The Project Gutenberg EBook of Mexican Copper Tools: the Use of Copper by
the Mexicans Before the Conquest; And The , by Philipp J. J. Valentini

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and most
other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms of
the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org.  If you are not located in the United States, you'll have
to check the laws of the country where you are located before using this ebook.

Title: Mexican Copper Tools: the Use of Copper by the Mexicans Before the Conquest; And The Katunes of Maya History, a Chapter in the Early History of Central America, With Special Reference to the Pio Perez Manuscript.

Author: Philipp J. J. Valentini

Translator: Stephen Salisbury, Jr.

Release Date: September 24, 2018 [EBook #57961]

Language: English

Character set encoding: UTF-8

*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK MEXICAN COPPER TOOLS; THE KATUNES ***




Produced by Richard Tonsing, Julia Miller and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from images generously made available
by The Internet Archive/American Libraries.)









                         MEXICAN COPPER TOOLS:
         THE USE OF COPPER BY THE MEXICANS BEFORE THE CONQUEST;

                                  AND

                      THE KATUNES OF MAYA HISTORY,
                            A CHAPTER IN THE
                   EARLY HISTORY OF CENTRAL AMERICA,
          WITH SPECIAL REFERENCE TO THE PIO PEREZ MANUSCRIPT.


                                   BY

                     PHILIPP J. J. VALENTINI, PH.D.

        [TRANSLATED FROM THE GERMAN, BY STEPHEN SALISBURY, JR.]


                           WORCESTER, MASS.:

                       PRESS OF CHARLES HAMILTON.

                                 1880.




 [PROCEEDINGS OF AMERICAN ANTIQUARIAN SOCIETY, APRIL 29, AND OCTOBER 21,
                                  1879.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------




                               CONTENTS.


                                                                   PAGE.

 MEXICAN COPPER TOOLS                                                  5

 THE KATUNES OF MAYA HISTORY                                          45

 NOTE BY COMMITTEE OF PUBLICATION                                     47

    _Introductory Remarks_                                            49

    _The Maya Manuscript and Translation_                             52

    _History of the Manuscript_                                       55

    _Elements of Maya Chronology_                                     60

    _Table of the 20 Days of the Maya Month_                          62

    _Table of the 18 Months of the Maya Year_                         63

    _Table of Maya Months and Days_                                   64

    _Translation of the Manuscript by Señor Perez_                    75

    _Discussion of the Manuscript_                                    77

    _Concluding Remarks_                                              92

    _Sections of the Perez Manuscript Expressed in Years_             96

    _Table of Maya Ahaues Expressed in Years_                        100

    _Results of the Chronological Investigation_                     102


                             Illustrations.

                                                                   PAGE.

 COPPER AXES IN THE ARMS OF TEPOZTLA, TEPOZTITLA AND                  12
   TEPOZCOLULA

 COPPER AXES, THE TRIBUTE OF CHILAPA                                  13

 COPPER AXES AND BELLS, THE TRIBUTE OF CHALA                          14

 MEXICAN GOLDSMITH SMELTING GOLD                                      18

 YUCATAN COPPER AXES                                                  30

 COPPER CHISEL FOUND IN OAXACA                                        33

 MEXICAN CARPENTER’S HATCHET                                          35

 COPPER AXE OF TEPOZCOLULA                                            36

 COPPER AXE OF TLAXIMALOYAN                                           36

 COPPER TOOL, FOUND BY DUPAIX IN OAXACA                               37

 MAYA AHAU KATUN WHEEL                                                72

 MAP SHOWING THE MOVEMENT OF THE MAYAS, AS STATED IN THE              78
   MANUSCRIPT

                                                                FOOTNOTE

 YUCATAN AXE, FROM LANDA                                              17

 INDIAN BATTLE AXE, FROM OVIEDO                                       19




                         MEXICAN COPPER TOOLS.

                   BY PHILIPP J. J. VALENTINI, PH.D.

             [_From the German, by Stephen Salisbury, Jr_.]

  [From Proceedings of American Antiquarian Society, April 30, 1879.]


The subject of prehistoric copper mining, together with the trade in the
metal and the process of its manufacture into implements and tools by
the red men of North America, has engaged the attention of numerous
investigators.

It was while listening to an interesting paper on prehistoric copper
mining at Lake Superior, read by Prof. Thomas Egleston before the
Academy of Sciences, of New York, March 9, 1879, that the writer was
reminded of a number of notes which he had made, some time previous, on
the same subject. These notes, however, covered a department of research
not included in the lecture of that evening. They were collected in
order to secure all the material extant in relation to the copper
products of Mexico and Central America. Nevertheless, this treatment of
a subject so germain to ours, could not help imparting an impulse to a
rapid comparison of the results of our own studies with those of others.
It brought to light striking agreements, as well as disagreements, which
existed in connection with the copper industries of the two widely
separated races. On the one hand it appeared that both of these ancient
people were unacquainted with iron; both were trained to the practise of
war, and, strange to say, both had invariably abstained from shaping
copper into any implement of war, the metal being appropriated solely to
the uses of peace.

But, on the other hand, whilst the northern red man attained to his
highest achievement in the production of the axe, the native of Central
America could boast of important additions to his stock of tools. He
possessed copper implements for tilling the fields, and knew the uses of
the chisel. Besides, when he wished to impart to the copper a definite
form, he showed a superior ingenuity. The northern Indian simply took a
stone, and by physical force hammered the metal into the required shape.
But the skilled workman of Tecoatega and Tezcuco, subjecting the native
copper to the heat of the furnace, cast the woodcutter’s axe in a mould,
as well as the bracelets and the fragile earrings that adorned the
princesses of Motezuma.

Therefore, in view of the recently increasing interest shown in
archæological circles, respecting everything relating to Mexico, the
writer deemed it worth while to revise the notes referred to.

As to the fact that the early Mexicans used instruments of copper, there
can be no doubt. The brevity of the statements respecting these
instruments is nevertheless very perplexing. The accounts of the Spanish
chroniclers, indeed, afford a certain degree of satisfaction, but they
leave us with a desire for fuller information. We should have felt more
grateful to these authorities if, out of the thousand and more chapters
devoted to the glorious deeds of the “Castellanos and Predicadores,”
they had written one in which they had introduced us to the Mexican
work-shop, exhibiting the weaver, the paper-maker, the carpenter, the
goldsmith, and the sculptor, and initiating us into the devices and
methods respectively employed; describing the form and shape of the
tools they used, and giving an account of all those little details which
are indispensable for achieving any technical or artistical results.

Yet, as it exists, the desired information is incomplete, and, for the
present at least, we can only deplore its brevity. In looking for aid
from other quarters we feel still more perplexed. No specimen of any
copper or bronze tool, apparently, has been preserved, and we are thus
prevented from determining whether the axes or chisels mentioned by the
Spanish authors were of the same shape as ours, or whether the natives
had contrived to give them a peculiar shape of their own. Finally, no
definite hint is given whether the kind of copper metal, which they
called “brass or bronze,” was copper with the natural admixtures of
gold, silver, tin, or other tempering elements, or whether the Mexicans
had themselves discovered the devices of hardening, and combined the
elements in due conventional proportions.

All these questions are of the highest interest, and claim an answer.
Our most renowned authorities for Mexican archæology and history,
Humboldt, Prescott and Brasseur de Bourbourg,[1] pass over this subject
without giving any desired satisfaction. They do not go much farther
than to repeat the statements furnished by the writers in the same
language as they received them.

These early statements will form the principal portion of the material
out of which we weave the text of our discussion. In order that the
reader may be better prepared to enter into our reasoning and judge of
the correctness of our conclusions, we shall, in translation, place the
statements of these authors below the text, in the form of foot-notes;
though, in cases where it is believed that the reader may desire to see
the originals, the Spanish text is given. Considerable help has been
derived from a source hitherto very little consulted, that of the native
paintings, which represent copper implements. As will be seen, they make
up, to a certain extent, for the deficiency of the latter in
collections. The cuts we give are of the same size as those we find
copied in the Kingsborough Collection.

We shall speak first of those localities whence the natives procured
their copper and their tin; secondly, of the manner in which they used
to melt metals; thirdly, consider whether the metal was moulded or
hammered; and fourthly, discuss the various forms into which their tools
appear to have been shaped.

That the natives of the New World collected and worked other metals
besides gold and silver, seems to have become known to the Spaniards
only after their entrance into the city of Mexico, A.D. 1521. During the
first epoch, in which the West India Islands and the Atlantic coasts of
South and Central America were explored and conquered, no specimen of
utensils, tools or weapons, made of brass or copper, was discovered to
be in the possession of the inhabitants. So also in Yucatan, Tlascalla,
and on the high plateau of Anahuac, where mechanics and industry were
found to have a home, and where the native warrior exhibited his person
in the most gorgeous military attire, their swords, javelins, lances and
arrows, showed that concerning the manufacture of arms they had, so to
speak, not yet emerged from the Stone-Age. And finally, when brass,
copper, tin, and even lead, were seen exposed for sale in the stalls of
the market-place of Mexico, it was noticed to the great astonishment of
the conquerors, that these metals had exclusively served the natives for
the manufacture of mere instruments of peace.

The Spanish leader communicates these facts to his emperor in these few
words:[2]—“Besides all kind of merchandise, I have seen for sale
trinkets made of gold and silver, of lead, bronze, copper and tin.”
Almost the same expressions are used in the memoirs of his companion,
Bernal Diaz de Castillo:[3]—“And I saw _axes_ of _bronze_, and _copper_,
and _tin_.” Under the influences of such a revelation the hearts of the
distressed Spaniards must have been elated with joy and courage, when
they saw not only a prospect of replacing the arms which their small
band had lost, but also the source from which to equip the faithful
Indian allies of Tlascala in an efficient manner. Immediately after
having taken firm foothold on the conquered ground, Cortes ordered the
goldsmiths of Tezcuco to cast eight thousand arrow-heads of copper, and
these weapons were made ready for delivery within a single week.[4] At
the same time, too, the hope to have a supply of cannon made was
presented to the conqueror’s mind. The only question was from whence to
procure a sufficient quantity of the material necessary to carry out
this design.

Copper is found to-day in nearly all the states of the Mexican Republic.
We abstain, therefore, from quoting the localities. But as far as our
information goes, no writer or historian has stated where Cortes and
before him the natives themselves found it. To investigate this matter
might be of direct utility, at least. We intend to use a source hitherto
little explored, but which for the history of Mexico is of greatest
importance, the picture tables, called the Codices Mexicana. These
collections contain representations of their historical, religious,
social and commercial life. The writer of this article has made himself
familiar with these sources, expecting to find in them disclosures about
the location of the ancient copper mines, as soon as he could discover
what _copper_ was called in the language of the natives. The answer
comes in this connection.

The Mexicans had the habit of giving a name to their towns and districts
from the objects which were found in abundance in their neighborhood.
Therefore, copper regions ought to bear a name which related to this
mineral.

In Lord Kingsborough’s Collection, Vol. V., pages 115–124, there are two
printed alphabetical indices of the names of all the towns, whose
hieroglyphic symbol, or, as we term it, whose coat of arms, is
represented in the Codex Mendoza, to be found in Vol. I. of the same
collection, pages 1–72. This Codex is arranged in three sections. The
first shows the picture-annals of the ancient Aztec-Kings, and the
cities which they conquered (pages 1–17). The second reproduces again
the coats of arms of these cities, but gives in addition the pictures of
all the objects of tribute which these cities had to pay. The third
section exhibits an illustration of how Mexican children were trained
from infancy up to their 15th year. Sections first and second will claim
our interest, exclusively.

Copper, we learn from the Dictionary of Molina[5] was named in the
language of the Nahoa speaking natives, _tepuzque_.[6] Upon searching in
the above quoted Codices, we find three names of towns which are
compounds of this word _tepuzque_. Their names appear in the following
form: Tepoztla, Vol. I., page 8, fig. 2, and the same name on page 26,
fig. 13. Tepoztitla, page 42, fig. 10, and Tepozcolula, page 43, fig. 3.

The cuts 1, 2, 3 and 4, are faithful reproductions of the coats of arms
belonging to these towns.

[Illustration:

  CUT 1.

  Tepoztla.
]

[Illustration:

  CUT 2.

  Tepoztla.
]

[Illustration:

  CUT 3.

  Tepoztitla.
]

[Illustration:

  CUT 4.

  Tepozcolula.
]

There cannot be any doubt as to the meaning of the objects represented
by these pictures. They mean axes. Their handles appear in a curved
form, the blades at their cutting edges are somewhat rounded, and the
tenons of the blades are inserted below the top of the handles. Both
handles and blades are painted in a reddish brown color, the wood as
well as the copper.

The differences between the pictured representations are the following:
Cuts 1, 2, and 4, show the axes growing out from the top of a mountain,
whilst the axe of cut 3 appears by itself. Further, the axes of cuts 1
and 2, those of _Tepoztla_, show something applied to the handle, which
in cut 1 we recognize to be a single bow-knot, and in cut 2 the same
girdle with a bow-knot, yet wound about a dress of white color,
embroidered with red spots. A notable difference, however, will still be
noticed between the form of the axes in cuts 1, 2, 3, and that in cut 4,
or _Tepozcolula_. We shall speak of this latter, on a later page, as an
instrument very closely related to the other axes.

By means of these pictures we arrive at the knowledge of the following
facts: Copper was undoubtedly found in the neighborhood of the three
named cities. Moreover, copper in these cities was wrought into
axe-blades. Finally, the axe will turn out to be the symbol used for
copper, in general.

Let us accept these facts and see whether this picture for the symbol
for copper does not return on other pages of the same Codex, and thereby
gain more information on the subject. We notice the picture of the
axe-blade reappearing on the pages 39 and 42. Both happen to bear the
same number, that of figure 20, and both belong to the same section of
the Codex which contains the pictures of the tributes paid by the
conquered towns. Cut 5 is a reproduction of fig. 20, page 39, Codex
Mendoza. It shows the metal axe without a handle hanging on a thread
from a line upon which we see five flags are painted. Moreover, at the
left side is a little picture. A flag in Mexican symbol writing
signifies the number twenty.[7]

[Illustration:

  CUT 5.

  Town of Chilapa.
]

We may therefore conclude that by this combination one hundred copper
axes are indicated. The question now arises, what city may have paid
this tribute of copper axes? The painter has not only omitted to connect
directly these flags and axe with one of the various coats of arms that
are grouped in their neighborhood, but even, if he had done so, the
student, still unacquainted with the art of explaining pictures, would
be unable to make out the name of the city, embodied in the picture of
the coat of arms. We will overcome this difficulty by consulting the
interpretation of the Codex Mendoza, which is printed on the pages 39–89
of Vol. V., Kingsb. Collection. There, on page 73, the suggestion is
given that the tribute objects refer to the town of Chilapa, whose coat
of arms (fig. 2), as we shall notice on the cut, consists of a tub
filled with water, and on whose surface the _chilli_-fruit appears,
better known as the Spanish red pepper _chilli_, red pepper, _atl_,
water, _pa_, in or above. For this reason we learn that the town of
_Chilapa_ was tributary in 100 axes.

[Illustration:

  CUT 6.

  Town of Chala.
]

In like manner we may proceed with the definition of the picture found
on page 42, fig. 20. The copy given in cut 6, shows 80 blades of copper
axes in fig. 20, and besides 40 little copper bells in fig. 19, and the
interpretation, Vol. V., page 76, informs us that it was the town of
Chala, fig. 26, which had to pay this kind of tribute.

Therefore, the towns of Tepoztla, Tepoztitla, Tepozcolula, and, besides,
those of Chilapa and Xala, must be considered to have been connected, in
one way or the other, with copper mining, copper manufacture, and the
tribute of the same.[8]

A few words on the procuring of the metal from localities where it was
discovered by the natives, may find a suitable place here. Mining, as we
understand it to-day, or as the Spaniards understood it already at the
time of the conquest, was not practised by the natives. Gold and silver
were not broken from the entrails of the rocks. They were collected from
the _placeres_ by a process of mere washing. No notice at all has come
down to us how copper was gathered. We can, however, easily imagine,
that whenever by a chance outcropping a copper vein or stratum became
visible, they probably broke off the ore or mineral to a depth easy to
be reached, and only selected the most solid pieces. It is evident that
the results of such superficial mining must have been very trifling,
certainly not greater than would barely suffice for the fabrication of
the most necessary tools. Herein we will find an explanation, why this
people, though possessing the metal and the technical skill,
nevertheless did not use it for the manufacture of arms. The production
could not have been abundant enough to supply the whole nation or even
the professional soldier with metal weapons. They preferred therefore,
to continue in the ignorance of the Stone-Age.

Where the Mexicans found the _lead_ that was seen in the market-place,
nay, even the purposes for which they might have used it, we have been
entirely unable to learn. _Lead_ in the language of the Nahoas, is
called _temeztli_ (telt stone, metzli moon), moon stone, a name
picturesque and characteristic, as were most of those which stand in the
list of objects that belong to the realm of nature. Not a single picture
referring to lead can be found in the Mexican Codices. The same must
also be said of _tin_, the name of which was _amochictl_, a word
seemingly Nahoatl in form, but whose root was probably derived from a
foreign language. It will be gratifying, however, to learn from the pen
of the great conqueror Cortes himself, where the natives, and afterwards
his followers, found their _tin_. To quote the language of Cortes,[9] “I
am without artillery and weapons, though I have often sent money to
obtain them. But as nothing drives a man to expedients so much as
distress, and as I had already lost the hope that Your Royal Majesty
might be informed of this, I have mustered all my strength to the utmost
in order that I might not lose what I have already obtained with so much
danger and sacrifice of life. I have therefore arranged to have men
immediately sent out in search of copper, and in order to obtain it
without delay I have expended a great amount of money. As soon as I had
brought together a sufficient quantity, I procured a workman, who
luckily was with us, to cast several cannons. Two half-culverines are
now ready, and we have succeeded as far as their size would permit. The
copper was indeed all ready for use, but I had no _tin_. Without _tin_ I
could do nothing, and it caused me a great deal of trouble to find a
sufficient quantity of it for these cannons, for some of our men, who
had tin plates or other vessels of that kind, were not willing to part
with them at any rate. For this reason I have sent out people in all
directions searching for tin, and the Lord, who takes care of
everything, willed graciously that when our distress had reached its
highest point, I found among the natives of _Tachco_[10] small pieces of
tin, very thin and in the form of coins.[11] Making further
investigations I found that this tin, there and in other provinces was
used for money, also that this tin was obtained from the same province
of _Tachco_, the latter being at a distance of 26 leagues from this
town. I also discovered the locality itself of these mines. The
Spaniards whom I despatched with the necessary tools brought me
_samples_ of it, and I then gave them orders that a sufficient quantity
should be procured, and, though it is a work of much labor, I shall be
supplied with the necessary quantity that I require. While searching for
tin, according to a report from those skilled in the subject, a rich
vein of iron-ore was also discovered.

Now supplied with tin I can make the desired cannons, and daily I try to
increase the number, so that now I have already five pieces ready, two
half-culverines, two which are still smaller, one field-piece and two
_sacres_, the same that I brought with me, and another half-culverine
which I purchased from the estate of the Adelantado Ponce de Leon.”

In the above report of Cortes, therefore, we are informed of the name of
the locality where tin was found and dug by the natives. So we have the
facts established that both copper and tin[12] were dug by the natives,
that there was a traffic, in them at that time, that Cortes himself
succeeded in getting at the mines from which they were extracted, and
that he had not been mistaken in his former recognition of their display
for sale in the public market.

But before these ores could be shaped into the above named commercial
forms, it is clear that they still needed to undergo a process of
smelting. As to the peculiar mode of smelting pursued by the natives, we
have not been able to find any distinct reference in the writings of the
chroniclers. It does not appear that the ancient Mexicans understood the
method of the Peruvians of melting their copper in furnaces exposed to
the wind on the lofty sierras, but we may form for ourselves an idea of
how they proceeded from a picture in Codex Mendoza, page 71, fig. 24.

Cut 7 gives a faithful reproduction.

[Illustration:

  CUT 7.

  Smelting Gold.
]

In the midst of an earthen tripod, surrounded by smoke and flames, we
perceive a small disk of a yellow color. Our attention is called to the
peculiar mark imprinted on the surface of the disk. Upon searching in
Lord Kingsborough’s Collection, Vol. V., page 112, plate 71, where the
interpretation of the little picture is given, we learn, that the man
sitting by the tripod, is meant to be a goldsmith. Hence we conclude the
disk must be understood to mean a round piece of gold, and that very
probably the mark printed on it, was the usual symbolical sign for
gold.[13] At the right of the tripod sits a man wrapped in his mantle,
no doubt the master of the work-shop; for the addition of a flake flying
from his mouth, as the typical sign for language or command, gives us a
right to suppose that we have before us the so-called _temachtiani_, or
master of the trade. At the left side crouches the apprentice,
_tlamachtilli_. He holds in his right hand a staff, one end of which is
in his mouth and the other is placed in the crucible. _Tlapitzqui_, in
the Nahoatl language means at the same time a flute player and a melter
of metal. This etymological version therefore conveys the idea, that the
staff held by the smelter signifies a pipe or tube used for increasing
heat by blowing the fire, as the staff is similar to a long pipe or
flute and is held in the mouth of the workman. In his left hand he holds
a similar staff, but there is no means of recognizing whether it is a
stick for stirring the embers, or a tube to be used alternately with the
other. Now, we shall be permitted to draw a conclusion from this process
of smelting gold as to the manner of smelting copper. The process must
have been exactly the same with both. For, if the Mexican goldsmith,
with the aid of a blowpipe, was able to increase the heat of the fire to
such a degree as to make gold fusible, a heat which requires 1,100° C.,
he cannot have found greater difficulties in melting copper, which
requires nearly the same degree of heat; and tin, which is far more
easily fusible, could have been treated in the same way.

Melting was followed by casting into forms or moulds, and these moulds
must have been of stone. This might be concluded from the language of
Torquemada and Gomara.[14] The words “_by placing one stone above
another one_” are too clear to leave the least doubt as to what the
author meant. This process will account for the absolute identity we had
the opportunity to observe existing between certain trinkets of the same
class, coming chiefly from Nicaragua and Chiriqui. No specimens of a
mould, however, have come to our view, or have been heard of as existing
in any collection, probably because whenever they were met by the
“_huaqueros_,” they did not recognize them as such, and threw them away.

The scanty knowledge we have of all these interesting technical details
will not be wondered at, if we consider that we derive it from no other
class of writers than from unlearned soldiers, and monks unskilled in
the practical matters of this world. But still, the principal reason for
this want of information is that the Mexican artist was as jealous in
keeping his devices secret, as the European. They also formed guilds,
into which the apprentices were sworn, and their tongues were bound by
fear as well as interest. Let us quote only one instance. The Vice-King
Mendoza reports to the Emperor[15] that he offered to pardon one of
those workmen, if he would disclose how he was able to counterfeit the
Spanish coins in so striking a way. But the native preferred to remain
silent and was put to death.

Here is the place for asking the question: Would not the early Mexicans,
aside from their practice of casting the above metals, have employed
also that of hammering? Our reply would be emphatically in the negative,
if taking the expression “hammering” in its strict meaning, which is
that of working with the hammer. The writers of the Conquest have left
the most explicit testimony, that the natives, only after the arrival of
the Spaniards became acquainted with this instrument, and with the art
of using it for working high reliefs out of a metal sheet. Moreover, the
native vocabulary has no word for the metal hammer as it is commonly
understood. Yet the wooden mallet was known, the so-called
_quauhololli_, and used by the sculptors. In the gradual education of
mankind in technical knowledge, beating of metals, of course, must have
preceded casting. The ancestors of the early Mexicans, at a certain
epoch, stood on the same low stage of workmanship as their more distant
northern brethren. But when the inventor of the mould had taught them
how to multiply the objects most in demand, by the means of this easy,
rapid and almost infallible operation, we must not imagine that he had
done away entirely with the old practice of beating and stretching metal
with a stone. The practice, in certain cases, would have been
maintained: as for instance, when a diadem, a shield, or a breastplate
was to be shaped, and on occasions when the object to be made required
the use of a thin flat sheet of metal. Such objects are not only
described by the writers, but are also represented by the native
painters. A specimen of such a kind is mentioned, which on account of
its extraordinary beauty, workmanship and value left a deep impression
on the conquerors. It was the present which Motezuma made to Cortes at
his landing, on the _Culhua_ coast, “the two gold and silver wheels;”
the one, as they said, representing the Sun, the other the Moon.
According to the measures they took of them, these round discs must have
had a diameter of more than five feet. It is preposterous to imagine
that round sheets of this size should have been the product of
casting.[16]

We pass on now to discuss the various tools which we have reason to
think were cast in copper or in bronze, by the early Mexicans.

The _axe_ stands in the first place. Cortes, we shall remember, omitted
to specify any of the objects which he saw exposed for sale in the
market-place. Not so his companion, Bernal Diaz. He, after a lapse of 40
years, when occupied with the writing of his memoirs, has no
recollection of other tools, which he undoubtedly must have seen, except
the much admired bronze axes. Specimens of these were sent over to Spain
in the same vessel on which the above mentioned presents to the Emperor
were shipped. At their arrival at Palos, Petrus Martyr of the Council
House of the Indies was one of the first to examine the curiosities sent
from the New World, and to gather from the lips of the bearers their
verbal comments. His remarks on the axes he had seen, are “with their
bronze axes and hatchets, cunningly tempered, they (the Indians) fell
the trees.” There are three expressions in this passage which will claim
our attention. First, we learn that two classes of axes were sent over,
one of which Martyr recognized as a “_secūris_” the other as a
“_dolabra_” hence a common axe, and another which was like a pick or a
hoe. Further on we shall give an illustration of these axes, taken from
the pictures of the natives, when we are to recur again to this subject.
Our author, in the second place, describes the two axes as of bronze,
for this is the English rendering of the Latin expression:
_aurichalcea_. Thirdly, we learn, that the blades were “cunningly
tempered” or “_argute temperata_.” This language requires explanation.

The attentive reader will remember what has been said respecting Cortes
and Bernal Diaz, whether they recognized the bronze objects in the
market as a mixture of copper and tin, of themselves, or whether they
had been inquisitive enough to ask for information, and in consequence
learned that it was a common practice among the workmen to mix these two
metals, in certain proportions, in order to produce a harder quality of
copper. The latter hypothesis seems to gain a certain corroboration from
Martyr’s language. For there cannot be the slightest doubt as to what he
meant when putting down the words “cunningly tempered.” He wished to
express the idea, that he had positive grounds for the conviction, that
the metal of which the axes were made, was not a _natural_ but an
_artificial_ product. What grounds for this conviction he had, he does
not, however, communicate to his reader.

Our author has the well deserved reputation of being one of the fullest
authorities for all that concerns the discovery and conquest of the
western hemisphere. Of all, however, that he has written, the pages
containing the landing of Cortes in Yucatan, and the entrance of the
Spaniards in the capital of Motezuma, appear to have been the most
attractive to the general reader and the student; these pages being torn
and soiled in the existing copies of his original Latin, as well as of
its translation into foreign languages. We mention this circumstance,
for it is not without a certain bearing upon our question. It proves how
confidently the reading public has drawn upon the author’s statement,
and how eagerly students have sought to digest his amazing accounts,
quite unsuspicious, however, of the errors in dates as well as facts;
admiring rather than criticizing the pompous phraseology of his mediæval
Latin, or his often very suggestive but somewhat flighty speculations.
In Petrus Martyr, therefore, we may recognize the originator of the
widespread theory that the Mexicans possessed the secret of
manufacturing bronze in the highest perfection and in accordance with
metallurgical rules. We are, however, forewarned. The statement is of
importance, and must be weighed before accepting it. We fear it will
fail like many genial but unsupported inspirations, of which our author
was susceptible. If we ask whence he derived the notion that the bronze
tools were “argute temperata” we shall find that he failed to give any
authority. Petrus Martyr, whom we often find quoting the full names and
special circumstances by the aid of which he gathered the material for
his historical letters, does not follow this laudable practice on this
occasion, even though the matter was one of importance to investigators
like himself. For these instruments of bronze, and many other tools sent
over, must have been, in another way, still more interesting to him than
the objects of industry themselves. These tools afforded the most
palpable proof of an independent industry practised by that strange
people beyond the sea; they were a key perhaps also to the riddle, how
it was possible to perform those marvels of workmanship. This silence of
Petrus Martyr respecting the details of the “_argutia_” which he
professes that the natives employed in manufacturing their bronze is so
much the more striking, since we find him enlarging a long while upon
their manufacture of paper; and he shows himself correctly informed
respecting that process. It is clear that the one was as well worth
detailing as the other. Therefore we cannot help expressing the
suspicion, that whilst he had correct information respecting the one, he
had none respecting the other.

It would, however, be venturing too much to reject so important a
statement merely on the grounds alleged. In order to save it, we could
fairly say, that he omitted his references through carelessness.
Accepting this position, let us then seek to ascertain, who his
informants might have been, and chiefly inquire what they were able to
tell him about the manufacture of bronze in Mexico.

The circumstances accompanying the arrival of the precious gifts from
the capital at the Camp of Cortes, their shipping and unlading at Palos,
and their registration at the custom-house, are perfectly known. From
them we gather the following points: First, no Spaniard had yet set foot
in the interior, they were still loitering on the shores of Vera Cruz,
where the embassies of Motezuma made their appearance. Hence, they were
still shut off from the opportunity of inspecting the workshops of
Tezcuco, Mexico and Azcapotzalco, the centres from which this special
class of merchandise was spread over the whole isthmus. Cortes, who had
many reasons for hastening the transfer of the precious treasures to the
ships, without much delay despatched one of them, intrusting two of his
friends, Montejo and Puerto Carrero, with the mission of presenting to
the Emperor the report of his startling discoveries and the presents
coming from the new vassal-king. Petrus Martyr, indeed, mentions these
two cavaliers, as being Cortes’ messengers, and it is highly probable
that it was from their lips that he gathered among other correct
information also that about the manufacture of paper. The special kind
of paper he describes, is one which was manufactured and used
exclusively on the coast of Yucatan and Vera Cruz, not the paper of the
maguey-plant which grows on the high plateaus, but that of the
amatl-tree, a native of the tierra caliente. Being in the very country
where this kind of paper was manufactured, the Spanish writers,
therefore, had the opportunity of hearing how paper was made, even,
possibly, of seeing the process itself, which they had not enjoyed in
the case of bronze. Could they have got the information from the mouths
of the embassadors? We know they held shyly aloof. The intercourse was
very ceremonious, and difficult besides, since the conversation passed
through the two native languages, and we cannot fairly imagine that the
technical question of manufacturing bronze should have become one of the
topics of inquiry. Moreover, we do not believe that special attention
would have been paid to these bronze implements, if we consider the
overpowering impression which the richness and rareness of the other
objects must have caused them. Finally, would they not have believed the
yellow metal to be gold? since they dreamt of nothing else, and were far
from imagining that the opulent ruler of Mexico would have made their
Emperor a present of poor bronze tools.

We are not able to offer any conclusive evidence against the remarkable
statement made by Petrus Martyr. We are fully aware how many positive
proofs are required to render it totally invalid. But we deemed it to be
our duty not to withhold from our readers the many grave doubts we
entertain against its too ready acceptance. We have still to add, that
this statement stands isolated and without support in the whole
literature of the Conquest. His contemporary writers, indeed,
occasionally speak of copper axes that were tempered by an alloy. None
of them, however, goes so far as he, to impute to the early Mexicans the
preparation of an artificial bronze, as was so manifestly implied by the
words, _argute temperatis_.

The passages which speak about the axes used by the natives are cited
below[17]. Three kinds are mentioned, stone, copper and bronze axes. The
first of them must have been in use among such tribes as lived outside
of the circle of Mexican trade and civilization, or among those which
intentionally held themselves aloof. For its retention and use the
complete absence of ores in certain districts may have had a decided
influence, as for instance was the case with the peninsula of
Yucatan.[18] The shape of the Yucatecan blades and that of the handle
and the adjustment of both, at least as far as is shown (see cut 8) by
the pictures of the Dresden Codex, which are of genuine Yucatecan
origin, appear to have been identical with those of the interior of
Anahuac.

[Illustration:

  CUT 8.

  Axes of Yucatan.
]

Among the copper and bronze axes noted below, those of Nicaragua appear
to have been of an uncommonly rich alloy of gold. The reader will smile
at Herrera’s account of the shrewdness shown by the native ladies in
keeping for themselves the plates of pure gold they were attired with,
and burdening the soldiers of Gonzales with heavy metal axes.[19] The
axes mentioned by Gomara, undoubtedly came from the mines of Anahuac,
since their alloy was not only gold, but tin and silver. Gomara is the
first who notes the chisel and the borer.

Let us further ascertain, what Father Sahagun[20] is able to tell us
about Mexican metal tools. As a teacher of the young native generation,
he made it his life’s task to teach his pupils all that concerned the
religious belief, the history and the industry of their forefathers. We
extract from Lib. 10, Cap. 7, the following passages and translate them
as literally as possible: “The goldsmith is an expert in the selection
of good metal. He knows how to make of it whatever he likes and does it
with skill and elegance. He is conversant with all kinds of devices, and
all this he does with composure and accuracy. (_Con medida y compas_).
He knows how to purify the ore, and makes plates of silver as well as of
gold from the cast metal. He knows likewise how to make moulds of carbon
(_moldes de carbon_), and how to put the metal into the fire in order to
smelt it. The unskilful goldsmith does not know how to purify the
silver, he leaves it mixed up with the ashes, and has his sly ways in
taking and stealing something of the silver.” Further on in Cap. 24: “he
who is a trader in needles (_agujas_), casts, cleans, and, polishes them
well; he makes also bells (_cascabeles_), filters (_aguijillos_),
punches (_punzones_), nails (_clavos_), axes (_hachas_), hatchets
(_destrales_), cooper’s adzes (_azuelas_), and chisels (_escoplos_).”

In these two passages is summed up all that we sought to gather
piecewise from the writers of the Conquest, on our special question. A
few new features, however, are cropping out in this enumeration of
implements, which give rise to the suspicion, that the goldsmith is
described, not as he worked before the year 1521, but as he had
perfected himself and enlarged his technical knowledge through the
intervention of Spanish mechanics, in the year of Sahagun’s writing,
about 1550. We mean the moulds of carbon, the nails,[21] and the
cooper’s adze, of which we read in Sahagun exclusively, and of which no
pictures or other evidences of their ante-Spanish existence have been
preserved.

Pictures of needles frequently occur in the Mexican paintings. But it is
understood that they are without an eye, the introduction of our sewing
needle having been an actual revelation to the natives. The head of a
Mexican needle, or rather pin, was full, and split like that of an
animal’s bone. The borer, certainly, had no handle or spiral point. Of
all these stitching, piercing and drilling instruments nothing has been
preserved, in kind.

[Illustration:

  CUT 9.

  Copper Chisel found in Oaxaca.
]

A chisel of copper was, however, discovered by Captain Dupaix[22] near
the city of Antequera (in Oaxaca). We give a faithful fac-simile of it
in cut 9. It is described by the discoverer in the following words:
“There are also many chisels of red copper found in the neighborhood of
this city, a specimen of which I possess, and will show in the
illustrations. Its length is seven inches, and the thickness is one
square inch (_sic_), and one side is edged, and this edge is a little
dull, showing that it had been in use. We do not know the temper they
gave to these instruments in order to employ them in their labors and in
their arts, or to give the wood or possibly the stone a regular form.”

We do not know if this chisel is still preserved in the Museum of
Mexico, to which it was presented by Captain Dupaix. If not, we hope to
be somewhat indemnified by another specimen of bronze chisel, of which
we are now in pursuit, and which according to description is similar in
form and composition to the one spoken of. Señor Andrez Aznar Perez, now
in New York, ploughed up such a tool about twelve years ago, on his
plantation near the river Tzompan in Tabasco, at the depth of nearly 12
inches. It was entirely solid, and had a slightly rounded edge, about an
inch in length, and he offers to have it brought from Yucatan for
further examination.

From the illustration of Captain Dupaix and the description of Mr.
Perez, we can for the moment only conclude that the ancient Mexican
chisel was similar in its form to that which our stone-masons now make
use of.

In regard to the form of ancient Mexican axes, we gave a general idea at
the beginning of this essay, but we have still several details to
discuss. In the illustrations the curved wooden handle will no doubt
appear remarkable. The Mexican painters were such faithful imitators of
what they saw, that we cannot presume they would have indulged in what
was an essential alteration of the object to be copied. If the handle of
the axe was curved, they would have copied it curved, and thus it
appears not only in the Mexican but also in the Yucatecan picture
codices.

Those acquainted with the practical handling of axes, and with felling
trees, know that a curved handle must increase the swinging power of an
axe to a considerable degree, and to have used this form is a remarkable
instance of Mexican technical craft and cunning. It would be worth while
to investigate whether this use of a curved handle was exclusively
confined to the natives of Central America, or had passed beyond its
boundaries, north as well as south.

We further learn from the pictures, that not the blade of the axe, but
the handle had an opening at a certain distance from the top, into which
the blade was fitted.

The specimens represented in the cuts 1, 3, 5, 6, 8, appear to be common
chopping axes. In the coat of arms of the town of Tepozcolula (see cut
4), however, as already pointed out, the form of the axe differs from
those of Tepoztla and Tepoztitlan. In order to obtain a correct idea of
these particular kinds of axes, we invite the reader to compare it with
another picture (Cod. Mendoza, page 71, fig. 77), and which we give in
cut 10. The shape of the axes themselves are evidently alike, in the one
as well as in the other picture, only that in cut 10 the axe is not in
connection with the coat of arms, but is held by a man who is at work
dropping or squaring the branch of a tree, from which chips are flying
off. This kind of axe, evidently, served a different purpose from those
chopping axes of Tepoztla. It was the hatchet used by the carpenter.
Thus reads the explanation given in Kingsb. Coll., Vol. V., page 112.

[Illustration:

  CUT 10.

  Mexican carpenter.
]

This instrument is of the most extravagant form. Were it not for the
authentic interpretation of the picture and the accessories we should
not be able to make out what kind of object it represented, and least of
all that it was a hatchet.

Let us examine its construction. The wooden handle has the shape of all
the Mexican and Yucatecan axes,—that of a somewhat curved club. But
instead of its being chopped off at the top, the handle extends farther
and is bent down to an angle of about 45 degrees. On the head of this
bent top a deep notch is visible, into which the blade of a little axe
is fixed, being fastened by a tongue or string wound three times around.
Thus, when a blow was struck, we can presume, the head of the tenon
would not move, from the resistance it met from the bottom of the notch.
Thus much the picture proves, and we cannot learn anything more of this
instrument. We only presume that in order to get a durable handle, they
sought a curved branch, and that this branch came generally from one
particular class of trees. The word _Tepozcolula_ signifies, properly,
the town in which copper was bent, _tepuzque_ (copper), and coloa (to
bend), but we learn from our picture, that the natives understood these
words to signify the town where the curved handles were manufactured,
which seems to be corroborated by another picture which we found for the
coat of arms of the town of Tepozcolula, Cod. Mendoza, pl. 45, fig. 5,
in which the painter (see cut 11) has laid a special stress upon this
curving of the _handle_, by shaping the end of the handle into an
exaggerated spiral form.

[Illustration:

  CUT 11.

  Tepozcolula.
]

There existed also a town, in which carpenter’s work was the chief
occupation of the inhabitants. This is to be inferred from the coat of
arms belonging to the town of Tlaximaloyan, cut 12, Cod. Mendoza, pl.
10, fig. 5.

_Tlaxima_ signifies to work as a carpenter, and _tlaximalli_ a chip of
wood. The “_little_” axe of copper, found by Dupaix at Quilapa, and of
which he gives an illustration not differing from the known shapes of
all axes, is very probably a specimen of this carpenter’s axe (see
Dupaix, Vol. II., 3d Expedition, Planche II., fig. 4).

[Illustration:

  CUT 12.

  Town of Tlaximaloyan.
]

It is but natural to think that being in possession of the large
chopping axe, the invention of the small hatchet would have become
incomparably easier than that of this awkward carpenter’s tool. We are,
however, too little informed to judge or to criticize its construction
and rather incline to think that these people had reasons of their own
for giving it the form it has. It must have been the one which Sahagun
called “destral,” or carpenter’s hatchet.[23]

We can still offer another form of copper tool once used by the natives.
Dupaix[24] discovered the original near the same town where he had found
the chisel. Below is a copy of his drawing in cut 13:

[Illustration:

  CUT 13.

  Copper Tool, found by Dupaix in Oaxaca.
]

The edge of this tool will be noticed to have a curve belonging to the
circumference of a circle. The cutting blade is 10 inches wide. Like the
axes, it has a tenon by which it could be fastened to an opening in a
wooden handle. It will appear from closer description that it was too
thin to have been used for heavy operations. Let us consult the
narration of the explorer: “This instrument is of red and very pure
copper, and when touched it gives out a sonorous sound. The metal is
_not hammered_ but _cast_. It is of not much weight, symmetrical, and of
graceful shape. The contours are regular and resemble those of an
anchor. It is flat on both sides, the portion serving as a handle (or
tenon) is a little thicker and slopes towards the edge, which cuts as
well as a chisel. An Indian, named Pascual Baltolano, from the village
of Zocho Xocotlan, half a mile distant from this city of Antequera, a
few months ago, when tilling his field met with an earthen pot which
contained 23 dozen of these blades, their quality, thickness and size
being a little different from each other. This gives rise to the
supposition that there existed various moulds, by means of which these
specimens were multiplied and cast. They did not differ greatly from
that which I possess. We meet here with a great difficulty, which is to
determine to what usage these instruments were destined,—to agriculture
or mechanics, as instruments of sacrifice or a variety of offensive
weapon that was fixed in the point of a lance? That which is certain,
however, is that they are found in abundance in this province and that
merchants buy these metals from the Indians and rank them high on
account of the superior quality of the ore.” On proceeding in his
expedition, the same author reaches the village of Mitla, where in the
parochial church he receives the following disclosure on the purpose of
the before-mentioned tools: “One day, when hearing mass in Mitla, I
noticed an ancient picture, which represented (San.) Isidro, the patron
of the laborers, and saw him painted holding in his right hand a pole
armed with the problematic blade. I therefrom conclude, that like the
ancient Indians, the native laborers of to-day have adopted this
instrument as a distinctive mark of their profession, and that instead
of being an instrument of death it must be viewed as one for giving
life.” This explanation agrees satisfactorily with what could be
inferred from its size and its peculiar shape, and if we imagine the
tenon bent and in this form fastened to the top of a pole we should
possibly have discovered a certain garden instrument of which the
Spaniards spoke as always used by the natives, the _uictli_, or coa,
hoe. It was never described in particular, nor could we discover it in
the pictures, but Molina’s translation of _uictli_ with “_coa_” which is
hoe, tells the story.

There is still something more in this passage of Dupaix, that is worth
considering. Among the 23 dozen of the instruments contained in the
earthen pot, and of which he was informed that they were similar in
shape to that which he had found, it is clear that there must have been
a great number of very diminutive size; otherwise we cannot conceive how
so many of them would have been placed in the pot, at all. Let us take
advantage of this suggestion and suppose Dupaix’s engraving, cut 13,
reduced to a diminutive size. We make thereby a little figure, and we
cannot deny that it looks like a Greek _Tau_. Of such a _Greek Tau_,
formed from copper, and used by the natives as money at the time of the
Conquest mention is made by the chroniclers.[25] They may be right, but
with the understanding that these copper pieces were not manufactured
for the purpose of serving as coin, but as tools, which of course, came
into market and became objects of barter, as we read the copper bells
also did, besides grains of the cacao fruit, bales of cotton, axes and
other articles of common necessity.

Thus much, and no more, we were able to glean from the early literature
of the Conquest and from the paintings of the natives. As we anticipated
at the outset, the testimony bearing on copper industry among the early
Mexicans is altogether incomplete and lacks that fulness of description
in which those writers indulge when treating topics of social customs,
religious rites, or monstrous idols. In but few instances the pictures
gathered from the codices illustrate the dim suggestions and the
doubtful wording of the Spanish text, so as to give at least a general
idea of the localities where the copper ores were obtained, of the
process of smelting, of the moulds that were used, and the objects or
tools that were produced by these means.

One point however we think we have come very near deciding, and one
which when collecting our notes was constantly in mind, namely: Whether
the Mexican bronze was to be viewed as an artificial or a natural
product? There was a great doubt concerning this question caused by the
first notices respecting the composition of the bronze. The expressions
of Cortes and Bernal Diaz were of so condensed a character that we were
at a loss how to reduce them to their elementary meaning, and the doubt
was not removed when examining apart each of the subsequent writers on
the same subject. But when putting their statements together, a certain
basis, at least, could be obtained, from which to deduce a settled
opinion. From the combined statements we learned that the bronze found
among the natives contained a rich basis of copper, which was mixed
either with gold, or with silver, or with tin, and we might infer from
this variety of admixtures, that the natives manufactured their _laton_
according to a fixed method. But, on the contrary, as the three metals
named are always found to be the steady components of Mexican copper
ore, we are led to the presumption, that these ores were worked in their
unaltered condition, just as nature had produced them. It is not indeed
meant to teach thereby, that the native did not appreciate the fact,
that copper of a deep red was softer than that of a lighter color.
Whenever they had to manufacture a chisel and had a choice between the
two qualities, we are certain they would have employed the lighter metal
for this purpose. But we hardly believe that they considered the light
metal to be a composition of the red colored copper with either silver,
gold or tin. This belief would involve a presupposition of metallurgical
science in the early Mexicans, that we have not the least knowledge they
had ever attained to. On the other hand, however, there is a strong
reason for the belief, that they recognized this light metal to be
related to the red copper. For if they had thought this bronze or
_laton_ to be a separate kind of metal, they would have had a separate
name for it, as they had for all the other metals, from the gold down to
the tin, and even to the cinnabar. Bronze would have been called
_tepuzque_ as was copper, but probably—with the addition descriptive
either of color or of hardness.

We were unable to discover one single hint, from which to infer that
they possessed the knowledge of hardening copper by dipping the hot
metal into water. This is a hypothesis, often noted and spoken of, but
which ranges under the efforts made for explaining what we have no
positive means to verify or to ascertain.

Though we have gained so little from our researches, this little,
however, we hope may incite others to extend their investigations, and
thus render the path clearer which we have tried to explore into this
field of prehistoric industry. The most substantial proofs and
contributions may be expected from our fellow-students in Mexico. They
dwell upon the ground which was the scene of this ancient industry. They
are also in a continuous contact with a numerous indigenous race, which
despite of European attempts to improve their working facilities, still
tenaciously cling to their old usages and fashions. Our Museums are
overcrowded with Mexican idols, pottery, and flint arrow-heads. One
specimen of an ancient tin-borer, one of a copper axe or hoe, or of a
bronze chisel would be counted as a very welcome and valuable
acquisition.

-----

Footnote 1:

  _A. v. Humboldt_, Essai s. 1. Nouv. Espagne, Tome III., Livre 4, Chap.
  ii. _W. H. Prescott_, History of the Conquest of Mexico, Book I.,
  Chap. 5. _Brasseur de Bourbourg_, Hist. d. Nat. Civ. du Mexique, Livre
  III., Chap. 7, pag. 678.

Footnote 2:

  _Carta (2da) de relacion_, por _Fernando Cortes_, de la villa Segura
  de Frontera desta Nueva España, á 30 de Octubre de 1520 años “donde
  hay todos los generos de mercaderias, que en todas las tierras se
  hallan, asi de mantenimientos como de vituallas, joyas de oro y de
  plata, de plomo, de _laton_, de _cobre_, de _estano_, de piedras, de
  huesos, etc.”

Footnote 3:

  _Bernal Diaz de Castillo_, Historia verdadera de la conquista de la
  Nuevo España, Madrid, 1632, I. Vol., Cap. 92, “y vendian hachas de
  laton, y cobre y estaño.” The meaning of this passage is, beyond all
  misinterpretation: He saw for sale bronze axes, and besides pieces of
  copper and others of tin. The order, in which these three words stand,
  conveys a suggestion that we should not wholly ignore. The word
  _laton_ (bronze) is followed by _cobre_ (copper) and _estano_ (tin),
  the two well known components of bronze. Might not the relative
  position of the three words teach that, to them, bronze was the most
  important metal and was therefore assigned the first place, mentioning
  the copper and tin afterwards as the elements from which the bronze
  was made? We might also go farther and inquire how the first metal
  came to be recognized by them as bronze. In framing a reply, let us
  consider three possible explanations. Let us suppose, first, that they
  knew the bronze well enough to recognize it at once. They, further,
  may have entertained doubts as to its identity, but finally have been
  led to this conclusion by seeing the copper and tin exhibited in the
  stalls, together with the bronze. Thirdly, we may also suppose, that
  they would desire to obtain more positive confirmation and therefore
  have inquired and learned from their native guides that this bronze
  was actually a composition of the two other metals before them.
  Therefore, considering all these cases, when engaged in composing
  their narration, the Spaniards would have remembered the circumstances
  connected with the memorable visit to the market, and have enumerated
  the metals in the order in which they actually are found; first, the
  bronze, the main object of their curiosity, and then the copper and
  tin as the key to the puzzle.

  We, however, make no defence of this forced and artificial
  interpretation of the language, and still less would in this manner
  build a premise from which to deduce the final conclusion, that the
  natives make bronze from copper and tin. On the contrary, the facts
  elicited from our material, as will be seen later, conduct us to very
  different conclusions. Still, having been struck by the occurrence of
  the three words and their relative positions, we could not dismiss
  them altogether, especially as Cortes and Bernal Diaz were
  eye-witnesses and were, therefore, of highest authority. Besides, it
  is by no means impossible that in the future, instruments of bronze
  may actually be discovered and found to be composed of tin and copper.
  In such an event our judgment would favor the opinion that Cortes and
  his followers were keener observers and investigators than those who
  during three and one-half centuries have attempted to ventilate the
  question.

  For the same position of words, compare also _Gomara_ (_Francisco
  Lopez de_), Historia General de las Indias, Ed. Barcia, Cap. 79:
  “There is also much featherwork in the market, and gold, silver,
  copper, lead, bronze (_laton_) and tin, though these three latter
  metals are scarce.” Gomara, it will be noticed, changed somewhat the
  position of the words, as compilers often do. He was a secretary to
  Cortes, and his work appeared in Zaragoza, 1552–1553, five years after
  Cortes’ death.

Footnote 4:

  _Bernal Diaz_, Chap. 147.

Footnote 5:

  A Vocabulario en la lengua Castellana y Mexicana, por el Rev^n Padre
  Fray _Alonso de Molina_: Guardian del Convento de San Antonio de
  Tezcuco, de la Orden de los Frayles Menores. México, 1572. This
  edition was preceded by a smaller one, 1552, which was the _fourteenth
  book_ in the series of those which were printed in Mexico.

Footnote 6:

  Let us quote from Bernal Diaz, Chapter 157, without any comment, the
  following anecdote concerning the word _tepuzque_. “In the smelting of
  gold there was also allowed an eighth of alloy to every ounce to
  assist the men in the purchase of the necessaries of life. But we (the
  soldiers) derived no advantage from this, but on the contrary, it
  proved very prejudicial to us, for the merchants added the same
  percentage to the price of their goods and sold for five pesos what
  was only worth three, and so this alloy became, as the Indians term
  it, tepuzque or copper. This expression became so common among us,
  that we added it to the names of the distinguished cavaliers to
  express the worth of their character, as, for instance, we used to
  say, Señor Don Juan of so much tepuzque.”

Footnote 7:

  Those who wish to be more extensively instructed in the Mexican system
  of numeration can read: _Leon y Gama_, Descripcion Hist. y Cronol. de
  las dos Piedras, Parte II., Appendice II., page 128, Edit. C. M. de
  Bustamante, Mexico, 1832. _Clavigero_, Storia antica di Messico,
  English translation by Ch. Cullen, London, 1807, Vol. I., Book 4, pag.
  410; and an article recently published by _Orozco y Berra_, in Tom.
  I., Entrega 6ma of the Anales del Museo Nacional de Mexico, 1879, page
  258, which article is the most complete hitherto written on the
  subject, and is illustrated by 53 cuts.

Footnote 8:

  There is, indeed, one passage in _Herrera (Antonio de)_, Hist. Gen. de
  los hechos de los Castellanos, Madrid, 1729, in his introductory
  Descripcion de las Indias, §§ Zacatula and Colima, where the working
  of copper mines by the indigenous people of these provinces is
  mentioned: “There are very abundant copper mines in this district,
  more towards the East, and near the port of Santiago. The Indians make
  _marvelous vessels_ (_vasos_) of this copper, because it is sweet
  (_dulce_). They have, however, still another kind of copper, which is
  hard, and which they employed for tilling the ground, instead of using
  iron, for they were not acquainted with iron before the Spaniards
  entered the kingdom.” As will be seen later, there is no doubt as to
  the latter assertion. But we fear the former to be an anachronism and
  the manufacturing of _vasos de cobre_ (copper vessels) will have to be
  assigned to the epoch after the Conquest, when the art of hammering
  was introduced and eagerly accepted and practised by the natives.

Footnote 9:

  Carta de Hernan Cortes al Emperador, de la gran ciudad de
  Tenochtitlan, desta Nueva España, a 13 dias del mes de Octubre de
  1524. Edicion _Gayangos_ (Don Pascual de), Paris, 1866.

Footnote 10:

  Tachco, to-day Tasco, at a distance of 25 miles, S. S. W. from the
  Capital. A. v. Humboldt visited the memorable spot. See Essay s. l.
  Nouv. Espagne, Livre IV., Chap. xi.: “At the west of Tehuilotepec, is
  the Cerro de la Campañia, where Cortes began his work of
  investigation.”

Footnote 11:

  The words of the text are: “Ciertas pieçeçuelas dello, a manera de
  moneda muy delgada, y procediendo por mio pezoquiza, halle que en la
  dicha provincia y aun en otras, se trataba por moneda.”

Footnote 12:

  In Molina’s vocabulary a suggestion can be found for what technical
  purposes _tin_ might have been employed. The word _teputzlacopintli_
  is translated with cañuto de estaño, para horadar piedras preciosas
  (cylinder of tin for perforating precious stones). We may, therefore,
  presume that the holes bored through the well known green jade
  trinkets, were drilled by the aid of the mentioned cañuto de estaño.

Footnote 13:

  This little figure symbolizing gold, recurs only once more in all
  those Mexican paintings which we have been able to examine. It stands
  in Vol. I., Kingsb. Collection, Cod. Mendoza, page 13, fig. 4, and is
  identical with that represented by the engraving. We do not venture
  too far in asserting that the symbol on this gold piece represents a
  genuine Mexican numeral. It is composed of a cross, having a dot in
  each of its quadrants. This cross is the well known symbol of the
  number 8000 (_xiquipilli_), and each dot stands for the number 1. We
  have thus expressed four times 8000 (nahui xiquipilli) or 32,000.
  Here, however, the interpretation ends, so far as it may be based upon
  accepted authorities. Whatever else there is to be learned concerning
  this number 32,000, found on the gold piece, must be derived by the
  confessedly hazardous process of induction.

  Nevertheless, let us try this process and ascertain what the number
  32,000 actually refers to. In answering this question it may, perhaps,
  fairly be assumed that the number stands in a direct relation to a
  certain numerical unity, like that in which hundreds stand to the
  tens, 100:1. Such a numerical unity, however, presupposes the
  existence of some tangible equivalent, which in Mexican commerce, if
  it was not some small piece of metal, would have had some other
  conventional representation, either in merchandise or in labor. If
  such a unity actually existed it is clear that its value must have
  been fixed either by weight or by measure. There is, however, no
  positive proof that such a unity, fixed by weight or measure, ever
  existed among the Mexicans. Cortes, in the above quoted letter,
  pretends that it was impossible for him to detect the use of any
  weights or scales, and no writer after him has touched this question
  or given any other decision. Respecting measures, there is no direct
  testimony at all. But, on the other hand, it is hardly to be imagined
  that these people, of whose religious administration and social polity
  we have such abundant evidences, should have been deficient to such an
  extent in the department of their commercial polity as not to have
  found any method by which the proportion between the value of the
  precious metal to merchandise in all its forms was to be expressed. We
  must guard ourselves against the fallacy that because we are not
  acquainted with the method it could not have existed. There are
  grounds to believe that Cortes was right in saying that the Mexicans
  did not know the use of weights (their vocabulary does not show any
  word answering to peso, pesilla, libra, balanza romana), but, we think
  they knew perfectly the use of measures (the vocabulary gives about
  twenty words for all varieties of this operation); and in regard to a
  certain unity of measure employed in gold transactions, there are
  indications given by other trustworthy writers that this unity might
  be detected in the quills, of conventional length, and probably of
  conventional diameter, which quills were filled up with grains of gold
  dust, by the color and shades of which they graduated the respective
  value. Bernal Diaz, Chapter 92: Antes de salir de la misma plaza,
  estaban otros muchos mercaderes, que, segun dixeron, era que tenian a
  _vender oro en granos_ como lo sacan de las minas, metido el oro en
  unos _canutillos_ delgados de los anserones de tierra (thin goose
  quills) e asi blancos porque se pareciese el oro por defuera, y por el
  _largor y gordor_ de los canutillos (length and width of the quills)
  tenian entre ellos su cuenta (they made up their account) que tantas
  mantas o que xiquipiles de cacao salia o qualquier otra cosa a que lo
  trocavan.

  This point being settled let us next introduce one other, for it will
  contribute to strengthen the probability that besides the quill there
  existed still a lower unity, that of the grain of gold itself, by
  which they counted. For this purpose, let us turn again to the gold
  piece represented in the painting. It is round. This reminds us of
  what was told by Cortes of the little pieces of _tin_ discovered in
  Tachco, which, he said, were used as coins. Likewise, we read in
  Bernal Diaz that Motezuma used to pay with pieces of gold when he lost
  in playing _patol_ (trictrac) with his Spanish jailors. The word
  employed by the author and eye-witness of the game, is “_tejuelo_,”
  which, according to Spanish usages and the dictionaries of their
  language, signifies: a round piece of metal. The author moreover
  informs us of the value of this tejuelo. It was 50 ducats of weight
  and must, therefore, have been equivalent to, at least, one hundred
  dollars of gold. Since Bernal Diaz in this entire passage wishes to
  express his highest esteem for Motezuma on account of the princely
  generosity with which he paid even those whom he knew had cheated him,
  we may fairly conclude that these tejuelos were not the lowest, but
  rather the highest, gold pieces that he had at his disposal. Should we
  now remember the number, 32,000, which is the highest found
  represented in Mexican pictures (they generally never exceed that of
  8000, the _xiquipilli_), it is not at all improbable that the
  Motezuma-tejuelo, about 100 dollars worth, might have been equivalent
  to 32,000 unities, while this unity may have been one grain of gold.
  For if we would divide 100 dollars of gold into 32,000 equal parts, or
  still farther divide one gold dollar into 320 equal parts, each part
  would represent a very small portion of gold, but still large enough
  to be counted separately with the finger. This was the way the
  gold-dust was collected on the placeres, not by men but by women and
  children. The procedure was primitive, indeed, in the highest degree.
  In such a way, however, gold gathering was undoubtedly practised in
  the first stage of men’s civilization. If not written in history, yet
  the linguistical testimony bears witness to it. We find the expression
  “_grain of gold_” to be the common property among the ancient and
  modern nations in connection with commerce and the weighing of gold.

Footnote 14:

  _Torquemada_ (Fray Juan de) Monarquia Indiana, Madrid, 1613, Vol. II.,
  Book 13, Chapter 1. “The goldsmiths did not possess the tools
  necessary for hammering metals, but with one stone placed above
  another one, they make a flat cup or a plate.” (Pero con una piedra
  sobre otra hacian una taza llana y un plato.) _Gomara, l. c._ “They
  will cast a platter in a mould with eight corners, and every corner of
  several metals, that is to say, the one of gold, the other of silver,
  without any kind of solder. They will also cast a little caldron with
  loose handles hanging thereto, as we used to cast a bell. They will
  also cast in a mould a fish with one scale of silver on its back and
  another of gold; they will make a parrot of metal so that his tongue
  shall shake and his head move and his wings flutter; they will cast an
  ape in a mould so that both hands and feet will stir, and holding a
  spindle in his hand, seeming to spin, yea, and an apple in his hand,
  as if he would eat it. Our Spaniards were not a little amazed at the
  sight of these things, for our goldsmiths are not to be compared to
  theirs.” _Bernal Diaz, Chapter_ 91. “I will first mention the
  sculptors and the gold and silversmiths, who were clever in working
  and smelting gold, and would have astonished the most celebrated of
  our Spanish goldsmiths; the number of these were very great and the
  most skilful lived at a place called Azcapotzalco, about four leagues
  from Mexico.” _Petrus Martyr, Decade VI., Chapter 6_. (A letter
  written to Pope Adrian VI.) “The chief noblemen’s houses (in
  Nicaragua) compass and inclose the King’s street on every side; in the
  middle site whereof one is erected, in which the goldsmiths dwell.
  Gold is there molten and forged (?) to be formed into divers jewels,
  and is formed into small plates or bars, to be stamped after the
  pleasure of its owners and at length is brought into the form and
  fashion they desire, and that neatly too.”

Footnote 15:

  Lorenzana (Don Franc, Antonia de) Historia de Nueva España, page 378,
  Note 2.

Footnote 16:

  See _Bernal Diaz_, Chap. 39.

  _Petrus Martyr de Angleria_, English edition of Eden, Islands of the
  West Indies, page 169: “Circumference of xxviii spans (_spithamarum_
  28).”

  _Torquemada Mon. Ind._, Lib. IV., Cap. 17.

  Three letters, on Cortes’ landing in Yucatan, edited by _Fredric
  Muller_, Amsterdam, 1871. (1) Their width being seven spans, (2)
  larger than a wagon’s wheel, and made as if beaten out of white iron.
  (3) Two wheels, the one of gold and weighing 30,000 castellanos, the
  other of silver, weighing 50 mark. These pieces are as large as a
  millstone.

Footnote 17:

[Illustration: From Landa.]

  _Bernal Diaz, Chap. 92_: “Bronze axes, and copper and tin.” _Petrus
  Martyr, Dec. V., Chap. 10_: “Bronze axes and edges, cunningly
  tempered.” _Gomara, Chap. 210_: “They also have axes, borers and
  chisels of copper mixed with gold, silver or tin.” _Landa Rel. d. l.,
  Cosas de Yucatan_, Ed. Brasseur, Paris, 1864, pag. 170, with a cut of
  a Yucatecan axe: “They had little axes made of a certain metal, and
  shaped as the illustration shows. They fastened them into the top of a
  wooden handle, one side serving as a weapon, the other for cutting
  wood. They sharpened them by hammering the edge with stones.”
  _Torquemada, Mon. Ind., Lib. 13, Cap. 34_: “The carpenters and carvers
  worked with copper instruments.” _Herrera, Dec. IV., Lib. 8, Cap. 3_:
  “In Honduras (1530) they cleared large mountains, for agricultural
  purposes, with axes made of flintstone.”

  _Remesal, Hist. d. l. Prov. de Chiapas y Guatemala, 1606_: “They
  clear, every year, large mountains of woods, in order to prepare them
  for the reception of the seed corn, as is the custom in the whole
  province of Vera-paz; and before they got the iron axes they had to
  work hard because they felled the trees with copper axes and often
  spent an entire day in cutting one single tree, though of inferior
  size; and if the tree was larger three and four days, those axes being
  very apt to break; and having experienced the strength of iron, they
  appreciate all tools made of it, and thus they held our axes and
  machetes in great esteem.” _Cogolludo_, _Hist. d. Yucatan, Lib. IV.,
  Cap. 3_, mentions axes as an article of trade in Yucatan: “Copper
  axes, brought from Mexico, which they exchanged for other
  merchandize.” _Documentos ineditos, Madrid, 1864, Vol. I., pag. 470_:
  “The Captain, Gil Gonzales de Avila, arrived here in Sto. Domingo
  (from Nicaragua) and sends to His Majesty 14,000 pesos de oro and
  15,000 pesos, proceeding from axes which they said contained gold, and
  6150 pesos de oro proceeding from bells which they also said contained
  gold. All this he said he was presented with during his discoveries
  which he was making in the Province of the South sea.” _Petrus
  Martyr_, _Dec. VI., Chapt. 2 and 3_, states the same fact on the
  authority of Gil Gonzales’ treasurer, Cereceda.

Footnote 18:

  The absolute absence of mines in Yucatan is a fact that needs no
  further corroboration. It might, however, be of interest to hear the
  language used by Landa, Rel. d. las cosas de Yucatan: 1. c. § 5 “There
  exist many beautiful structures of masonry in Yucatan, all of them
  built of stone and showing the finest workmanship, the most
  astonishing that ever were discovered in the Indies; and we cannot
  wonder at it enough because there is not any class of metal in this
  country by which such works could be accomplished.”

Footnote 19:

[Illustration: From Oviedo.]

  _Herrera_ (_Dec. III., Lib. 4, Cap. 5_) having the original reports
  before his eyes, represents this scene as follows: “Multitudes of
  Indians flocked along the ways, astonished to see the beards and the
  dressing of the Spaniards. The chief person they met was Dirianjeu,
  the warlike cacique, who came attended by five hundred men and
  seventeen women, covered with gold plates, all drawn up in order, but
  without arms and with ten banners and trumpets, after their fashion.
  When they came near, the banners were displayed and the cacique
  touched Gonzales’ hand, as did all the five hundred, everyone giving
  him a turkey. Yet each of the women gave him twenty axes of gold
  (veinte hachas de oro) fourteen carats fine, each weighing eighteen
  pesos and some more.” We find in _Oviedo_ (_Gonzalo Fernandez de_),
  _Historia gen. y nat. de las Indias_, at the end of Vol. IV., five
  folio quarto pages with illustrations referring to the chapter he
  wrote on Nicaragua, and we learn from his text that he made the
  sketches himself during his sojourn in Nicaragua (1524). They
  represent views of the volcano of Masaya, gymnastic sports of the
  Indians, a plan of the town of Tecoatega, and three Indian arms, an
  _estorica_, a _porra_ and an _alabarda_. Each of the drawings is
  provided with a number which correctly corresponds to that written in
  the text, except those three drawings of the arms, for which we could
  not find the text. Upon closer examination we discovered a suggestion
  made (on page 81) that some ancient copyist or editor must have
  revised Oviedo’s original manuscript, who was supposed to have dropped
  the inscription to which the drawings of the three arms belong,
  perhaps, only on account of the illegibility of Oviedo’s handwriting.
  On the other hand, we cannot help expressing our doubts as to the fact
  that these three kinds of arms should have been in use with the
  Nicoyans or Nicaraguans. Notwithstanding we give the cut of the
  alabarda, which has the shape of a genuine mediæval battle-axe.

Footnote 20:

  Sahagun (Bernardino de), Historia de la N. España, Ed. Carlos M. de
  Bustamante, 3 Vol., Mexico, 1830.

Footnote 21:

  The following notice of three prehistoric nails is given for what it
  is worth. Torquemada, Lib. VI., Cap. 23: Under the reign of
  Nezahualpilli of Tezcuco, the statue of the God of Rain, Tlaloc,
  having been found to be timeworn and corroded, a new one was made and
  located on the mountain of Matlalcueye, the ancient site of this
  statue. “When this idol of Tlaloc was replaced by the new one, it
  happened that one of its arms broke off. They put it on again and
  fastened it with three gold nails. Later, when the new faith was
  introduced in their countries, this diabolical image was brought down
  from the hills, at the time of the first Bishop Zummaraga, and was
  broken to pieces in his presence, but not before removing the three
  gold nails spoken of.”

Footnote 22:

  Dupaix, Antiquités Mexicaines, Paris, 1834, Vol. II., Planche 26, fig.
  75, and text in Vol. I., page 21, No. 75.

Footnote 23:

  With our first glance at the picture of _Tepozcolula_ we were induced
  to believe that we had found therein a representation of the
  instrument which Petrus Martyr called a “_dolabra_,” and Sahagun
  “_azuela_.” The translation of the one is, pick or hoe, and of the
  other, cooper’s adze. Both of these, therefore, would have been
  instruments in which the blade and its edge are at right angles to
  their handle, and the management of which requires both hands of the
  workman. This supposition is refuted by the picture of the carpenter
  (cut 10), who is distinctly seen to hold the piece of wood in the left
  and the tool in his right hand.

Footnote 24:

  Dupaix, l. c., Vol. II., Planche 26, fig. 74, and text Vol. I., page
  21.

Footnote 25:

  Torquemada, Mon. Ind., Lib.—, Chap.—: “They also used certain copper
  coins, almost in the shape of a Greek Tau, Τ, its width about three or
  four fingers. It was a thin piece of plate of an uncertain size, and
  contained much gold.” Clavigero, The History of Mexico, Ed. Ch.
  Cullen, London, 1807, Vol. VII., Sect. 36, page 386, evidently copies
  the sentence when he says: “Their fourth species of money, which most
  resembled coined money, was made of pieces of copper, in the form of a
  T, and was employed in purchases of little value.”




                      THE KATUNES OF MAYA HISTORY.

                   BY PHILIPP J. J. VALENTINI, PH.D.

       [_Translated from the German, by Stephen Salisbury, Jr._]

 [From Proceedings of American Antiquarian Society, October 21, 1879.]




                 NOTE BY THE COMMITTEE OF PUBLICATION.


The Publishing Committee are glad of the opportunity to print another
paper from the pen of Professor Valentini. His previous contributions
have been favorably received by some of the most competent judges. He is
always ingenious and suggestive, taking care to sustain his views by
adequate collateral information, and leaving an impression of
earnestness and thoroughness, even though the reader should not be able
always to see the way through his bold inferences to the important
conclusions deduced from them.

It seems apparent that new phases of opinion respecting the position in
the world’s history held by the races occupying the central portions of
the American Continent may be looked for in the near future. Or rather,
perhaps, it may be claimed that vestiges of ancient and independent
culture, of revolutions, conquests, and changing dynasties, extending
back to a remote period of time, which have hitherto simply excited and
bewildered travellers and explorers, bid fair to be subjected to tests
and comparisons derived from wider and closer observation, for which the
means are accumulating, and from which definite results are anticipated.

It is remarkable how one tidal wave of investigation after another has,
at different eras, invaded and receded from these regions, carrying from
them more or less of the fragments of their architectural, monumental,
and pictorial records—the sources of doubtful and unsatisfactory
interpretation. The Spanish chroniclers; the scientists of the period of
Humboldt and his contemporaries; the French government and the learned
societies of France, uniting their efforts to render effective the
honest but undisciplined enthusiasm of Brasseur de Bourbourg; all have
experienced a subsidence of interest arising mainly from a want of
success in yielding a sufficiently plausible solution of a mysterious
subject. The death of Brasseur, the fall of Maximilian, and the
political distractions of the French government and people, are not
alone the causes of suspended action on the part of the learned bodies
of France. They deemed it prudent to discredit the judgment and
correctness of their own agent. One at least of Brasseur’s Commission
publicly disavowed responsibility for his opinions; and his attempt to
interpret the Codex Troano by means of the alphabet of Bishop Landa was
pronounced by themselves to be a failure.

How signally the explorations of Del Rio, of Dupaix, of Galindo, and of
De Waldeck, failed to make a permanent impression on the public mind!
How soon the illustrated narrative of Stephens became in a measure
disregarded, and even his reliableness questioned! How completely the
nine ponderous folios of Lord Kingsborough’s extensive collection fell
dead from the press, until the great work to which he had devoted his
life and his entire fortune sold in the market for less than a single
useless production of Increase or Cotton Mather! We have seen the
elaborate and learned essays of Gallatin upon Mexican civilization
slumbering with the long sleep of the Ethnological Society; the
Geographical Society cautious about travelling out of the routes of
regular expeditions; even the sardonic “Nation,” assumed arbiter in
literature, politics, and science, and always ready for caustic
criticism, hesitating to venture far beneath the surface of these
important inquiries. The ill-fated Berendt has perished in the midst of
his unfinished labors; and, lastly, one of the most purely philosophical
investigators of Indian habits and history reasons in a direction
opposed to the antiquity and extent of aboriginal civilization.

If there is to be a renewal of interest in Mexican archæology, and a
revived consciousness of something more to be gained from the relics of
culture among the early races of this continent (a meaning in its
mystical remains that has not been developed), our Society may claim its
share in the re-kindling or fostering of the newly excited impulse. In
saying this we do not overlook the preparation which recent studies of
the general condition of prehistoric races has created for such
investigations; but, in this particular field, it has had the fortune to
draw special attention to certain regions and opportunities of research.
This has been due to the earnest and liberal exertions of one of its
members, who, some years since, passed a winter in Yucatan, and has kept
up a correspondence with friends and acquaintances there.[26] He
embodied his observations and experiences in a report on behalf of the
Council rendered in 1876. He has since endeavored to promote the
operations of Dr. and Mrs. Le Plongeon in the actual field, and has
assisted in preparing the papers of Professor Valentini for our
publications, providing illustrations in all cases when practicable. The
Report of the Council in the present number of “Proceedings” is largely
devoted to an account, by the writer[27] of a visit to the city of
Mexico, and his observations upon the country and its history. More than
twelve years ago, in January, 1868, a generous member of the Society[28]
had the forethought to establish a department of the library composed of
books relating to Spanish America, beginning with the gift of Lord
Kingsborough’s mammoth publication, and others, for the specialty of
antiquities, and accompanied by a pecuniary foundation for future
growth. The importance of a provision for this particular purpose
becomes daily more conspicuous as attention is directed to that portion
of the continent.

It is gratifying to perceive that such movements, with the greater
activity in publishing its “Anales” on the part of the Museo Naçional de
México, and the issue of such publications as that of Prof. Rau by the
Smithsonian Institution,[29] and the private work of Mr. Short,[30] are
not without their influence.

The scheme, which, although not fully matured, we have reason to believe
a real one, of sending an expedition to some of the original Mexican
provinces for a thorough exploration, at the cost of a wealthy citizen
of New York, the results to be printed in the North American Review, may
be regarded as one of the fruits of the “_Renaissance_.”

                                              S. F. HAVEN,
                                                    _For the Committee_.


                         INTRODUCTORY REMARKS.

In the ensuing discussion an attempt is made to explain the so-called
“Katunes of Maya history.”

The Manuscript which bears this name is written in the Maya language,
and its discovery is of comparatively recent date. At its first
publication in 1841 it could not fail to attract the attention of all
those who were engaged in the study of ancient American history, because
it unveiled a portion of the history of Yucatan, which had been till
then entirely unknown and seriously missed. At that date only a scanty
number of data, loosely described, and referring to an epoch removed
from the Spanish conquest of the Peninsula by only a few decades, had
appeared as the sole representatives of a long past, in which the
builders of the ruined cities undoubtedly must have lived an eventful
life, not to be counted by a few generations, but by a long and hardly
calculable number of centuries. This vacuum of time the manuscript
promised to fill out. Though it did not offer a history conceived in the
common acceptation of the word, the brief epitome of events which it
presented, began by telling us of the arrival of foreigners from distant
lands, who, step by step succeeded in conquering the Maya soil and who
were brought into significant connection with the name as well as the
fall of cities now lying in ruins over the whole country.

As to the authenticity of the events reported, they have been received
by many students with a confidence and faith rarely manifested when
discoveries of such importance are brought to light. As to the form in
which they were presented, the author seemed to exhibit neither the
skill of a professional nor the clumsiness of an occasional forger. If
on the one hand the gaps he left betrayed a defective memory, this
circumstance should be held rather as an indication of his credibility.
The material from which his information was derived, we might add, was
extensive, and much of it was probably lost when he gave the account at
a later period of his life.

The events communicated being in themselves of the highest interest,
rose in importance from the fact that they were arranged in successive
epochs. A chance was thereby given to calculate the long space of time
that intervened between the arrival of the ancient and of the modern
conquerors. This difficult task was attempted by the fortunate
discoverer himself, Señor Juan Pio Perez, of Yucatan, accompanied by a
learned discussion on ancient Maya chronology. His calculation furnishes
the sum of 1392 years, the first initial date to be assigned to the year
144 A. D., and the last to 1536 A. D.

When, some years ago we undertook to examine the argument of Señor Perez
we were not at all astonished by the great antiquity of the date he had
drawn from the Maya Manuscript. For, nearly at the same time, we had
reached similar results in an attempt made to utilize certain records
which Ixtlilxochitl (1590), and Veytia (1760), (Kingsborough Collection,
Vols. 8 and 9), have left regarding the earliest chronology of the
Nahuatl tribes. By adopting a more rational method of computation than
these Mexican writers had followed, we were unable to withstand the
conclusion, that the Nahuatl people who were immediate territorial
neighbors of the Mayas, considered the year 258 A. D. the earliest date
of their arrival on and occupancy of the Mexican soil. Thus we had
reached in this line of investigation very nearly the same results with
the Nahuatl as Señor Perez with the Maya chronology, and the suspicion
began to dawn upon us that these two neighboring people might, possibly,
have stood in a still closer than a mere territorial connection.

These results, however, were only of a very problematical nature. They
were derived from written reports, which, after all, could not be
regarded as unquestionable authority. But they received a strong
confirmation from a discovery we made later on the so-called Mexican
Calendar Stone. In our discussion of this monument we believe that we
have given ample proof of the fact, that its principal zone contains a
sculptured record, showing a series of numerical symbols, from the
computation of which the year 231 A. D. resulted as that which the
Nahuatls had accepted as the first date of their national era.

Records presented in stone and compiled by the nation whose history they
convey, must always be considered the most authentic evidence of
historical truth. Now, were we also so fortunate as to possess some Maya
monument, similar to the Mexican Calendar Stone, and were we also able
to decipher it, we should thereby have the means for determining whether
Maya chronology extended back to an epoch different from that of the
Nahuatl, or to one identical with it. That such a monument once existed
we have no doubt. That it may still exist, we have no reasonable grounds
for denying the possibility. It remains, however, still to be discovered
and to be interpreted. But since the fortunate discovery has not yet
been made, we must rest satisfied for the present with conclusions
derived from extant written records. The only manuscript of this
character thus far brought to light, is that said to have been found at
Mani,[31] which was translated by Señor Perez from the Maya language,
and accompanied by a very valuable chronological interpretation.

Since the close revision we undertook of the latter, brought out very
striking coincidences of early Maya dates with those of the Nahuatl, and
especially with that indicated on the Calendar Stone, we thought it
worth while to reprint the manuscript, to discuss its contents again,
and to arrange them under new points of view. Regarded by itself, the
manuscript, indeed, might seem of only doubtful value in settling an
important chronological question. But the comparison of its earliest
date with that of the Nahuatl monument will enhance the value of each of
them, because they may be considered as corroborative of each other.


                          THE MAYA MANUSCRIPT.

               _Maya._                         _Translation._

 Lai u tzolan Katun lukci ti cab ti  This is the series of “Katunes”
 yotoch Nonoual cante anilo Tutul    that elapsed from the time of their
 Xiu ti chikin Zuiua; u luumil u     departure from the land and house
 talelob Tulapan chiconahthan.       of Nonoual, in which were the four
                                     Tutul Xiu, lying to the west of
                                     Zuina, going out of the country of
                                     Tulapan.

 §1. Cante bin ti Katun lic u        §1. Four epochs were spent in
 ximbalob ca uliob uaye yetel Holon  travelling, before they arrived
 Chantepeuh yetel u cuchulob: ca     here with Holonchantepeuh and his
 hokiob ti petene uaxac Ahau bin yan followers. When they began their
 cuchi, uac Ahau, can Ahau cabil     journey toward this island, it was
 Ahau, cankal haab catac hunppel     the 8th Ahau, and the 6th, 4th and
 haab; tumen hun piztun oxlahun Ahau 2d were spent in travelling;
 cuchie ca uliob uay ti petene       because in the year of the 13th
 caukal haab catac hunppel haab tu   Ahau they arrived at this island,
 pakteil yetel cu ximbalob lukci tu  making together eighty-one years
 luumilob ca talob uay ti petene     they were travelling, between their
 Chacnouitan lae, u añoil lae 81.    departure from their country and
                                     their arrival at this island of
                                     Chacnouitan.
                            81 años.                           Years 81.

 § 2. Vaxac Ahau, uac Ahau, cabil    § 2. The 8th Ahau, the 6th Ahau; in
 Ajau kuchci Chacnouitan Ahmekat     the 2d Ahau arrived Ajmekat Tutul
 Tutul Xiu hunppel haab minan ti     Xiu, and ninety-nine years they
 hokal haab cuchi yanob Chacnouitan  remained in Chacnouitan.
 lae: lai u habil lae.
                            99 años.                           Years 99.

 § 3. Laitun uchci u chicpahal       § 3. In this time also took place
 tzucubte Ziyan-caan lae Bakhalal,   the discovery of the province of
 can Ahau, cabil Ahau, oxlahun Ahau  Ziyan-caan or Bacalar, the 4th Ahau
 oxkal haab cu tepalob Ziyan-caan ca and 2d Ahau, or sixty years, they
 emob uay lac: lai u haabil cu       had ruled in Ziyan-caan when they
 tepalob Bakhalal chuulte laitun     came here. During these years of
 chicpahci Chichen Itza lae.         their government of the province of
                                     Bacalar occurred the discovery of
                                     Chichen-Itza.
                            60 años.                           Years 60.

 § 4. Buluc Ahau, bolon Ahau, uuc    § 4. The 11th Ahau, the 9th, 7th,
 Ahau, ho Ahau ox Ahau, hun Ahau uac 5th, 3d and 1st Ahau, or 120 years,
 kal haab cu tepalob Chichen Itza ca they ruled in Chichen-Itza, when it
 paxi Chichen Itza, ca binob cahtal  was destroyed, and they emigrated
 Champutun ti yanhi u yotochob ah    to Champoton, where the Itzaes holy
 Ytzoab kuyen uincob lae.            men, had houses.
                           120 años.                          Years 120.

 § 5. Vac Ahau, chucuc u luumil      § 5. The 6th Ahau they took
 Chanputun, can Ahau, cabil Ahau,    possession of the territory of
 oxlahun Ahau, buluc Ahau, bolon     Champoton; the 4th Ahau, 2d, 13th,
 Ahau, uuc Ahau, ho Ahau, ox Ahau,   11th, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d, 1st, 12th,
 hun Ahau, lahca Ahau, lahun Ajau,   10th and 8th, Champoton was
 uaxac Ahau, paxci Chanputun,        destroyed or abandoned. Two hundred
 oxlahun kaal haab cu tepalob        and sixty years the Itzaes reigned
 Chanputun tumenel Ytza uincob ca    in Champoton, when they returned in
 talob u tzaclé u yotochob tu caten, search of their homes, and they
 laix tun u katunil binciob ah       lived for several katunes under the
 Ytzaob yalan che yalan aban yalan   uninhabited mountains.
 ak ti numyaob lae; lai u habil
 cuchinbal lae.
                           260 años.                          Years 260.

 § 6. Vac Ahau, can Ahau, ca kal     § 6. The 6th Ahau, 4th Ahau, after
 haabcatalob u heↄob yotoch tu caten 40 years, they returned to their
 ca tu zatahob Chakanputun: lay u    homes once more and Champoton was
 habil lae.                          lost to them.
                            40 años.                           Years 40.

 § 7. Lai u katunil cabil Ahau. u    § 7. In this Katun of the 2d Ahau,
 heↄci cab Ajcuitok Tutul Xiu Vxmal. Ajcuitok Tutul Xiu established
 Cabil Ahau, oxlahun Ahau, buluc     himself in Uxmal; the 2d Ahau, the
 Ahau, bolon Ahau, uuc Ahau, ho      13th, 11th, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d, 1st,
 Ahau, ox Ahau, hun Ahau, lahca      the 12th and 10th Ahau, equal to
 Ahau, lahun Ahau, lahun kal haab cu 200 years, they governed in Uxmal,
 tepalob yetel u halach uinicil      with the governors of Chichen Itza
 Chichen Itza yetel Mayalpan: lay u  and of Mayapan.
 habil lae.
                           200 años.                          Years 200.

 § 8. Lai u katunil buluc Ahau,      § 8. These are the Katunes 11th,
 bolon Ahau, uac Ahau, uaxac Ahau,   9th and 6th Ahau (_sic_). In the
 paxci u halach uinicil Chichen Itza 8th Ahau the governor of
 tumenel u kebanthan Hunac-eel, ca   Chichen-Itza was deposed, because
 uch ti Chacxib chac Chichen Itza tu he murmured disrespectfully against
 kebanthan Hunac-eel u halach        Hunac-eel. This happened to
 uinicil Mayalpan ichpac. Cankal     Chacxibchac of Chichen-Itza,
 haab catac lahun piz haab, tu lahun governor of the fortress of
 tun uaxac Ahau cuchie; lai u haabil Mayapan. Ninety years had elapsed,
 paxci tumenel Ahzinteyutchan yetel  but the 10th year of the 8th Ahau
 Tzunte-cum, yetel Taxcal, yetel     was the year in which he was
 Pantemit, Xuchu-cuet, yetel         overthrown by Ajzinte-yut-chan,
 Ytzcuat, yetel Kakaltecat lay u     with Tzunte-cum, Taxcal, Pantemit,
 kaba uinicilob: lae muctulob        Xuch-ueuet, Ytzcuat and Kakaltecat;
 ahmayal panob lae.                  these are the names of the seven
                                     Mayalpanes.
                            90 años.                           Years 90.

 § 9. Laili u katunil uaxac Ahau,    § 9. In the same Katun of the 8th
 lai ca binob u pâ ah Vlmil Ahau     Ahau they attacked Chief Ulmil, in
 tumenel u uahal-uahob yetel ah      consequence of his quarrel with
 Ytzmal Vlil Ahau; lae oxlahun uuↄ u Ulil, Chief of Yzamal; thirteen
 katunilob ca paxob tumen Hunac-eel: divisions of troops he had when he
 tumenel u ↄabal u naatob; uac Ahau  was routed by Hunac-eel; in the 6th
 ca ↄoci: hunkal haab catac can      Ahau the war was over, after 34
 lahun pizi: lai u habil cu xinbal.  years.
                            34 años.                           Years 34.

 § 10. Vac Ahau, can Ahau, cabil     § 10. In the 6th Ahau, 4th, 2d,
 Ahau, oxlahun Ahau, buluc Ahau,     13th and 11th Ahau, the fortified
 chucuc u luumil ich pâ Mayalpan,    territory of Mayapan was invaded by
 tumenel u pach tulum, tumenel       the men of Itza, under their Chief
 multepal ich cab Mayalpan, tumenel  Ulmil, because they had walls, and
 Ytza uinicob yetel ah Vlmil Ahau    governed in common the people of
 lae; can kaal haab catac oxppel     Mayalpan; eighty-three years
 haab: yocol buluc Ahau cuchie paxci elapsed after this event, and at
 Mayalpan tumenel ahuitzil ↄul, tau  the beginning of the 11th Ahau
 cah Mayalpan.                       Mayalpan was destroyed by strangers
                                     of the Uitzes, Highlanders, as was
                                     also Tancaj of Mayalpan.
                            83 años.                           Years 83.

 § 11. Vaxac Ahau lay paxci Mayalpan § 11. In the 8th Ahau, Mayalpan was
 lai u katunil uac Ahau, can Ahau,   destroyed; the epochs of the 6th,
 cabil Ahau, lai haab cu ximbal ca   4th and 2d Ahau elapsed, and at
 yax mani españoles u yaxilci caa    this period the Spaniards for the
 luumi Yucatan tzucubte lae, oxkal   first time arrived, and gave the
 haab pâaxac ich pâ cuchie.          name of Yucatan to this province,
                                     sixty years after the destruction
                                     of the fortress.
                            60 años.                           Years 60.

 § 12. Oxlahun Ahau, buluc Ahau,     § 12. The 13th and 11th Ahau,
 uchci mayacimil ich pâ yetel        pestilence and small pox were in
 nohkakil: oxlahun Ahau cimci        the castles. In the 13th Ahau,
 Ahpula: uacppel haab u binel ma     Chief Ajpula died; six years were
 ↄococ u xocol oxlahun Ahau cuchie,  wanting to the completion of the
 ti yanil u xocol haab ti lakin      13th Ahau; this year was counted
 cuchie, canil kan cumlahi pop, tu   toward the east of the wheel, and
 holhun Zip catac oxppeli, bolon     began on the 4th “Kan.” Ajpula died
 Ymix u kinil lai cimi Ahpula;       on the 18th day of the month Zip,
 laitun año cu ximbal cuchi lae ca   in the 9th Ymix; and that it may be
 oheltabac lay u xoc numeroil años   known in numbers, it was the year
 lae 1536 años cuchie, oxkal haab    1536, sixty years after the
 paaxac ich pâ cuchi lae.            destruction of the fortress.

 § 13. Laili ma ↄococ u xocol buluc  § 13. Before the termination of the
 Ahau lae lai ulci españoles kul     11th Ahau, the Spaniards arrived,
 uincob ti lakin u talob ca uliob    holy men from the east came with
 uay tac luumil lae; bolon Ahau      them when they reached the land.
 hoppci cristianoil uchci            The 9th Ahau was the commencement
 caputzihil: laili ichil u katunil   of baptism and Christianity; and in
 lae ulci yax obispo Toroba u kaba,  this year was the arrival of Toroba
 heix año cu ximbal uchie.           (Toral), the first bishop.
                          1544 años.                          1544 A. D.

  NOTE.—This Manuscript has also an introduction and close, which
  Señor Perez has not published, because the dates specified occurred
  in the Spanish epoch, and consequently were of no interest to the
  Maya student.


                       HISTORY OF THE MANUSCRIPT.

In the interest of authenticity it is much to be regretted that neither
the name of the author, his residence, nor the date when the Manuscript
was written, are known to us, and we are also ignorant of other matters
of moment; whether the Manuscript is an original or a copy, or how often
copied, or by what family or person it may have been preserved before it
came into the hands of Don Juan Pio Perez. That Yucatecan gentleman had
retired from Mérida, the capital, to the District of Peto, to devote
himself to his favorite studies, the ancient language and the history of
his nation. The unusual interest that he showed in this direction,
united to his influential position as first officer of the district,
enabled him to obtain many small manuscript documents known to have been
written by the natives in their vernacular language, the Maya, soon
after the time of the conquest, which, for the most part, contained
historical reminiscences of the time of the supremacy of their
ancestors. Among these manuscripts there was a so-called _Chilam Balam
Calendar_, which, in the form of an appendix, contained, besides, the
outlines of the primitive history of Yucatan. It was, indeed, but a
brief epitome of historical events, accompanied by the corresponding
dates. But its value consisted in the circumstance that these dates were
catalogued according to successive epochs; and it required only slight
inspection to disclose the fact that they extended back to a period not
very distant from our Christian Era.

This was a discovery to the learned world as welcome as any that could
be made. It was unique in its kind. All attempts, thus far, had vainly
sought to learn something about the history of the builders of those
palaces and temples with whose ruins the peninsula was covered at the
date of the arrival of the Spaniards, and which pointed to a long past
and to the unceasing activity of a numberless population, which, while
it was skilled in the most important branches of art and industry, and
familiar with a luxury such as only ancient Asia and India had
displayed, was yet governed by a despotic and hierarchical power. The
native, when asked whose work the ruins were, would answer nothing but
that they owed their origin to men who, in ancient times, had immigrated
from far distant countries.

The Manuscript disclosed at once the history of these strange
immigrants, showed the progressive march of the conquest, and the
contemporaneous foundation of the largest cities then in ruins, and
furnished in the Maya language the chronology of each event and its
corresponding epoch. By means of his extensive antiquarian knowledge
Señor Perez made an exact translation of this Manuscript into Spanish,
and afterwards undertook a critical interpretation of its contents, and
accompanied the whole with an introductory explanation of the system of
ancient Maya chronology.

In the midst of these labors he was surprised by the arrival of the
celebrated American traveller and archæologist, John Lloyd Stephens, and
was induced to entrust to him a copy of the MSS. and interpretations to
be embodied in his work on Yucatan, in order to bring them more fully
before the world. His wishes were scrupulously complied with, and the
Spanish translation has been rendered into literal English by Mr.
Stephens in “Incidents of Travel in Yucatan,” vol. I., Appendix, pages
434–459, and vol. II., Appendix, pages 465–469.

Mr. Albert Gallatin, who, of all American students, has made himself
most thoroughly acquainted with what remains of the historical elements
of the Nahuatl and Maya people, has brought together the results of his
investigations in a lecture published in the “Transactions of the
American Ethnological Society,” New York, 1858, vol. I., pages 104–114.
The information therein contained attests an entire familiarity with the
method pursued by Señor Perez in his commentary, without, indeed,
undertaking any severe criticism of it. In our opinion Mr. John L.
Stephens and Mr. Gallatin are the only Americans who have recognized
Señor Perez’s merits in an unequivocal manner, and have brought them to
the knowledge of the world.

This is all we could learn about the Manuscript, nor have we been able
to form a supposition, much less to discover in the text itself any clue
to the source from which the unknown Maya author could have drawn his
data. At the end of the Manuscript Señor Perez gives his opinion that
the whole was written from memory, because it must have been done long
after the conquest, and after Bishop Landa had publicly destroyed much
of the historical picture-writing of the Mayas by an _auto-da-fé_, and
because the whole narration is so concise and condensed that it appears
more like an index than a circumstantial description of events.

These opinions of Señor Perez might cast a well grounded suspicion on
the authenticity of the manuscript. We shall try to remove such doubts,
at once, by presenting the following considerations. We do not believe
that Bishop Landa succeeded in burning the entire treasures of Maya
literature at the notorious _auto-da-fé_ in the town of Mani in 1561.
The authorities[32] to which we have access describe the number of the
destroyed objects so precisely that we have every reason to confide in
their correctness. We read of 5,000 idols of different size and form, 13
large altar stones, 22 smaller stones, 197 vessels of every form and
size, and lastly of 27 rolls (_sic_) on deerskin covered with signs and
hieroglyphics, given to destruction at that time and place. We may
believe that the terrorism exercised by Bishop Landa had a powerful
influence on the minds and on the newly converted consciences of the
natives, and the Bishop no doubt used every possible means to get into
his hands as much as he could of what he considered to be “cabalistic
signs and invocations to the devil.” But we can never believe that these
27 rolls represented the entire Maya literature, collected for hundreds
of years with the greatest care and held sacred by the natives. Such a
wholesale destruction would have been an impossibility. We could refer
to a similar occurrence that took place in Mexico; and though Bishop
Zumarraga has the bad reputation of having destroyed all the picture
treasures of the Nahuatls by an _auto-da-fé_, there were notwithstanding
so many of them in existence soon after his time in the possession of
native families that Ixtlilxochitl, Tezozomoc, and others, were able to
build up their detailed accounts of the primitive history of their
country from these original sources. Possibly numbers of them may have
been preserved among the Maya tribes, for only under such favorable
conditions could Cogolludo, Villagutierre and Lizana have obtained the
valuable information and material which form the chief interest of their
labors and researches, and which enabled also Pio Perez in the year
1835, to discover material from which to interpret so complete a
description of the system of Maya chronology. Nay, even, we have a
suspicion that Bishop Landa may have laid aside the most important part
of these records, or what was the most intelligible to him, for we
cannot comprehend how he would have been able without these pictures
before his eyes to present in his work the symbols for the days so
correctly, and also those for the months, or how otherwise he could have
written his work in Spain, so far removed from all sources of
information and from consultation with the natives.

No reason, therefore, exists why the Maya author should not have
remained in possession of some painting, which exhibited the annals of
his forefathers. If, however, he was compelled to write his “Series of
Katunes” from memory, there is no reason for not relying on the accuracy
of his retentive faculties alone. The noble Indians, and he belonged
undoubtedly to this class, were very particular in training their sons
to learn by heart songs expressing the glorious deeds of their
ancestors. It is a fact attested by the Spanish chroniclers, that these
songs were recited publicly in the temples and on solemn religious
occasions. They were the only kind of positive knowledge with which we
know the brains of the Indian pupils were burdened. In either case,
therefore, the accuracy of the written Maya report needs not be doubted,
at least not on the grounds alleged. Had it been composed in the Spanish
language instead of Maya, we should have viewed this circumstance with a
more critical eye. But as the native under Spanish rule expressed it in
his native language, this kind of loyalty appears to us to give a
certain warranty of dealing with a man who described the traditions of
his oppressed race, and who wished to perpetuate its memory by handing
down to posterity the principal events of the past history of his
nation.

At this place, we should not like to omit pointing out an interesting
suggestion which the clear headed and sagacious author, Señor Eligio
Ancona[33] made in his before mentioned work, that Bishop Landa and the
author of the Manuscript agree so often in their mention of historic
dates, in the manner as well as the matter, as to lead to the idea that
both drew their information from the same source. Whatever be its
origin, we agree with the views of Señor Perez, that, in spite of the
deficiency and breaks occurring in the Manuscript, it deserves critical
attention as the only document thus far discovered that gives
information of the early history of Yucatan.


                      ELEMENTS OF MAYA CHRONOLOGY.

It is impossible to understand the Manuscript before obtaining a
knowledge of the division of time prevalent in Yucatan before the
Spanish Conquest. Señor Perez has the incontestable merit of having been
the first to lay before the world not only the chief points of the
system but also all the technical details. Before his time but little
was known of Maya chronology. From the great historic works of
Torquemada, Herrera and Cogolludo, we learn only that the Mayas, in
conformity with the Mexicans, held that the solar year was composed of
360 days, and when these were passed they added 5 days more as a
correction. We are told that both nations divided their years into 18
months, and their months into twenty days each. As to the longer periods
of time, however, we hear of certain differences. While the Mexicans had
an epoch of 52 years which they divided into 4 smaller periods, the so
called _Tlapilli_, each of 13 years, the Mayas counted a great epoch of
260 years, the so called _Ahau Katun_, subdivided into 13 smaller
periods each of 20 years, with the simple name _Ahau_. This period of 20
years was according to Cogolludo[34] subdivided again into what he calls
_lustra_ of 5 years each, but he does not give the native name of this
division.

The discovery of the Manuscript, no doubt, induced Señor Perez to make a
systematic and detailed sketch of the early native chronology of his
country. We shall mention only the most interesting and important of his
details and refer the reader for the rest to Stephens’ work already
mentioned. The names of the 20 days in the month are as follows:—

                                1 Kan.
                                2 Chicchan.
                                3 Quimij.
                                4 Manik.
                                5 Lamat.
                                6 Muluc.
                                7 Oc.
                                8 Chuen.
                                9 Eb.
                               10 Been.
                               11 Gix.
                               12 Men.
                               13 Quib.
                             ^114 Caban.
                             ^215 Edznab.
                             ^316 Cavac.
                             ^417 Ahau.
                             ^518 Ymix.
                             ^619 Yx.
                             ^720 Akbal.

The 18 months were as follows:—

                    1 Pop (16th of July.)
                    2 Uoo (5th of August)
                    3 Zip (25th of August).
                    4 Zodz (14th of September).
                    5 Zeec (4th of October).
                    6 Xal (24th of October).
                    7 Dze-yaxkin (13th of November).
                    8 Mol (3d of December).
                    9 Dchen (23d of December).
                   10 Yaax (12th of January).
                   11 Zae (1st of February).
                   12 Quej (21st of February).
                   13 Mac (13th of March).
                   14 Kankin (2d of April).
                   15 Moan (22d of April).
                   16 Pax (12th of May).
                   17 Kayab (1st of June).
                   18 Cumkū (21st of June).

As the table shows their year began with the first day of the month Pop,
which corresponded to the 16th of July in our calendar, when, as Señor
Perez observes, the sun was almost vertical over the Peninsula. The day
itself was called _Kin_, Sun, the month _U_, Moon, and the 5 intercalary
days were called nameless days, _Xona-Kaba-Kin_, not-name-Sun.

In the arrangement of their yearly calendar the Mayas proceeded as
follows: Like the Mexicans they used a combination of the numbers 1 to
13, with the names of the 20 days of the month. They called the first
day of the month Pop (our 16 July) 1 Kan, the second 2 Chicchan, the
third 3 Quimij, and so on. The fourteenth day was called 1 Caban, the
fifteenth 2 Edznab, and the last or twentieth day 7 Akbal. The first day
of the second month followed in correct numerical sequence with the name
8 Kan, the second with the name 9 Chicchan. Thus repeating the 20 names
of the days with the above combination of numbers from 1 to 13 they
reached the 360th day with the name 9 Akbal. Then followed the
intercalary week of 5 days bearing the names 10 Kan, 11 Chicchan, 12
Cimij, 13 Manik, and 1 Lamat.

The second year begins with 2 Muluc. In the same manner going on with
the combination the first day of the third year was 3 Hix, then followed
4 Cavac, 9 Kan, 10 Muluc, 11 Hix, 12 Cavac, 13 Kan, 1 Muluc, 2 Hix, and
so on. At the end of the 52d year the above-mentioned combination was
exhausted, for the 53d year began again with the day 1 Kan.

 ─────────┬─────┬─────┬─────┬─────┬─────┬─────┬───────────┬─────┬──────
 Names of │Pop. │Uoo. │Zip. │Zodz.│Zeec.│Xul. │Dze-yaxkin.│Mol. │Dchen.
    the   │     │     │     │     │     │     │           │     │
  Months. │     │     │     │     │     │     │           │     │
 Names of │    1│    2│    3│    4│    5│    6│          7│    8│     9
 the Days.│     │     │     │     │     │     │           │     │
 ─────────┼─────┼─────┼─────┼─────┼─────┼─────┼───────────┼─────┼──────
 Kan,     │    1│    8│    2│    9│    3│   10│          4│   11│     5
 Chicchau,│    2│    9│    3│   10│    4│   11│          5│   12│     6
 Quimij,  │    3│   10│    4│   11│    5│   12│          6│   13│     7
 Manik,   │    4│   11│    5│   12│    6│   13│          7│    1│     8
 Lamat,   │    5│   12│    6│   13│    7│    1│          8│    2│     9
 Muluc,   │    6│   13│    7│    1│    8│    2│          9│    3│    10
 Oc,      │    7│    1│    8│    2│    9│    3│         10│    4│    11
 Chuen,   │    8│    2│    9│    3│   10│    4│         11│    5│    12
 Eb,      │    9│    3│   10│    4│   11│    5│         12│    6│    13
 Been,    │   10│    4│   11│    5│   12│    6│         13│    7│     1
 Gix,     │   11│    5│   12│    6│   13│    7│          1│    8│     2
 Men,     │   12│    6│   13│    7│    1│    8│          2│    9│     3
 Quib,    │   13│    7│    1│    8│    2│    9│          3│   10│     4
 Caban,   │    1│    8│    2│    9│    3│   10│          4│   11│     5
 Edznab,  │    2│    9│    3│   10│    4│   11│          5│   12│     6
 Cavac,   │    3│   10│    4│   11│    5│   12│          6│   13│     7
 Ahau,    │    4│   11│    5│   12│    6│   13│          7│    1│     8
 Ymix,    │    5│   12│    6│   13│    7│    1│          8│    2│     9
 Yk,      │    6│   13│    7│    1│    8│    2│          9│    3│    10
 Akbal,   │    7│    1│    8│    2│    9│    3│         10│    4│    11
 ─────────┴─────┴─────┴─────┴─────┴─────┴─────┴───────────┴─────┴──────

 ─────────┬─────┬─────┬─────┬─────┬───────┬─────┬─────┬──────┬──────
 Names of │Yeax.│Zac. │Quej.│Mac. │Kankin.│Moan.│Pax. │Kayab.│Cumkū.
    the   │     │     │     │     │       │     │     │      │
  Months. │     │     │     │     │       │     │     │      │
 Names of │   10│   11│   12│   13│     14│   15│   16│    17│    18
 the Days.│     │     │     │     │       │     │     │      │
 ─────────┼─────┼─────┼─────┼─────┼───────┼─────┼─────┼──────┼──────
 Kan,     │   12│    6│   13│    7│      1│    8│    2│     9│     3
 Chicchau,│   13│    7│    1│    8│      2│    9│    3│    10│     4
 Quimij,  │    1│    8│    2│    9│      3│   10│    4│    11│     5
 Manik,   │    2│    9│    3│   10│      4│   11│    5│    12│     6
 Lamat,   │    3│   10│    4│   11│      5│   12│    6│    13│     7
 Muluc,   │    4│   11│    5│   12│      6│   13│    7│     1│     8
 Oc,      │    5│   12│    6│   13│      7│    1│    8│     2│     9
 Chuen,   │    6│   13│    7│    1│      8│    2│    9│     3│    10
 Eb,      │    7│    1│    8│    2│      9│    3│   10│     4│    11
 Been,    │    8│    2│    9│    3│     10│    4│   11│     5│    12
 Gix,     │    9│    3│   10│    4│     11│    5│   12│     6│    13
 Men,     │   10│    4│   11│    5│     12│    6│   13│     7│     1
 Quib,    │   11│    5│   12│    6│     13│    7│    1│     8│     2
 Caban,   │   12│    6│   13│    7│      1│    8│    2│     9│     3
 Edznab,  │   13│    7│    1│    8│      2│    9│    3│    10│     4
 Cavac,   │    1│    8│    2│    9│      3│   10│    4│    11│     5
 Ahau,    │    2│    9│    3│   10│      4│   11│    5│    12│     6
 Ymix,    │    3│   10│    4│   11│      5│   12│    6│    13│     7
 Yk,      │    4│   11│    5│   12│      6│   13│    7│     1│     8
 Akbal,   │    5│   12│    6│   13│      7│    1│    8│     2│     9
 ─────────┴─────┴─────┴─────┴─────┴───────┴─────┴─────┴──────┴──────

The following year must begin with 2 Muluc.

                    Each week had 5 days│Kan      10
                                        │Chicchan 11
                                        │Quimij   12
                                        │Manik    13
                                        │Lamat     1

It is to be observed here that this arrangement of a calendar of epochs
agrees with that in use in the interior of Mexico. There, the numbers
from 1 to 13 were combined with four names, Tecpatl, Calli, Tochtli and
Acatl, which they had taken, like the Mayas, from the names for the 20
days of the month; and both calendars represent the first days of their
weeks of five days as occurring upon the 1st, 6th, 11th and 16th days of
the month. From this system Señor Perez arrives at the division into
great epochs of 52 years used in Mexico as well as in Yucatan. This
statement appears hazardous in the highest degree when compared with the
statements made by the before-mentioned authorities. They claim for
Yucatan an epoch of 20 and 260 years respectively; and Landa, who wrote
with the first impressions of the conquest still fresh in his mind, and
whose information came directly from the natives themselves, agrees with
them. Without doubt Señor Perez must have been aware of this
contradiction. After he had developed in §7 the so-called epoch of the
Mayas of 52 years he makes us acquainted with this national Maya epoch,
though, as we shall presently learn, he disagrees with the Maya writers
as to the time of its duration. His statement is: §8. “The Yucatecans,
besides the great cycle of 52 years, employed still another great cycle,
which had reference to certain portions of it, in order to date the main
epoch, and the most notable events of their history. Each of these
cycles contained 13 periods, of 24 years each, making together 312
years. Each period, or _Ahau-Katun_ was divided into two parts. The
first of these parts of 20 years was enclosed in a square (_sic_), and
was called on that account _amaytun_, _lamayte_ or _lamaytun_. The
second part of 4 years formed, so to speak, a pedestal for the first
part, and was called _chek oc Katun_, or _lath oc Katun_, which
signifies a _chair_ or pedestal. These years were considered
intercalary, and were held to be unlucky years. They were called _u yail
Jaab_, and the same was the case with the 5 intercalary days to which
they corresponded. The separation of the 20 years from the following 4
years gave rise to the erroneous idea that the _Ahaues_ consisted of
twenty years only, an error which has prevailed almost universally among
those who have written upon this subject. But if they had counted the
years which compose a period, and had taken notice of the positive
declarations of the manuscript to the effect that the _Ahaues_ consisted
of 24 years divided as above stated, they would not have misled their
readers on this point.”

Señor Perez continues:—

“It is an incontrovertible fact that those Maya periods, epochs or ages,
took their name from _Ahau Katun_, for they began to be counted from the
day which bore the name _Ahau_, the second day of those years, which
began with the name _Cavac_. But as these days and numbers were taken
from years which had run their course, the periods of 24 years could
never maintain an arithmetical order, but succeeded each other according
to the following arrangement of numbers: 13, 11, 9, 7, 5, 3, 1, 12, 10,
8, 6, 4, 2. As the Indians considered the number 13 the initial number,
it is probable that some remarkable event had happened in that year,
because, when the Spaniards arrived in the Peninsula, the Indians then
counted the 8th as the 1st, that being the date at which their ancestors
came to settle there; and an Indian writer proposed that they should
abandon that order also, and begin counting from the 11th, solely
because the Conquest had happened in that Ahau. Now, if the 13th Ahau
Katun began on a second day of the year, it must be that year which
began on 12 Cavac, and the 12th of the series. The 11th Ahau would
commence in the year of 10 Cavac, which occurred after a period of 24
years, and so on with the rest; taking notice that after the lapse of
years we come to the respective number marked in the course of the
Ahaues which is placed first; proving that they consisted of 24, and
not, as some have believed, of 20 years.”

From the heading (§8), “_Of the Great Cycle of 312 years, or Ahau
Katunes_,” as well as of the text just quoted, it is apparent that Señor
Perez intended to establish the fact that the ancient Maya cycles were
composed of 24 and 312 years respectively. He does so in manifest
contradiction to the prevalent opinion that they consisted of 20 and 260
years. We do not understand the reasons why he should have come to this
conclusion. It grew out neither from the facts alleged nor from the
connection into which he wove them together. The peculiar circumstance
of having, in his commentary references, four years intercalated in
succession to the usual cycle of twenty years, and included in a square,
to serve as a “_pedestal_” to the former, is not capable of shedding new
light upon the question and causing us to distrust authorities on which
we were accustomed to rely. The other reason, which stands second in his
order of forming premises for his conclusion, is said to be the
undeniable fact, that those periods took their name of _Ahau Katun_,
because they began to be counted from the day Ahau, which was the second
day of those years that began in _Cavac_. Of this incontrovertible fact
the readers are not elsewhere informed. The information, however, which
we are able to give is that according to all we have been able to gather
on the Maya Calendar, a period, or a single year, commencing with a day
named _Ahau_, has never existed in their system of counting. They always
commenced it with the words _Kan_, _Muluc_, _Hix_, _Cavac_. If there
existed any exceptional ground for changing an old established method of
dating, the reason should have been stated, for it is preposterous to
assume that the first day of a great cyclical period should have taken
its name from any other day of the year’s calendar than from the four
above named. Nor do we understand the reason why, just here, the topic
of the succession of the numbers 13, 11, 9, 7, 5, 3, 1, 12, 10, 8, 6, 4,
2, was introduced. Could it have been with the intention of showing that
this singular enumeration of alternating _Ahaues_, which we shall
hereafter speak of, occurred only in cycles of 24 years, and that
therefrom a proof might be derived for establishing the pretended cycle
of 24 and 312 years? Evidence of this should have been given by a table
showing the series, and by still another table in which should be shown
that such an alternating succession did not occur in cycles composed of
20 years. Not one single fact can be detected in Señor Perez’s text, by
which the long established assumption of a 20 years’ cycle has been
disproved.

Nevertheless, the data which we possess of the ancient Maya Calendar are
not so complete as to disprove emphatically that a cycle of 24 and 312
years respectively was never used by the Maya chronologers.

Without doubt, Yucatan owed its ancient greatness to the success of
uniting a rude and scattered population around a number of theocratical
centres, where similar forms of worship were maintained. Though the
ancient records are wanting, this feature of the Maya system stands out
upon the background of dim traditions with great distinctness. After
this concentration of tribes, and with the view of regulating worship, a
uniform calendar would have been introduced, the main features of which
would probably have been a solar year of 365 days, the division of the
year into 20 months, and a cyclical period of 20 and 260 years
respectively. In the middle of the 11th century great tribal revolutions
took place on the high plateaus of Anahuac, by which the lowlands of
Yucatan were also affected. An adventurous tribe of the Nahuatl stock
possessed itself of one of the principal towns of Yucatan and
established its influence and power. Mayapan became the centre of
Nahuatl worship. The calendar the invaders brought with them must have
been the old honored division of the years into 365 days, with 20
months, and their cyclical period of not 20 but 52 years, and it is also
known that about the year 1450, the political union of the Mayas was
broken into several smaller divisions, some of which presumably would
have held to the ancient cycle of 20 years; others may have adopted the
Nahuatl cycle of 52 years, and possibly, may have introduced the cycle
of 24 years spoken of by Señor Perez. Political schism was likely to
have generated also a hierarchical one, and each newly formed body of
priests, in whose hands the custody and composition of annals fell,
would have sought to distinguish themselves from their predecessors by
innovations, if only of a formal character. Such changes we also observe
among the Nahuatls in Anahuac. The period of 52 years, however, seems to
have constantly prevailed among them, and also the divisions of the 365
days into 18 months of 20 days each.

We find, for instance, that one of the Nahuatl tribes begins its annals
with December 9, another selects December 26, another January 9, and
others January 12, February 4, and February 22. We also know that a
different calculation prevailed among these tribes in beginning their
annals. The State of Colhuacan began its chronology with a year 1
_Calli_, the State of Mexico with 2 _Acatl_, others with 1 _Tochtli_,
and seemingly the most ancient calculation began with the year 1
_Tecpatl_. Thus we have a historical basis for our assertion that the
Nahuatl as well as the Maya tribes did not conform to a uniform rule in
beginning their first year’s date, in their chronological epochs, or in
the division of their cyclical epochs.

In spite of this diversity, so perplexing to modern chronologists, the
Aztecs and the Mayas were both governed by the same general principle in
arranging their calendars. Both nations recognized the fact that in the
past their solar year had numbered only 360 days; and they preserved in
the words nemotemi and xona-kaba-kin, the remembrance of a not to be
forgotten effort exerted by their ancestors to correct the primordial
solar year of 360 days into one of 365 days. Both nations
conscientiously kept on dividing the year into 18 months, and each of
the months into 20 days, and with both the number 13 returns as a basis
governing the calendar of years as well as that of periods.[35]

We notice, moreover, that both nations omit to count the 20 days of the
month in the succession of the figures 1–20, but after the thirteenth
day they again begin with the number 1, and the 20th day therefore was
figured with the number 7, and also that the Mexicans counted their
smallest period with 13 years, the so-called _tlapilli_, and upon its
quadruple the cycle of 52 years was based. The lesser Maya or _Ahau_
period is 20 years, while the greater or _Ahau Katun_ is 260 years or 13
times the smaller. Señor Perez’s lesser period of 24, and the greater
one of 312 years show the same method and calculation (13 × 24 = 312).

This conformity between the early calendars of Central America should
not escape the observation of the future historical enquirer. He will be
compelled to adopt a very remote period of time when both nations,
differing so entirely in their language, dwelt in peace, connected by
the strong bands of a hierarchical power. One of these two nations, it
is clear, must have invented it. Hence the question arises, was it
original with the immigrating Nahuatl tribes who came from the higher
northern countries as is reported, and did they succeed in forming such
a consolidation with the Maya races as to mingle both under the same
hierarchical government, or did the contrary take place? The most
prevalent opinion makes the Nahuas the inventors of the general system
of chronology, but later students begin to express themselves in favor
of its Maya origin. On a more fitting occasion we are desirous to
present our reasons for taking the latter view.

Before passing from these chronological speculations to the discussion
of the Maya Manuscript, we wish to state briefly our idea of the origin
of the system of reckoning by alternating Ahaues. [See page 66]. We
promised to return to this subject, and shall now endeavor to give a
solution to this chronological problem differing from that of Señor
Perez. A passage in Bishop Landa’s work, determined our decision. After
a previous and positive assertion that the lesser Ahau period consisted
of 20 years, Landa continues, ... “The order in which they computed
their dates and made their prophecies by the aid of this computation (of
20 years) was arrived at by having two idols, dedicated to two of these
characters (_Ahaues_). To the first idol, which stands with a cross
marked above the circle, they paid homage by making him offerings and
sacrifices, in order to obtain an immunity from the calamities to come
in these 20 years, but after ten of these years had passed they offered
nothing but incense and worship. When the twenty years of the first were
fully passed they began to occupy themselves with the presages of their
second idol and to offer sacrifices to him, having taken away their
first idol to replace it by the second, in order to worship it in the
coming ten years.”[36]

[Illustration:

  AHAU KATUN.

  [Above we give a reproduction of a Maya Ahau Katun wheel taken from
    that in Landa’s “Las cosas de Yucatan,” § XL., in order that his
    explanation may be understood.]
]

“The Indians say, for example, that the Spaniards arrived at the City of
Mérida in the year of the nativity of our Lord and Master 1541, which
was precisely the first year of _Buluc Ahau_ (11 Ahau), the same that we
find placed at the top of the instrument[37] below the cross, and which
also indicates that they arrived in the month _Pop_, which is the first
in their year. Had the Spaniards not come as they did, then they would
have placed the Idol of _Bolon Ahau_ (9 Ahau), offering homage to it,
and continuing to refer to the prognostics of _Buluc Ahau_, till the
year 1561; and then they would take it from the temple and put in its
place that of _Vuc Ahau_ (7 Ahau), all the while continuing to refer to
the prognostics of _Buluc Ahau_, for ten years more, and the same with
the others until the tour was made. In this way they made up their
Katuns of twenty and ten years, worshipping them according to their
superstitions and juggleries, which were in such great numbers that
there were more than enough to deceive that simple people, and there is
reason for astonishment when one knows what kind of things in nature and
experience belong to the Demon.”

Whoever is acquainted with the awkwardness and literary negligence of
Landa’s writing will not be astonished that in his statement he left out
something which a more careful writer would have expressed, and placed
at the head of his explanation. The wanting statement, however, can be
supplied. It will be noticed that Landa in his text only refers to two
Ahau Idols worshipped in the temple. But this number must have been 13,
as is evident from the 3d Idol _Vuc Ahau_, mentioned afterwards in the
statement with which he finished his description, in order not to always
repeat the same thing of the ten other idols which are painted on the
wheel. Let us then take the statement of Landa supplemented by what we
have said above as to the questionable nomenclature of these Ahaues as
they appear in the row of numbers 13, 11, 9, 7, 5, 3, 1, 12, 10, 8, 6,
4, 2. Landa’s description gives us to understand that the lapse of
twenty years was always required before the new combination of two idols
was presented to the worshippers, and which had not before been seen in
the temple in company with the former Idols. For example: When Idol 3
was placed in the temple, Idol 2 took a first place among the
worshippers. Indeed, Idol 2 was in the temple with Idol 1, but Idol 3
was not with Idol 1, nor Idol 4 with Idol 2. If such a combination
repeating itself after 20 years, represented a space of time familiar to
the Mayas, it is natural that it should receive the name Ahau or period
of the _god_,[38] and that it should receive its name from the number of
the Idol presiding at the expiration of this space of 20 years. If
therefore in the rotation of the circle Idols 2 and 3 passed out of the
temple, the combination, or what is the same, the space of 20 years,
during which they had ornamented the temple will have borne the name 2
_Ahau_, on the ground that Idol 2 had preceded it. The second
combination, then, would follow when the presidency of Idol 4 would have
finished its term, and in this way the row 2, 4, 6, 8, 10, 12, 1, 3, 5,
7, 9, 11, 13, may have had its origin.

Now, it is true that the order in which these numbers stand is different
from that transmitted to us, which begins with 13 and is followed by 11
and 9. The reverse of this method of reckoning may possibly be accounted
for in this way: An epoch unknown to us may have occurred when the Maya
chroniclers desired to review past events and bring them into order.
Counting backwards from such a date they would have called the first
period of twenty years not the 13th, nor, according to our above
statement, the 1st, but the 2d Ahau. Consequently the period after the
expiration of the great cycles of 260 years would have been called the
13th Ahau, though properly speaking it should have been the 2d Ahau. An
historical epoch for such reckoning backward is known to have occurred.
It occurred again in the year 1542, when the conquest of Yucatan by the
Spaniards took place. It appears that the Mayas in that year declared
their 13th Ahau period to be at an end, from 1522 to 1542; consequently
a back reckoning, according to this system of the Mayas, gave a 2d Ahau
for the period of 1502–22, a 4th Ahau for that of 1482–1502, and going
on in the same way of reckoning the year 1282 would have represented the
expiration of the 13th _Ahau_.

The circle of Landa exemplifies this manner of counting. He starts from
the 13th Ahau, counting from left to right. But if we count in the
opposite direction we should obtain the row of numbers 2, 4, 6, 8, &c.,
as we have shown above. If we refer to the striking discovery on the
Mexican Calendar stone[39] that the days upon that circle are not
counted towards the right but towards the left, and generalize it as a
rule to be adopted also for the chronological cycles of the Mayas, we
should come to the conclusion that the Mayas in some of their former
chronological epochs counted their Ahaues in that natural order. Who
shall say that the reversed counting did not originate from a
misunderstanding on the part of the Spaniards? We do not claim to have
finally disposed of the question. Every new attempt will be a welcome
addition to the cause, for each new investigator is obliged to descend
deeper into the dark mine where Maya history lies buried.


              SEÑOR PEREZ’S TRANSLATION OF THE MANUSCRIPT.

Señor Perez is thus far the only interpreter of the Maya Manuscript, and
his Spanish text found a skilful translator in Mr. John L. Stephens.
Neither the Spanish text nor the special chronological analysis of each
paragraph composed by Señor Perez, have hitherto been made public; we
owe the possession of both these documents to the kindness of our
friend, Dr. Carl Hermann Berendt, lately deceased, who, during his long
residence in Yucatan, was occupied in amassing a large collection of
matters relating to Maya literature and history, in original form or in
authentic copies. In comparing the Spanish with the English
translations, it seems that many things, not clear in the first, had
been made more intelligible in the last. It is evident that Señor Perez
sought to translate the Maya text as literally and faithfully as he
could into the Spanish language, otherwise his text would have been more
fluent and finished. The abruptness of expression, and the frequent
ellipses in the construction of its sentences, show that the Maya idiom
has been faithfully rendered. Such a course increases the interest, and
at the same time it creates confidence in the correctness of the
translation. Dr. Berendt, the profound scholar of the Maya language,
wrote us as follows on March 14, 1873: “I have several times undertaken
to translate this manuscript myself, but have always given up the task.
The manifold doubts which the original text leaves open seem to me
correctly solved by Señor Perez, and it always appeared to me that I
might indeed make another but not a better translation. The small
changes in the text of Stephens, of which you speak, I do not believe
were introduced merely from a love of his own expressions. I believe
that he first came to an understanding with Perez, and sought only to
assist the better comprehension of the manuscript for the benefit of the
public at large.”

It is to be hoped that the differences of translation of the manuscript
spoken of above, and to which Señor Eligio Ancona[40] draws attention,
will be critically investigated and finally decided by the coming
generation of scholars in Yucatan. The sons of the country should be the
born judges of the language and the spirit of the literary relics of the
indigenous race. Recent investigations have shown that this language was
split into sixteen dialects, which were spoken by as many tribes, whose
territories extended far beyond the present area of the Yucatecan
peninsula.[41] Like all languages, these Maya idioms have undergone
changes during the last three or four centuries. To understand and
explain their now obsolete elements, must be left exclusively to the
native scholar.


                     DISCUSSION OF THE MANUSCRIPT.

It will now be our task to endeavor to clear away such doubts as may
arise in regard to the chronological interpretation of the Maya
Manuscript. These doubts have reference, first, to the choice of the
method to be pursued in reckoning the Ahaues either at 24 or at 20
years. Second, as to the manner of filling up certain gaps which the
author has left open in the chronological sequence of the Ahau period;
and finally, after building again this chronological structure in its
logical order, we must adapt the dates expressed in Ahaues to the
current language of our Christian chronological era.

In order to avoid troublesome reference to the text of the preceding
pages, we shall repeat the English translation, and for better
convenience, shall present two or more sections together. To demonstrate
Señor Perez’s system and method of counting, we shall give the
translation of the Spanish text, as communicated by Dr. Berendt, without
undertaking to make any special criticisms of it.

  _This is the series of Katuns that elapsed from the time of their
  separation from the land and house of Nonoual, in which were the
  four Tutul Xiu, lying to the west of Zuina, going out of the country
  of Tulapan._

With these few words the Maya author states his purpose. He wishes to
enumerate the Katuns or periods of time from the beginning of the
history of his nation to the arrival of the Spanish conquerors. He tells
us that his nation lived in a land called Tulapan, which was westerly
from another called Zuina, and that from thence, under the lead of four
chiefs, the Tutul Xiu, they had immigrated into this new country,
Yucatan.

[Illustration:

  [Map showing the movement of the Mayas as stated in the Manuscript.]
]

By Tutul Xiu the author evidently means the name of the reigning family,
which, at the arrival of the Spaniards, were considered as the ancient
rulers and hereditary lords of Chichen-Itza.[42] In regard to the
countries referred to by the names Tulapan and Zuina, we can only say
that in Central American traditions the name Tulapan oftentimes returns
under the form of Tulan. Thus, for example, the Quichés and
Cakchiqueles, sister nations of the Mayas, make mention of the above
countries in their annals.[43] Upon a closer examination of the text,
contained in the so-called “Popol Vuh,” we were unable to detect any
grounds for the assumption that these countries or places lay in a
distant orient. They probably will turn out to have been, or by the
annalists were thought to have been, situated on the northern boundaries
of Mexico, on a route of migration ending with the high plateaus of
Guatemala.

  _§1. Four epochs were spent in travelling before they arrived here
  with Holon Chantepeuh and his followers. When they began their
  journey towards this island, it was the 8th Ahau, and the 6th, 4th
  and 2d were spent in travelling, because in the 1st year of the 13th
  Ahau they arrived at this island, making together eighty-one years
  they were travelling between their departure from their country and
  their arrival at this island of Chacnouitan. These are 81 years._

We learn that four Ahau periods had passed the 8th, 6th, 4th and 2d
before the wanderers arrived with their leader, Holon Chantepeuh, at the
island of Chacnouitan. In the following 13th Ahau they are said to have
been already settled there. It is of the highest importance to note that
the Maya author here acknowledges that he reckoned each Ahau period as
20 years, and he remains faithful to this method to the end of the
manuscript. By this fact alone, we should be compelled to follow the
division of 20 years thus established, even if in contradiction to the
statements of other chroniclers, which fortunately is not the case.

As the author treats of the affairs of the Tutul Xiu or the so-called
Itza race, and attributes to them the discovery and colonization of
Yucatan, it is highly probable that he made use of the annals of the
Itzaes, and that they were arranged in periods of just 20 years. If we
should be right in this assumption the 20–year period must be regarded
as the most ancient ever used in Yucatan.

We cannot fully agree with Señor Perez and his countrymen that the
author intended to designate the peninsula of Yucatan when he speaks of
the Island of Chacnouitan. This name appears for the first and only time
in this manuscript. It is generally acknowledged that the name had never
previously been heard of.[44] We should state that the words of the text
are always _nay ti petene Chacnouitan_. If in Maya _peten_ meant only a
peninsula, we should take no exceptions. But the fundamental meaning of
_peten_ is an island, and as the demonstrative pronoun _nay_ means as
well “of this place” as “of that place,” the translation could as well
stand for “that distant island.” Whether the island was situated in the
ocean or in any of the many inland lakes, the probabilities seem to lie
with the latter supposition, for they came by land. Had they come by
sea, tradition would have dwelt with some characteristic remark upon
such an exceptional case. From the following paragraph it will become
still more evident that the Chacnouitan discovered by the Itzaes was
neither the whole nor the northern part of Yucatan, but a district
situated in the southwest of the peninsula.

  _§2. The 8th Ahau, the 6th Ahau, in the 2d Ahau arrived Ajmekat
  Tutul Xiu, and ninety-nine years they remained in Chacnouitan—years
  99._

  _§3. In this time also took place the discovery of the Province of
  Ziyan-caan or Bacalar; the 4th Ahau and the 2d Ahau and the 13th
  Ahau, or sixty years they had ruled in Ziyan-caan when_ THEY CAME
  HERE. _During these years of their government of the Province of
  Bacalar occurred the discovery of the Province of Chichen-Itza.
  These are years 60._

As the first section closed with the arrival at Chacnouitan, which took
place upon the 2d Ahau, it was to be expected that the second section
would continue the sequence of Ahaues so as to connect with the
necessarily following 13th Ahau. But we see that it begins with the 8th
Ahau, follows with the 6th and closes with the 2d Ahau.

Before taking notice of the accounts given in these two paragraphs let
us first ascertain what Ahaues were left out between the 2d Ahau, at the
end of the first section, and the 8th Ahau, with which the second
section begins. According to the rule above given on the alternating
Ahaues, the missing ones would be the following: The (13), (11), (9),
(7), (5), (3), (1), (12), and (10th) Ahau. Of these nine Ahaues, or 180
years, the author had nothing in mind to tell us. No event of
significance appears to have taken place. Perhaps the wanderers had to
rest to gather strength before attempting further conquests. Moreover,
this time belongs to the most ancient epochs of Maya history, and
information regarding it was so dim and so obscure that it appeared to
the author as of no account. The chronological sequence thus being
established, let us now turn to the contents of the two section, 2 and
3. They begin with the 8th Ahau and close with the 13th Ahau. As to the
events happening within the 8th, 6th, 4th, 2d and 13th Ahau, they indeed
do not appear in the wished for sequence. But the sequence, as will be
shown, can be established without making interpolations. It will be
noticed that in section 2 the 4th Ahau is not mentioned. After having
quoted the 8th and 6th Ahau, the author passes over this 4th Ahau and
mentions the arrival of Ajmekat, belonging to the family of the renowned
Tutul Xiu, who seems to have led in the conquests of Bacalar and
Chichen-Itza, which are recorded in section 3, as happening in the 4th,
2d and 13th Ahau. That these conquests must be counted into the epoch
mentioned with the names 8th, 6th, 4th, 2d and 13th Ahau is clearly
expressed by the words, “_in this time_,” so that no mistake can take
place as to the intimate connection with the arrival of Ajmekat. We
learn moreover that the time which the conquerors remained in the
province of Chacnouitan is said to have been 99 years. These 99 or 100
years cover exactly the time represented by the above five Ahaues, and
when reading at the end of the 3d paragraph that they had ruled 60 years
in Ziyan-caan Bacalar, it becomes clear that these 60 years are not
years that follow the 99 years, but that they were the last years of the
99 mentioned. The two sections supplement each other, and from them the
following impression is conveyed, that Chacnouitan was the territory
situated southwest of the shores of the great lagoon of Bacalar. The
wanderers had been waiting during eleven Ahaues, from the 13th to the
4th Ahau, before they made an attack against the possessors of Bacalar.
An attempt to take it appears to have been made during the 8th, 6th and
4th Ahaues, and only accomplished in the 2d Ahau, through the arrival or
help of Ajmekat, who led them further on to the discovery or conquest of
Chichen-Itza, in the 13th Ahau.

The difficulty of interpreting the two sections is removed as soon as we
view them in the light of the reasons given, not as two distinct epochs
of which the one follows the other, as Señor Perez does (see
commentary), but as belonging to one and the same epoch from the 8th to
the 13th Ahau. It must not be so much questioned what the author ought
to have done in order to represent his history in a logical way, _and on
account of his omissions cast a doubt upon the whole record_, as how to
use what he has left to construct a system from these elements, and to
avail ourselves unhesitatingly of the help of the chronological sequence
of Ahaues, which is and will remain the only reliable thread to lead us
through and out of the labyrinth.

  COMMENTARY OF SEÑOR PEREZ.—“The manuscript informs us that at the
  8th Ahau a colony of Toltecs under their leader Holon Chantépeuh,
  marched out from the city of Tulapan, and that in their wanderings
  they spent 4 Ahaues, 8, 6, 4, 2, till they came to Chacnouitan,
  which happened in the first year of the 13th Ahau. To doubt this is
  not possible, for this statement is the beginning and foundation of
  all later dates. According to my calculation which I will explain
  hereafter, it was from the year 144 to 217, which is 97 and not 81
  years, as the manuscript reports, for if we _compute_ the Ahaues
  with 24 years, as we have shown, and include the first year of the
  Ahau following as the time of their arrival, then the account makes
  97 years. They stayed in Chacnouitan with Ajmekat Tutul Xiu during
  the remaining years of the 13th Ahau, until the 2d Ahau.

  These Ahaues, as we have explained, should follow in the order 13,
  9, 7, 5, and not 13, 6, 8, 2, for this latter list represents
  earlier Ahaues, and as they represent different epochs they can only
  be expressed by the same figures after the expiration of 312 years,
  thereby clearly showing the error.

  It is likewise asserted that they remained 99 years in Chacnouitan,
  which could not have been true, for this would have made 119 actual
  years, or only 95 years if we reckon only four Ahaues, without the
  second, for if we regard the succession we miss the 4th Ahau, which
  the manuscript has left out. But the manuscript does not count four
  but five Ahaues, as it reckons an Ahau at 20 years, the five
  _Ahaues_ less one year make the aforesaid 99 years.”

  _§4. The 11th Ahau, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d and 1st Ahau, or 120 years,
  they ruled in Chichen-Itza, when it was destroyed, and they
  emigrated to Champutun where the Itzaes, holy men, had houses._

                                                          _Years 120._

  _§5. The 6th Ahau they took possession of the territory of
  Champutun, the 4th Ahau, 2d, 13th, 11th, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d, 1st,
  12th, 10th and 8th, Champutun was destroyed or abandoned. The Itzaes
  reigned two hundred and sixty years in Champutun when they returned
  in search of their homes, and they lived for several Katuns in the
  uninhabited mountains._

                                                          _Years 260._

  _§6. The 6th Ahau, 4th Ahau, after 40 years they returned to their
  homes once more and Champutun was lost to them._

                                                           _Years 40._

The fourth section, in correct sequence, continues the series from the
13th Ahau when Chichen-Itza was founded. It covers the 11th, 9th, 7th,
5th, 3d, and 1st Ahau, a space of 20 years, in which the wanderers make
the new region of Chichen-Itza their metropolis. Enemies, however, whose
names are not indicated, destroy the place and oblige them to look
elsewhere. They then turn to Champutun (now Champoton, also Potonchan),
situated in a southwesterly direction from Chichen-Itza, on the westerly
shore of the Peninsula.

The fifth section should begin with the 12th Ahau, but instead it
follows the 6th Ahau. Hence the (12th), (10th) and (8th) Ahau are
missing. These 60 years may be supposed to be the time required by the
exiles to recuperate their strength in order to conquer the new
territory of Champoton. In the 6th Ahau then they succeeded in taking
Champoton, and they remained there during the 4th, 2d, 13th, 11th, 9th,
7th, 5th, 3d, 1st, 12th, 10th and 8th Ahaus, a full _Ahau-Katun_ epoch
of 260 years. They were obliged to leave Champoton in the 8th _Ahau_,
and seemed willing to return to their old home, but determined to
reconquer Champoton. We are told in the sixth section that two Katuns or
40 years, were passed in delays and preparations, correctly figured by
the 6th and 4th Ahau; that they then made an attempt to reconquer
Champoton, failing in which, they were obliged to look about for a new
home.

  COMMENTARY OF SEÑOR PEREZ TO THE 4TH, 5TH AND 6TH SECTIONS.—They
  remained in Chichen-Itza and ruled there until it was destroyed,
  when they betook themselves to Champoton. Here they built their
  houses during the 11th, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d and 1st Ahaues (_sic_). If
  this succession should be stated correctly it would be the 10th,
  8th, 6th, 4th, 2d and 13th Ahau, or from the year 452 to 576, A. D.,
  when the 13th _Ahau_ expired. The Ahaues represented the years 432,
  456, 480, 504, 528 and 552 A. D.

  §5. In the 6th Ahau they took Champoton and held sway there during
  the following twelve Ahaues until it was destroyed. After this they
  looked again for a home after they had passed several Katunes in the
  mountainous regions, which were the 11th, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d, 1st,
  12th, 10th, 8th, 6th, 4th, 2d and 13th Ahaues, making a complete
  epoch of 312 years. Their coming should not have been stated as the
  6th, but the 11th Ahau, according to the explanation.

  §6. In the 6th and 4th Ahau they again erected houses after they had
  lost Champoton, that is after a lapse of 48 years, which requires a
  connection with the 11th and 9th Ahau. This occurred in the years
  888 to 936 A. D., for the 11th _Ahau_ began in 888, the 9th in 912,
  and ended in the year 936 A. D.

  _§7. In this Katun of the 2d Ahau, Ajcuitok Tutul Xiu established
  himself in Uxmal; the 2d Ahau, 13th, 11th, 9th, 7th, 5th, 3d, 1st,
  12th and 10th Ahau, equal to 200 years, they governed in Uxmal, with
  the governors of Chichen-Itza and Mayapan._

The former section closing with the 4th Ahau, this begins with the 2d
and is followed in correct succession by the 13th, 11th, 9th, 7th, 5th,
3d, 1st, 12th and 10th, a space of 200 years. In the 2d Ahau, under
their leader Ajcuitok, they settled down in a new region at the town of
Uxmal. It appears that Chichen-Itza had been rebuilt, and Mayapan newly
founded. Rulers resided at both places at peace with the Tutul Xiu at
Uxmal.

  COMMENTARY OF SEÑOR PEREZ TO SECTION 7.—In the 2d Ahau Ajcuitok
  Tutul Xiu made a settlement in Uxmal, and reigned there with the
  Governors of Chichen-Itza and Mayapan during 2d, 13th, 11th, 9th,
  7th, 5th, 3d, 1st, 12th and 10th Ahau. A correction of these Ahaues
  gives us the 7th, 5th, 3d, 1st, 12th, 10th, 8th, 6th, 4th and 2d,
  and brings them into harmony with the Christian era, to wit: the
  years 936, 960, 987, 1008, 1032, 1056, 1080, 1104, 1128 and 1152
  A. D. The 2d Ahau ended with the foundation and with the completion
  of 240 years in the year 1176, for the foundation took place in the
  year 936, when the 7th Ahau just now corrected began.

§8. _These are the Katuns, 11th, 9th and 6th Ahau (sic.) In the 8th the
Governor of Chichen-Itza was deposed because he murmured disrespectfully
against Hunac-eel. This happened to Chacxibchac of Chichen-Itza,
governor of the fortress of Mayalpan. Ninety years had elapsed, but the
tenth year of the 8th Ahau was the year in which he was overthrown by
Ajzinte-yut-chan with Tzunte-cum, Taxcal, Pantemit, Xuch-cuet, Ytzcuat
and Kakaltecat. These are the names of the seven Mayalpanes._

§9. _In the same Katun of the 8th Ahau, they attacked King Ulmil in
consequence of his quarrel with Ulil, King of Yzamal; thirteen divisions
of troops he had when he was routed by Hunac-eel; in the 6th Ahau the
war was over after 34 years._

As the foregoing section 7 closed with the 10th Ahau, we should expect
section 8 to begin with the 8th Ahau. We read, however, 11th, 9th and
6th Ahau. This sequence is evidently incorrect in itself, because the
9th can never be followed by the 6th Ahau. If the period began with the
11th Ahau, the sequence should follow with the 9th and 7th Ahau. The
correct reading of the text, however, will result from the examination
of that which follows immediately after this introductory sentence.
There we read these words: “In the 8th Ahau the governor of Chichen-Itza
was deposed,” etc., and this same 8th Ahau is mentioned again in the
sentence that follows, beginning with “Ninety years,” etc. So also it
reappears for a third time in section 9, at its beginning. Now, as
section 8 was expected to commence with the 8th Ahau, it is more than
probable that the author has blundered in some way. We presume that
instead of 11th, 9th and 6th, he intended to write 10th, 8th and 6th.
The 10th would indicate a reference made to the ending of the last
section. The 8th and 6th are those in which all the events described in
our two sections occur, for the insulted governor Hunac-eel of section 8
is the same who takes revenge in section 9.

This difficulty being removed, another arises, how to interpret the
words “ninety years elapsed, but the tenth year of the 8th Ahau was the
year in which he was overthrown,” etc. This reads as if these ninety
years were predecessors of the 8th Ahau. If this were so, they would
fall in the 10th, 12th, 1st, 3d and the first half of the 5th Ahau. Of
such Ahaues mention is made in the foregoing section 7. But we notice
these Ahaues were passed in peace and not in war, as our passage
evidently suggests. We cannot help thinking that another blunder is
concealed in this phrase, and that the author meant to write nine years.
If we write, _Nine years had elapsed, but the tenth year of the 8th Ahau
was the year in which he was overthrown_, the idea of the author seems
stated correctly. These nine years, then, would have fallen in the 10th
Ahau, with which we proposed to commence section 8, and nine years added
to the twenty years of the 8th Ahau, make twenty-nine years, and five
more years of the 6th Ahau give those thirty-four years, which, at the
end of section 9 are expressly indicated as passed in war. Such is the
sense which we give to these two somewhat perplexing sections.

  COMMENTARY OF SEÑOR PEREZ TO SECTIONS 8 AND 9.—The Ahaues 11th, 9th,
  6th and 8th passed away, and in the latter the governor Hunac-eel of
  Mayapan overthrew Chacxibchac, the governor of Chichen-Itza, because
  he had spoken ill of him, and in the 10th year of the last Ahau, the
  seven chiefs of Hunac-eel overcame the governor Chacxibchac. If a
  correction is to be made it should then stand 13th, 11th, 9th and
  7th Ahau, or the years 1176, 1200, 1224 and 1248 to the year 1272
  A. D. Hence it was the year 1258, the tenth year of the 7th Ahau
  that Chacxibchac was overcome.

  During the 8th Ahau occurred the destruction of the power of King
  Ulmil, because he had waged war against Ulil of Izamal, and
  Hunac-eel at the head of 13 divisions overcame Ulmil in the 6th
  Ahau. [We are unable to give the correction of Señor Perez, as we do
  not comprehend his text.]

  §10. _In the 6th Ahau, 4th Ahau, 2d Ahau, 13th Ahau, 11th Ahau the
  fortified territory of Mayapan was invaded by the men of Itza under
  their king Ulmil because they had walls, and governed in common the
  people of Mayalpan; eighty-three years elapsed after this event, and
  at the beginning of the 11th Ahau, Mayalpan was destroyed by
  strangers of the Uitzes or Highlanders, as was also Tancaj of
  Mayalpan._

                                                           _Years 83._

  _§11. In the 8th Ahau, Mayalpan was destroyed; the epochs of the
  6th, 4th, 2d elapsed, and at this period the Spaniards, for the
  first time arrived, and gave the name of Yucatan to this province,
  sixty years after the destruction of the fortress._

                                                           _Years 60._

In section 10 the 6th Ahau follows the 8th correctly, and the 4th, 2d,
13th and 11th Ahaues were passed in internal wars between Chichen-Itza
and Mayalpan. In the 11th Ahau a highland people, called Uitze (probably
Quiché), unite with the rulers of Chichen-Itza, and they then succeed in
destroying Mayalpan. In section 11 another destruction of Mayalpan is
reported. As this section begins with the 8th Ahau, and the foregoing
ended with the 11th, a gap was left which represents the (9th), (7th),
(5th), (3d), (1st), (12th) and (10th) Ahau. This gap undoubtedly means a
period of great exhaustion to both contending parties, and as a second
destruction of Mayalpan is reported in the 8th Ahau, we may fairly
assume that this city had recovered, and in making a last effort to
regain supremacy, was finally conquered. We understand the two reported
destructions of this city as the heroic and victorious effort of the
Maya race to exterminate the foreign Nahuatl invader, who, for a long
period succeeded in taking a strong foothold in the country. In the
succeeding epochs of the 6th, 4th and 2d Ahau, exhaustion from the war
and disintegration must have ensued, for such was the condition in which
the Spaniards found the Maya people in the following 13th and 11th
Ahaues, which were the last they were allowed to count.

  COMMENTARY OF SEÑOR PEREZ TO SECTIONS 10 AND 11.—In the 6th, 4th, 2d
  and 11th Ahaues the fortified land of Mayapan is attacked by the men
  of Itza and their king Ulmil, for it had walls, and the people were
  governed in a community. The place was destroyed by foreigners from
  the Highlands in the 11th Ahau, and Tancaj of Mayapan was also
  conquered. The correction of the reckoning gives us the 5th, 3d,
  1st, 12th and 10th Ahau. We have stated that the 5th _Ahau_ began in
  the year 1272, and the others were consequently 1296, 1320, 1344,
  and 1368, and the 8th Ahau ended in the year 1392 A. D.

  In the 8th Ahau Mayapan was destroyed, then followed the Katunes of
  the 6th, 4th and 2d Ahau, in which latter the Spaniards passed by
  and gave to the province the name of Yucatan. Hence, the Ahaues
  begin again their regular course, though it is a contradiction to
  say in the foregoing section that Mayapan had been destroyed in the
  11th Ahau (corrected to the 10th _Ahau_). It would perhaps have been
  better to say it had been destroyed for the second time, possibly
  for the purpose of rebuilding it. The 8th Ahau began in the year
  1392, the 6th, 4th and 2d Ahaues fell in the years 1416, 1440 and
  1464, which last ended in the year 1488 A. D.

  _§12. The 13th Ahau, 11th Ahau pestilence and small-pox were in the
  castles. In the 13th Ahau chief Ajpulà died. Six years were wanting
  to complete the 13th Ahau. This year was counted towards the east of
  the wheel, and began on the 4th Kan. Ajpulà died on the 18th day of
  the month Zip, on the 9th Imix; and that it may be known in numbers
  it was the year 1536, sixty years after the demolition of the
  fortress._

  _§13. Before the termination of the 11th Ahau the Spaniards arrived,
  holy men from the East came with them when they reached the land.
  The 9th Ahau was the commencement of baptism and Christianity; and
  in this year was the arrival of Toroba (Toral), the first bishop,
  1544._

After the 11th section had closed with the 2d Ahau, the 12th section
correctly begins with the 13th Ahau, and the 13th and last section
closed the manuscript with the 11th Ahau, when the government of the
Mayas was brought to an end by the arrival of the Spaniards. The
particular details contained in these two sections will be discussed
hereafter.

  COMMENTARY OF SEÑOR PEREZ TO SECTIONS 12 AND 13.—In the 13th and the
  11th Ahaues pestilence and small-pox reigned. In the sixth year,
  before the expiration of the 13th _Ahau_, Ajpulà died at the time
  when four Katunes were counted on the east of the wheel. His death
  happened on the 18th day of the month _Zip_, on the 9th day Imix.
  This date is wrong according to my reckoning; for the year 4 _Cavac_
  expired at the beginning and not at the end of the epoch, otherwise
  it would have been the year 4 _Muluc_. In the first case, the year 4
  Cavac was that of 1496, in the other case it would be the year 1506,
  and never that of 1536, for in that year the 9th Ahau began.[45]

We give, besides, a recapitulation which Señor Perez himself added to
his commentary, and for which we are indebted to the kindness of the
late Dr. C. Hermann Berendt:—

  “From what we have stated it will be seen that by only taking into
  account the number of epochs which are mentioned in the manuscript,
  and which elapsed between events, and by restoring this nomenclature
  according to the progressive series of the Ahaues, it appears that
  all indicated facts occur within the space of 58 epochs of 24 years
  each, which makes in all 1392 years to the expiration of the 11th
  Ahau. If we subtract these years from the year 1536, in which the
  11th Ahau expired, 1444 A. D. remains as the year when the Toltecs
  seem to have arrived to colonize the country.

  But if we allow the epochs and their enumeration to stand as they
  are, and in order to integrate the Ahaues in the sequence above
  indicated, add those which are missing, we should find that 97
  epochs, each of 24 years had passed. The sum of 2328 years,
  represented by this count, is a space of time of too great magnitude
  to bring into harmony with Mexican history, and would signify that
  this country was 40 years older than the foundation of Rome, and 17
  years older than the introduction of Greek Olympiads, which is very
  improbable.

  Should any hypercritical person fail to believe in the list of
  epochs because their succession is incorrect, let him remember that
  the list has much to render it worthy of belief, though it must be
  subjected to corrections. Still less ought any one to refuse belief
  in the historical statement of events. The manuscript indicates a
  traditional origin common to the history of all primitive nations.
  It is noticeable that no traditions exist to contradict the
  manuscript, and that it is the only one thus far discovered. The
  contents of the manuscript might be thus epitomized:—

  1. The Toltecs occupied 4 epochs in going from their home to
  Chacnouitan.

                                                         144–217 A. D.

  2. They arrived there in the first year of the succeeding epoch, and
  remained still 4 epochs more with their chieftain, Ajmekat Tutul
  Xiu.

                                                         218–360 A. D.

  3. They discovered Ziyan-Caan or Bacalar and ruled therein 3 epochs,
  till they discovered Chichen-Itza.

                                                         360–432 A. D.

  4. They remained at Chichen-Itza 6 epochs, till they set out to
  colonize Champoton.

                                                         432–576 A. D.

  5. From the discovery of Champoton, which they colonized and ruled
  until they lost it, 13 epochs elapsed.

                                                         576–888 A. D.

  6. They remain 2 epochs in the wilderness till they return again to
  Chichen-Itza.

                                                         888–936 A. D.

  7. In the following epoch Ajcuitok Tutul Xiu colonized Uxmal, and
  ruled during 10 epochs in harmony with the governors of Mayapan and
  Chichen.

                                                        936–1176 A. D.

  8. Three other epochs pass, and in the 10th year of the following
  epoch Chacxibchac, ruler of Chichen, was defeated by Hunac-eel,
  ruler of Mayapan, and his captains.

                                                       1176–1258 A. D.

  9. In the same epoch of the defeat of the ruler of Chichen they
  marched against Ulmil, who was king in the same Chichen, because he
  had waged war against Ulil, king of Izamal, which war Hunac-eel,
  brought to a close in the following epoch.

                                                       1258–1572 A. D.

  10. In spite of Ulmil’s defeat this ruler of Chichen planned an
  invasion of Mayapan. After the lapse of 2 more epochs, and in the
  third year of that which followed, Mayapan was destroyed in the year
  1368 by strangers who came from the mountains.

                                                       1272–1392 A. D.

  11. Besides the three named epochs, and indeed in the last of them,
  the Spaniards passed along, who gave to the province the name of
  Yucatan.

                                                       1392–1488 A. D.

  12. In the following epoch an epidemic reigned even in the temples
  and fortified places, and in the 6th year Ajpula died on the 11th of
  September, 1493.

                                                       1488–1512 A. D.

  13. In the 11th and last epoch (1536–1576) the conquerors arrived,
  to wit: in 1527, and in the following the first Bishop came, in the
  year 1541, and the conquest was completed in 1560 A. D.

                  *       *       *       *       *

  Thus much I have been able to bring to light in this matter. But
  with the help of dates, which I do not possess, and with that of the
  travels you have made in our country, the information which you have
  gathered must have enlarged your ideas on this subject, and I wish
  you would be so kind as to communicate them to your most devoted

                                                   F. I. JUAN PIO PEREZ.

 _Peto, April 2, 1842._
       MR. J. LLOYD STEPHENS.”


                          CONCLUDING REMARKS.

It will be noticed from the text of the Manuscript, that no events are
commemorated but such as are connected with _war_. In this style also
the Nahuatl annals were drawn up. With both nations _war_ was recognized
as the only fact worthy to be kept in the memory of the coming
generations. Nor does the author state whether the country was ruled by
kings or an emperor. It is rather suggested (section 7) that the tribes
were gathered in groups, with a large town as a centre, and this town
was governed by a priest. The words _halach uinicil_, _holy men_, were
somewhat too freely interpreted with _governor_ by the translator. In
regard to the considerable gaps in the sequence of years in the
manuscript, we will not longer attribute them to a lack of memory on the
part of the author, but to the custom generally observed among the
annalists to be regardless of any work of peace performed by the nation;
and whenever the question shall be discussed, at what epoch the building
of the huge pyramids and temples took place, these dates will contribute
to the answer. Periods of peace certainly began with years of great
exhaustion; but recovery must have ensued, and the unshaken energy of
the people and their leaders must have been directed to the undertaking
of works, in which they could exhibit also their taste for pomp and
architectural achievements. The gaps, therefore, instead of casting a
shadow upon the authority and completeness of the manuscript, may rather
be thought to perform the silent office of throwing light into the
obscure past of the Maya history. As to the method, however, which we
employed in computing the omitted periods of Ahaues, we have only to say
that it grew out from the nature of the Maya enumeration itself. The two
ends of the interrupted series being given, the number of the
intervening Ahaues could be easily supplied.

What now remains is, to discover for the restored and completed series
of Ahaues the corresponding chronological expressions in our era. We
find the total Ahau periods mentioned in the annals were 50. We have
thought it necessary to complete twenty more periods, so that we have
seventy periods (20×70), or 1400 years. As soon therefore as we know in
which year of our era the last or 13th Ahau mentioned in the manuscript
fell, we can, by reckoning backward, find the years date of the first
Ahau mentioned, to wit: the 8th Ahau, and also determine the dates and
events of each of all the other intervening Ahaues. The manuscript
fortunately affords us the necessary material for determining with
incontestable certainty the years date of the last 13th Ahau. It is the
following: we read in the 12th section that Chief Ajpulà died in a year
when there were still six years wanting before the expiration of the
13th Ahau, and that the year of his decease was 1536 A. D.

According to this statement the 13th Ahau ended with the year 1542.
Bishop Landa (see §41 of his Relacion de las Cosas de Yucatan) confirms
the correctness of the above calculation, though he says that the 13th
Ahau expired with the year 1541. Landa undoubtedly selects this date of
June 10th, 1541, as that of the last decisive victory at T’ho over the
Indians, while the author of the manuscript may have had in mind the
date when Mérida was officially incorporated as the capital, and a
dependency of the Spanish crown, which was January 6, 1542.[46] If we
subtract the total number of Ahaues already obtained, and amounting to
1400 years, from the year 1542, we obtain for the first epoch named in
the manuscript which is the 8th Ahau, or the starting of the conquerors
from Tulapan, the years 142–162 of our modern Christian era.

Of all the dates calculated from the manuscript only that of 1542 is
well established from a historical point of view, as that when Mérida
was declared the future capital of the conquered country. It is
represented by the last year of the 13th Ahau. A second date and event,
that of the final destruction of Mayapan, is mentioned by Cogolludo, who
places it about the year 1420 A. D., which would give (see table, page
96) a 12th or a 10th _Ahau_ period. But the manuscript in §11 gives
_Vaxac Ahau_, or the 8th _Ahau_, which according to our computation
represents the years between 1442 and 1462. Landa agrees with this
statement (Relacion de las Cosas de Yucatan, §IX., page 52). “_It is now
120 years since Mayapan was destroyed._” Landa wrote in the year 1566,
therefore, in his conception Mayapan was destroyed in 1446, which year
falls correctly in the 8th _Ahau_.

Landa’s account agrees also with another event mentioned in the
manuscript, the wanderings of the Itzaes 40 years in the wilderness
before they settled down at Uxmal and Mayapan, in the 6th and 4th Ahau,
which is in our calculation from 942–982 A. D. Landa, however, does not
fix the year (Relacion de las Cosas de Yucatan, §VIII., page 46). In
§VIII., page 49, he likewise speaks of a king of the tribes of Cocomes,
hostile to the Itzaes, who kept a Mexican garrison in Mayapan. This is
an allusion to the seven Mayalpanes mentioned in the manuscript (in §8),
all of whom have Mexican (Nahuatl) names. There also the year is not
given. However, his confirmation of so early events in Maya history
appears to be of high value.

It is fortunate that the manuscript just in the middle of its narration
exhibits a long succession of Ahau periods without any gaps at all. We
can count through sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9 and 10, thirty-one _Ahau_
periods or 620 _years_ of uninterrupted history. They represent,
according to our calculation, the epochs from the years 682–1302 A. D.,
or from the taking of Champoton to the first destruction of Mayapan by
the assistance of the foreign Uitzes. This compact period of time
touches a very remote epoch in the history of the civilized nations of
Central America. It reaches backwards to an epoch when in Europe, Pepin
D’Heristal and his family laid the foundation to their future ascendancy
on the throne of France. If we look still further backward in our table,
we notice another long period of time (sections 3 and 4) which
represents the sum of eight uninterrupted Ahaues, equal to 160 years.
The connection of these two great periods was re-established by the
interpolation of the three Ahaues, 8, 10 and 12 in section 5, a
correction for which there should be not the least question. Groping our
way, we should reach the epochs when Bacalar was founded, with a date as
early as between 462 and 482 A. D. At this point we are no longer able
to follow the conquerors on their route. The location of Bacalar is well
known to us, but that of Chacnouitan and Tulapan has escaped our
investigation. Notwithstanding, by the aid of the quoted Ahaues we are
able to fix the time for the long rest and residence in Chacnouitan, and
for their remote starting from Tulapan. It comprises the epochs
backwards from the year 462 to that of 162, and since the text reports
that eighty years were spent in the migration, we are entitled to fix
the time for the arrival in the peninsula with the year 242 A. D. It is
of significance for our purpose, that this settling on the peninsula can
be computed with the year 242 A. D. It represents, as will be seen, the
13th Ahau, a date always assumed by the Maya chronologists as one with
which they designate the commencement of a new cycle.


The following table contains a chronological translation of the Ahaues
as they correspond with the years of our Christian era. Accordingly, the
historical events would correspond to the following dates of our
Christian era:—

 ═══════════╤═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
 SECTIONS OF│     AHAUES.
     THE    │
 MANUSCRIPT.│
 ───────────┼───────────────────────────────────────────────────────────
     § 1    │8, 6, 4, 2.       Passed in the migration of the conquerors
            │                    from Tulapan, = 162, 182, 202, 222.
     § 2    │(13), (11), (9),  Their stay in Chacnouitan, = 242, 262,
            │  (7), (5), (3),    282, 302, 322, 342, 362, 382, 402, 422,
            │  (1), (12),        442.
            │  (10), 8, 6.
     § 3    │(4) 2, 13.        They take Bacalar,  = 462, 482, 502.
     § 4    │11, 9, 7, 5, 3,   Settlement at Chichen-Itza and its
            │  1.                destruction, = 522, 542, 562, 582, 602,
            │                    622.
     § 5    │(12), (10), (8).  En route for Champoton, = 642, 662, 682.
     do.    │6, 4, 2, 13, 11,  In Champoton, = 702, 722, 742, 762, 782,
            │  9, 7, 5, 3, 1,    802, 822, 842, 862, 882, 902, 922, 942.
            │  12, 10, 8.
     § 6    │6, 4.             They lose Champoton twice, = 962, 982.
     § 7    │2, 13, 11, 9, 7,  Uxmal, Mayapan and Chichen-Itza in
            │  5, 3, 1, 12,      league, = 1002, 1022, 1042, 1062, 1082,
            │  10.               1102, 1122, 1142, 1162, 1182.
 §§ 8 and 9 │8.                The war between Chichen-Itza and Mayapan,
            │                    = 1182–1202.
     §10    │6, 4, 2, 13, 11.  The war continues; the Uitzes help in the
            │                    destruction of Mayapan, = 1222, 1242,
            │                    1262, 1282, 1302.
     §11    │(9), (7), (5),    Mayapan destroyed again, = 1322, 1342,
            │  (3), (1), (12),   1362, 1382, 1402, 1422, 1442, 1462.
            │  (10), 8.
     do.    │6, 4, 2.          The Spaniards make their appearance in
            │                    Yucatan, = 1482, 1502, 1522.
  §§ 12 and │13.               Beginning of the propagation of
     13     │                    Christianity, = 1542.
 ═══════════╧═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════

It will be noticed that the result obtained by our computation is almost
identical with that of Señor Perez. In his conception the manuscript
comprises the epoch from 144–1536 A. D.; in ours, that from 142–1542. A
coincidence like this may be thought to justify the conclusion that
although we differed in our methods of interpretation and reckoning, the
agreement of the results appears so much the more satisfactory. We
should be pleased to view the subject in so favorable a light, but fear
we cannot. For, whilst, on the one hand, we are far from claiming any
infallibility for our _modus procedendi_, on the other hand, we cannot
help protesting against Señor Perez’s methods of obtaining his results.
Besides giving to the Ahau the not admissible duration of 24 years, he
further makes an evident mistake in the summing up of the Ahaues quoted
in the manuscript, by counting 58 of them instead of 50. He does not
seem aware that the Maya author mentions various of these Ahaues twice,
and even thrice, a fact which we took care to point out in the course of
our discussion. It is only by increasing the length of the Ahau to 24
years, and also by counting 8 Ahaues more than there actually were, that
Señor Perez is able to arrive at the date of 144 A. D. for the exodus
from Tulapan. If we should indeed incline to make allowance for his
choice of the 24–year period, because as it seems to us he was misled by
his authorities, he notwithstanding must be held accountable for the
mistake made in _counting in_ those eight ill-starred Ahaues. His
computation therefore being defective in itself, the favorable
impression gained from the fact that two interpreters arrived at an
almost identical result, will disappear. Such an agreement would have
been very valuable if either of the two interpreters could show that his
method stands the test of incontrovertible proof. Therefore, it is only
by chance that Señor Perez’s mistakes in reckoning make up very nearly
the same number of years that we have obtained; first, by means of the
interpolation of 20 more Ahaues; and second, by allowing only 20 years
for each Ahau period.

In conclusion it may be proper to make some statements as to the
position which this manuscript holds in aboriginal literature, and also
as to its value and use as a chronological document. In the first place
we are fully convinced of its genuineness. We have not been able to
examine the document itself as to the material upon which it was
written, nor as to the characters of the text, nor as to external
appearance, and we are not informed into whose hands it fell after it
left those of its author before it came into the possession of Señor
Perez. But we believe that Señor Perez had good reasons for regarding it
as a document prepared in the last half of the 16th century, at a time
near to that when Yucatan was conquered by the Spaniards. The language
and construction belong to that epoch, as we are told. But even if it
should not be an original, but a second or third copy, this would not be
enough to shake our faith in the authenticity and importance of its
contents. For setting aside the fact that its matter has a specific
national character, and presupposes a knowledge on the part of its
author which only a native could have obtained, the style of its
composition indicates its national bearing.

Let us fancy ourselves in the position of the Maya writer while at work.
Before him, on the table, stands the wheel for counting the Ahaues, and
as he bends over the sheets containing the painted annals, his eye turns
alternately from the paper to the wheel, making a careful comparison.
Then he pauses and considers in his mind what expressions he must use,
and afterwards begins to write. From time to time he cannot forbear,
however, casting an occasional glance at the letters of the Spanish
alphabet, in order to shape them correctly, for he is still a beginner
in this new art. Now, perhaps he wavers for a moment, and then begins
anew. The recollection of some ancient Maya song steals in upon his
mind, and by the aid of a few significant sentences he incorporates the
substance with his text. To interpolations of this kind we may attribute
such phrases as “the disrespectful utterances of Chacxibchac against
Hunac-eel.” Of the ancient Maya ballads, it is to be regretted, none are
known to exist. Yet there is no reason for relinquishing the hope
altogether, that some day, at least, a copy of the painted annals, which
our Maya writer evidently consulted, may be discovered, while we can
willingly dispense with the ballads.

As long as such hopes fail of realization, we must be satisfied with the
slight, but yet important, contribution offered us in the manuscript. We
may complain of its brevity, yet notwithstanding it is the most complete
document we possess of ancient American history. It is all the more
important for the reason that it relates to Yucatan, which in our
opinion, is the _very cradle_ of early American civilization. It is also
pleasant to observe that the manuscript is not at variance with what we
have learned from the fragmentary records made by Landa, Lizana and
Cogolludo. Notwithstanding its imperfections, it interprets and explains
much that had hitherto appeared uncertain and deficient. It is of
undoubted authenticity, and forms a firm foundation for the
reconstruction of the history of the past, which till now has remained
enigmatical, and which is faintly expressed by the crumbling ruins of
the peninsula.

The manuscript, finally, affords a guarantee that the long past not only
reached back to the remotest epoch of our era, but that more than all,
it stands in a near, perhaps in the most intimate, connection with the
history of the Nahuatl race. In reference to the homogeneous structure
of the Maya and Nahuatl calendars we have already expressed our belief
that these two nations were closely related to each other. In the
traditions of both occurs the name of Tula or Tulapan, as a fatherland
common to each of them.[47] This supposition appears to us still further
justified by the circumstance that the chronological annals of both
nations revert to the same period of time as a starting point. As
regards the Nahuatls, we refer to the circle of signs engraved on the
Calendar Stone which gave us the information that the annalists of
Anahuac in the year 1479, counted back twelve hundred and forty-eight
years to the celebration of their first festival in honor of the sun;
that is, they carried back their political or religious record to the
year 231 A. D. The Maya manuscript corresponds to this date, as we
think, since the year 242 A. D. resulted from our calculation. It was
the year in which the ancient conquerors, after wandering 80 years,
arrived on the Island of Chacnouitan where they made a permanent
settlement. This event happened in the 13th Ahau (see table), which, as
we know, is the starting point of Maya chronology, and likewise the
first date of that name which the manuscript mentions. The difference of
11 years which appears in the Nahuatl computation cannot be regarded as
of much importance.


THE MAYA AHAUES OF THE MSS., BROUGHT INTO CORRESPONDENCE WITH THE YEARS
                         OF THE CHRISTIAN ERA:—

                 ════════════════════╤════════════════
                 Ahaues Before Christ│
                 ────────────────────┼────────────────
                     10           118│
                      8            98│
                      6            78│
                      4            58│
                      2            38│
                     13            18│
                 ────────────────────┴────────────────

                 Ahaues Christian Era│
                 ────────────────────┼────────────────
                     11             2│
                      9            22│
                      7            42│
                      5            62│
                      3            82│
                      1           102│
                     12           122│
                     10           142│
                      8           162│
                      6           182│
                      4           202│
                      2           222│
                     13           242│

                     11           262│I. Ahau Katun.
                      9           282│
                      7           302│
                      5           322│
                      3           342│
                      1           362│
                     12           382│
                     10           402│
                      8           422│
                      6           442│
                      4           462│
                      2           482│
                     13           502│

                     11           522│II. Ahau Katun.
                      9           542│
                      7           562│
                      5           582│
                      3           602│
                      1           622│
                     12           642│
                     10           662│
                      8           682│
                      6           702│
                      4           722│
                      2           742│
                     13           762│

                     11           782│III. Ahau Katun.
                      9           802│
                      7           822│
                      5           842│
                      3           862│
                      1           882│
                     12           902│
                     10           922│
                      8           942│
                      6           962│
                      4           982│
                      2          1002│
                     13          1022│

                     11          1042│IV. Ahau Katun.
                      9          1062│
                      7          1082│
                      5          1102│
                      3          1122│
                      1          1142│
                     12          1162│
                     10          1182│
                      8          1202│
                      6          1222│
                      4          1242│
                      2          1262│
                     13          1282│

                     11          1302│V. Ahau Katun.
                      9          1322│
                      7          1342│
                      5          1362│
                      3          1382│
                      1          1402│
                     12          1422│
                     10          1442│
                      3          1462│
                      6          1482│
                      4          1502│
                      2          1522│
                     13          1542│
                 ════════════════════╧════════════════

If, however, it should seem desirable to examine chronological parallels
we shall refer our readers to a second chapter on Central American
chronology which is hereafter to appear, in which we propose to
undertake the task of illustrating and explaining still further the
parallelism of Maya and Nahuatl dates. It will then be proved that in
this written and still existing Nahuatl chronology, supported by the
date 231 A. D., found on the Calendar Stone, a still earlier date
designated as _X Calli_ can be found, which represents the year 137
A. D. In this year, according to the annals, a great eclipse of the sun
took place, with the remarkable statement that it occurred exactly at
the end of a year at 12 o’clock noon. In our manuscript we find the
first date preceding the settlement of Chacnouitan designated with the
8th Ahau, the date of the setting out from Tulapan, which we have
already stated to be the years 142–162 A. D. Another agreement is that
the Nahuatl records show that 166 years before the occurrence of the
above mentioned eclipse of the sun in the year 1 _Tecpatl_, a congress
of astrologers to amend the calendar of the nation took place at a town
called Huehuetlapallan, and by reckoning back we find that this year
corresponds with the year 29 B. C. If we then follow a hint which Señor
Perez has very ingeniously furnished that the manuscript strangely
begins with an 8th Ahau instead of a 13th Ahau, and that the Maya
chronology could be dated back to such a 13th Ahau as a proper beginning
connected with some interesting event, we find by reckoning back from
the 8th to the 13th Ahau the corresponding date to be the years 18–38
B. C.


Now, the results gained in this line of investigation, can be formulated
as follows:—

1. That the conquerors and settlers of the Yucatan peninsula, as well as
those of the Anahuac lakes, were joint participants in a correction of
their national calendar about the year 29 B. C.

2. That about the year 137 A. D., when a total eclipse of the sun took
place, the ancestors of both nations set out from their common
fatherland, Tula or Tulapan.

3. That about the year 231 A. D., both nations made their appearance on
the coast of Central America, and succeeded in conquering a large
portion of the peninsula.

It is true that we have only documentary evidence to substantiate the
theory just referred to. But, if we do not possess the desirable
evidence of monumental inscriptions, it behooves us to examine and to
weigh carefully that which still remains. In this connection we should
also remember that the sculptor, in carving his records, was not guided
by his memory alone, but that he copied the symbols from the sacred
books of his race; and that on the other hand, our learned Maya writer,
when translating these latter into written phonetic language, drew his
text, as did the sculptor from similar sources.

If therefore with the help of written records we can build up hypotheses
partially satisfactory, and not altogether improbable, we have
accomplished all that could be expected for the present, at least, and
have perhaps excited an interest in a branch of history which has
hitherto been held as dead and unproductive.

In conclusion, we would express the hope that the Maya manuscript may be
submitted to a rigid critical and linguistic examination, and that the
publication of the work may be appended to a heliotype copy of the
original in order to exhibit to students a document of so great
importance, and to ensure its preservation.

-----

Footnote 26:

  S. Salisbury, Jr., Esq.

Footnote 27:

  Col. John D. Washburn.

Footnote 28:

  The Hon. Isaac Davis.

Footnote 29:

  The Palenque Tablet, in the U. S. National Museum. By Charles Rau,
  1879.

Footnote 30:

  The North Americans of Antiquity, their origin, migrations, and type
  of civilization considered. By John T. Short, 1880.

Footnote 31:

  Historia de Yucatan. By Eligio Ancona, Mérida, 1879, Vol. I., page 95,
  note 1.

Footnote 32:

  Historia de Yucatan, Eligio Ancona, Mérida, 1879, Vol. II., page 78.

Footnote 33:

  Historia de Yucatan, Eligio Ancona, Mérida, 1879, Vol. I., page 156.
  “Landa in Relacion de las cosas de Yucatan, § viii., also speaks of
  the tranquillity and good harmony which reigned among the chiefs of
  those cities, and we notice that concerning the epochs referred to,
  his report is in accordance, in many details, with that of the
  anonymous author of the ‘Maya Epochs.’”

Footnote 34:

  _Diego Lopez de Cogolludo_, Historia de Yuacathan. Madrid, 1683, Lib.
  IV., Cap. 5. “The count they kept in their books was by 20 to 20
  years, and also by _lustros_ of 4 to 4 years. When five of these
  lustros had passed, or twenty years elapsed, they called this time
  _Katun_, and set one hewn stone (_piedra labrada_) upon another, well
  cemented by lime and sand. This can be noticed in their temples and
  ecclesiastical buildings, and especially on some ancient walls of our
  convent in Mérida, upon which the cells have been built.”

  The expression Katun, mentioned in this passage, and to which we have
  assigned a place in our title, requires a few words of explanation. As
  far as we know, it occurs only three times in our Central American
  authors; in Cogolludo, Landa, and in our manuscript. The first gives
  Katun the meaning of a period of twenty years. The second (§ XLI.),
  uses the following phraseology: “Contando XIII. veyntes con una de las
  XX. letras de los meses que llaman Ahau, sin orden, sino
  retruecandolos como pareceran en las siguiente raya redonda, llaman
  les a estos en su lengua Katunes.” This phraseology is somewhat
  obscure, nevertheless it will be admitted that his intention was to
  state that each of the images of the thirteen Ahaues, depicted on the
  surface of the wheel, represented twenty years, this being a period
  which they also called Katunes. We arrive at this definite conclusion
  by the consideration that if Landa says that the period of twenty
  years was called _Ahau_, and another one, that of 260 years, _Katun_,
  he would have stated the latter fact in expressive words; the occasion
  for doing so being too urgent to let it pass. The third author uses
  the word _Katun_ in his introductory lines, without giving it any
  numerical value. But it will be noticed that in the text which
  follows, the expression _Katun_ is used interchangeably with that of
  Ahau for a period of 20 years. This concordance of the three authors
  allows us to conclude that whenever the word _Katun_ is employed, the
  short period of 20 years was meant. In this connection a question
  arises: How is it that no author has made mention of the long period
  of 260 years, with which we become acquainted in Señor Perez’s
  chronological essay. It is probable he found it mentioned in some Maya
  manuscripts in which this long period appeared under the name of _Ahau
  Katun_. Though this fact of itself may be considered of no importance,
  still, as it would bring to light another of the many numerical
  combinations (13×20=260) in which those people indulged, with the
  fundamental figures of their calendar system, we must feel a great
  interest in the asserted fact, hoping it will turn out to be a correct
  statement. Our researches have been directed for a long time towards
  the discovery of the symbols which the Maya annalists or sculptors
  would have employed for their chronological periods. It was in
  connection with these studies that we discovered the Nahuatl symbols
  for the same, of which we gave account in our discussion on the
  Calendar Stone. Yet while this discovery only corroborates the
  suspicion long entertained that a certain set of Maya symbols
  represented the lustra of 5, and another the period of 20 years, we
  have not yet been able to recognize a Maya symbol for the period of
  260 years.

  The word Katun is a compound of _Kat_, to ask, to consult, and _tun_,
  stone; hence the stone, which when asked, gives account. Thus it was
  also understood by Cogolludo, who, when mentioning the word _Katun_
  (see above), was referring to the square stones incrusted into walls,
  upon which the convent was built. What traditions he followed in this
  is still better illustrated by the words in continuation of this
  passage: “In a place called Tixualahtun, which means a spot where one
  hewn stone is set upon another one, the Archives of the Indians are
  said to have existed, to which they resorted for all questions of
  historical interest (recurso de todos los acaecimientos), as we should
  do to Simancas, in Spain.” The stone columns found on the spot named,
  can be seen pictured in J. L. Stephens’ Incidents of travel in
  Yucatan, Vol. II., page 318.

Footnote 35:

  Señor Orozco y Berra, the learned and laborious author of the “Carta
  ethnografica de México, México, 1864,” has made this matter a subject
  of special investigation in “Anales del Museo Nacional de México,”
  1879, Tom. I., Entrega 7, page 305.

Footnote 36:

  Las cosas de Yucatan. Diego de Landa. Edition B. de Bourbourg. Paris,
  1864. Page 315, § XL.

Footnote 37:

  A specimen of such an instrument with a surface inscribed as the cut
  shows would hardly have been preserved. We think that the box enclosed
  a round disk turning on a pivot; this contrivance, evidently served as
  an aid to the memory in enumerating the alternating Ahaues. To-day, we
  should obtain the same result by writing the Ahaues in a horizontal or
  vertical line, but the Nahuatls and Mayas, having solely a symbolical
  or pictorial manner of representation, made use of this ingenious
  arrangement by painting the series of the Ahaues on the circumference
  of a circle. Thus the idea of an uninterrupted sequence of time and
  the connection of the 2d Ahau with the 13th were brought to notice.

Footnote 38:

  Ahau translated means: sovereign, king, august, principal. See page 3
  of Juan Pio Perez’s “Diccionario de la lengua Maya,” published in
  Mérida in 1877, by the friends and faithful executors of the last will
  of the defunct scholar. This valuable work comprises the whole of the
  linguistical stock of the Maya language, the words collected exceeding
  the number of 20,000, on 437 pages, quarto. It may be purchased from
  Dr. George E. Shiels, 896 Broadway, New York.

Footnote 39:

  Proceedings of Am. Antiq. Society, April 24, 1878, page 16, in an
  article on the Mexican Calendar Stone, by Ph. J. J. Valentini, in
  which mention was made of this singular kind of notation from the
  right to the left hand. A. v. Humboldt, in “Vue des Cordilléres,” page
  186, remarks: “Le cercle intérieur offre les vingt signes du jour: en
  se souvenant que Cipactli est le premier et Xochitl le dernier, on
  voit qu’gu’ici, _comme partout ailleurs_, les Mexicains ont rangé les
  hiéroglyphes de droite à gauche.” The great scholar has clothed in the
  form of a proven statement that which at the beginning of this century
  was an opinion generally prevalent among Americanists, and which does
  not bear the test, when the numerous copies existing of the Mexican
  calendar days are examined. They all show the arrangement of the days
  from the left to the right. The sculptured calendar is the only
  exception.

Footnote 40:

  Historia de Yucatan; by Eligio Ancona, Mérida, 1879, Vol. I., page
  159.

Footnote 41:

  Remarks on the Centres of Ancient Civilization in Central America.
  Address read before the Amer. Geogr. Society, New York, July 10, 1876,
  by Dr. C. Hermann Berendt.

Footnote 42:

  Herrera, Decade IV., Lib. X., Chapt. 2, 3 and 4. These three chapters
  are a compilation of data concerning the ancient history of Yucatan,
  and the adventurous career of the Itza race, which appear to be drawn
  from sources unknown at this day, and which are independent of what we
  can learn from Landa, from the author of the Maya Manuscript, and from
  Cogolludo.

Footnote 43:

  Traces of such a migration and succeeding halting places can be
  discovered in the Quiché annals, edited by Brasseur de Bourbourg, with
  the title of _Popol Vuh_. “Popol Vuh, le livre sacré et les mythes de
  l’antiquité centro-Américaine,” Paris, 1861, on pages 83, 235, 241,
  and pages 215, 217, 236, in which names are quoted and regions
  described which give evidence of a course of migration from northern
  to southern Mexico.

Footnote 44:

  _E. Ancona, Historia de Yucatan, Vol. I., page 34._ Mérida, 1879.—“The
  word Chacnovitan or Chacnouitan first appeared in the Maya MSS. or
  series of Maya epochs. Upon examining this document, and observing
  that the tribe wandered from Tulapan to Chacnouitan and later to
  Bakhalal and from there to Chichen-Itza, etc., it will be understood
  that the name in question was given to no other portion of our
  peninsula than to that which lies at the south. Brasseur de Bourbourg
  supposes, and we think not without reason, that Chacnouitan lay
  between Bakhalal and Acallan, s. e. of the Laguna de los Terminos.—See
  Brasseur de Bourbourg, Archives de la comission scientifica, Tomo. I,
  page 422, note 2.”

Footnote 45:

  Señor Perez in his commentary makes his calculation that 1496 was the
  year of the death of Chief Ajpulà, and succeeds in giving it a
  plausible appearance of correctness. But we observe that in order to
  reach this date he was not aware of having altered the words of the
  Maya text, and those of his own translation. This translation said
  correctly: “There were still six years wanting before the completion
  of the 13th Ahau.” In the text of the commentary, however, we find him
  starting his count on the supposition that the original text was the
  sixth year of the 13th Ahau. Though this change is by no means
  allowable, he succeeds, ingeniously enough, in arriving at the year
  above quoted, and in stating also the dates of the day and month,
  precisely as the annalist had set them down.

Footnote 46:

  Eligio Ancona, Historia de Yucatan, Mérida, 1879, Vol. I., page 333.

Footnote 47:

  With reference to the Mayas, consult the Quiché traditions in Brasseur
  de Bourbourg’s Popol Vuh, pages 215, 217 and 236, and Brasseur de
  Bourbourg’s Memorial of Tecpan Atitlan, page 170, note 3. For the
  Nahuatl race, Brasseur de Bourbourg’s Histoire des Nations civilisées
  du Mexique, Vol. I., Appendix, page 428, in extracts made from the
  Codex Chimalpopoca.

------------------------------------------------------------------------




                          TRANSCRIBER’S NOTES


 1. P. 53, changed “Ahcuitok” to “Ajcuitok”.
 2. P. 81, changed “Ajmekut” to “Ajmekat”.
 3. P. 94, changed “Mayapanes” to “Mayalpanes”.
 4. Footnote 9, changed “de la grau” to “de la gran”.
 5. Footnote 39, changed “interieur” to “intérieur” and “hiéroglyphs” to
      “hiéroglyphes”.
 6. Footnote 43, changed “centro-Americaine” to “centro-Américaine”.
 7. Silently corrected typographical errors.
 8. Retained anachronistic and non-standard spellings as printed.
 9. Enclosed italics font in _underscores_.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Mexican Copper Tools: the Use of
Copper by the Mexicans Before th, by Philipp J. J. Valentini

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK MEXICAN COPPER TOOLS; THE KATUNES ***

***** This file should be named 57961-0.txt or 57961-0.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/5/7/9/6/57961/

Produced by Richard Tonsing, Julia Miller and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from images generously made available
by The Internet Archive/American Libraries.)

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
be renamed.

Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United
States without permission and without paying copyright
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for the eBooks, unless you receive
specific permission. If you do not charge anything for copies of this
eBook, complying with the rules is very easy. You may use this eBook
for nearly any purpose such as creation of derivative works, reports,
performances and research. They may be modified and printed and given
away--you may do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks
not protected by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the
trademark license, especially commercial redistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/license.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works

1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
you share it without charge with others.

1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country outside the United States.

1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:

  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  United States, you'll have to check the laws of the country where you
  are located before using this ebook.

1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
provided that

* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  Literary Archive Foundation."

* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  works.

* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  receipt of the work.

* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and The
Project Gutenberg Trademark LLC, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark. Contact the Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
without further opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
remaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
Defect you cause.

Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
www.gutenberg.org



Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is in Fairbanks, Alaska, with the
mailing address: PO Box 750175, Fairbanks, AK 99775, but its
volunteers and employees are scattered throughout numerous
locations. Its business office is located at 809 North 1500 West, Salt
Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up to
date contact information can be found at the Foundation's web site and
official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

For additional contact information:

    Dr. Gregory B. Newby
    Chief Executive and Director
    gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works.

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search
facility: www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg EBook of Hector’s Inheritance, by Horatio Alger

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: Hector’s Inheritance
       or The Boys of Smith Institute

Author: Horatio Alger

Release Date: May, 2004 [EBook #5674]
Last Updated: September 18, 2016

Language: English

Character set encoding: UTF-8

*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK HECTOR’S INHERITANCE ***




Produced by Carrie Fellman





HECTOR’S INHERITANCE

OR

THE BOYS OF SMITH INSTITUTE


By Horatio Alger, Jr.

Author of “Eric Train Boy” “Young Acrobat,” “Only an Irish Boy,” “Bound
to Rise,” “The Young Outlaw,” “Driven from Home” etc.

NEW YORK





HECTOR’S INHERITANCE.




CHAPTER I. MR. ROSCOE RECEIVES TWO LETTERS.



Mr. Roscoe rang the bell, and, in answer, a servant entered the library,
where he sat before a large and commodious desk.

“Has the mail yet arrived?” he asked.

“Yes, sir; John has just come back from the village.”

“Go at once and bring me the letters and papers, if there are any.”

John bowed and withdrew.

Mr. Roscoe walked to the window, and looked thoughtfully out upon a
smooth, luxuriant lawn and an avenue of magnificent trees, through which
carriages were driven to what was popularly known as Castle Roscoe.
Everything, even to the luxuriously appointed room in which he sat,
indicated wealth and the ease which comes from affluence.

Mr. Roscoe looked around him with exultation.

“And all this may be mine,” he said to himself, “if I am only bold. What
is it old Pindar says? ‘Boldness is the beginning of victory.’ I have
forgotten nearly all I learned in school, but I remember that. There is
some risk, perhaps, but not much, and I owe something to my son---”

He was interrupted by the entrance of the servant with a small leather
bag, which was used to hold mail matter, going from or coming to the
house.

The servant unlocked the bag, and emptied the contents on the desk.
There were three or four papers and two letters. It was the last which
attracted Mr. Roscoe’s attention.

We will take the liberty of looking over Mr. Roscoe’s shoulder as he
reads the first. It ran as follows:

“DEAR SIR:-I am in receipt of your favor, asking my terms for boarding
pupils. For pupils of fifteen or over, I charge five hundred dollars per
year, which is not a large sum considering the exceptional advantages
presented by Inglewood School. My pupils are from the best families,
and enjoy a liberal table. Moreover, I employ competent teachers, and
guarantee rapid progress, when the student is of good, natural capacity,
and willing to work.

“I think you will agree with me that it is unwise to economize when the
proper training of a youth is in question, and that a cheap school is
little better than no school at all.

“I have only to add that I shall be most happy to receive your young
nephew, if you decide to send him to me, and will take personal pains to
promote his advancement. I remain, dear sir, your obedient servant,

“DIONYSIUS KADIX.”

Mr. Roscoe threw the letter down upon the desk with an impatient
gesture.

“Five hundred dollars a year!” he exclaimed. “What can the man be
thinking of? Why, when I went to school, twenty-five years since, less
than half this sum was charged. The man is evidently rapacious. Let me
see what this other letter says.”

The second letter was contained in a yellow envelope, of cheap texture,
and was much more plebeian in appearance than the first.

Again we will look over Mr. Roscoe’s shoulder, and read what it
contains. It was postmarked Smithville, and the envelope was disfigured
by a blot. It commenced:

“DEAR SIR:-It gives me pleasure to answer your inquiries respecting
my school. I have about fifty pupils, part of whom, say one-third, are
boarders. Though I say it myself, it will be hard to find any school
where more thorough instruction is given. I look upon my pupils as my
children, and treat them as such. My system of government is, therefore,
kind and parental, and my pupils are often homesick in vacation, longing
for the time to come when they can return to their studies at Smith
Institute. It is the dearest wish of Mrs. Smith and myself to make our
young charges happy, and to advance them, by pleasant roads over flowery
meads, to the inner courts of knowledge.

“Humbug!” muttered Mr. Roscoe. “I understand what all that means.” He
continued:

“I hope you will not consider three hundred dollars per annum too
much for such parental care. Considering the present high price of
provisions, it is really as low a price as we can afford to receive.

“I shall be glad if you consider my letter favorable and decide to place
your nephew under my charge. Yours respectfully,

“SOCRATES SMITH, A. M.”

“That is more reasonable,” said Mr. Roscoe, to himself, as he laid down
the letter. “Three hundred dollars I consider a fair price. At any rate,
I do not propose to pay any more for Hector. I suppose the table is
plain enough, but I don’t believe in pampering the appetites of boys.
If he were the master of Roscoe Hall, as he thinks he is, there might be
some propriety in it; but upon that head I shall soon undeceive him. I
will let him understand that I am the proprietor of the estate, and that
he is only a dependent on my bounty. I wonder how he will take it. I
dare say he will make a fuss, but he shall soon be made to understand
that it is of no use. Now to answer these letters.”

Mr. Roscoe sat down in a luxurious armchair, and, drawing pen and paper
toward him, wrote first to Dr. Radix. I subjoin the letter, as it throws
some light upon the character of the writer:

“ROSCOE HALL, Sept. 10th. DR. DIONYSIUS RADIX.

“My DEAR SIR:-I am in receipt of your letter of the 8th instant,
answering my inquiries in regard to your school. Let me say at once that
I find your terms too high. Five hundred dollars a year for forty weeks’
board and schooling seems to me an exorbitant price to ask. Really, at
this rate, education will soon become a luxury open only to the wealthy.

“You are probably under a misapprehension in reference to my young ward.
Nephew he is not, in a strict sense of the term. He was adopted--not
legally, but practically--by my brother, when he was only a year old,
and his origin has been concealed from him. My brother, being childless,
has allowed him to suppose that he was his own son. Undoubtedly he
meant to provide for him in his will, but, as often happens, put off
will-making till it was too late. The estate, therefore, goes to me,
and the boy is unprovided for. This does not so much matter, since I am
willing to educate him, and give him a fair start in life, if he acts
in a manner to suit me. I do not, however, feel called upon to pay an
exorbitant price for his tuition, and, therefore, shall be obliged to
forego placing him at Inglewood School. Yours, etc.,

“ALLAN ROSCOE.”

“When this letter is sent, I shall have taken the decisive step,”
 thought Mr. Roscoe. “I must then adhere to my story, at whatever cost.
Now for the other.”

His reply to the letter of Socrates Smith, A. M., was briefer, but
likely to be more satisfactory to the recipient. It ran thus;

“SOCRATES SMITH, A. M.

“DEAR Sir:-Your letter is at hand, and I find it, on the whole,
satisfactory. The price you charge-three hundred dollars per annum--is
about right. I hope you are a firm disciplinarian. I do not want Hector
too much indulged or pampered, though he may expect it, my poor brother
having been indulgent to excess.

“Let me add, by the bye, that Hector is not my nephew, though I may
inadvertently have mentioned him as such, and had no real claims upon my
brother, though he has been brought up in that belief. He was adopted,
in an informal way, by my brother, when he was but, an infant. Under the
circumstances, I am willing to take care of him, and prepare him to earn
his own living when his education is completed.

“You may expect to see me early next week. I will bring the boy with me,
and enter him at once as a pupil in your school.

“Yours, etc., ALLAN ROSCOE.”

“There, that clinches it!” said Mr. Roscoe, in a tone of satisfaction.
“Now for an interview with the boy.”




CHAPTER II. RESENTING AN INSULT.



A stone’s throw from the mansion was a neat and spacious carriage house.
The late master of Castle Roscoe had been fond of driving, and kept
three horses and two carriages. One of the latter was an old-fashioned
coach; while there was, besides, a light buggy, which Hector was
accustomed to consider his own. It was he, generally, who used this,
for his father preferred to take a driver, and generally took an airing,
either alone or with Hector, in the more stately carriage, drawn by two
horses.

Hector walked across the lawn and entered the carriage house, where
Edward, the coachman, was washing the carriage. As the former is to be
our hero, we may pause to describe him.

He was fifteen, slenderly but strongly made, with a clear skin and dark
eyes and a straightforward look. He had a winning smile, that attracted
all who saw it, but his face could assume a different expression if
need be. There were strong lines about his mouth that indicated calm
resolution and strength of purpose. He was not a boy who would permit
himself to be imposed upon, but was properly tenacious of his rights.

As he entered the carriage house, he looked about him in some surprise.

“Where is the buggy, Edward?” he asked.

“Master Guy is driving out in it.”

“How is that?” said Hector. “Doesn’t he know that it is mine? He might,
at least, have asked whether I intended to use it.”

“That is what I told him.”

“And what did he say?”

“That it was just as much his as yours, and perhaps more so.”

“What could he mean?”

“He said his father had promised to give it to him.”

“Promised to give him my buggy!” exclaimed Hector, his eyes flashing.

“It’s a shame, Master Hector, so it is,” said Edward, sympathetically.
He had known Hector since he was a boy of five, and liked him far better
than Guy, who was a newcomer, and a boy disposed to domineer over those
whom he considered his inferiors.

“I don’t intend to submit to it,” said Hector, trying, ineffectually, to
curb his anger.

“I don’t blame you, Master Hector, but I’m afraid you will have a hard
time. As your uncle is your guardian, of course he has power over you,
and he thinks everything of that boy of his, though, to my mind, he is
an unmannerly cub.”

“I don’t know how much power he has over me, but he mustn’t expect me
to play second fiddle to his son. I am willing that Guy should enjoy
as many privileges as I do, though the estate is mine; but he mustn’t
interfere with my rights.”

“That’s right, Master Hector. Why don’t you speak to your uncle about
it? I would, if I were you.”

“So I will, if it is necessary. I will speak to Guy first, and that may
be sufficient. I don’t want to enter complaint against him if I can help
it.”

“You didn’t see Master Guy ride out, did you?”

“‘No; I was reading. If I had seen him, I would have stopped him.”

“I am afraid it wouldn’t have done any good.”

“Do you mean that he would have taken the buggy in spite of me?” asked
Hector, indignantly.

“I think he would have tried. To tell the truth, Master Hector, I
refused to get the buggy ready for him, till he brought out a paper from
his father commanding me to do it. Then, of course, I had no choice.”

Hector was staggered by this.

“Have you got the paper?” he asked.

“Yes,” answered Edward, fumbling in his vest pocket.

He drew out a small scrap of notepaper, on which was written, “My son,
Guy, has my permission to ride out in the buggy. You will obey me rather
than Hector.”

This was signed, “Allan Roscoe.”

“So it seems my uncle is the trespasser,” said Hector. “It is he who
takes the responsibility. I will go and speak to him at once.”

“Wait a minute! There comes Master Guy, returning from his ride. You can
have it out with him first.”

In fact, Hector had only to look down the avenue to see the rapid
approach of the buggy. Guy held the reins, and was seated in the
driver’s seat with all the air of a master. The sight aggravated Hector,
and not without reason. He waited until Guy, flinging the reins to
Edward, leaped from the buggy, then he thought it time to speak.

“Guy,” he said, calmly, “it seems to me that you owe me an apology.”

“Oh, I do, do I?” sneered Guy. “What for, let me ask?”

“You have driven out in my buggy, without asking my permission.”

“Oh, it’s your buggy, is it?” said Guy, with another sneer.

“Of course it is. You know that as well as I do.”

“I don’t know it at all.”

“Then I inform you of it. I don’t want to be selfish; I am willing that
you should ride out in it occasionally; but I insist upon your asking my
permission.”

Guy listened to these words with a sneer upon his face. He was about
the same age and size as Hector, but his features were mean and
insignificant, and there was a shifty look in his eye that stamped him
as unreliable. He did not look like the Roscoes, though in many respects
he was in disposition and character similar to his father.

“It strikes me,” he said, with an unpleasant smile, “that you’re taking
a little too much upon yourself, Hector Roscoe. The buggy is no more
yours than mine.”

“What do you say, Edward?” said Hector, appealing to the coachman.

“I say that the buggy is yours, and the horse is yours, and so I told
Master Guy, but he wouldn’t take no notice of it.”

“Do you hear that, Guy?”

“Yes, I do; and that’s what I think of it,” answered Guy, snapping his
fingers. “My father gave me permission to ride out in it, and I’ve got
just as much right to it as you, and perhaps more.”

“You know better, Guy,” said Hector, indignantly; “and I warn you not to
interfere with my rights hereafter.”

“Suppose I do?” sneered Guy.

“Then I shall be under the necessity of giving you a lesson,” said
Hector, calmly.

“You will, will you? You’ll give me a lesson?” repeated Guy, nodding
vigorously. “Who are you, I’d like to know?”

“If you don’t know, I can tell you.”

“Tell me, then.”

“I am Hector Roscoe, the owner of Roscoe Hall. Whether your father is to
be my guardian or not, I don’t know; but there are limits to the power
of a guardian, and I hope he won’t go too far.”

“Hear the boy talk!” said Guy, contemptuously.

“I wish to treat my uncle with becoming respect; but he is a newcomer
here--I never saw him till three months since--and he has no right to
come here, and take from me all my privileges. We can all live at peace
together, and I hope we shall; but he must treat me well.”

“You are quite sure Roscoe Castle belongs to you, are you, Hector?”

“That’s the law. Father left no will, and so the estate comes to me.”

“Ho! ho!” laughed Guy, with malicious glee.

“If you only knew what I know, you wouldn’t crow quite so loud. It’s a
splendid joke.”

There was something in this that attracted Hector’s attention, though he
was not disposed to attach much importance to what Guy said.

“If I only knew what you know!” he repeated.

“Yes; that’s what I said.”

“What is it?”

“You’ll know it soon enough, and I can tell you one thing, it’ll
surprise you. It’ll take down your pride a peg or two.”

Hector stared at his cousin in unaffected surprise. What could Guy
possibly mean? Had his father perhaps made a will, and left the estate
to some one else--his uncle, for example? Was this the meaning of Guy’s
malicious mirth?

“I don’t know to what you refer,” he said; “but if it’s anything that is
of importance to me, I ought to know it. What is it?”

“Go and ask father,” said Guy, with a tantalizing grin.

“I will,” answered Hector, “and without delay.”

He turned to enter the house, but Guy had not exhausted his malice. He
was in a hurry to triumph over Hector, whom he disliked heartily.

“I don’t mind telling you myself,” he said.

“You are not what you suppose. You’re a lowborn beggar!”

He had no sooner uttered these words, than Hector resented the insult.
Seizing the whip from Guy, he grasped him by the collar, flung him to
the ground and lashed him with it.

“There,” said he, with eyes aflame, “take that, Guy Roscoe, and look out
how you insult me in future!”

Guy rose slowly from the ground, pale with fury, and, as he brushed the
dust from his clothes, ejaculated:

“You’ll pay dearly for this, Hector!”

“I’ll take the consequences,” said Hector, as coldly as his anger would
allow. “Now, I shall go to your father and ask the meaning of this.”




CHAPTER III. HECTOR LEARNS A SECRET.



Hector entered the library with some impetuosity. Usually he was quiet
and orderly, but he had been excited by the insinuations of Guy, and he
was impatient to know what he meant--if he meant anything.

Allan Roscoe looked up, and remarked, with slight sarcasm:

“This is not a bear garden, Hector. You appear to think you are on the
playground, judging by your hasty motions.”

“I beg your pardon, uncle,” said Hector, who never took amiss a rebuke
which he thought deserved. “I suppose I forgot myself, being excited. I
beg your pardon.”

“What is the cause of your excitement?” asked Mr. Roscoe, surveying the
boy keenly.

“Guy has said something that I don’t understand.”

“He must have said something very profound, then,” returned Allan
Roscoe, with light raillery.

“Indeed, Uncle Allan, it is no laughing matter,” said Hector, earnestly.

“Then let me hear what it is.”

“He intimates that he knows something that would let down my pride a peg
or two. He hints that I am not the heir of Castle Roscoe.”

The boy used the term by which the house was usually known.

Allan Roscoe knit his brow in pretended vexation.

“Inconsiderate boy!” he murmured. “Why need he say this?”

“But,” said Hector, startled, “is it true?”

“My boy,” said his uncle, with simulated feeling, “my son has spoken to
you of a secret which I would willingly keep from you if I could. Yet,
perhaps, it is as well that you should be told now.”

“Told what?” exclaimed Hector, quite at sea.

“Can you bear to hear, Hector, that it is indeed true? You are not the
owner of this estate.”

“Who is then?” ejaculated the astonished boy.

“I am; and Guy after me.”

“What! Did my father leave the estate away from me? I thought he did not
leave a will?”

“Nor did he.”

“Then how can anyone else except his son inherit?”

“Your question is a natural one. If you were his son you would inherit
under the law.”

“If I were his son!” repeated Hector, slowly, his head swimming. “What
do you mean by that? Of course I am your brother’s son.”

“It is very painful for me to tell, Hector. It will be distressing for
you to hear. No tie of blood connects you with the late owner of Castle
Roscoe.”

“I don’t believe you, Uncle Allan,” said Hector, bluntly.

“Of course, therefore, I am not your uncle,” added Allan Roscoe, dryly.

“I beg your pardon; I should have said Mr. Allan Roscoe,” said Hector,
bowing proudly, for his heart was sore, and he was deeply indignant with
the man who sat, smooth and sleek, in his father’s chair, harrowing up
his feelings without himself being ruffled.

“That is immaterial. Call me uncle, if you like, since the truth is
understood. But I must explain.”

“I would like to know what is your authority for so surprising a
statement, Mr. Roscoe. You cannot expect me to believe that I have been
deceived all my life.”

“I make the statement on your father’s authority--I should say, on my
brother’s authority.”

“Can you prove it, Mr. Roscoe?”

“I can. I will presently put into your hands a letter, written me by my
brother some months since, which explains the whole matter. To save you
suspense, however, I will recapitulate. Where were you born?”

“In California.”

“That is probably true. It was there that my brother found you.”

“Found me?”

“Perhaps that is not the word. My brother and his wife were boarding
in Sacramento in the winter of 1859. In the same boarding house was a
widow, with a child of some months old. You were that child. Your mother
died suddenly, and it was ascertained that she left nothing. Her child
was, therefore, left destitute. It was a fine, promising boy--give me
credit for the compliment--and my brother, having no children of his
own, proposed to his wife to adopt it. She was fond of children, and
readily consented. No formalities were necessary, for there was no one
to claim you. You were at once taken in charge by my brother and his
wife, therefore, and very soon they came to look upon you with as much
affection as if you were their own child. They wished you to consider
them your real parents, and to you the secret was never made known, nor
was it known to the world. When my brother returned to this State, three
years after, not one of his friends doubted that the little Hector was
his own boy.

“When you were six years old your mother died--that is, my brother’s
wife. All the more, perhaps, because he was left alone, my brother
became attached to you, and, I think, he came to love you as much as if
you were his own son.”

“I think he did,” said Hector, with emotion. “Never was there a kinder,
more indulgent father.”

“Yet he was not your father,” said Allan Roscoe, with sharp emphasis.

“So you say, Mr. Roscoe.”

“So my brother says in his letter to me.”

“Do you think it probable that, with all this affection for me, he would
have left me penniless?” asked the boy.

“No; it was his intention to make a will. By that will he would no doubt
have provided for you in a satisfactory manner. But I think my poor
brother had a superstitious fear of will making, lest it might hasten
death. At any rate, he omitted it till it was too late.”

“It was a cruel omission, if your story is a true one.”

“Your--my brother, did what he could to remedy matters. In his last
sickness, when too weak to sign his name, he asked me, as the legal heir
of his estate, to see that you were well provided for. He wished me to
see your education finished, and I promised to do so. I could see that
this promise relieved his mind. Of one thing you may be assured, Hector,
he never lost his affection for you.”

“Thank Heaven for that!” murmured the boy, who had been deeply and
devotedly attached to the man whom, all his life long, he had looked
upon as his father.

“I can only add, Hector,” said Mr. Roscoe, “that I feel for your natural
disappointment. It is, indeed, hard to be brought up to regard yourself
as the heir of a great estate, and to make the discovery that you have
been mistaken.”

“I don’t mind that so much, Mr. Roscoe,” said Hector, slowly. “It is the
hardest thing to think of myself as having no claim upon one whom I have
loved as a father--to think myself as a boy of unknown parentage. But,”
 he added, suddenly, “I have it only on your word. Why should I believe
it?”

“I will give you conclusive proof, Hector. Read this.”

Allan Roscoe took from his pocket a letter, without an envelope. One
glance served to show Hector that it was in the handwriting of his late
father, or, at any rate, in a handwriting surprisingly like it.

He began to read it with feverish haste.

The letter need not find a place here. The substance of it had been
accurately given by Mr. Allan Roscoe. Apparently, it corroborated his
every statement.

The boy looked up from its perusal, his face pale and stricken.

“You see that I have good authority for my statement,” said Mr. Roscoe.

“I can’t understand it,” said Hector, slowly.

“I need only add,” said Mr. Roscoe, apparently relieved by the
revelation, “that my brother did not repose confidence in me in vain. I
accept, as a sacred charge, the duty he imposed upon me. I shall provide
for you and look after your education. I wish to put you in a way to
prepare yourself for a useful and honorable career. As a first step, I
intend, on Monday next, to place you in an excellent boarding school,
where you will have exceptional privileges.”

Hector listened, but his mind was occupied by sad thoughts, and he made
no comment.

“I have even selected the school with great care,” said Mr. Roscoe. “It
is situated at Smithville, and is under the charge of Socrates Smith, A.
M., a learned and distinguished educator. You may go now. I will speak
with you on this subject later.”

Hector bowed. After what he had heard, his interest in other matters was
but faint.

“I shall be glad to get him out of the house,” thought Allan Roscoe. “I
never liked him.”




CHAPTER IV. A SKIRMISH.



Hector walked out of the house in a state of mental bewilderment not
easily described. Was he not Hector Roscoe, after all? Had he been all
his life under a mistake? If this story were true, who was he, who were
his parents, what was his name? Why had the man whom he had supposed to
be his father not imparted to him this secret? He had always been kind
and indulgent; he had never appeared to regard the boy as an alien in
blood, but as a dearly loved son. Yet, if he had, after all, left him
unprovided for, he had certainly treated Hector with great cruelty.

“I won’t believe it,” said Hector, to himself.

“I won’t so wrong my dear father’s memory at the bidding of this man,
whose interest it is to trump up this story, since he and his son become
the owners of a great estate in my place.”

Just then Guy advanced toward Hector with a malicious smile upon his
face. He knew very well what a blow poor Hector had received, for he
was in his father’s confidence, and he was mean enough, and malicious
enough, to rejoice at it.

“What’s the matter with you, Hector?” he asked, with a grin. “You look
as if you had lost your last friend.”

Hector stopped short and regarded Guy fixedly.

“Do you know what your father has been saying to me?” he asked.

“Well, I can guess,” answered Guy. “Ho! ho! It’s a great joke that you
have all the time fancied yourself the heir of Castle Roscoe, when you
have no claim to it at all. I am the heir!” he added, drawing himself up
proudly; “and you are a poor dependent, and a nobody. It’s funny!”

“Perhaps you won’t think it so funny after this!” said Hector, coolly,
exasperated beyond endurance. As he spoke he drew off, and in an instant
Guy measured his length upon the greensward.

Guy rose, his face livid with passion, in a frame of mind far from
funny. He clinched his fists and looked at Hector as if he wished to
annihilate him. “You’ll pay for this,” he screamed. “You’ll repent it,
bitterly, you poor, nameless dependent, low-born, very likely--”

“Hold, there!” said Hector, advancing resolutely, and sternly facing the
angry boy. “Be careful what you say. If this story of your father’s is
true, which I don’t believe, you might have the decency to let me
alone, even if you don’t sympathize with me. If you dare to say or hint
anything against my birth, I’ll treat you worse than I have yet.”

“You’ll suffer for this!” almost shrieked Guy.

“I am ready to suffer now, if you are able to make me,” said Hector.
“Come on, and we’ll settle it now.”

But Guy had no desire for the contest to which he was invited. He had a
wholesome fear of Hector’s strong, muscular arms, aided, as they were,
by some knowledge of boxing. Hector had never taken regular lessons, but
a private tutor, whom his father had employed, a graduate of Yale, had
instructed him in the rudiments of the “manly art of self-defense,” and
Hector was very well able to take care of himself against any boy of his
own size and strength. In size, Guy was his equal, but in strength he
was quite inferior. This Guy knew full well, and, angry as he was, he by
no means lost sight of prudence.

“I don’t choose to dirty my hands with you,” he said. “I shall tell my
father, and it would serve you right if he sent you adrift.”

In Hector’s present mood, he would not, perhaps, have cared much if
this threat had been carried into execution, but he was not altogether
reckless, and he felt that it was best to remain under Mr. Roscoe’s
protection until he had had time to investigate the remarkable story
which he suspected his reputed uncle had trumped up to serve his own
interests.

“Tell your father, if you like,” said Hector, quietly. “I don’t know
whether he will sustain you or not in your insults, but if he does, then
I shall have two opponents instead of one.”

“Does that mean that you will attack my father?” demanded Guy, hoping
for an affirmative answer, as it would help him to prejudice his father
against our hero.

“No,” answered Hector, smiling, “I don’t apprehend there will be any
necessity, for he won’t insult me as you have done.”

Guy lost no time in seeking his father, and laying the matter before him,
inveighing against Hector with great bitterness.

“So he knocked you down, did he, Guy?” asked Allan Roscoe, thoughtfully.

“Yes; he took me unawares, or he couldn’t have done it,” answered Guy, a
little ashamed at the avowal.

“What did you do?”

“I--I told him he should suffer for it.”

“Why did he attack you?”

“It was on account of something I said.”

“What was it?”

Guy reluctantly answered this question, and with correctness.

“It was your fault for speaking to him when he was feeling sore at
making a painful discovery.”

“Do you justify him in pitching into me like a big brute?” asked Guy,
hastily.

“No; but still, I think it, was natural, under the circumstances. You
should have kept out of his way, and let him alone.”

“Won’t you punish him for attacking me?” demanded Guy, indignantly.

“I will speak to him on the subject,” said Allan Roscoe; “and will tell
him my opinion of his act.”

“Then shan’t I be revenged upon him?” asked Guy, disappointed.

“Listen, Guy,” said his father. “Is it no punishment that the boy
is stripped of all his possessions, while you step into his place?
Henceforth he will be dependent upon me, and later, upon you. He has
been hurled down from his proud place as owner of Castle Roscoe, and I
have taken his place, as you will hereafter do.”

“Yes,” said Guy, gleefully; “it will be a proud day when I become master
of the estate.”

Allan Roscoe was not a specially sensitive man, but this remark of his
son jarred upon him.

“You seem to forget, Guy, that you do not succeed till I am dead!”

“Yes, I suppose so,” answered Guy, slowly.

“It almost seems as if you were in a hurry for me to die.”

“I didn’t mean that, but it’s natural to suppose that I shall live
longer than you do, isn’t it?”

“I suppose so,” returned Allan Roscoe, shortly.

“Of course that’s what I mean.”

“Then, since you are so much better off than Hector, you had better be
more considerate, and leave him to get over his disappointment as well
as he can.”

“Shall I send in Hector to see you?” asked Guy, as he at length turned
to leave the room.

“Yes.”

“You’re to go in to my father,” said Guy, reappearing on the lawn; “he’s
going to give it to you.”

Hector anticipated some such summons, and he had remained in the same
spot, too proud to have it supposed that he shrank from the interview.

With a firm, resolute step, he entered the presence of Allan Roscoe.

“I hear you wish to see me, Mr. Roscoe,” he said, manfully.

“Yes, Hector; Guy has come to me with complaints of you.”

“If he says I knocked him down for insulting me, he has told you the
truth,” said Hector, sturdily.

“That was the substance of what he said, though he did not admit the
insult.”

“But for that I should not have attacked him.”

“I do not care to interfere in boys’ quarrels, except in extreme
cases,” said Mr. Roscoe. “I am afraid Guy was aggravating, and you were
unnecessarily violent.”

“It doesn’t seem to me so,” said Hector.

“So I regard it. I have warned him not to add by taunts to the poignancy
of your disappointment. I request you to remember that Guy is my son,
and that I am disposed to follow my brother’s directions, and provide
for and educate you.”

Hector bowed and retired. He went out with a more favorable opinion of
Allan Roscoe, who had treated the difficulty in a reasonable manner.

Allan Roscoe looked after him as he went out.

“I hate that boy,” he said, to himself; “I temporize from motives of
policy, but I mean to tame his haughty spirit yet.”




CHAPTER V. PREPARING TO LEAVE HOME.



Allan Roscoe’s remonstrance with the two boys had the effect of keeping
the peace between them for the remainder of the week. Guy did not think
it prudent to taunt Hector, unless backed up by his father, and he felt
that the change in their relative positions was satisfaction enough at
present. Besides, his father, in a subsequent conversation, had told Guy
that it was his purpose to place Hector in a boarding school, where the
discipline would be strict, and where he would be thrashed if he proved
rebellious.

“I shall tell Mr. Smith,” he added, “that the boy needs a strong hand,
and that I am not only perfectly willing that he should be punished
whenever occasion may call for it, but really desire it.”

“Good, good!” commended Guy, gleefully. “I hope old Smith’ll lay it on
good.”

“I presume he will,” said Allan Roscoe, smiling in sympathy with his
son’s exuberance. “I am told by a man who knows him that he is a tall
man, strong enough to keep order, and determined to do it.”

“I should like to be there to see Hector’s first flogging,” remarked the
amiable Guy. “I’d rather see it than go to the theater any time.”

“I don’t see how you can, unless you also enter the school.”

“No, thank you,” answered Guy. “No boarding school for me. That isn’t
my idea of enjoyment. I’d rather stay at home with you. Hector won’t be
here to interfere with my using his horse and buggy.”

“They are his no longer. I give them to you.”

“Thank you, father,” said Guy, very much gratified.

“But I would rather you would not use them till after Hector is gone. It
might disturb him.”

“That’s just why I want to do it.”

“But it might make trouble. He might refuse to go to school.”

“You’d make him go, wouldn’t you, father?”

“Yes; but I wish to avoid forcible measures, if possible. Come, Guy,
it’s only till Monday; then Hector will be out of the way, and you can
do as you please without fear of interference.”

“All right, father. I’ll postpone my fun till he is out of the way.
You’ll go with him, won’t you?”

“Yes, Guy.”

“Just tell old Smith how to treat him. Tell him to show him no mercy, if
he doesn’t behave himself.”

“You seem to dislike Hector very much. You shouldn’t feel so. It isn’t
Christian.”

Guy looked at his father queerly out of the corner of his eye. He
understood him better than Allan Roscoe supposed.

“I hope you won’t insist on my loving him, father,” he said. “I leave
that to you.”

“I only wish you to avoid coming into collision with him. As for love,
that is something not within our power.”

“Will you be ready to go with me to boarding school on Monday morning,
Hector?” asked Allan Roscoe, on Saturday afternoon.

“Yes, sir.”

Indeed, Hector felt that it would be a relief to get away from the
house which he had been taught to look upon as his--first by right of
inheritance, and later as actual owner. As long as he remained he was
unpleasantly reminded of the great loss he had experienced. Again,
his relations with Guy were unfriendly, and he knew that if they were
permanently together it wouldn’t be long before there would be another
collision. Though in such a case he was sure to come off victorious, he
did not care to contend, especially as no advantage could come of it in
the end.

Of the boarding school kept by Mr. Socrates Smith he had never heard,
but felt that he would, at any rate, prefer to find himself amid new
scenes. If the school were a good one, he meant to derive benefit from
it, for he was fond of books and study, and thought school duties no
task.

“I have carefully selected a school for you,” continued Allan Roscoe,
“because I wish to follow out my poor brother’s wishes to the letter.
A good education will fit you to maintain yourself, and attain a
creditable station in life, which is very important, since you will have
to carve your own future.”

There was no objection to make to all this. Still, it did grate upon
Hector’s feelings, to be so often reminded of his penniless position,
when till recently he had regarded himself, and had been regarded by
others, as a boy of large property.

Smithville was accessible by railroad, being on the same line as the
town of Plympton in which Roscoe Castle was situated. There was a train
starting at seven o’clock, which reached Smithville at half-past, eight.
This was felt to be the proper train to take, as it would enable Hector
to reach school before the morning session began. Allan Roscoe, who was
not an early riser, made an effort to rise in time, and succeeded. In
truth, he was anxious to get Hector out of the house. It might be
that the boy’s presence was a tacit reproach, it might be that he had
contracted a dislike for him. At any rate, when Hector descended to the
breakfast room, he found Mr. Roscoe already there.

“You are in time, Hector,” said Mr. Roscoe. “I don’t know how early they
will get up at school, but I hope it won’t be earlier than this.”

“I have no objection to early rising,” said Hector.

“I have,” said Allan Roscoe, gaping.

“I am sorry to have inconvenienced you,” said Hector, politely. “I could
have gone to school alone.”

“No doubt; but I wished an interview with Mr. Socrates Smith myself. I
look upon myself in the light of your guardian, though you are not my
nephew, as was originally supposed.”

“I’d give a good deal to know whether this is true,” thought Hector,
fixing his eyes attentively upon his uncle’s face.

I have written “uncle” inadvertently, that being the character in which
Mr. Roscoe appeared to the world.

“By the way, Hector,” said Allan Roscoe, “there is one matter which we
have not yet settled.”

“What is that, sir?”

“About your name.”

“My name is Hector Roscoe.”

“I beg your pardon. Assuming by brother’s communication to be true, and
I think you will not question his word, you have no claim to the name.”

“To what name have I a claim, then?” asked Hector, pointedly.

“To the name of your father--the last name, I mean. I have no objection
to your retaining the name of Hector.”

“What was the name of my father?” asked the boy.

“Ahem! My brother did not mention that in his letter. Quite an omission,
I must observe.”

“Then it is clear that he meant to have me retain his own name,” said
Hector, decisively.

“That does not follow.”

“As I know no other name to which I have a claim, I shall certainly keep
the name of the kindest friend I ever had, whether he was my father or
not,” said Hector, firmly.

Allan Roscoe looked annoyed.

“Really,” he said, “I think this ill-judged, very ill-judged. It will
lead to misapprehension. It will deceive people into the belief that you
are a real Roscoe.”

“I don’t know but I am,” answered Hector, with a calm look of defiance,
which aggravated Allan Roscoe.

“Have I not told you you are not?” he said, frowning.

“You have; but you have not proved it,” said Hector.

“I am surprised that you should cling to a foolish delusion. You are
only preparing trouble for yourself. If my word is not sufficient--”

“You are an interested party. This story, if true, gives you my
property.”

“At any rate, you may take your father’s--I mean my brother’s--word for
it.”

“If he had told me so, I would believe it,” said Hector.

“You have it in black and white, in the paper I showed you. What more do
you want?”

“I want to be sure that that document is genuine. However, I won’t argue
the question now. I have only been giving you my reasons for keeping the
name I have always regarded as mine.”

Allan Roscoe thought it best to drop the subject; but the boy’s
persistency disturbed him.




CHAPTER VI. SMITH INSTITUTE.



Socrates Smith, A. M., was not always known by the philosophic name
by which he challenged the world’s respect as a man of learning and
distinguished attainments. When a boy in his teens, and an academy
student, he was known simply as Shadrach Smith. His boy companions used
to address him familiarly as Shad. It was clear that no pedagogue could
retain the respect of his pupils who might readily be metamorphosed into
Old Shad. By the advice of a brother preacher, he dropped the plebeian
name, and bloomed forth as Socrates Smith, A. M.

I may say, in confidence, that no one knew from what college Mr. Smith
obtained the degree of Master of Arts. He always evaded the question
himself, saying that it was given him by a Western university causa
honoris.

It might be, or it might not. At any rate, he was allowed to wear
the title, since no one thought it worth while to make the necessary
examination into its genuineness. Nor, again, had anyone been able to
discover at what college the distinguished Socrates had studied. In
truth, he had never even entered college, but he had offered himself as
a candidate for admission to a college in Ohio, and been rejected. This
did not, however, prevent his getting up a school, and advertising to
instruct others in the branches of learning of which his own knowledge
was so incomplete.

He was able to hide his own deficiencies, having generally in his employ
some college graduate, whose poverty compelled him to accept the scanty
wages which Socrates doled out to him. These young men were generally
poor scholars in more than one sense of the word, as Mr. Smith did not
care to pay the high salary demanded by a first-class scholar. Mr. Smith
was shrewd enough not to attempt to instruct the classes in advanced
classics or mathematics, as he did not care to have his deficiencies
understood by his pupils.

It pleased him best to sit in state and rule the school, administering
reproofs and castigations where he thought fit, and, best of all, to
manage the finances. Though his price was less than that of many other
schools, his profits were liberal, as he kept down expenses. His table
was exceedingly frugal, as his boarding pupils could have testified, and
the salaries he paid to under teachers were pitifully small.

So it was that, year by year, Socrates Smith, A. M., found himself
growing richer, while his teachers grew more shabby, and his pupils
rarely became fat.

Allan Roscoe took a carriage from the depot to the school.

Arrived at the gate, he descended, and Hector followed him.

The school building was a long, rambling, irregular structure, of no
known order of architecture, bearing some resemblance to a factory. The
ornament of architecture Mr. Smith did not regard. He was strictly of a
utilitarian cast of mind. So long as the institute, as he often called
it, afforded room for the school and scholars he did not understand what
more was wanted.

“Is Mr. Smith at leisure?” Mr. Roscoe asked of a bare-arm servant girl
who answered the bell.

“I guess he’s in his office,” was the reply.

“Take him this card,” said Mr. Roscoe. The girl inspected the card with
some curiosity, and carried it to the eminent principal. When Socrates
Smith read upon the card the name

ALLAN ROSCOE,

and, penciled in the corner, “with a pupil,” he said, briskly:

“Bring the gentleman in at once, Bridget.”

As Mr. Roscoe entered, Mr. Smith beamed upon him genially. It was thus
he always received those who brought to him new scholars. As he always
asked half a term’s tuition and board in advance, every such visitor
represented to him so much ready cash, and for ready cash Socrates had a
weakness.

“I am glad to see you, Mr. Roscoe,” said the learned principal,
advancing to meet his visitor. “And this is the young lad. Dear me! he
is very well grown, and looks like he was fond of his books.”

This was not exactly the way in which a learned scholar might be
expected to talk; but Mr. Smith’s speech was not always elegant, or even
grammatically correct.

“I believe he is reasonably fond of study,” said Mr. Roscoe. “Hector,
this is your future instructor, Prof. Socrates Smith.”

At the name of professor, which he much affected, Socrates Smith looked
positively benignant.

“My young friend,” he said, “we will try to make you happy. Smith
Institute is a regular beehive, full of busy workers, who are preparing
themselves for the duties and responsibilities of life. I aim to be a
father to my pupils, and Mrs. Smith is a mother to them. I am truly glad
to receive you into my happy family.”

Hector scanned attentively the face of his new teacher. He was not
altogether prepossessed in his favor. That the reader may judge whether
he had reason to be, let me describe Mr. Smith.

He was a trifle over six feet in height, with yellowish, sandy hair,
high cheek bones, a rough and mottled skin, a high but narrow forehead,
a pair of eyes somewhat like those of a ferret, long, ungainly limbs,
and a shambling walk. A coat of rusty black, with very long tails,
magnified his apparent height, and nothing that he wore seemed made for
him.

Perhaps, as the first Socrates was said to have been the homeliest of
all the Athenians, it was fitting that the man who assumed his name
should also have the slightest possible claim to beauty.

“He may be a learned man,” thought Hector, “but he is certainly plain
enough. It is well that he has something to compensate for his looks.”

“I hope you are glad to come here, my boy,” said Socrates, affably. “I
sincerely trust that you will be contented at the institute.”

“I hope so, too,” said Hector, but he evidently spoke doubtfully.

“I should like a little conversation with you, Professor Smith,” said
Allan Roscoe. “I don’t know that it is necessary to keep Hector here
during our interview.”

Socrates took the hint.

He rang a hand bell, and a lank boy, of fifteen, appeared.

“Wilkius,” said Mr. Smith, “this is a new scholar, Hector Roscoe. Take
him to the playground, and introduce him to Mr. Crabb.”

“All right, sir. Come along.”

This last was addressed to Hector, who went out with the new boy.

“I thought it best to speak with you briefly about Hector, Professor
Smith,” commenced Allan Roscoe.

“Very appropriate and gratifying, Mr. Roscoe. I can assure you he will
be happy here.”

“I dare say,” returned Mr. Roscoe, carelessly. “I wish to guard you
against misinterpreting my wishes. I don’t want the boy pampered, or too
much indulged.”

“We never pamper our boarding pupils,” said Socrates, and it is quite
certain that he spoke the truth.

“It spoils boys to be too well treated.”

“So it does,” said Socrates, eagerly. “Plain, wholesome diet, without
luxury, and a kind, but strict discipline--such are the features of
Smith Institute.”

“Quite right and judicious, professor. I may remark that the boy, though
reared in luxury by my brother, is really penniless.”

“You don’t say so?”

“Yes, he is solely dependent upon my generosity. I propose, however, to
give him a good education at my own expense, and prepare him to earn his
living in some useful way.”

“Kind philanthropist!” exclaimed Socrates. “He ought, indeed, to be
grateful.”

“I doubt if he will,” said Mr. Roscoe, shrugging his shoulders. “He has
a proud spirit, and a high idea of his own position, though he is of
unknown parentage, and has nothing of his own.”

“Indeed!”

“I merely wish to say that you do not need to treat him as if he were
my nephew. It is best to be strict with him, and make him conform to the
rules.”

“I will, indeed, Mr. Roscoe. Would that all guardians of youth were as
judicious! Your wishes shall be regarded.”

After a little more conversation, Allan Roscoe took his leave.

So, under auspices not the most pleasant, Hector’s school life began.




CHAPTER VII. THE TYRANT OF THE PLAYGROUND.



Under the guidance of the lank boy, named Wilkins, Hector left Mr.
Smith’s office, and walked to a barren-looking plot of ground behind the
house, which served as a playground for the pupils of Smith Institute.

Wilkins scanned the new arrival closely.

“I say, Roscoe,” he commenced, “what made you come here?”

“Why do boys generally come to school?” returned Hector.

“Because they have to, I suppose,” answered Wilkins.

“I thought they came to study.”

“Oh, you’re one of that sort, are you?” asked Wilkins, curiously.

“I hope to learn something here.”

“You’ll get over that soon,” answered Wilkins, in the tone of one who
could boast of a large experience.

“I hope not. I shall want to leave school if I find I can’t learn here.”

“Who is it that brought you here--your father?”

“No, indeed!” answered Hector, quickly, for he had no desire to be
considered the son of Allan Roscoe.

“Uncle, then?”

“He is my guardian,” answered Hector, briefly.

They were by this time in the playground. Some dozen boys were playing
baseball. They were of different ages and sizes, ranging from ten to
nineteen. The oldest and largest bore such a strong personal resemblance
to Socrates Smith, that Hector asked if he were his son.

“No,” answered Wilkins; “he is old Sock’s nephew.”

“Who is old Sock?”

“Smith, of course. His name is Socrates, you know. Don’t let him catch
you calling him that, though.”

“What sort of a fellow is this nephew?” asked Hector.

“He’s a bully. He bosses the boys. It’s best to keep on the right side
of Jim.”

“Oh, is it?” inquired Hector, smiling slightly.

“Well, I should say so.”

“Suppose you don’t?”

“He’ll give you a thrashing.”

“Does his uncle allow that?”

“Yes; I think he rather likes it.”

“Don’t the boys resist?”

“It won’t do any good. You see, Jim’s bigger than any of us.”

Hector took a good look at this redoubtable Jim Smith.

He was rather loosely made, painfully homely, and about five feet nine
inches in height. Nothing more need be said, as, in appearance, he
closely resembled his uncle.

Jim Smith soon gave Hector an opportunity of verifying the description
given of him by Wilkins.

The boy at the bat had struck a ball to the extreme boundary of the
field. The fielder at that point didn’t go so fast as Jim, who was
pitcher, thought satisfactory, and he called out in a rough, brutal
tone:

“If you don’t go quicker, Archer, I’ll kick you all round the field.”

Hector looked at Wilkins inquiringly.

“Does he mean that?” he asked.

“Yes, he does.”

“Does he ever make such a brute of himself?”

“Often.”

“And the boys allow it?”

“They can’t help it.”

“So, it seems, you have a tyrant of the school?”

“That’s just it.”

“Isn’t there any boy among you to teach the fellow better manners? You
must be cowards to submit.”

“Oh, you’ll find out soon that you must submit, too,” said Wilkins.

Hector smiled.

“You don’t know me yet,” he said.

“What could you do against Jim? He’s three or four inches taller than
you. How old are you?”

“I shall be sixteen next month.”

“And he is nineteen.”

“That may be; but he’d better not try to order me round.”

“You’ll sing a different tune in a day or two,” said Wilkins.

By this time Jim Smith had observed the new arrival.

“What’s that you’ve got with you, Wilkins?” he demanded, pausing in his
play.

“The new boy.”

“Who’s he?”

“His name is Roscoe.”

“Ho! Hasn’t he got any other name?” asked Jim, meaningly.

Wilkins had forgotten the new arrival’s first name, and said so.

“What’s your name, Roscoe?” asked Jim, in the tone of a superior.

Hector resented this tone, and, though he had no objection, under
ordinary circumstances, to answering the question, he did not choose to
gratify his present questioner.

“I don’t happen to have a card with me,” he answered, coldly.

“Oh, that’s your answer, is it?” retorted Jim, scenting insubordination
with undisguised pleasure, for he always liked the task of subduing a
new boy.

“Yes.”

“I guess you don’t know who I am,” said Jim, blustering.

“Oh, yes, I do.”

“Well, who am I, then?”

“The bully of the school, I should suppose, from your style of
behavior.”

“Do you hear that, boys?” demanded Jim, in a theatrical tone, turning to
the other boys.

There was a little murmur in response, but whether of approval or
reprobation, it was not easy to judge.

“That boy calls me a bully! He actually has the audacity to insult me!
What do you say to that?”

The boys looked uneasy. Possibly, in their secret hearts, they admired
the audacity that Jim complained of; but, seeing the difference between
the two boys in size and apparent strength, it did not seem to them
prudent to espouse the side of Hector.

“Don’t you think I ought to teach him a lesson?”

“Yes!” cried several of the smaller boys, who stood in awe of the bully.

Hector smiled slightly, but did not seem in the least intimidated.

“Jim,” said Wilkins, “the boy’s guardian is inside with your uncle.”

This was meant as a warning, and received as such. A boy’s guardian is
presumed to be his friend, and it would not be exactly prudent, while
the guardian was closeted with the principal, to make an assault upon
the pupil.

“Very well,” said Jim; “we’ll postpone Roscoe’s case. This afternoon
will do as well. Come, boys, let us go on with the game.”

“What made you speak to Jim in that way?” expostulated Wilkins. “I’m
afraid you’ve got into hot water.”

“Didn’t I tell the truth about him?”

“Yes,” answered Wilkins, cautiously; “but you’ve made an enemy of him.”

“I was sure to do that, sooner or later,” said Hector, unconcernedly.
“It might as well be now as any time.”

“Do you know what he’ll do this afternoon?”

“What will he do?”

“He’ll give you a thrashing.”

“Without asking my permission?” asked Hector, smiling.

“You’re a queer boy! Of course, he won’t trouble himself about that. You
don’t seem to mind it,” he continued, eying Hector curiously.

“Oh, no.”

“Perhaps you think Jim can’t hurt. I know better than that.”

“Did he ever thrash you, then?”

“Half a dozen times.”

“Why didn’t you tell his uncle?”

“It would be no use. Jim would tell his story, and old Sock would
believe him. But here’s Mr. Crabb, the usher, the man I was to introduce
you to.”

Hector looked up, and saw advancing a young man, dressed in rusty black,
with a meek and long-suffering expression, as one who was used to being
browbeaten. He was very shortsighted, and wore eyeglasses.



CHAPTER XIII. IN THE SCHOOLROOM.



“Mr. Crabb,” said Wilkins, “this is the new scholar, Roscoe. Mr. Smith
asked me to bring him to you.”

“Ah, indeed!” said Crabb, adjusting his glasses, which seemed to sit
uneasily on his nose. “I hope you are well, Roscoe?”

“Thank you, sir; my health is good.”

“The schoolbell will ring directly. Perhaps you had better come into the
schoolroom and select a desk.”

“Very well, sir.”

“Are you a classical scholar, Roscoe?”

“Yes, sir.”

“And how far may you have gone now?” queried Crabb.

“I was reading the fifth book of Virgil when I left off study.”

“Really, you are quite a scholar. I suppose you don’t know any Greek?”

“I was in the second book of the Anabasis.”

“You will go into the first class, then. I hope you will become one of
the ornaments of the institute.”

“Thank you. Is the first class under Mr. Smith?”

“No; I teach the first class,” said Crabb, with a modest cough.

“I thought the principal usually took the first class himself?”

“Mr. Smith comes into the room occasionally and supervises, but he has
too much business on hand to teach regularly himself.”

“Is Mr. Smith a good scholar?” asked Hector.

“Ahem!” answered Mr. Crabb, evidently embarrassed; “I presume so. You
should not ask Ahem! irrelevant questions.”

In fact, Mr. Crabb had serious doubts as to the fact assumed. He knew
that whenever a pupil went to the principal to ask a question in
Latin or Greek, he was always referred to Crabb himself, or some other
teacher. This, to be sure, proved nothing, but in an unguarded moment,
Mr. Smith had ventured to answer a question himself, and his answer was
ludicrously incorrect.

The schoolroom was a moderate-sized, dreary-looking room, with another
smaller room opening out of it, which was used as a separate recitation
room.

“Here is a vacant desk,” said Mr. Crabb, pointing out one centrally
situated.

“I think that will do. Who sits at the next desk?”

“Mr. Smith’s nephew.”

“Oh, that big bully I saw on the playground?”

“Hush!” said Crabb, apprehensively. “Mr. Smith would not like to have
you speak so of his nephew.”

“So, Mr. Crabb is afraid of the cad,” soliloquized Hector. “I suppose I
may think what I please about him,” he added, smiling pleasantly.

“Ye-es, of course; but, Master Roscoe, let me advise you to be prudent.”

“Is he in your class?”

“Yes.”

“Is he much of a scholar?”

“I don’t think he cares much for Latin and Greek,” answered Mr. Crabb.
“But I must ring the bell. I see that it wants but five minutes of
nine.”

“About my desk?”

“Here is another vacant desk, but it is not as well located.”

“Never mind. I will take it. I shall probably have a better neighbor.”

The bell was rung. Another teacher appeared, an elderly man, who
looked as if all his vitality had been expended on his thirty years
of teaching. He, too, was shabbily dressed--his coat being shiny and
napless, and his vest lacking two out of the five original buttons.

“I guess Smith doesn’t pay very high salaries,” thought Hector. “Poor
fellows. His teachers look decidedly seedy.”

The boys began to pour in, not only those on the playground, but as many
more who lived in the village, and were merely day scholars. Jim
Smith stalked in with an independent manner and dropped into his seat
carelessly. He looked around him patronizingly. He felt that he was
master of the situation. Both ushers and all the pupils stood in fear of
him, as he well knew. Only to his uncle did he look up as his superior,
and he took care to be on good terms with him, as it was essential to
the maintenance of his personal authority.

Last of all, Mr. Smith, the learned principal, walked into the
schoolroom with the air of a commanding general, followed by Allan
Roscoe, who he had invited to see the school in operation.

Socrates Smith stood upright behind his desk, and waved his hand
majestically.

“My young friends,” he said; “this is a marked day. We have with us a
new boy, who is henceforth to be one of us, to be a member of our happy
family, to share in the estimable advantages which you all enjoy. Need I
say that I refer to Master Roscoe, the ward of our distinguished friend,
Mr. Allan Roscoe, who sits beside me, and with interest, I am sure,
surveys our institute?”

As he spoke he turned towards Mr. Roscoe, who nodded an acknowledgment.

“I may say to Mr. Roscoe that I am proud of my pupils, and the progress
they have made under my charge. (The principal quietly ignored the two
ushers who did all the teaching.) When these boys have reached a high
position in the world, it will be my proudest boast that they were
prepared for the duties of life at Smith Institute. Compared with this
proud satisfaction, the few paltry dollars I exact as my honorarium are
nothing--absolutely nothing.”

Socrates looked virtuous and disinterested as he gave utterance to this
sentiment.

“And now, boys, you will commence your daily exercises, under the
direction of my learned associates, Mr. Crabb and Mr. Jones.”

Mr. Crabb looked feebly complacent at this compliment, though he knew it
was only because a visitor was present. In private, Socrates was rather
apt to speak slightingly of his attainments.

“While I am absent with my distinguished friend, Mr. Roscoe, I expect
you to pursue your studies diligently, and preserve the most perfect
order.”

With these words, the stately figure of Socrates passed through the
door, followed by Mr. Roscoe.

“A pleasant sight, Mr. Roscoe,” said the principal; “this company of
ambitious, aspiring students, all pressing forward eagerly in pursuit of
learning?”

“Quite true, sir,” answered Allan Roscoe.

“I wish you could stay with us for a whole day, to inspect at your
leisure the workings of our educational system.”

“Thank you, Mr. Smith,” answered Mr. Roscoe, with an inward shudder;
“but I have important engagements that call me away immediately.”

“Then we must reluctantly take leave of you. I hope you will feel easy
about your nephew--”

“My ward,” corrected Allan Roscoe.

“I beg your pardon--I should have remembered--your ward.”

“I leave him, with confidence, in your hands, my dear sir.”

So Allan Roscoe took his leave.

Let us look in upon the aspiring and ambitious scholars, after Mr. Smith
left them in charge of the ushers.

Jim Smith signalized his devotion to study by producing an apple core,
and throwing it with such skillful aim that it struck Mr. Crabb in the
back of the head.

The usher turned quickly, his face flushed with wild indignation.

“Who threw that missile?” he asked, in a vexed tone.

Of course no one answered.

“I hope no personal disrespect was intended,” continued the usher.

Again no answer.

“Does anyone know who threw it?” asked Mr. Crabb.

“I think it was the new scholar,” said Jim Smith, with a malicious look
at Hector.

“Master Roscoe,” said Mr. Crabb, with a pained look, “I hope you have
not started so discreditably in your school life.”

“No, sir,” answered Hector; “I hope I am not so ungentlemanly. I don’t
like to be an informer, but I saw Smith himself throw it at you. As he
has chosen to lay it to me, I have no hesitation in exposing him.”

Jim Smith’s face flushed with anger.

“I’ll get even with you, you young muff!” he said.

“Whenever you please!” said Hector, disdainfully.

“Really, young gentlemen, these proceedings are very irregular!” said
Mr. Crabb, feebly.

With Jim Smith he did not remonstrate at all, though he had no doubt
that Hector’s charge was rightly made.




CHAPTER IX. THE CLASS IN VIRGIL.



Presently the class in Virgil was called up. To this class Hector had
been assigned, though it had only advanced about half through the third
book of the AEneid, while Hector was in the fifth.

“As there is no other class in Virgil, Roscoe, you had better join the
one we have. It will do you no harm to review.”

“Very well, sir,” said Hector.

The class consisted of five boys, including Hector. Besides Jim Smith,
Wilkins, Bates and Johnson belonged to it. As twenty-five lines had been
assigned for a lesson, Hector had no difficulty in preparing himself,
and that in a brief time. The other boys were understood to have studied
the lesson out of school.

Bates read first, and did very fairly. Next came Jim Smith, who did
not seem quite so much at home in Latin poetry as on the playground.
He pronounced the Latin words in flagrant violation of all the rules of
quantity, and when he came to give the English meaning, his translation
was a ludicrous farrago of nonsense. Yet, poor Mr. Crabb did not dare,
apparently, to characterize it as it deserved.

“I don’t think you have quite caught the author’s meaning, Mr. Smith,”
 he said. By the way, Jim was the only pupil to whose name he prefixed
the title “Mr.”

“I couldn’t make anything else out of it,” muttered Jim.

“Perhaps some other member of the class may have been more successful!
Johnson, how do you read it?”

“I don’t understand it very well, sir.”

“Wilkins, were you more successful?”

“No, sir.”

“Roscoe, can you translate the passage?”

“I think so, sir.”

“Proceed, then.”

Hector at once gave a clear and luminous rendering of the passage, and
his version was not only correct, but was expressed in decent English.
This is a point in which young classical scholars are apt to fail.

Mr. Crabb was not in the habit of hearing such good translations, and he
was surprised and gratified.

“Very well! Very well, indeed, Roscoe,” he said, approvingly. “Mr.
Smith, you may go on.”

“He’d better go ahead and finish it,” said Smith, sulkily. “He probably
got it out of a pony.”

My young readers who are in college or classical schools, will
understand that a “pony” is an English translation of a classical
author.

“He is mistaken!” said Hector, quietly. “I have never seen a translation
of Virgil.”

Mr. Smith shrugged his shoulders, and drew down the corners of his
mouth, intending thereby to express his incredulity.

“I hope no boy will use a translation,” said the usher; “it will make
his work easier for the time being, but in the end it will embarrass
him. Roscoe, as you have commenced, you may continue. Translate the
remainder of the passage.”

Hector did so, exhibiting equal readiness.

The other boys took their turns, and then words were given out to parse.
Here Jim Smith showed himself quite at sea; though the usher, as it was
evident, selected the easiest words for him, he made a mistake in every
one. Apparently he was by no means certain which of the words were
nouns, and which verbs, and as to the relations which they sustained to
other words in the sentence he appeared to have very little conception.

At length the recitation was over. It had demonstrated one thing, that
in Latin scholarship Hector was far more accurate and proficient than
any of his classmates, while Jim Smith stood far below all the rest.

“What in the world can the teacher be thinking of, to keep such an
ignoramus in the class?” thought Hector. “He doesn’t know enough to join
a class in the Latin Reader.”

The fact was, that Jim Smith was unwilling to give up his place as a
member of the highest class in Latin, because he knew it would detract
from his rank in the school. Mr. Crabb, to whom every recitation was a
torture, had one day ventured to suggest that it would be better to
drop into the Caesar class; but he never ventured to make the suggestion
again, so unfavorably was it received by his backward pupil. He might,
in the case of a different pupil, have referred the matter to the
principal, but Socrates Smith was sure to decide according to the wishes
of his nephew, and did not himself possess knowledge enough of the Latin
tongue to detect his gross mistakes.

After a time came recess. Hector wished to arrange the books in his
desk, and did not go out.

Mr. Crabb came up to his desk and said: “Roscoe, I must compliment you
on your scholarship. You enter at the head. You are in advance of all
the other members of the class.”

“Thank you, sir,” said Hector, gratified.

“There is one member of the class who is not competent to remain in it.”

“Yes, sir; I observed that.”

“But he is unwilling to join a lower class. It is a trial to me to hear
his daily failures, but, perhaps, he would do no better anywhere else.
He would be as incompetent to interpret Caesar as Virgil, I am afraid.”

“So I should suppose, sir.”

“By the way, Roscoe,” said the usher, hurriedly; “let me caution you
against irritating Smith. He is the principal’s nephew, and so we give
him more scope.”

“He seems to me a bully,” said Hector.

“So he is.”

“I can’t understand why the boys should give in to him as they do.”

“He is taller and stronger than the other boys. Besides, he is backed up
by the principal. I hope you won’t get into difficulty with him.”

“Thank you, Mr. Crabb. Your caution is kindly meant, but I am not afraid
of this Jim--Smith. I am quite able to defend myself if attacked.”

“I hope so,” said the usher; but he scanned Hector’s physical
proportions doubtfully, and it was very clear that he did not think him
a match for the young tyrant of the school.

Meanwhile, Jim Smith and his schoolfellows were amusing themselves in
the playground.

“Where’s that new fellow?” asked Jim, looking back to see whether he had
come out.

“He didn’t come out,” said Bates.

Jim nodded his head vigorously:

“Just as I expected,” he said. “He knows where he is well off.”

“Do you think he was afraid to come?” asked Bates.

“To be sure he was. He knew what to expect.”

“Are you going to thrash him?” asked Johnson.

“I should say I might.”

“He’s a very good Latin scholar,” remarked Wilkins.

“He thinks he is!” sneered Jim.

“So Mr. Crabb appears to think.”

“That for old Crabb!” said Jim, contemptuously, snapping his fingers.
“He don’t know much himself. I’ve caught him in plenty of mistakes.”

This was certainly very amusing, considering Smith’s absolute ignorance
of even the Latin rudiments, but the boys around him did not venture to
contradict him.

“But it don’t make any difference whether he knows Latin or not,”
 proceeded Jim. “He has been impudent to me, and he shall suffer for it.
I was hoping to get a chance at him this recess, but it’ll keep.”

“You might spoil his appetite for dinner,” said Bates, who was rather a
toady to Jim.

“That’s just exactly what I expect to do; at any rate, for supper. I’ve
got to have a reckoning with that young muff.”

The recess lasted fifteen minutes. At the end of that time the
schoolbell rang, and the boys trooped back into the schoolroom.

Hector sat at his desk looking tranquil and at ease. He alone seemed
unaware of the fate that was destined for him.




CHAPTER X. DINNER AT SMITH INSTITUTE.



At twelve o’clock the morning session closed. Then came an intermission
of an hour, during which the day scholars either ate lunch brought with
them, or went to their homes in the village to partake of a warm repast.

At ten minutes past twelve, a red-armed servant girl made her appearance
at the back door looking out on the playground, and rang a huge dinner
bell. The boys dropped their games, and made what haste they could to
the dining room.

“Now for a feast!” said Wilkins to Hector, significantly.

“Does Mr. Smith furnish good board?” asked Hector, for he felt the
hunger of a healthy boy who had taken an early breakfast.

“Good grub?” said Wilkins, making a face. “Wait till you see. Old Sock
isn’t going to ruin himself providing his pupils with the delicacies of
the season.”

“I’m sorry for that. I am confoundedly hungry.”

“Hungry!” exclaimed Wilkins. “I’ve been I hungry ever since I came
here.”

“Is it as bad as that?” asked Hector, rather alarmed.

“I should say so. I haven’t had a square meal--what I call a square
meal--for four weeks, and that’s just the time since I left home.”

They had reached the door of the dining-room by this time.

In the center stood a long table, but there didn’t seem to be much on it
except empty plates. At a side table stood Mrs. Smith, ladling out soup
from a large tureen.

“That’s the first course,” whispered Wilkins. “I hope you’ll like it.”

The boys filed in and took seats. The servant girl already referred to
began to bring plates of soup and set before the boys. It was a thin,
unwholesome-looking mixture, with one or two small pieces of meat, about
the size of a chestnut, in each plate, and fragments of potatoes and
carrots. A small, triangular wedge of dry bread was furnished with each
portion of soup.

“We all begin to eat together. Don’t be in a hurry,” said Wilkins, in a
low tone.

When all the boys were served, Socrates Smith, who sat in an armchair at
the head of the table, said:

“Boys, we are now about to partake of the bounties of Providence, let me
hope, with grateful hearts.”

He touched a hand bell, and the boys took up their soup spoons.

Hector put a spoonful gingerly into his mouth, and then, stopping short,
looked at Wilkins. His face was evidently struggling not to express
disgust.

“Is it always as bad?” he asked, in a whisper.

“Yes,” answered Wilkins, shrugging his shoulders.

“But you eat it!”

Wilkins had already swallowed his third spoonful.

“I don’t want to starve,” answered Wilkins, significantly. “You’ll get
used to it in time.”

Hector tried to dispose of a second spoonful, but he had to give it up.
At home he was accustomed to a luxurious table, and this meal seemed to
be a mere mockery. Yet he felt hungry. So he took up the piece of bread
at the side of his plate, and, though it was dry, he succeeded in eating
it.

By this time his left-hand neighbor, a boy named Colburn, had finished
his soup. He looked longingly at Hector’s almost untasted plate.

“Ain’t you going to eat your soup?” he asked, in a hoarse whisper

“No.”

“Give it to me?”

“Yes.”

In a trice, Colburn had appropriated Hector’s plate and put his own
empty one in its place. Just after this transfer had been made, Mr.
Smith looked over to where Hector was sitting. He observed the empty
plate, and said to himself: “That new boy has been gorging himself. He
must have a terrible appetite. Well, that’s one good thing, he ain’t
dainty. Some boys turn up their noses at plain, wholesome diet. I didn’t
know but he might.”

Presently the hand bell rang again, and the soup plates were removed. In
their places were set dinner plates, containing a small section each of
corned beef, with a consumptive-looking potato, very probably “soggy.”
 At any rate, this was the case with Hector’s. He succeeded in eating the
meat, but not the potato.

“Give me your potato?” asked his left-hand neighbor.

“Yes.”

It was quickly appropriated. Hector looked with some curiosity at the
boy who did so much justice to boarding-school fare. He was a thin, pale
boy, who looked as if he had been growing rapidly, as, indeed, he had.
This, perhaps, it was that stimulated his appetite. Afterward Hector
asked him if he really liked his meals.

“No,” he said; “they’re nasty.”

He was an English boy, which accounted for his use of the last word.

“You eat them as if you liked them,” remarked Hector.

“I’m so hungry,” apologized Colburn, mournfully. “I’m always hungry. I
eat to fill up, not ‘cause I like it. I could eat anything.”

“I believe he could,” said Wilkins, who overheard this conversation.
“Could you eat fried cat, now?” he asked.

“Yes,” answered Colburn, honestly. “There would be something hearty and
filling about fried cat. I ain’t half full now.”

It was just after dinner.

Hector might have said the same thing at the end of his first dinner.
There was, indeed, another course. It consisted of some pale, flabby
apple pie, about half baked. The slices given were about half the size
of those that are ordinarily supplied at private tables and restaurants.
Hector managed to eat the apple, but the crust he was obliged to leave.
He noticed, however, that his fellow pupils were not so fastidious.

When the last fragment of pie had disappeared, Mr. Smith again rang the
hand bell.

“Boys,” he said, “we have now satisfied our appetites.”

“I haven’t,” thought Hector.

“We have once more experienced the bountiful goodness of Providence in
supplying our material wants. As we sit down to our plain but wholesome
diet, I wonder how many of us are sensible of our good fortune. I wonder
how many of us think of the thousands of poor children, scattered about
the world, who know not where to get their daily bread. You have been
refreshed, and have reinforced your strength; you will soon be ready to
resume your studies, and thus, also, take in a supply of mental food,
for, as you are all aware, or ought to be aware, the mind needs to be
fed as well as the body. There will first be a short season for games
and out-of-door amusements. Mr. Crabb, will you accompany the boys to
the playground and superintend their sports?”

Mr. Crabb also had participated in the rich feast, and rose with the
same unsatisfied but resigned look which characterized the rest. He led
the way to the playground, and the boys trooped after him.

“Really, Wilkins,” said Hector, in a low tone, “this is getting serious.
Isn’t there any place outside where one can get something to eat?”

“There’s a baker’s half a mile away, but you can’t go till after
afternoon session.”

“Show me the way there, then, and I’ll buy something for both of us.”

“All right,” said Wilkins, brightening up.

“By the way, I didn’t see Jim Smith at the table.”

“No; he eats with his uncle and aunt afterward. You noticed that old
Sock didn’t eat just now.”

“Yes, I wondered at it.”

“He has something a good deal better afterward. He wouldn’t like our
dinner any better than we did; but he is better off, for he needn’t eat
it.”

“So Jim fares better than the rest of us, does he?”

“Yes, he’s one of the family, you know.”

Just then pleasant fumes were wafted to the boys’ nostrils, and they saw
through the open window, with feelings that cannot well be described, a
pair of roast chickens carried from the kitchen to the dining-room.

“See what old Sock and Ma’am Sock are going to have for dinner?” said
Wilkins, enviously.

“I don’t like to look at it. It is too tantalizing,” said Hector.




CHAPTER XI. HECTOR RECEIVES A SUMMONS.



It so happened that Hector was well provided with money. During the
life of Mr. Roscoe, whom he regarded as his father, he had a liberal
allowance--liberal beyond his needs--and out of it had put by somewhat
over a hundred dollars. The greater part of this was deposited for
safe-keeping in a savings bank, but he had twenty-five dollars in his
possession.

At the time he was saving his money, he regarded himself as the heir and
future possessor of the estate, and had no expectation of ever needing
it. It had been in his mind that it would give him an opportunity of
helping, out of his private funds, any deserving poor person who might
apply to him. When the unexpected revelation had been made to him
that he had no claim to the estate, he was glad that he was not quite
penniless. He did not care to apply for money to Allan Roscoe. It would
have been a confession of dependence, and very humiliating to him.

No sooner was school out, than he asked Wilkins to accompany him to
the baker’s, that he might make up for the deficiencies of Mr. Smith’s
meager table.

“I suppose, if I guide you, you’ll stand treat, Roscoe?” said Wilkins.

“Of course.”

“Then let us go,” said his schoolfellow, with alacrity. “I’d like to get
the taste of that beastly dinner out of my mouth.”

They found the baker’s, but close beside it was a restaurant, where more
substantial fare could be obtained.

“Wilkins,” said Hector, “I think I would rather have a plate of meat.”

“All right! I’m with you.”

So the two boys went into the restaurant, and ordered plates of roast
beef, which they ate with evident enjoyment.

“I guess,” said the waiter, grinning, “you two chaps come from the
institute.”

“Yes,” answered Hector. “What makes you think so?”

“The way you eat. They do say old Smith half starves the boys.”

“You’re not far from right,” said Wilkins; “but it isn’t alone the
quantity, but the quality that’s amiss.”

They ate their dinner, leaving not a crumb, and then rose refreshed.

“I feel splendid,” said Wilkins. “I just wish I boarded at the
restaurant instead of the doctor’s. Thank you, Roscoe, for inviting me.”

“All right, Wilkins! We’ll come again some day.”

Somehow the extra dinner seemed to warm the heart of Wilkins, and
inspire in him a feeling of friendly interest for Hector.

“I say, Hector, I’ll tell you something.”

“Go ahead.”

“You’ve got to keep your eyes open.”

“I generally do,” answered Hector, smiling, “except at night.”

“I mean when Jim Smith’s round.”

“Why particularly when he is around?”

“Because he means to thrash you.”

“What for?”

“You are too independent. You don’t bow down to him, and look up to
him.”

“I don’t mean to,” said Hector, promptly.

“If you don’t you’ll see trouble, and that very soon.”

“Let it come!” said Hector, rather contemptuously.

“You don’t seem afraid!” said Wilkins, regarding him curiously.

“Because I am not afraid. Isn’t that a good reason?”

“You don’t think you can stand up against Jim, do you?”

“I will see when the time comes.”

“I shouldn’t be a bit surprised if he were looking out for you at this
very moment, and wondering where you are.”

It seemed that Wilkins was right. As they approached the school grounds,
John Bates came running to meet them.

“Where have you been, you two?” he said.

“To the village,” answered Wilkins.

“What for?”

“For a walk,” answered Wilkins, with a warning glance at Hector. It
would have been awkward if the principal had heard that they had been
compelled to eke out their meager dinner at a restaurant.

“Well, Jim wants you. Leastways, he wants Roscoe.”

Bates looked as if he expected Roscoe would immediately hasten to comply
with the wishes of the redoubtable Jim.

“If he wants me, he can come to me,” said Hector, independently.

“But I say, that won’t do. Jim won’t be satisfied.”

“Won’t he? I don’t know that that particularly concerns me.”

“Shall I tell him that?”

“If you choose.”

Bates looked as if Hector had been guilty of some enormity. What, defy
the wishes, the mandates, of Jim Smith, the king of the school and the
tyrant of all the small boys! He felt that Hector Roscoe was rushing on
his fate.

“I advise you to come,” he said, “Jim’s mad with you already, and he’ll
lick you worse if you send him a message like that.”

“He will probably have to take blows, as well as give them,” said
Hector.

“Then I am to tell him what you said?”

“Of course.”

With a look that seemed to say, “Your fate be on your own head!” Bates
walked away.

“John Bates is always toadying to Jim,” said Wilkins. “So he’s prime
favorite when Jim is good-natured--when he’s cross, I’ve seen him kick
Bates.”

“And Bates didn’t resent it?”

“He didn’t dare to. He’d come round him the next day the same as ever.”

“Has the boy no self-respect?” asked Hector, in a tone of disgust.

“He doesn’t seem to have.”

As soon as school was out, Jim Smith had looked round for the new boy,
who seemed disposed to defy his authority. On account of eating at
different tables, they had not met during the noon intermission. At any
rate, there had not been time to settle the question of subserviency.
Through the afternoon session Jim had been anticipating the signal
punishment which he intended to inflict upon the newcomer.

“I’ll show him!” he said to himself. “Tomorrow he’ll be singing a
different tune, or I am mistaken.”

This was the way Jim had been accustomed to break in refractory new
arrivals. The logic of his fist usually proved a convincing argument,
and thus far his supremacy had never been successfully resisted. He
was confident that he would not be interfered with. Secretly, his Uncle
Socrates sympathized with him, and relished the thought that his
nephew, who so strongly resembled him in mind and person, should be
the undisputed boss--to use a word common in political circles--of the
school. He discreetly ignored the conflicts which he knew took place,
and if any luckless boy, the victim of Jim’s brutality, ventured to
appeal to him, the boy soon found that he himself was arraigned, and not
the one who had abused him.

“Where’s that new boy?” asked Jim, as he left the schoolroom.

He had not seen our hero’s departure--but his ready tool, Bates, had.

“I saw him sneaking off with Wilkins,” said Bates.

“Where did they go?”

“To the Village, I guess.”

“They seemed to be in a hurry,” said Jim, with a sneer.

“They wanted to get out of your way--that is, the new boy did,”
 suggested Bates.

Jim nodded.

“Likely he did,” he answered. “So he went to the village, did he?”

“Yes; I saw him.”

“Well, he’s put it off a little. That boy’s cranky. I’m goin’ to give
him a lesson he won’t forget very soon.”

“So you will, so you will, Jim,” chuckled Bates.

“That’s the way I generally take down these boys that put on airs,”
 said Jim, complacently. “This Roscoe’s the worst case I’ve had yet. So
Wilkins went off with him, did he?”

“Yes; I saw them go off together.”

“I’ll have to give Wilkins a little reminder, then. It won’t be safe to
take up with them that defy me. I’ll just give him a kick to help his
memory.”

“He won’t like that much, oh, my!” chuckled Bates.

“When you see them coming, Bates, go and tell Roscoe I want to see him,”
 said Jim, with the air of an autocrat.

“All right, Jim,” said Bates, obediently.

So he went on his errand, and we know what success he met with.




CHAPTER XII. THE IMPENDING CONFLICT.



Jim Smith stood leaning indolently against a post, when his emissary,
Bates, returned from his errand. He was experiencing “that stern joy”
 which bullies feel just before an encounter with a foeman inferior in
strength, whom they expect easily to master. Several of the boys were
near by--sycophantic followers of Jim, who were enjoying in advance the
rumpus they expected. I am afraid schoolboys do not always sympathize
with the weaker side. In the present instance, there was hardly a boy
who had not at some time or other felt the weight of Jim’s fist, and, as
there is an old saying that “misery loves company,” it was not, perhaps,
a matter of wonder that they looked forward with interest to seeing
another suffer the same ill-treatment which they had on former occasions
received!

Presently Bates came back.

Jim looked over his head for the boy whom he expected to see in his
company.

“Where’s the new boy?” he demanded, with a frown.

“He won’t come.”

“Won’t come?” repeated Jim, with an ominous frown. “Did you tell him I
wanted him?”

“Yes, I did.”

“And what did he say?”

“That if you wanted to see him, you could come to him.”

All the boys regarded each other with looks of surprise. Was it possible
that any boy in Smith Institute could have the boldness to send such a
message to Jim! Most of all, Jim was moved by such a bold defiance of
his authority. For the moment, he could not think of any adequate terms
in which to express his feelings.

“Did the new boy say that?” he asked, hoarsely.

“Yes, he did.”

Jim nodded his head vigorously two or three times.

“You fellows,” he said, appealing to the boys around him, “did you ever
hear such impudence?”

“No!” “Never!” exclaimed the boys in concert, Bates being the loudest
and most emphatic.

“I have never been so insulted since I was at the institute,” said Jim,
again looking about him for a confirmation of his statement.

“It’s because he’s a new boy. He don’t understand,” suggested one.

“That’s no excuse,” said Jim, sternly. “He needn’t think I’ll let him
off on that account.”

“Of course not,” answered Bates.

“What would you advise me to do, boys?” asked Jim, with the air of a
monarch asking the opinion of his counselors.

“Thrash him till he can’t stand!” said the subservient Bates. He was
always ready to go farther than anyone else in supporting and defending
the authority of the tyrant of the playground.

“Bates, you are right. I shall follow your advice,” said Jim. “Where is
the young reprobate?”

“He is over in Carver’s field.”

“Is anyone with him?”

“Yes, Wilkins.”

“Ha! Wilkins and I will have an account to settle. If he is going to
side with this young rascal he must take the consequences. So, he’s over
in the field, is he? What’s he doing?”

“I think he was going to walk down to the brook.”

Carver’s field was a tract, several acres in extent, of pasture land,
sloping down to one corner, where a brook trickled along quietly. Here
three large trees were located, under whose spreading branches the boys,
in the intervals of study, used often to stretch themselves for a chat
or engage in some schoolboy games, such as nimble peg or quoits. The
owner of the field was an easy-going man, who did not appear to be
troubled by the visits of the boys, as long as they did not maltreat the
peaceful cows who gathered their subsistence from the scanty grass that
grew there.

“He wants to keep out of your way, I guess,” volunteered Bates.

As this suggestion was flattering to the pride of the “boss,” it was
graciously received.

“Very likely,” he said; “but he’ll find that isn’t so easy. Boys, follow
me, if you want to see some fun.”

Jim started with his loose stride for the field, where he expected to
meet his adversary, or, rather, victim, for so he considered him, and
the smaller boys followed him with alacrity. There was going to be a
scrimmage, and they all wanted to see it.

Jim and his followers issued from the gate, and, crossing the street,
scaled the bars that separated Carver’s field from the highway. Already
they could see the two boys--Roscoe and Wilkins-slowly walking, and
nearly arrived at the brook in the lower part of the field.

“He doesn’t seem much afraid,” remarked Talbot, one of the recent
comers, incautiously.

Upon him immediately Jim frowned ominously.

“So you are taking sides with him, Talbot, are you?” he said,
imperiously.

“No, Jim,” answered Talbot, hurriedly, for he now saw that he had been
guilty of an imprudence.

“What made you say he wasn’t scared, then?”

“I only said he didn’t seem afraid,” answered Talbot, apologetically.

“Be careful what you say in future, young fellow!” said Jim, sternly;
“that is, if you are a friend of mine. If you are going over to Roscoe,
you can go, and I shall know how to treat you.”

“But I am not going over to him. I don’t like him,” said the cowardly
boy.

“Very well; I accept your apology this time. In future be careful what
you say.”

By this time Wilkins and Roscoe had reached the clump of big trees, and
had seated themselves under their ample branches. Then, for the first
time, glancing backward toward the school, they became aware of the
advancing troop of boys. Wilkins saw them first.

“There’s Jim coming!” he exclaimed. “Now you are in a pickle. He means
business.”

“I suppose,” said Hector, coolly, “he has decided to accept my
invitation, and come to see me.”

“You’ll find he has,” said Wilkins, significantly.

“He seems to have considerable company,” remarked Hector, scanning the
approaching party with tranquillity.

“They’re coming to see the fun!” said Wilkins.

“I suppose you mean the fight between Jim Smith and myself.”

“Well, not exactly. They’ve come to see you thrashed.”

Hector smiled.

“Suppose they should see Jim thrashed instead--what then?”

“They might be surprised: but I don’t think they will be,” answered
Wilkins, dryly. He was, on the whole, well disposed toward Hector, and
he certainly disliked Jim heartily, but he did not allow his judgment to
be swayed by his preferences, and he could foresee but one issue to the
impending conflict. There was one thing that puzzled him exceedingly,
and that was Hector’s coolness on the brink of a severe thrashing, such
as Jim was sure to give him for his daring defiance and disregard of his
authority.

“You’re a queer boy, Hector,” he said. “You don’t seem in the least
alarmed.”

“I am not in the least alarmed,” answered Hector. “Why should I be?”

“You don’t mind being thrashed, then?”

“I might mind; but I don’t mean to be thrashed if I can help it.”

“But you can’t help it, you know.”

“Well, that will soon be decided.”

There was no time for any further conversation, for Jim and his
followers were close at hand.

Jim opened the campaign by calling Hector to account.

“Look here, you new boy,” he said, “didn’t Bates tell you that I wanted
to see you?”

“Yes,” answered Hector, looking up, indifferently.

“Well, why didn’t you come to me at once, hey?”

“Because I didn’t choose to. I sent word if you wished to see me, to
come where I was.”

“What do you mean by such impudence, hey?”

“I mean this, Jim Smith, that you have no authority over me and never
will have. I have not been here long, but I have been here long enough
to find out that you are a cowardly bully and ruffian. How all these
boys can give in to you, I can’t understand.”

Jim Smith almost foamed at the mouth with rage.

“You’ll pay for this,” he howled, pulling off his coat, in furious
haste.




CHAPTER XIII. WHO SHALL BE VICTOR?



Hector was not slow to accept the challenge conveyed by his antagonist’s
action. He, too, sprang to his feet, flung off his coat, and stood
facing the bully.

Hector was three inches shorter, and more than as many years younger,
than Jim. But his figure was well proportioned and strongly put
together, as the boys could see. On the other hand; Jim Smith was
loosely put together, and, though tall, he was not well proportioned.
His arms were long and his movements were clumsy. His frame, however,
was large, and he had considerable strength, but it had never been
disciplined. He had never learned to box, and was ignorant of the first
rudiments of the art of self-defense. But he was larger and stronger
than any of his school-fellows, and he had thus far had no difficulty in
overcoming opposition to his despotic rule.

The boys regarded the two combatants with intense interest. They could
see that Hector was not alarmed, and meant to defend himself. So there
was likely to be a contest, although they could not but anticipate an
easy victory for the hitherto champion of the school.

Hector did not propose to make the attack. He walked forward to a
favorable place and took his stand. The position he assumed would have
assured the casual observer that he knew something of the art in which
his larger antagonist was deficient.

“So you are ready to fight, are you?” said Jim.

“You can see for yourself.”

Jim rushed forward, intending to bear down all opposition. He was
whirling his long arms awkwardly, and it was clear to see that he
intended to seize Hector about the body and fling him to the earth. Had
he managed to secure the grip he desired, opposition would have been
vain, and he would have compassed his design. But Hector was far too
wary to allow anything of this kind. He evaded Jim’s grasp by jumping
backward, then dashing forward while his opponent was somewhat unsteady
from the failure of his attempt, he dealt him a powerful blow in the
face.

Jim Smith was unprepared for such prompt action. He reeled, and came
near falling. It may safely be said, also, that his astonishment was as
great as his indignation, and that was unbounded.

“So that’s your game, is it?” he exclaimed, furiously. “I’ll pay you for
this, see if I don’t.”

Hector did not reply. He did not propose to carry on the battle by
words. Already the matter had come to a sterner arbitrament, and he
stood on the alert, all his senses under absolute control, watching his
big antagonist, and, from the expression of his face, seeking to divine
his next mode of attack. He had this advantage over Jim, that he was
cool and collected, while Jim was angry and rendered imprudent by his
anger. Notwithstanding his first repulse, he did not fully understand
that the new boy was a much more formidable opponent than he
anticipated. Nor did he appreciate the advantage which science gives
over brute force. He, therefore, rushed forward again, with the same
impetuosity as before, and was received in precisely the same way.
This time the blood started from his nose and coursed over his inflamed
countenance, while Hector was still absolutely unhurt.

Meanwhile the boys looked on in decided amazement. It had been as far
as possible from their thoughts that Hector could stand up successfully
against the bully even for an instant. Yet here two attacks had been
made, and the champion was decidedly worsted. They could not believe the
testimony of their eyes.

Carried away by the excitement of the moment, Wilkins, who, as we have
said, was disposed to espouse the side of Hector, broke into a shout of
encouragement.

“Good boy, Roscoe!” he exclaimed. “You’re doing well!”

Two or three of the other boys, those who were least under the
domination of Jim, and were only waiting for an opportunity of breaking
away from their allegiance, echoed the words of Wilkins. If there was
anything that could increase the anger and mortification of the tyrant
it was these signs of failing allegiance. What! was he to lose his hold
over these boys, and that because he was unable to cope with a boy much
smaller and younger than himself? Perish the thought! It nerved him to
desperation, and he prepared for a still more impetuous assault.

Somewhere in his Greek reader, Hector had met with a saying attributed
to Pindar, that “boldness is the beginning of victory.” He felt that
the time had now come for a decisive stroke. He did not content
himself, therefore, with parrying, or simply repelling the blow of his
antagonist, but he on his part assumed the offensive. He dealt his blows
with bewildering rapidity, pressed upon Jim, skillfully evading the
grasp of his long arms, and in a trice the champion measured his length
upon the greensward.

Of course, he did not remain there. He sprang to his feet, and renewed
the attack. But he had lost his confidence. He was bewildered, and, to
confess the truth, panic-stricken, and the second skirmish was briefer
than the first.

When, for the third time, he fell back, with his young opponent standing
erect and vigorous, the enthusiasm of the boys overcame the limits of
prudence. There was a shout of approval, and the fallen champion, to
add to his discomfiture, was forced to listen to his own hitherto
subservient followers shouting, “Hurrah for the new boy! Hurrah for
Hector Roscoe!”

This was too much for Jim.

He rose from the ground sullenly, looked about him with indignation
which he could not control, and, shaking his fist, not at one boy in
particular, but at the whole company, exclaimed: “You’ll be sorry for
this, you fellows! You can leave me, and stand by the new boy if you
want to, but you’ll be sorry for it. I’ll thrash you one by one, as I
have often done before.”

“Try Roscoe first!” said one boy, jeeringly.

“I’ll try you first!” said Jim; and too angry to postpone his intention,
he made a rush for the offender.

The latter, who knew he was no match for the angry bully, turned and
fled. Jim prepared to follow him, when he was brought to by Hector
placing himself in his path.

“Let that boy alone!” he said, sternly.

“What business is it of yours?” demanded Jim, doggedly; but he did not
offer to renew the attack, however.

“It will be my business to put an end to your tyranny and bullying,”
 said Hector, undauntedly. “If you dare to touch one of these boys, you
will have to meet me as well.”

Jim had had enough of encountering Hector. He did not care to make a
humiliating spectacle of himself any more before his old flatterers. But
his resources were not at an end.

“You think yourself mighty smart!” he said, with what was intended to be
withering sarcasm. “You haven’t got through with me yet.”

He did not, however, offer to pursue the boy who had been the first to
break away from his allegiance. He put on his coat, and turned to walk
toward the school, saying, “You’ll hear from me again, and that pretty
soon!”

None of his late followers offered to accompany him. He had come to the
contest with a band of friends and supporters. He left it alone. Even
Bates, his most devoted adherent, remained behind, and did not offer to
accompany the discrowned and dethroned monarch.

“What’s Jim going to do?” asked Talbot.

“He’s going to tell old Sock, and get us all into trouble.”

“It’ll be a cowardly thing to do!” said Wilkins. “He’s been fairly
beaten in battle, and he ought to submit to it.”

“He won’t if he can help it.”

“I say, boys, three cheers for the new boy!” exclaimed Wilkins.

They were given with a will, and the boys pressed forward to shake the
hand of the boy whose prowess they admired.

“Thank you, boys!” said Hector, “but I’d rather be congratulated on
something else. I would rather be a good scholar than a good fighter.”

But the boys were evidently of a different opinion, and elevated Hector
straightway to the rank of a hero.




CHAPTER XIV. SOCRATES CALLS HECTOR TO ACCOUNT.



Jim Smith, as he walked back to the institute, nursing his wrath, felt
very much like a dethroned king. He was very anxious to be revenged upon
Hector, but the lesson he had received made him cautious. He must get
him into trouble by some means. Should he complain to his uncle? It
would involve the necessity of admitting his defeat, unless he could
gloss over the story in some way.

This he decided to do.

On reaching the school he sought his dormitory, and carefully wiped away
the blood from his face. Then he combed his hair and arranged his dress,
and sought his uncle.

Mr. Smith was at his desk, looking over his accounts, and estimating the
profits of the half year, when his nephew made his appearance.

“Uncle Socrates, I’d like to speak to you.”

“Very well, James. Proceed.”

“I want to complain of the new boy who came this morning.”

Socrates Smith looked up in genuine surprise. As a general thing,
his nephew brought few complaints, for he took the responsibility of
punishing boys he did not like himself.

“What! Roscoe?” inquired the principal.

“Yes.”

“Is he in any mischief?”

“Mischief? I should say so! Why, he’s a regular young Turk.”

“A young Turk? I don’t think I understand you, James.”

“I mean, he’s a young ruffian.”

“What has he been doing?” asked Socrates, in surprise.

“He pitched into me a short time ago,” said Jim, in some embarrassment.

“Pitched into you! You don’t mean to say that he attacked you?”

“Yes, I do.”

“But he’s a considerably smaller boy than you, James. I am surprised
that he should have dared to attack you.”

“Yes, he is small, but he’s a regular fighter.”

“I suppose you gave him a lesson?”

“Ye-es, of course.”

“So that he won’t be very likely to renew the attack.”

“Well, I don’t know about that. He’s tough and wiry, and understands
boxing. I found it hard work to thrash him.”

“But you did thrash him?” said Socrates, puzzled.

“Yes.”

“Then what do you want me to do?”

“I thought you might punish him for being quarrelsome.”

“It may be a good idea. I remember now that his uncle warned me that he
would need restraining.”

“Just so, uncle,” said Jim, eagerly. “His uncle was right.”

“Well, I will give him a lecture. He will find that he cannot behave as
he pleases at Smith Institute,” said Socrates, pompously. “He will find
that I do not tolerate any defiance of authority. I will speak of it
after vespers.”

“Thank you, uncle.”

“He’ll get a raking down!” thought Jim, with gratification. “I’ll make
it hot for him here, he may be sure of that.”

Half an hour after supper was read a brief evening service called
vespers, and then the boys’ study hours commenced. During this time they
were expected to be preparing their lessons for the next day.

The service was generally read by Socrates Smith, A. M., in person. It
was one of the few official duties he performed, and he was generally
very imposing in his manner on this occasion.

When the service had been read on that particular evening, the principal
did not immediately give the signal for study to be commenced. Instead,
he cleared his throat, saying:

“Boys, I have a few words to say to you. This morning a new boy made his
appearance among us. His uncle, or perhaps I should say his guardian,
attracted by the well-deserved fame of Smith Institute, came hither to
enter him among my pupils. I received him cordially, and promised
that he should share with you the rich, the inestimable educational
advantages which our humble seminary affords. I hoped he would be an
acquisition, that by his obedience and his fidelity to duty he would
shed luster on our school.”

Here Socrates blew his nose sonorously, and resumed:

“But what has happened? On the very first day of his residence here he
brutally assaults one of our numbers, my nephew, and displays the savage
instincts of a barbarian. His uncle did well to warn me that he would
need salutary restraint.”

Hector, who had been amused by the solemn and impressive remarks of
Socrates, looked up in surprise. Had Allan Roscoe really traduced him
in this manner, after robbing him of his inheritance, as Hector felt
convinced that he had done?

“Hector Roscoe!” said Socrates, severely; “stand up, and let me hear
what you have to say for yourself.”

Hector rose calmly, and faced the principal, by no means awe-stricken at
the grave arraignment to which he had listened.

“I say this, Mr. Smith,” he answered, “that I did not attack your
nephew till he had first attacked me. This he did without the slightest
provocation, and I defended myself, as I had a right to do.”

“It’s a lie!” muttered Jim, in a tone audible to his uncle.

“My nephew’s report is of a different character. I am disposed to
believe him.”

“I regret to say, sir, that he has made a false statement. I will give
you an account of what actually occurred. On my return from a walk he
sent a boy summoning me to his presence. As he was not a teacher, and
had no more authority over me than I over him, I declined to obey, but
sent word that if he wished to see me he could come where I was. I then
walked down to the brook in Carver’s field. He followed me, as soon
as he had received my message, and, charging me with impertinence,
challenged me to a fight. Well, we had a fight; but he attacked me
first.”

“I don’t know whether this account is correct or not,” said Socrates, a
little nonplused by this new version of the affair.

“I am ready to accept the decision of any one of the boys,” said Hector.

“Bates,” said Socrates, who knew that this boy was an adherent of his
nephew, “is this account of Roscoe’s true?”

Bates hesitated a moment. He was still afraid of Jim, but when he
thought of Hector’s prowess, he concluded that he had better tell the
truth.

“Yes, sir,” he answered.

Jim Smith darted an angry and menacing glance at his failing adherent.

“Ahem!” said Socrates, looking puzzled: “it is not quite so bad as I
supposed. I regret, however, that you have exhibited such a quarrelsome
disposition.”

“I don’t think I am quarrelsome, sir,” said Hector.

“Silence, sir! I have Mr. Allan Roscoe’s word for it.”

“It appears to me,” said Hector, undauntedly, “that your nephew is at
least as quarrelsome as I am. He forced the fight upon me.”

“Probably you will not be in a hurry to attack him again,” said
Socrates, under the impression that Hector had got the worst of it.

Some of the boys smiled, but Socrates did not see it.

“As you have probably received a lesson, I will not punish you as I had
anticipated. I will sentence you, however, to commit to memory the first
fifty lines of Virgil’s ‘AEneid.’ Mr. Crabb, will you see that Roscoe
performs his penance?”

“Yes, sir,” said Crabb, faintly.

“Is your nephew also to perform a penance?” asked Hector, undaunted.

“Silence, sir! What right have you to question me on this subject?”

“Because, sir, he is more to blame than I.”

“I don’t know that. I am not at all sure that your story is correct.”

Mr. Crabb, meek as he was, was indignant at this flagrant partiality.

“Mr. Smith,” he said, “I happen to know that Roscoe’s story is strictly
correct, and that your nephew made an unprovoked attack upon him.”

Hector looked grateful, and Jim Smith furious.

“Mr. Crabb,” said Socrates, angrily, “I did not ask your opinion. So far
as my nephew is concerned, I will deal with him privately. Boys, you may
begin your studies.”

All the boys understood that Jim was to be let off, and they thought it
a shame. But Mr. Crabb took care to make Hector’s penance as light as
possible.

And thus passed the first day at Smith Institute.




CHAPTER XV. THE USHER CONFIDES IN HECTOR.



Mr. Crabb acted rashly in siding with Hector, and speaking against Mr.
Smith’s nephew. Socrates showed his displeasure by a frigid demeanor,
and by seeking occasions for snubbing his assistant. On the other hand,
Hector felt grateful for his intercession, and an intimacy sprang up
between them.

A few days afterward, on a half holiday, Mr. Crabb said: “Roscoe, I am
going out for a walk. Do you care to accompany me?”

“I will do so with pleasure,” said Hector, sincerely.

“Mr. Crabb,” he said, after they were fairly on their way, “I am sorry
to see that Mr. Smith has not forgiven you for taking my part against
Jim.”

“I would do it again, Roscoe,” said the usher. “I could not sit silent
while so great an injustice was being done.”

“Do you think Jim was punished?”

“I am sure he was not. He is a boy after Mr. Smith’s own heart, that
is, he possesses the same mean and disagreeable qualities, perhaps in a
greater degree. Has he interfered with you since?”

“No,” answered Hector, smiling; “he probably found that I object to
being bullied.”

“You are fortunate in being strong enough to withstand his attacks.”

“Yes,” said Hector, quietly; “I am not afraid of him.”

“Bullies are generally cowards,” said the usher.

“I wonder, Mr. Crabb, you are willing to stay at Smith Institute, as
usher to such a man as Mr. Smith.”

“Ah, Roscoe!” said Mr. Crabb, sighing; “it is not of my own free will
that I stay. Poverty is a hard task-master. I must teach for a living.”

“But surely you could get a better position?”

“Perhaps so; but how could I live while I was seeking for it. My lad,”
 he said, after a pause, “I have a great mind to confide in you; I want
one friend to whom I can talk unreservedly.”

“Mr. Crabb,” said Hector, earnestly, “I shall feel flattered by your
confidence.”

“Thank you, Roscoe; or, rather, since we are going to be friends, let me
distinguish you from the other boys and call you Hector.”

“I wish you would, sir.”

“I need not tell you that I am poor,” continued Mr. Crabb; “you can read
it in my shabby clothes. I sometimes see the boys looking at my poor
suit, as if they wondered why I dressed so badly. Smith has more than
once cast insulting looks at my rusty coat. It is not penuriousness, as
some of the boys may think--it is poverty that prevents me from attiring
myself more becomingly.”

“Mr. Crabb, I sympathize with you,” said Hector.

“Thank you, Hector. Of that I am sure.”

“Mr. Smith ought to pay you enough to clothe yourself neatly. He makes
you work hard enough.”

“He pays me twenty dollars a month,” said the usher; “twenty dollars and
my board.”

“Is that all?” asked Hector, in amazement. “Why, the girl in the kitchen
earns nearly that.”

“To be sure,” answered the usher, bitterly; “but in Mr. Smith’s
estimation, I stand very little higher. He does not value education, not
possessing it himself. However, you may wonder why, even with this
sum, I cannot dress better. It is because I have another than myself to
support.”

“You are not married?” asked Hector, in surprise.

“No; but I have an invalid sister, who is wholly dependent upon me. To
her I devote three-quarters of my salary, and this leaves me very little
for myself. My poor sister is quite unable to earn anything for herself,
so it is a matter of necessity.”

“Yes, I understand,” said Hector, in a tone of sympathy.

“You now see why I do not dare to leave this position, poor as it is.
For myself, I might take the risk, but I should not feel justified in
exposing my sister to the hazard of possible want.”

“You are right, Mr. Crabb. I am very sorry now that you spoke up for me.
It has prejudiced Mr. Smith against you.”

“No, no; I won’t regret that. Indeed, he would hesitate to turn me
adrift, for he would not be sure of getting another teacher to take my
place for the same beggarly salary.”

“Something may turn up for you yet, Mr. Crabb,” said Hector, hopefully.

“Perhaps so,” answered the usher, but his tone was far from sanguine.

When they returned to the school, Hector carried out a plan which had
suggested itself to him in the interest of Mr. Crabb. He wrote to a boy
of his acquaintance, living in New York, who, he had heard, was in want
of a private tutor, and recommended Mr. Crabb, in strong terms, for that
position. He did this sincerely, for he had found the usher to be a good
teacher, and well versed in the studies preparatory to college. He did
not think it best to mention this to Mr. Crabb, for the answer might be
unfavorable, and then his hopes would have been raised only to be dashed
to the earth.

Later in the day, Hector fell in with Bates, already referred to as a
special friend of Jim Smith. The intimacy, however, had been diminished
since the contest in which Hector gained the victory. Bates was not
quite so subservient to the fallen champion, and Jim resented it.

“I saw you walking out with old Crabb,” said Bates.

“He isn’t particularly old,” said Hector.

“Oh, you know what I mean. Did you ever see such a scarecrow?”

“Do you refer to his dress?” asked Hector.

“Yes; he’ll soon be in rags. I shouldn’t wonder at all if that old suit
of his was worn by one of Noah’s sons in the ark.”

“You don’t suppose he wears it from choice, do you?”

“I don’t know. He’s stingy, I suppose--afraid to spend a cent.”

“You are mistaken. He has a sister to support, and his salary is very
small.”

“I can believe that. Old Sock is mean with his teachers. How much does
he pay Crabb?”

“It is very little, but I don’t know that I ought to tell.”

“I say, though, Roscoe, I wouldn’t go to walk with him again.”

“Why not?”

“The boys will say that, you are trying to get into his good graces, so
he’ll let you off easy in your lessons.”

“I don’t want him to let me off easy; I generally intend to be
prepared.”

“I know, but that’s what they will say.”

“Let them say what they please, and I will do what I please,” said
Hector, independently.

“Old Sock ain’t any too fond of Crabb since he took your part the other
day. Jim says the old man means to bounce him before long.”

“I suppose that means discharge him.”

“It means giving him his walking papers. Jim will see that he does it,
too.”

Hector did not reply, but he felt more than ever glad that he had
written a letter which might possibly bring the poor usher more
profitable and, at the same time, agreeable employment.

“Jim doesn’t like you, either,” added Bates.

“I never supposed he did. I can do without his favor.”

“He will get you into a scrape if he can.”

“I have no doubt whatever of his benevolent intentions toward me. I
shall not let it interfere with my happiness.”

Just then a sharp cry was heard, as of a boy in pain. It came from the
school yard, which the two boys were approaching on their return from a
walk.

“What’s that?” asked Hector, quickly.

“I expect it’s the new boy.”

One had arrived the day before.

“Is he hurt, I wonder?” asked Hector, quickening his steps.

“Jim’s got hold of him, probably,” said Bates; “he said this morning
he was going to give the little chap a lesson to break him into school
ways.”

“He did, did he?” said Hector, compressing his lips. “I shall have
something to say to that,” and he quickened his steps.




CHAPTER XVI. TOSSED IN A BLANKET.



The last new boy was a little fellow only eleven years old. His name was
Tommy Cooper, as he was called at home. It was his first absence from
the sheltering care of his mother, and he felt lonesome in the great,
dreary school building, where he was called “Cooper,” and “you little
chap.” He missed the atmosphere of home, and the tenderness of his
mother and sister. In fact, the poor boy was suffering from that most
distressing malady, homesickness.

Had Mrs. Socrates Smith been a kind, motherly woman, she might have done
much to reconcile the boy to his new home; but she was a tall, gaunt,
bony woman, more masculine than feminine, not unlike Miss Sally Brass,
whom all readers of Dickens will remember.

I am sorry to say that a homesick boy in a boarding school does not meet
with much sympathy. Even those boys who have once experienced the same
malady are half ashamed of it, and, if they remember it at all, remember
it as a mark of weakness. There was but one boy who made friendly
approaches to Tommy, and this was Hector Roscoe.

Hector had seen the little fellow sitting by himself with a sad face,
and he had gone up to him, and asked him in a pleasant tone some
questions about himself and his home.

“So you have never been away from home before, Tommy,” he said.

“No, sir,” answered the boy, timidly.

“Don’t call me sir. I am only a boy like you. Call me Hector.”

“That is a strange name. I never heard it before.”

“No, it is not a common name. I suppose you don’t like school very
much?”

“I never shall be happy here,” sighed Tommy.

“You think so now, but you will get used to it.”

“I don’t think I shall.”

“Oh, yes, you will. It will never seem like home, of course, but you
will get acquainted with some of the boys, and will join in their games,
and then time will pass more pleasantly.”

“I think the boys are very rough,” said the little boy.

“Yes, they are rough, but they don’t mean unkindly. Some of them were
homesick when they came here, just like you.”

“Were you homesick?” asked Tommy, looking up, with interest.

“I didn’t like the school very well; but I was much older than you when
I came here, and, besides, I didn’t leave behind me so pleasant a home.
I am not so rich as you, Tommy. I have no father nor mother,” and for
the moment Hector, too, looked sad.

The little fellow became more cheerful under the influence of Hector’s
kind and sympathetic words. Our hero, however, was catechised about his
sudden intimacy with the new scholar.

“I see you’ve got a new situation, Roscoe,” said Bates, when Hector was
walking away.

“What do you mean?”

“You’ve secured the position of nurse to that little cry baby.”

“You mean Tommy Cooper?”

“Yes, if that’s his name.”

“I was cheering up the little fellow a bit. He’s made rather a bad
exchange in leaving a happy home for Smith Institute.”

“That’s so. This is a dreary hole, but there’s no need of crying about
it.”

“You might if you were as young as Tommy, and had just come.”

“Shall you take him under your wing?”

“Yes, if he needs it.”

We now come to the few minutes preceding the return of Hector from his
walk, as indicated in the last chapter.

Tommy Cooper was sitting in the school yard, with a disconsolate look,
when Jim Smith, who was never happier than when he was bullying other
boys, espied him.

“What’s the matter with you, young one?” he said, roughly, “Is your
grandmother dead?”

“No,” answered Tommy, briefly.

“Come here and play.”

“I would rather not.”

“I am not going to have you sulking round here. Do you hear me?”

“Are you one of the teachers?” asked Tommy, innocently.

“You’ll find out who I am,” answered Jim, roughly. “Here, Palmer, do you
want a little fun with this young one?”

Palmer and Bates were Jim Smith’s most devoted adherents.

“What are you going to do, Jim?” questioned Palmer.

“I’m going to stir him up a little,” said Jim, with a malicious smile.
“Go and get a blanket.”

“All right!” said Palmer.

“We’ll toss him in a blanket. He won’t look so sulky after we get
through with him.”

There were two or three other boys standing by, who heard these words.

“It’s a shame!” said one, in a low voice. “See the poor little chap, how
sad he looks! I felt just as he does when I first came to school.”

“Jim ought not to do it,” said the second. “It’s a mean thing to do.”

“Tell him so.”

“No, thank you. He’d treat me the same way.”

The two speakers were among the smaller boys, neither being over
fourteen, and though they sympathized with Tommy, their sympathy was not
likely to do him any good.

Out came Palmer with the blanket.

“Are there any teachers about?” asked Jim.

“No.”

“That’s good. We shan’t be interfered with. Here, young one, come here.”

“What for?” asked Tommy, looking frightened.

“Come here, and you’ll find out.”

But Tommy had already guessed. He had read a story of English school
life, in which a boy had been tossed in a blanket, and he was not slow
in comprehending the situation.

“Oh, don’t toss me in a blanket!” said the poor boy, clasping his hands.

“Sorry to disturb you, but it’s got to be done, young one,” said Jim.
“Here, jump in. It’ll do you good.”

“Oh, don’t!” sobbed the poor boy. “It’ll hurt me.”

“No, it won’t! Don’t be a cry baby. We’ll make a man of you.”

But Tommy was not persuaded. He jumped up, and tried to make his escape.
But, of course, there was no chance for him. Jim Smith overtook him in a
couple of strides, and seizing him roughly by the collar, dragged him
to the blanket, which by this time Palmer and one of the other boys, who
had been impressed into the service reluctantly, were holding.

Jim Smith, taking up Tommy bodily, threw him into the blanket, and then
seizing one end, gave it a violent toss. Up went the boy into the air,
and tumbling back again into the blanket was raised again.

“Raise him, boys!” shouted Jim. “Give him a hoist!”

Then it was that Tommy screamed, and Hector heard his cry for help.

He came rushing round the corner of the building, and comprehended, at a
glance, what was going on.

Naturally his hot indignation was much stirred.

“For shame, you brutes!” he cried. “Stop that!”

If there was anyone whom Jim Smith did not want to see at this moment,
it was Hector Roscoe. He would much rather have seen one of the ushers.
He saw that he was in a scrape, but his pride would not allow him to
back out.

“Keep on, boys!” he cried. “It’s none of Roscoe’s business. He’d better
clear out, or we’ll toss him.”

As he spoke he gave another toss.

“Save me, Hector!” cried Tommy, espying his friend’s arrival with joy.

Hector was not the boy to let such an appeal go unheeded. He sprang
forward, dealt Jim Smith a powerful blow, that made him stagger, and let
go the blanket, and then helped Tommy to his feet.

“Run into the house. Tommy!” he said. “There may be some rough work
here.”

He faced round just in time to fend off partially a blow from the angry
bully.

“Take that for your impudence!” shouted Jim Smith. “I’ll teach you to
meddle with, me.”

But Jim reckoned without his host. The blow was returned with interest,
and, in the heat of his indignation, Hector followed it up with such
a volley that the bully retreated in discomfiture, and was glad to
withdraw from the contest.

“I’ll pay you for this, you scoundrel!” he said, venomously.

“Whenever you please, you big brute!” returned Hector, contemptuously.
“It is just like you to tease small boys. If you annoy Tommy Cooper
again, you’ll hear from me.”

“I’d like to choke that fellow!” muttered Jim. “Either he or I will have
to leave this school.”




CHAPTER XVII. JIM SMITH’S REVENGE.



It would be natural to suppose that Jim Smith, relying upon his
influence with his uncle, would have reported this last “outrage,” as he
chose to consider it, to the principal, thus securing the punishment of
Hector. But he was crafty, and considered that no punishment Hector was
likely to receive would satisfy him. Corporal punishment for taking the
part of an ill-used boy, Hector was probably too spirited to submit to,
and, under these circumstances, it would hardly have been inflicted.
Besides, Jim was aware that the offense for which Hector had attacked
him was not likely, if made known, to secure sympathy. Even his uncle
would be against him, for he was fond of money, and had no wish to lose
the new pupil, whose friends were well able to pay for him.

No! He decided that what he wanted was to bring Hector into disgrace.
The method did not immediately occur to him, but after a while he saw
his way clear.

His uncle’s bedchamber was on the second floor, and Jim’s directly over
it on the third story. Some of the other boys, including Hector, had
rooms also on the third floor.

Jim was going upstairs one day when, through the door of his uncle’s
chamber, which chanced to be open, he saw a wallet lying on the bureau.
On the impulse of the moment, he walked in on tiptoes, secured the
wallet, and slipped it hurriedly into his pocket. Then he made all haste
upstairs, and bolted himself into his own room. Two other boys slept
there, but both were downstairs in the playground.

Jim took the wallet from his pocket and eagerly scanned the contents.
There were eight five-dollar bills and ten dollars in small bills,
besides a few papers, which may be accurately described as of no value
to anyone but the owner.

The boy’s face assumed a covetous look. He, as well as his uncle, was
fond of money--a taste which, unfortunately, as he regarded it, he was
unable to gratify. His family was poor, and he was received at half
price by Socrates Smith on the score of relationship, but his allowance
of pocket money was less than that of many of the small boys. He made
up the deficiency, in part, by compelling them to contribute to his
pleasures. If any boy purchased candy, or any other delicacy, Jim, if he
learned the fact, required him to give him a portion, just as the feudal
lords exacted tribute from their serfs and dependents. Still, this was
not wholly satisfactory, and Jim longed, instead, for a supply of money
to spend as he chose.

So the thought came to him, as he scanned the contents of the wallet:
“Why shouldn’t I take out one or two of these bills before disposing of
it? No one will lay it to me.”

The temptation proved too strong for Jim’s power of resistance. He
selected a five-dollar bill and five dollars in small bills, and
reluctantly replaced the rest of the money in the wallet.

“So far, so good!” he thought. “That’s a good idea.”

Then, unlocking the door, he passed along the entry till he came to the
room occupied by Hector. As he or one of the two boys who roomed with
him might be in the room, he looked first through the keyhole.

“The coast is clear!” he said to himself, in a tone of satisfaction.

Still, he opened the door cautiously, and stepped with catlike tread
into the room. Then he looked about the room. Hanging on nails were
several garments belonging to the inmates of the room. Jim selected a
pair of pants which he knew belonged to Hector, and hurrying forward,
thrust the wallet into one of the side pockets. Then, with a look of
satisfaction, he left the room, shutting the door carefully behind him.

“There,” he said to himself, with exultation. “That’ll fix him! Perhaps
he’ll wish he hadn’t put on quite so many airs.”

He was rather annoyed, as he walked along the corridor, back to his
own room, to encounter Wilkins. He had artfully chosen a time when he
thought all the boys would be out, and he heartily wished that some
untoward chance had not brought Wilkins in.

“Where are you going, Jim?” asked Wilkins.

“I went to Bates’ room, thinking he might be in, but he wasn’t.”

“Do you want him? I left him out on the playground.”

“Oh, it’s no matter! It’ll keep!” said Jim, indifferently.

“I got out of that pretty well!” he reflected complacently.

Perhaps Jim Smith would not have felt quite so complacent, if he had
known that at the time he entered Hector’s room it was occupied, though
he could not see the occupant. It so chanced that Ben Platt, one of
Hector’s roommates, was in the closet, concealed from the view of anyone
entering the room, yet so placed that he could see through the partially
open door what wras passing in the room.

When he saw Jim Smith enter he was surprised, for he knew that that
young man was not on visiting terms with the boy who had discomfited and
humiliated him.

“What on earth can Jim want?” he asked himself.

He did not have long to wait for an answer though not a real one; but
actions, as men have often heard, speak louder than words.

When he saw Jim steal up to Hector’s pants, and producing a wallet,
hastily thrust it into one of the pockets, he could hardly believe the
testimony of his eyes.

“Well!” he ejaculated, inwardly, “I would not have believed it if I
hadn’t seen it. I knew Jim was a bully and a tyrant, but I didn’t think
he was as contemptible as all that.”

The wallet he recognized at once, for he had more than once seen
Socrates take it out of his pocket.

“It’s old Sock’s wallet!” he said to himself. “It’s clear that Jim has
taken it, and means to have it found in Roscoe’s possession. That’s as
mean a trick as I ever heard of.”

Just then Wilkins entered the room. Wilkins and Ben Platt were Hector’s
two roommates.

“Hello, Wilkins! I’m glad you’ve come just as you have.”

“What for, Platt? Do you want to borrow some money?”

“No; there is more money in this room now than there has been for a long
time.”

“What do you mean? The governor hasn’t sent you a remittance, has he?”

“No.”

“Expound your meaning, then, most learned and mysterious chum.”

“I will. Within five minutes Jim Smith has been here and left a wallet
of money.”

“Jim been here? I met him in the corridor.”

“I warrant he didn’t say he had been here.”

“No; he said he had been to Bates’ room, but didn’t find him there.”

“That’s all gammon! Wilkins, what will you say when I tell you that old
Sock’s wallet is in this very room!”

“I won’t believe it!”

“Look here, then!”

As he spoke, Ben went to Hector’s pants and drew out the wallet.

Wilkins started in surprise and dismay.

“How did Roscoe come by that?” he asked; “surely he didn’t take it?”

“Of course he didn’t. You might know Roscoe better. Didn’t you hear me
say just now that Jim brought it here?”

“And put it in Roscoe’s pocket?”

“Yes.”

“In your presence?”

“Yes; only he didn’t know that I was present,” said Platt.

“Where were you?”

“In the closet. The door was partly open, and I saw everything.”

“What does it all mean?”

“Can’t you see? It’s Jim’s way of coming up with Roscoe. You know he
threatened that he’d fix him.”

“All I can say is, that it’s a very mean way,” said Wilkins in disgust.

He was not a model boy--far from it, indeed!--but he had a sentiment of
honor that made him dislike and denounce a conspiracy like this.

“It’s a dirty trick,” he said, warmly.

“I agree with you on that point.” “What shall we do about it?”

“Lay low, and wait till the whole thing comes out. When Sock discovers
his loss, Jim will be on hand to tell him where his wallet is. Then we
can up and tell all we know.”

“Good! There’s a jolly row coming!” said Wilkins, smacking his lips.




CHAPTER XVIII. THE MISSING WALLET IS FOUND.



Socrates Smith was, ordinarily, so careful of his money, that it was a
very remarkable inadvertence to leave it on the bureau. Nor was it long
before he ascertained his loss. He was sitting at his desk when his
wife looked in at the door, and called for a small sum for some domestic
expenditure.

With an ill grace--for Socrates hated to part with his money--he put his
hand into the pocket where he usually kept his wallet.

“Really, Mrs. Smith,” he was saying, “it seems to me you are always
wanting money--why, bless my soul!” and such an expression of
consternation and dismay swept over his face, that his wife hurriedly
inquired:

“What is the matter, Mr. Smith?”

“Matter enough!” he gasped. “My wallet is gone!”

“Gone!” echoed his wife, in alarm. “Where can you have left it?”

Mr. Smith pressed his hand to his head in painful reflection.

“How much money was there in it, Socrates?” asked his wife.

“Between forty and fifty dollars!” groaned Mr. Smith. “If I don’t find
it, Sophronia, I am a ruined man!”

This was, of course, an exaggeration, but it showed the poignancy of the
loser’s regret.

“Can’t you think where you left it?”

Suddenly Mr. Smith’s face lighted up.

“I remember where I left it, now,” he said; “I was up in the chamber an
hour since, and, while changing my coat, took out my wallet, and laid it
on the bureau. I’ll go right up and look for it.”

“Do, Socrates.”

Mr. Smith bounded up the staircase with the agility of a man of half
his years, and hopefully opened the door of his chamber, which Jim had
carefully closed after him. His first glance was directed at the bureau,
but despair again settled down sadly upon his heart when he saw that it
was bare. There was no trace of the missing wallet.

“It may have fallen on the carpet,” said Socrates, hope reviving
faintly.

There was not a square inch of the cheap Kidderminster carpet that he
did not scan earnestly, greedily, but, alas! the wallet, if it had ever
been there, had mysteriously taken to itself locomotive powers, and
wandered away into the realm of the unknown and the inaccessible.

Yet, searching in the chambers of his memory, Mr. Smith felt sure that
he had left the wallet on the bureau. He could recall the exact moment
when he laid it down, and he recollected that he had not taken it again.

“Some one has taken it!” he decided; and wrath arose in his heart, He
snapped his teeth together in stern anger, as he determined that
he would ferret out the miserable thief, and subject him to condign
punishment.

Mrs. Smith, tired of waiting for the appearance of her husband, ascended
the stairs and entered his presence.

“Well?” she said.

“I haven’t found it,” answered Socrates, tragically. “Mrs. Smith, the
wallet has been stolen!”

“Are you sure that you left it here?” asked his wife.

“Sure!” he repeated, in a hollow tone. “I am as sure as that the sun
rose to-morrow--I mean yesterday.”

“Was the door open?”

“No; but that signifies nothing. It wasn’t locked, and anyone could
enter.”

“Is it possible that we have a thief in the institute?” said Mrs. Smith,
nervously. “Socrates, I shan’t sleep nights. Think of the spoons!”

“They’re only plated.”

“And my earrings.”

“You could live without earrings. Think, rather, of the wallet, with
nearly fifty dollars in bills.”

“Who do you think took it, Socrates?”

“I have no idea; but I will find out. Yes, I will find out. Come
downstairs, Mrs. Smith; we will institute inquiries.”

When Mr. Smith had descended to the lower floor, and was about entering
the office, it chanced that his nephew was just entering the house.

“What’s the matter, Uncle Socrates?” he asked; “you look troubled.”

“And a good reason why, James; I have met with a loss.”

“You don’t say so!” exclaimed Jim, in innocent wonder; “what is it?”

“A wallet, with a large amount of money in it!”

“Perhaps there is a hole in your pocket,” suggested Jim.

“A hole--large enough for my big wallet to fall through! Don’t be such a
fool!”

“Excuse me, uncle,” said Jim, meekly; “of course that is impossible.
When do you remember having it last?”

Of course Socrates told the story, now familiar to us, and already
familiar to his nephew, though he did not suspect that.

Jim struck his forehead, as if a sudden thought had occurred to him.

“Could it be?” he said, slowly, as if to himself; “no, I can’t believe
it.”

“Can’t believe what?” demanded Socrates, impatiently; “if you have any
clew, out with it!”

“I hardly like to tell, Uncle Socrates, for it implicates one of the
boys.”

“Which?” asked Mr. Smith, eagerly.

“I will tell you, though I don’t like to. Half an hour since, I was
coming upstairs, when I heard a door close, as I thought, and, directly
afterward, saw Hector Roscoe hurrying up the stairs to the third floor.
I was going up there myself, and followed him. Five minutes later
he came out of his room, looking nervous and excited. I didn’t think
anything of it at the time, but I now think that he entered your room,
took the wallet, and then carried it up to his own chamber and secreted
it.”

“Hector Roscoe!” repeated Mr. Smith, in amazement. “I wouldn’t have
supposed that he was a thief.”

“Nor I; and perhaps he isn’t. It might be well, however, to search his
room.”

“I will!” answered Socrates, with eagerness, “Come up, James, and you,
Mrs. Smith, come up, too!”

The trio went upstairs, and entered poor Hector’s room. It was not
unoccupied, for Ben Platt and Wilkins were there. They anticipated a
visit, and awaited it with curious interest. They rose to their feet
when the distinguished visitors arrived.

“Business of importance brings us here,” said Socrates. “Platt and
Wilkins, you may leave the room.”

The boys exchanged glances, and obeyed.

“Wilkins,” said Ben, when they were in the corridor, “it is just as I
thought. Jim has set a trap for Roscoe.”

“He may get caught himself,” said Wilkins. “I ain’t oversqueamish, but
that is too confounded mean! Of course you’ll tell all you know?”

“Yes; and I fancy it will rather surprise Mr. Jim. I wish they had let
us stay in there.”

Meanwhile, Jim skillfully directed the search.

“He may have put it under the mattress,” suggested Jim.

Socrates darted to the bed, and lifted up the mattress, but no wallet
revealed itself to his searching eyes.

“No; it is not here!” he said, in a tone of disappointment; “the boy may
have it about him. I will send for him.”

“Wait a moment, Uncle Socrates,” said Jim; “there is a pair of pants
which I recognize as his.”

Mr. Smith immediately thrust his hand into one of the pockets and drew
out the wallet!

“Here it is!” he exclaimed, joyfully. “Here it is!”

“Then Roscoe is a thief! I wouldn’t have thought it!” said Jim.

“Nor I. I thought the boy was of too good family to stoop to such a
thing. But now I remember, Mr. Allan Roscoe told me he was only adopted
by his brother. He is, perhaps, the son of a criminal.”

“Very likely!” answered Jim, who was glad to believe anything derogatory
to Hector.

“What are you going to do about it, uncle?”

“I shall bring the matter before the school. I will disgrace the boy
publicly,” answered Socrates Smith, sternly. “He deserves the exposure.”

“Aha, Master Roscoe!” said Jim, gleefully, to himself; “I rather think I
shall get even with you, and that very soon.”




CHAPTER XIX. A DRAMATIC SCENE.



It was generally after vespers that Mr. Smith communicated to the school
anything which he desired to call to their attention. This was to be the
occasion of bringing our hero into disgrace.

The boys assembled, most of them quite ignorant that anything
exceptional was to occur. Hector himself, the person chiefly interested,
was entirely unconscious that he was to be made “a shining mark” for
the arrows of suspicion and obloquy. If he had noticed the peculiar and
triumphantly malicious looks with which Jim Smith, the bully and tyrant,
whom he had humiliated and deposed, regarded him, he might have been led
to infer that some misfortune was in store for him. But these looks he
did not chance to notice.

There were two other boys, however, who did notice them. These were Ben
Platt and Wil-kins, who had very good reasons, as we know, for doing so.

“I believe old Sock is going to pitch into Roscoe at vespers,” said Ben,
in a whisper, to his roommate.

“So do I. There’s a look about him like that of a tiger about to pounce
on his prey.”

“Or a cat with murderous designs on a mouse.”

“We must expose the whole thing.”

“Of course.”

“Won’t Jim be mad?”

“Let him! He won’t dare to thrash us while Roscoe is round.”

There was, indeed, about Socrates Smith an air of mystery, portentous
and suggestive. He looked like one meditating a coup d’etat, or,
perhaps, it might better be said, a coup de main, as the hand is with
schoolmasters, generally, the instrument of attack.

When the proper time arrived, Mr. Smith cleared his throat, as he always
did before beginning to speak.

“Boys,” he said, “I have an important, and I may say, a painful,
communication to make to you.”

All the boys looked at each other in curiosity, except the three who
were already in the secret.

“You know, boys,” continued Socrates, “how proud I am of this institute,
how zealous I am for its good reputation, how unwearied I am in my
efforts for your progress and welfare.”

Mr. Smith’s unwearied efforts were largely in the line of making out and
receipting bills for tuition, and it may be said that this was to him by
far the most agreeable of the duties he undertook to perform.

“I have been proud of my pupils,” continued the principal, “and it has
given me pleasure to reflect that you all reflected credit, more or
less, upon my teaching. I have, also, sought to form your manners, to
train you to fill the positions which Providence may have in store for
you. In a word, while from time to time you may have indulged in little
escapades, slightly-culpable, I have felt that you were all gentlemen.”

“What in the world does he mean?” thought more than one puzzled boy.
“What is all this leading to?”

Among those to whom this thought occurred, was Hector Roscoe, who was
very far from conjecturing that all this long preamble was to introduce
an attack upon him.

“But,” proceeded Socrates, after a pause, “I have this afternoon been
painfully undeceived. I have learned, with inexpressible pain, that
Smith Institute has received an ineffaceable stigma.”

“Old Sock is getting eloquent!” whispered Ben Platt.

“I have learned,” continued Socrates, with tragic intensity, “that I
have nourished a viper in my bosom! I have learned that we have a thief
among us!”

This declaration was greeted with a buzz of astonishment. Each boy
looked at his next door neighbor as if to inquire, “Is it you?”

Each one, except the three who were behind the scenes. Of these, Jim
Smith, with an air of supreme satisfaction, looked in a sidelong way at
Hector, unconscious the while that two pairs of eyes--those of Wilkins
and Ben Platt--were fixed upon him.

“I thought you would be surprised,” said the principal, “except, of
course, the miserable criminal. But I will not keep you in suspense.
To-day, by inadvertence, I left my wallet, containing a considerable
sum of money, on the bureau in my chamber. An hour later, discovering
my loss, I went upstairs, but the wallet was gone. It had mysteriously
disappeared. I was at a loss to understand this at first, but I soon
found a clew. I ascertained that a boy--a boy who is presently one of
the pupils of Smith Institute--had entered my chamber, had appropriated
the wallet, had carried it to his dormitory, and there had slyly
concealed it in the pocket of a pair of pants. Doubtless, he thought his
theft would not be discovered, but it was, and I myself discovered the
missing wallet in its place of concealment.”

Here Mr. Smith paused, and it is needless to say that the schoolroom
was a scene of great excitement. His tone was so impressive, and
his statement so detailed, that no one could doubt that he had most
convincing evidence of the absolute accuracy of what he said.

“Who was it?” every boy had it on his lips to inquire.

“Three hours have elapsed since my discovery,” continued Mr. Smith.
“During that time I have felt unnerved. I have, however, written and
posted an account of this terrible discovery to the friends of the pupil
who has so disgraced himself and the school.”

Ben Platt and Wilkins exchanged glances of indignation. They felt that
Mr. Smith had been guilty of a piece of outrageous injustice in acting
thus before he had apprised the supposed offender of the charge against
him, and heard his defense. Both boys decided that they would not spare
Jim Smith, but at all hazards expose the contemptible plot which he had
contrived against his schoolfellow.

“I waited, however, till I was somewhat more calm before laying the
matter before you. I know you will all be anxious to know the name of
the boy who has brought disgrace upon the school to which you belong,
and I am prepared to reveal it to you. Hector Roscoe, stand up!”

If a flash of lightning had struck him where he sat, Hector could not
have been more astonished. For a moment he was struck dumb, and did not
move.

“Stand up, Hector Roscoe!” repeated the principal. “No wonder you sit
there as if paralyzed. You did not expect that so soon your sin would
find you out.”

Then Hector recovered completely his self-possession. He sprang to his
feet, and not only that, but he strode forward, blazing with passion,
till he stood before Mr. Smith’s desk and confronted him.

“Mr. Smith!” he said, in a ringing tone, “do I understand you to charge
me with stealing a wallet of yours containing money?”

“I do so charge you, and I have complete evidence of the truth of my
charge. What have you to say?”

“What have I to say?” repeated Hector, looking around him proudly and
scornfully. “I have to say that it is an infamous lie!”

“Hold, sir!” exclaimed Socrates, angrily. “Shameless boy, do you intend
to brazen it out? Did I not tell you that I had complete proof of the
truth of the charge?”

“I don’t care what fancied proof you have. I denounce the charge as a
lie.”

“That won’t do, sir! I myself took the wallet from the pocket of your
pantaloons, hanging in the chamber. Mrs. Smith was with me and witnessed
my discovery, and there was another present, one of the pupils of this
institute, who also can testify to the fact. It is useless for you to
deny it!”

“You found the wallet in the pocket of my pantaloons?” asked Hector,
slowly.

“Yes. There can be no doubt about that.”

“Who put it there?” demanded Hector, quickly.

Socrates Smith was staggered, for he had not expected this query from
the accused.

“Who put it there?” he repeated.

“Yes, sir,” continued Hector, firmly. “If the matter is as you state it,
some one has been mean enough to put the wallet into my pocket in order
to implicate me in a theft.”

“Of course you put it there yourself, Roscoe. Your defense is very
lame.”

Hector turned round to his fellow-scholars.

“Boys,” he said, “you have heard the charge that has been made against
me. You know me pretty well by this time. Is there any one of you that
believes it to be true?”

“No! No!” shouted the boys, with one exception. Jim Smith was heard to
say distinctly, “I believe it!”

“Silence in the school!” shouted Socrates. “This is altogether
irregular, and I won’t have it.”

Hector turned to the principal, and said, calmly:

“You see, Mr. Smith, that, in spite of your proof, these boys will not
believe that your charge is well founded.”

“That is neither here nor there, Roscoe. Will anyone step up and prove
your innocence?”

There was another sensation. In the second row back a boy was seen to
rise.

“Mr. Smith,” said Ben Platt, “I can prove Roscoe’s innocence!”




CHAPTER XX. HECTOR GAINS A VICTORY.



There were two persons on whom Ben Platt’s declaration made a profound
impression. These were Jim Smith and his uncle, the learned Socrates.
The latter was surprised, for he was fully persuaded that the charge
he had made was a true one, and Hector was a thief. As for Jim, his
surprise was of a very disagreeable nature. Knowing as he did that, he
himself had taken the money, he was alarmed lest his offense was to
be made known, and that the pit which he had digged for another should
prove to be provided for himself.

Socrates was the first to speak after taking time to recover himself
from his surprise.

“This is a very extraordinary statement, Platt,” he said. “You say you
can prove Roscoe’s innocence?”

“Yes, sir,” answered Platt, firmly.

“I wish no trifling here, sir,” said the principal, sharply. “I myself
found the wallet in Roscoe’s pocket.”

“Yes, sir,” answered Ben Platt, “I know it was there.”

“You knew it was there!” repeated Socrates. “How did you know it was
there?”

“Because I saw it put in.”

Here Jim Smith’s face turned from red to pale, and he moved about
uneasily in his seat. “Could Ben Platt have been hidden somewhere in the
room?” he asked himself, “If so, what was he to do?” There was but one
answer to this question. He must brazen it out, and boldly contradict
the witness. But he would bide his time. He would wait to hear what Ben
had to say.

“Did you put it in yourself?” asked Socrates, savagely.

“No, Mr. Smith, I didn’t put it in,” answered Ben, indignantly.

“None of your impudence, sir!” said the schoolmaster, irritated.

“I merely answered your question and defended myself,” answered Ben.

There was a little murmur among the pupils, showing that their sympathy
was with the boy who had been so causelessly accused by the principal.

“Silence!” exclaimed Socrates, annoyed. “Now,” he continued, turning
to Ben, “since you know who put the wallet into Roscoe’s pocket--a very
remarkable statement, by the way--will you deign to inform me who did
it?”

“James Smith did it!” said Ben, looking over to the principal’s nephew,
who was half expecting such an attack.

“It’s a base lie!” cried Jim, but his face was blanched, his manner was
nervous and confused, and he looked guilty, if he were not so.

“My nephew?” asked Socrates, flurried.

“Yes, sir.”

“It isn’t so, Uncle Socrates,” said Jim, excited. “I’ll lick you, Ben
Platt, when we get out of school.”

“You forget yourself, James,” said Socrates, with a mildness he would
not have employed with any other pupil.

“I beg your pardon, Uncle Socrates,” said Jim, with contrition, “but I
can’t be silent when I am accused of things I don’t do.”

“To be sure, you have some excuse, but you should remember the respect
you owe to me. Then you did not do it?”

“Certainly not, sir.”

“So it appears, Platt, that you have brought a false charge against
your fellow-pupil,” said Mr. Smith, severely. “I can conceive of nothing
meaner.”

“Mr. Smith,” said Hector, “what right have you to say that the charge is
false? Is it the denial of your nephew? If he took the wallet he would,
of course, deny it.”

“So would you!” retorted Socrates.

“No one saw me conceal it,” said Hector, significantly.

Then Wilkins rose.

“Mr. Smith,” he said, “I have some evidence to offer.”

“Out with it, sir,” said the principal, angrily, for he was fighting
against an inward conviction that his nephew was really the guilty
party.

“I was walking along the corridor about the time Platt speaks of Smith’s
visit to Roscoe’s room, and I met your nephew walking in the opposite
direction. When I entered the room, Platt told me that, half-concealed
by the closet door, he had seen Jim Smith enter and thrust the wallet
into Roscoe’s pocket. Soon after, you and Mrs. Smith came into the
room, guided by your nephew, who let you know just where the wallet was
hidden. He had very good reasons for knowing,” added Wilkins.

If a look would have annihilated Wilkins, the look directed towards him
by Jim Smith would have had that effect.

“It’s a conspiracy against me, Uncle Socrates,” said Jim, intent upon
brazening it out. “They’re all in league together.”

“The testimony of Wilkins doesn’t amount to much!” said Mr. Smith. “He
may have seen James in the corridor, but that is by no means a part of
his complicity in this affair.”

“Just so!” said Jim, eagerly.

“Ben Platt’s evidence ought to count for something,” said Hector. “He
saw your nephew putting the wallet into the pocket of my pants.”

Socrates was clearly perplexed. In spite of his partiality for his
nephew, the case against him certainly looked very strong.

Hector, however, determined to make his defense even stronger.

“I would like to ask Platt,” he said, “at what time this took place?”

“At three o’clock.”

“How do you know it was three?” asked the principal, sharply.

“Because I heard the clock on the village church strike three.”

“I would like to ask another boy--Frank Lewis--if he heard the clock
strike three?”

Lewis answered in the affirmative.

“Where were you at the time?”

“In the playground.”

“What were you doing?”

“Playing ball.”

“Was I in the game?”

“Yes.”

“How long had the game been going on?”

“Half an hour.”

“How long had the game been going on, do you know?”

“From half to three-quarters of an hour.”

“Can you remember whether I was with you all the time?”

“You were.”

“Now, Platt, will you tell me how long after the wallet was put into my
pocket before Mr. Smith appeared in search of it?”

“Not over half an hour.”

“I submit, then,” said Hector, in a matter-of-fact manner, “that I was
absent in the playground during the entire time when it was found in
my room. I believe this is what lawyers call an alibi that I have,
fortunately, been able to prove.”

“You are a very smart lawyer!” sneered the principal.

The boys were by this time so incensed at Mr. Smith’s evident effort to
clear his nephew at the expense of Roscoe, that there was a very audible
hiss, in which at least half a dozen joined.

“Is this rebellion?” asked Socrates, furiously.

“No, sir,” said Ben Platt, firmly. “We want justice done; that is all.”

“You shall have justice--all of you!” exclaimed Socrates, carried beyond
the limits of prudence.

“I am glad to hear that, sir,” said Hector. “If you do not at once
exonerate me from this charge, which you know to be false, and write to
my guardian retracting it, I will bring the matter before the nearest
magistrate.”

This was more than Socrates had bargained for. He saw that he had gone
too far, and was likely to wreck his prospects and those of the school.

“I will look into the matter,” he said, hurriedly, “and report to the
school hereafter. You may now apply yourselves to your studies.”




CHAPTER XXI. THE USHER IS DISCHARGED.



Among the boys of Smith Institute there was but one opinion on the
subject of the principal’s wallet. All acquitted Roscoe of having any
part in the theft, and they were equally unanimous in the belief that
Jim Smith had contrived a mean plot against the boy whom he could not
conquer by fair means. There was a little informal consultation as
to how Jim should be treated. It was finally decided to “send him to
Coventry.”

As this phrase, which is well understood in English schools, may not be
so clear to my readers, I will explain that Jim was to be refused notice
by his schoolfellows, unless he should become aggressive, when he was to
be noticed in a manner far from agreeable.

Jim could not help observing the cold looks of the boys, who but lately
were glad enough to receive notice from him, and he became very angry.
As to being ashamed of the exposure, he was not sensitive, nor did
he often have any feeling of that kind. Naturally vindictive, he
felt especially angry with the two boys, Ben Platt and Wilkins, whose
testimony had proved so uncomfortable for him.

“I’ll thrash those boys if I never thrash another,” he said to himself.
“So they have turned against me, have they? They’re only fit to black my
boots anyway. I’ll give ‘em a lesson.”

Platt and Wilkins were expecting an attack. They knew that Jim would
seize the opportunity of attacking them singly, and in the absence of
Hector, of whom he was afraid, and with good reason. They concerted
measures, accordingly, for defeating the common enemy.

Jim was stalking about the next day, looking sullen and feeling ugly.
He could not help observing that whenever he approached a group of boys
they immediately scattered and walked away in various directions. This
naturally chafed him, for, having no intellectual resources, he found
solitude oppressive. Besides, he had been accustomed to the role of
boss, and where is a boss without followers?

Tired of the schoolroom precincts, Jim went to walk. In a rustic lane,
much to his delight, he saw approaching him one of the boys who had so
seriously offended him.

It was Ben Platt.

Ben was sauntering along in idle mood when he came face to face with the
dethroned boss.

“So it’s you, Platt, is it?” said Jim, grimly.

“I believe it is,” answered Ben, coolly.

“I’ve got a word or two to say to you,” said Jim, significantly.

“Say them quick,” said Ben, “for I’m in a hurry.”

“I’m not,” said Jim, in his old tone, “and it makes no difference
whether you are or not.”

“Indeed! you are as polite as usual,” returned Ben.

“Look here, you young whelp!” Jim broke forth, unable any longer to
restrain his wrath, “what, did you mean by lying about me last evening?”

“I didn’t lie about you,” said Ben, boldly.

“Yes, you did. What made you say you saw me put that wallet into
Roscoe’s pocket?”

“I can’t think of any reason, unless because it was true,” said Ben.

“Even if it were, how dared you turn against me? First you play the spy,
and then informer. Paugh!”

“I see you admit it,” said Ben. “Well, if you want an answer I will give
you one. You laid a plot for Hector Roscoe--one of the meanest, dirtiest
plots I ever heard of, and I wasn’t going to see you lie him into a
scrape while I could prevent it.”

“That’s enough, Platt!” exclaimed Jim, furiously. “Now, do you know what
I am going to do?”

“I don’t feel particularly interested in the matter.”

“You will be, then. I am going to thrash you.”

“You wouldn’t if Hector Roscoe were here,” said Ben, not appearing to be
much frightened.

“Well, he isn’t here, though if he were it wouldn’t make any difference.
I’ll whip you so you can’t stand.”

Ben’s reply was to call “Wilkins!”

From a clump of bushes, where he had lurked, unobserved hitherto, sprang
Wilkins, and joined his friend.

“There are two of us, Smith!” said Ben Platt.

“I can thrash you both,” answered Jim, whose blood was up.

Before the advent of Hector no two boys would have ventured to engage
Jim in combat, but his defeat by a boy considerably smaller had lost him
his prestige, and the boys had become more independent. He still fancied
himself a match for both, however, and the conflict began. But both of
his antagonists were in earnest, and Jim had a hard time.

Now, it so happened that Mr. Crabb, the usher, was taking a solitary
walk, and had approached the scene of conflict unobserved by any of the
participants. He arrived at an opportune time. Jim had managed to draw
Wilkins away, and by a quick movement threw him. He was about to deal
his prostrate foe a savage kick, which might have hurt him seriously,
when the usher, quiet and peaceful as he was by nature, could restrain
himself no longer. He rushed up, seized him by the collar, dragged him
back and shook him with a strength he did not suppose he possessed,
saying:

“Leave that boy alone, you brute!”

Jim turned quickly, and was very much surprised when he saw the meek
usher, whom he had always despised, because he looked upon him as a Miss
Nancy.

“So it’s you, is it?” he said, with a wicked glance.

“Yes, it is I,” answered the usher, manfully; “come up just in time to
stop your brutality.”

“Is it any of your business?” demanded Jim, looking as if he would like
to thrash the usher.

“I have made it my business. Platt and Wilkins, I advise you to join
me, and leave this fellow, who has so disgraced himself as to be beneath
your notice.”

“We will accompany you with pleasure, sir,” said the boys.

They regarded the usher with new respect for this display of courage,
for which they had not given him credit.

“I’ll fix you, Crabb,” said Jim Smith, insolently, “and don’t you forget
it!”

Mr. Crabb did not deign to answer him.

Jim Smith was as good as his word.

An hour later Mr. Crabb was summoned to the presence of the principal.

Socrates received him with marked coldness.

“Mr. Crabb,” he said, “I cannot conceal the amazement I feel at a
complaint which has just been made by my nephew.”

“Well, sir?”

Mr. Crabb had nerved himself for the worst, and did not cower or show
signs of fear, as Socrates expected he would.

“James tells me that you attacked him savagely this afternoon when he
was having a little sport with two of his schoolfellows.”

“Is that what he says, Mr. Smith?”

“Yes, sir, and I require an explanation.”

“You shall have it. The sport in which your nephew was engaged was
attempting to thrash Wilkins. He had him down, and was about to deal him
a savage kick when I fortunately came up.”

“And joined in the fight,” sneered Socrates.

“Yes, if you choose to put it so. Would you have had me stand by, and
see Wilkins brutally used?”

“Of course, you color the affair to suit yourself,” said Socrates,
coldly. “The fact is that you, an usher, have lowered yourself by taking
part in a playful schoolboy contest.”

“Playful!” repeated Mr. Crabb.

“Yes, and I shall show how I regard it by giving you notice that I no
longer require your services in my school. I shall pay you up at the end
of the week and then discharge you.”

“Mr. Smith,” said the usher, “permit me to say that anything more
disgraceful than your own conduct within the last twenty-four hours I
have never witnessed. You have joined your nephew in a plot to disgrace
an innocent boy, declining to do justice, and now you have capped the
climax by censuring me for stopping an act of brutality, merely because
your nephew was implicated in it!”

“This to me?” exclaimed Socrates Smith, hardly crediting the testimony
of his ears.

“Yes, sir, and more! I predict that the stupid folly which has
characterized your course will, within six months, drive from you every
scholar you have in your school!”

“Mr. Crabb,” gasped Socrates, never more surprised in his life than
he was at the sudden spirit exhibited by the usher, “I will not be so
insulted. Leave me, and to-morrow morning leave my service.”

“I will, sir. I have no desire to remain here longer.”

But when Mr. Crabb had walked away his spirit sank within him. How was
he to obtain another situation? He must consult immediately with Hector
Roscoe, in whose judgment, boy as he was, he reposed great confidence.




CHAPTER XXII. THE WELCOME LETTER.



“Hector,” said Mr. Crabb, nervously, “I am going to leave the institute
at the end of the week.”

“Have you secured another situation, Mr. Crabb?” asked Hector,
hopefully.

“No,” answered the usher, shaking his head. “I have been discharged.”

“For what reason?”

“For interfering with Mr. Smith’s nephew when he was brutally abusing
Wilkins.”

“Did Mr. Smith fully understand the circumstances?”

“Yes; but he stands by his nephew right or wrong. He blamed me for
checking his nephew’s brutality.”

“This is shameful!” said Hector, warmly. “May I ask, Mr. Crabb, if you
have formed any plans?”

“No, except to seek a new position!” answered Crabb. “I fear,” he
added, despondently, “that it may be some time before I am so fortunate.
Roscoe, I don’t know what to do when I leave the school. I shall barely
have five dollars, and you know I have not only myself, but another to
support.”

“Keep up your courage, Mr. Crabb! It is nearly time for me to hear from
the friend in New York to whom I wrote is your behalf. If you can secure
the position of his private tutor--”

“If I can, I will hail it as providential. It will relieve me at once
from all anxiety.”

“I don’t think I shall long remain here myself, Mr. Crabb,” said
Hector. “I came here with the full intention of making the most of the
facilities the institute affords for education, but I find the principal
incompetent, and disposed to connive at injustice and brutality. The
only good I have got here has been derived from your instructions.”

“Thank you, Roscoe. Such a tribute is, indeed, welcome,” said the usher,
warmly.

“It is quite sincere, Mr. Crabb, and I hope my good wishes may bring you
the advantage which I have in view.”

“Thank you, Roscoe. I don’t blame you for being disgusted with the
management of the school. You have yourself suffered injustice.”

“Yes; in writing home, and charging me with theft, before he had
investigated the circumstances, Mr. Smith did me a great injustice. I
doubt whether he has since written to correct the false charge, as
I required him to do. If not, I shall owe it to myself to leave the
school.”

“You will be justified in doing so.” The next day brought Hector two
letters. One was from Allan Roscoe, and read as follows:

“HECTOR: I have received from your worthy teacher a letter which has
filled me with grief and displeasure. I knew you had great faults, but
I did not dream that you would stoop so low as to purloin money, as it
seems you have done. Mr. Smith writes me that there is no room to doubt
your guilt. He himself discovered in the pocket of your pantaloons a
wallet containing a large sum of money, which he had missed only a short
time before. He learned that you had entered his chamber, and taken the
money, being tempted by your own dishonest and depraved heart.

“I cannot express the shame I feel at this revelation of baseness. I
am truly glad that you are not connected with me by blood. Yet I cannot
forget that my poor brother treated you as a son; and took pains to
train you up in right ideas. It would give him deep pain could he know
how the boy whom he so heaped with benefits has turned out! I may say
that Guy is as much shocked as I am, but he, it seems, had a better
knowledge of you than I; for he tells me he is not surprised to hear it.
I confess I am, for I thought better of you.

“Under the circumstances I shall not feel justified in doing for you as
much as I intended. I proposed to keep you at school for two years more,
but I have now to announce that this is your last term, and I advise you
to make the most of it. I will try, when the term closes, to find some
situation for you, where your employer’s money will not pass through
your hands. ALLAN ROSCOE.”

Hector read the letter with conflicting feelings, the most prominent
being indignation and contempt for the man who so easily allowed himself
to think evil of him.

The other letter he found more satisfactory.

It was from his young friend in New York, Walter Boss. As it is short, I
subjoin it:

“DEAR HECTOR: I am ever so glad to hear from you, but I should like much
better to see you. I read to papa what you said of Mr. Crabb, and he
says it is very apropos, as he had made up his mind to get me a tutor.
I am rather backward, you see, not having your taste for study, and papa
thinks I need special attention. He says that your recommendation is
sufficient, and he will engage Mr. Crabb without any further inquiry;
and he says he can come at once. He will give him sixty dollars a month
and board, and he will have considerable time for himself, if he wants
to study law or any other profession. I don’t know but a cousin may join
me in my studies, in which case he will pay a hundred dollars per month,
if that will be sastisfactory.

“Why can’t you come and make me a visit? We’ll have jolly fun. Come
and stay a month, old chap. There is no one I should like better. Your
friend, WALTER Boss.”

Hector read this letter with genuine delight. It offered a way of
escape, both for the unfortunate usher and himself. Nothing could be
more “apropos” to quote Walter’s expression.

Our hero lost no time in seeking out Mr. Crabb.

“You seem in good spirits, Roscoe,” said the usher, his careworn face
contrasting with the beaming countenance of his pupil.

“Yes, Mr. Crabb, I have reason to be, and so have you.”

“Have you heard from your friend?” asked the usher, hopefully.

“Yes, and it’s all right.”

Mr. Crabb looked ten years younger.

“Is it really true?” he asked.

“It is true that you are engaged as private tutor to my friend, Walter.
You’ll find him a splendid fellow, but I don’t know if the pay is
sufficient,” continued Hector, gravely.

“I am willing to take less pay than I get here,” said the usher, “for
the sake of getting away.”

“How much do you receive here?”

“Twenty dollar a month and board. I might, perhaps, get along on a
little less,” he added doubtfully.

“You won’t have to, Mr. Crabb. You are offered sixty dollars a month and
a home.”

“You are not in earnest, Roscoe?” asked the usher, who could not believe
in his good fortune.

“I will read you the letter, Mr. Crabb.”

When it was read the usher looked radiant. “Roscoe,” he said, “you come
to me like an angel from heaven. Just now I was sad and depressed; now
it seems to me that the whole future is radiant. Sixty dollars a month!
Why, it will make me a rich man.”

“Mr. Crabb,” said Hector, with a lurking spirit of fun, “can you really
make up your mind to leave Smith Institute, and its kind and benevolent
principal?”

“I don’t think any prisoner ever welcomed his release with deeper
thankfulness,” said the usher. “To be in the employ of a man whom you
despise, yet to feel yourself a helpless and hopeless dependent on him
is, I assure you, Roscoe, a position by no means to be envied. For two
years that has been my lot.”

“But it will soon be over.”

“Yes, thanks to you. Why can’t you accompany me, Hector? I ought not,
perhaps, to draw you away, but--”

“But listen to the letter I have received from my kind and considerate
guardian, as he styles himself,” said Hector.

He read Allan Roscoe’s letter to the usher.

“He seems in a great hurry to condemn you,” said Mr. Crabb.

“Yes, and to get me off his hands,” said Hector, proudly. “Well, he
shall be gratified in the last. I shall accept Walter’s invitation, and
we will go up to New York together.”

“That will, indeed, please me. Of course, you will undeceive your
guardian.”

“Yes. I will get Wilkins and Platt to prepare a statement of the facts
in the case, and accompany it by a note releasing Mr. Roscoe from any
further care or expense for me.”

“But, Hector, can you afford to do this?”

“I cannot afford to do otherwise, Mr. Crabb. I shall find friends, and I
am willing to work for my living, if need be.”

At this point one of the boys came to Mr. Crabb with a message from
Socrates, desiring the usher to wait upon him at once.




CHAPTER XXIII. ANOTHER CHANCE FOR THE USHER.



Mr. Smith had been thinking it over. He had discharged Mr. Crabb in the
anger of the moment, but after his anger had abated, he considered that
it was not for his interest to part with him. Mr. Crabb was a competent
teacher, and it would be well-nigh impossible to obtain another so
cheap. Twenty dollars a month for a teacher qualified to instruct in
Latin and Greek was certainly a beggarly sum, but Mr. Crabb’s dire
necessity had compelled him to accept it. Where could he look for
another teacher as cheap? Socrates Smith appreciated the difficulty,
and decided to take Mr. Crabb back, on condition that he would make an
apology to Jim.

To do Mr. Crabb justice, it may be said that he would not have done this
even if he saw no chance of another situation. But this Mr. Smith did
not know. He did observe, however, that the usher entered his presence
calm, erect and appearing by no means depressed, as he had expected.

“You sent for me, sir?” said the usher interrogatively.

“Yes, Mr. Crabb. You will remember that I had occasion to rebuke you,
when we last conferred together, for overstepping the limits of your
authority?”

“I remember, Mr. Smith, that you showed anger, and found fault with me.”

“Exactly so.”

“Why doesn’t he ask to be taken back?” thought Socrates.

“I have thought the matter over since,” continued the principal, “and
have concluded we might be able to arrange matters.”

The usher was surprised. He had not expected that Mr. Smith would make
overtures of reconciliation. He decided not to mention at present his
brighter prospects in New York, but to wait and see what further his
employer had to say.

Mr. Crabb bowed, but did not make any reply.

“I take it for granted, Mr. Crabb, that your means are limited,”
 proceeded Socrates.

“You are right there, sir. If I had not been poor I should not have
accepted the position of teacher in Smith Institute for the pitiful
salary of twenty dollars a month.”

“Twenty dollars a month and your board, Mr. Crabb,” said Socrates, with
dignity, “I consider a very fair remuneration.”

“I do not, Mr. Smith,” said the usher, in a decided tone.

“I apprehend you will find it considerably better than to be out of
employment,” said Socrates, rather angry.

“You are right there, sir.”

“I am glad you show signs of returning reason. Well, Mr. Crabb, I have
thought the matter over, and I have a proposal to make to you.”

“Very well, sir!”

“I do not wish to distress you by taking away your means of livelihood.”

“You are very considerate, sir.”

There was something in Mr. Crabb’s tone that Socrates did not
understand. It really seemed that he did not care whether he was taken
back or not. But, of course, this could not be. It was absolutely
necessary for him, poor as he was, that he should be reinstated. So Mr.
Smith proceeded.

“To cut the matter short, I am willing to take you back on two
conditions.”

“May I ask you to name them?”

“The first is, that you shall apologize to my nephew for your
unjustifiable attack upon him day before yesterday.”

“What is the other, Mr. Smith?”

“The other is, that hereafter you will not exceed the limits of your
authority.”

“And you wish my answer?” asked the usher, raising his eyes, and looking
fixedly at his employer.

“If you please, Mr. Crabb.”

“Then, sir, you shall have it. Your proposal that I should apologize to
that overgrown bully for restraining him in his savage treatment of a
fellow-pupil is both ridiculous and insulting.”

“You forget yourself, Mr. Crabb,” said Socrates, gazing at the hitherto
humble usher in stupefaction.

“As to promising not to do it again, you will understand that I shall
make no such engagement.”

“Then, Mr. Crabb,” said Socrates, angrily, “I shall adhere to what I
said the other day. At the end of this week you must leave me.”

“Of course, sir, that is understood!”

“You haven’t another engagement, I take it,” said Mr. Smith, very much
puzzled by the usher’s extraordinary independence.

“Yes, sir, I have.”

“Indeed!” said Socrates, amazed. “Where do you go?” Then was Mr. Crabb’s
time for triumph.

“I have received this morning an offer from the city of New York,” he
said.

“From New York! Is it in a school?”

“No, sir; I am to be private tutor in a family.”

“Indeed! Do you receive as good pay as here?”

“As good!” echoed the usher. “I am offered sixty dollars a month and
board, with the possibility of a larger sum, in the event of extra
service being demanded.”

Socrates Smith had never been more surprised.

This Mr. Crabb, whom he had considered to be under his thumb, as being
wholly dependent upon him, was to receive a salary which he considered
princely.

“How did you get this office?” he asked.

“Through my friend, Hector Roscoe,” answered the usher.

“Probably he is deceiving you. It is ridiculous to offer you such a
sum.”

“I am quite aware that you would never think of offering it, but, Mr.
Smith, there are other employers more generous.”

Mr. Crabb left the office with the satisfied feeling that he had the
best of the encounter.. He would have felt gratified could he have known
the increased respect with which he was regarded by the principal as a
teacher who could command so lucrative an engagement in the great city
of New York.

Before closing this chapter I must take notice of one circumstance which
troubled Mr. Smith, and in the end worked him additional loss.

I have already said that Jim Smith, in appropriating his uncle’s wallet,
abstracted therefrom a five-dollar bill before concealing it in Hector’s
pocket.

This loss Mr. Smith speedily discovered, and he questioned Jim about it.

“I suppose Roscoe took it,” said Jim, glibly.

“But he says he did not take the wallet,” said Socrates, who was assured
in his own mind that his nephew was the one who found it on the bureau.
Without stigmatizing him as a thief, he concluded that Jim meant to get
Hector into trouble.

“Wasn’t it found in his pants’ pocket?” queried Jim.

“Yes, but why should he take five dollars out of the wallet?”

“I don’t know.”

“It doesn’t look likely that he would!” said Socrates, eying Jim keenly.

“Then it may have been Ben Platt or Wilkins,” said Jim, with a bright
idea.

“So it might,” said the principal, with a feeling of relief.

“They said they were in the room--at any rate, Platt said so--at the
time it was concealed, only he made a mistake and took Roscoe for me.”

“There is something in that, James. It may be as you suggest.”

“They are both sneaks,” said Jim, who designated all his enemies by that
name. “They’d just as lieve do it as not. I never liked them.”

“I must look into this matter. It’s clear that some one has got this
money, and whoever has it has got possession of it dishonestly.”

“To be sure,” answered Jim, with unblushing assurance. “If I were you I
would find out who did it, that is, if you don’t think Roscoe did it.”

“No, I don’t think Roscoe did it, now. You may tell Platt and Wilkins
that I wish to see them.”

Jim could not have been assigned a more pleasing duty. He hated the two
boys quite as much as he did Hector, and he was glad to feel that they
were likely to get into hot water.

He looked about for some time before he found the two boys. At length he
espied them returning from a walk.

“Here, you two!” he called out, in a voice ef authority. “You’re
wanted!”

“Who wants us?” asked Ben Platt.

“My uncle wants you,” answered Jim, with malicious satisfaction. “You’d
better go and see him right off, too. You won’t find it a trifling
matter, either.”

“Probably Jim has been hatchng some mischief,” said Wilkins. “He owes us
a grudge. We’ll go and see what it is.”




CHAPTER XXIV. THE YOUNG DETECTIVES.



When Mr. Smith had made the two boys’ understand that he suspected them
of purloining the missing five-dollar bill, they were naturally very
indignant.

“Mr. Smith,” said Ben Platt, in a spirited tone, “no one ever suspected
me of dishonesty before.”

“Nor me,” said Wilkins.

“That’s neither here nor there,” said the principal, dogmatically. “It
stands to reason that some one took the money. Money doesn’t generally
walk off itself,” he added, with a sneer.

“I don’t dispute that,” said Ben; “but that does not prove that Wilkins
or I had anything to do with it.”

“You were in the room with the money for half an hour, according to your
own confession,” said Socrates.

“Yes, I was.”

“And part of that time Wilkins was also present.”

“Yes, sir,” assented Wilkins.

“I am no lawyer,” said the principal, triumphantly, “but that seems to
me a pretty good case of circumstantial evidence.”

“You seem to forget, sir, that there is another person who had an
excellent chance to take the money,” said Ben Platt.

“You mean Hector Roscoe? That is true. It lies between you three.”

“No, Mr. Smith, I do not mean Hector Roscoe. I have as much confidence
in Roscoe as myself.”

“So have I,” sneered Socrates.

“And I know he would not take any money that did not belong to him. I
mean a very different person--your nephew, James Smith.”

Socrates Smith frowned with anger. “There seems to be a conspiracy
against my unfortunate nephew,” he said. “I don’t believe a word of your
mean insinuations, and I am not deceived by your attempt to throw your
own criminality upon him. It will not injure him in my eyes. Moreover, I
shall be able to trace back the theft to the wrongdoer. The missing bill
was marked with a cross upon the back, and should either of you attempt
to pass it, your guilt will be made manifest. I advise you to restore it
to me while there is yet time.”

“The bill was marked?” asked Wilkins, eagerly.

“Yes.”

“Then, sir, you may have a chance to find out who took it.”

“The discovery might not please you,” said Socrates, with a sneer.

“It would give me the greatest pleasure, Mr. Smith. If I can in any way
help you discover the missing note, I will do so.”

“You can go,” said Socrates, abruptly.

When the two boys had left the presence of the principal, Ben Platt,
said, “What are you going to do about it, Wilkins?”

“First of all,” answered Wilkins, promptly, “I am going to find out if
Jim took that money.”

“How can you find out?”

“Did you notice that he had come out with a new ring?”

“No, I didn’t observe it.”

“He has bought it since that money was lost!” said Wilkins,
significantly.

“Do you think he purchased it with the missing bill?”

“I wouldn’t wonder at all. At any rate, I am going to find out. He must
have bought it from Washburn, the jeweler. Will you go with me, and
ask?”

“Yes,” answered Ben, eagerly. “Let us go alone. If we can only prove the
theft upon Jim, so that old Sock can’t help believing that he stole the
money, we shall be cleared; though, as to that, there isn’t a scholar in
school who would believe the charge against us.”

“Still, we may as well do what we can to bring the guilt home to Jim
Smith.”

Ten minutes later the two boys entered the shop of Mr. Washburn.

“Will you show me some rings, Mr. Washburn?” asked Wilkins.

“Certainly,” answered the jeweler, politely.

“What is the price of that?” asked Wilkins, pointing to one exactly like
the one he had seen on Jim’s finger.

“Three dollars and a half. It is a very pretty pattern.”

“Yes, sir. There’s one of our boys who has one just like it.”

“You mean James Smith, the principal’s nephew.”

“Yes, sir.”

“He bought it of me yesterday.”

The two boys exchanged a quick glance.

They felt that they were on the brink of a discovery.

“Did he give you a five-dollar bill in payment?” asked Ben Platt.

“Yes,” answered the jeweler, in surprise.

“Could you identify that bill?”

“What are you driving at, boys?” asked Mr. Washburn, keenly.

“I will explain to you if you will answer my questions first.”

“Yes, I could identify the bill.”

“Have you it in your possession still?”

“I have.”

“How will you know it?”

“It seems to me, my boy, you are in training for a lawyer.”

“I have a very urgent reason for asking you this question, Mr.
Washburn.”

“Then I will answer you. When the note was given me, I noticed that it
was on the Park Bank of New York.”

“Will you be kind enough to see if you can find it?”’

“Certainly.”

The jeweler opened his money drawer, and after a brief search, produced
the bill in question.

It was a five-dollar bill on the Park Bank of New York, as he had
already told the boys.

“Now, Mr. Washburn,” asked Wilkins, trying to repress his excitement,
“will you examine the back of the bill, and see if there is any mark on
it.”

The jeweler did as requested, and announced, after slight examination,
that there was a cross on the back of the bill in the upper right hand
corner.

“Hurrah!” shouted Ben, impulsively.

To the wondering jeweler he explained his precise object in the inquiry
he had made, and the boys were complimented by Mr. Washburn for their
shrewdness.

“If I ever meet with a loss, I shall certainly call on you for
assistance, boys,” he said.

“Thank you, Mr. Washburn,” answered Wilkins, “but I do not expect to be
here to be called upon.”

“You are not going to leave the institute, are you?”

“I shall write to my father in what manner I have been treated, and let
him understand how the principal manages the school, and I feel sure he
will withdraw me.”

“Ditto for me!” said Ben Platt. “Old Sock’s partiality for his nephew
has been carried too far, and now that the only decent teacher is
going--Mr. Crabb--I don’t mean, to stay here if I can help it.”

The boys, upon their return to the school, sought out the principal.

“Well, boys,” he said, “have you come to confess?”

“No, sir,” answered Ben, “but we have come to give you some information
about your money.”

“I was sure you knew something about it,” said Socrates, with a sneer.
“I am glad you have decided to make a clean breast of it.”

“You are mistaken, sir.”

“Well, out with your information!” said the principal, roughly.

“A five-dollar bill, marked as you have described, was paid to Mr.
Washburn, the jeweler, only yesterday.”

“Ha! Well?”

“The one who offered it purchased a gold ring.”

“I don’t care what he bought. Who was it that offered the money?”

“Your nephew, James Smith!”

“I don’t believe it,” said the teacher, very much disconcerted.

“Then, sir, I advise you to question Mr. Washburn.”

“How can he identify the bill? Is it the only five-dollar bill he has?”

“The only five-dollar bill on the Park Bank of New York, and he says he
noticed that this was the bank that issued the bill handed him by your
nephew.”

“What of that?”

“The note, which he still has in his possession, is marked just exactly
as you have described.”

“It may have been marked since it came into Mr. Washburn’s hands,” said
Socrates, but he was evidently very much disturbed by the intelligence.
He might not confess it, but he could not help believing that Jim was
the thief, after all.

“You can go,” he said, harshly. “I will look into this improbable
story.”




CHAPTER XXV. SMITH INSTITUTE GROWS UNPOPULAR.



Hector lost no time in drawing up a statement of the facts connected
with the loss of the wallet, which he got Wilkins and Ben Platt to sign.
This he put into an envelope directed to Allan Roscoe, accompanied by a
brief note, which I subjoin:

“MR. ROSCOE: I send you a statement, signed by two of my schoolmates,
showing that the charge which Mr. Smith was in such a hurry to bring
against me, in order to screen his nephew, who is the real thief, is
wholly unfounded. I am not particularly surprised that you were ready
to believe it, nor do I care enough for your good opinion to worry. I
consider that it is due to myself, however, to prove to you that I have
done nothing of which I need be ashamed. Finding the scholars here in
terror of a bully, who imposed upon his schoolfellows with impunity
because, being the principal’s nephew, he was protected in so doing, I
taught him a lesson which may not do him good, but has certainly been of
benefit to his fellow-pupils. In so doing, I have incurred his enmity,
and that of his uncle, who, for more than one reason, is utterly unfit
to conduct a school of this kind.

“You threaten to remove me from school at the end of this term. I do not
wish to remain, and shall remove myself at the end of this week. I shall
not look to you for support, nor do I expect again to depend upon the
estate to which I once thought myself the heir, unless I should be
able to prove that I am the son of your brother, as I fully believe,
notwithstanding the letter you exhibit.”

“HECTOR ROSCOE.”

When Mr. Allan Roscoe received this letter he was very much disturbed.
As he had no affection for Hector, and did not care what became of him,
this may, perhaps, excite surprise. Could it be the last sentence which
excited his alarm?

“Is that letter from Hector?” asked Guy, who had noticed the postmark as
it lay upon his father’s table.

“Yes,” answered Allan Roscoe.

“Does he try to explain his theft?” asked Guy.

“He says he had nothing to do with it.”

“Oh, of course!” sneered Guy. “You don’t believe it, do you?”

“He sends a statement of two of the pupils to the effect that the wallet
was taken by another pupil, a nephew of the principal.”

“That’s too thin!”

“I don’t know. It may be true. I don’t like the boy, but I hardly think
it probable he would steal.”

“You think better of him than I do. I suppose he wants to get into your
good graces again?”

“No; he says he shall leave school at the end of this week, and will not
again look to me for support.”

“That’s jolly!” exclaimed Guy, much pleased. “You’re well rid of him,
papa. Let him go away and make a living as he can. He’ll have to
turn newsboy, or something of that sort--perhaps he’ll have to be a
bootblack. Wouldn’t that be a good come down for a boy like Hector?”

Guy spoke with great glee, but his father did not seem to enjoy his
release as well as Guy. He showed that he understood the boy better when
he said:

“Hector will not have to resort to any such employment. He has a good
education, and he can get some decent position, probably. On the whole,
I am sorry he is going to leave my protection, for friends of the family
may, perhaps, blame me.”

“But it isn’t your fault, papa. He is taking his own course.”

“To be sure. You are right there!”

Mr. Roscoe thought so much on the subject, however, that the next day he
went to Smith Institute to see Hector, without telling Guy where he was
going.

Arrived there, he asked to see Mr. Smith.

The latter did not appear to be in a happy frame of mind.

“How do you do, Mr. Roscoe?” he said.

“Very well,” answered Mr. Roscoe, briefly. “Mr. Smith, I wish to see my
ward.”

“I am sorry you cannot see him, Mr. Roscoe.”

“Cannot see him! Why not?”

“Because he has left the institute.”

Allan Roscoe frowned.

“Why has he left?” he asked.

“He has left against my will. I think he has been influenced by an usher
in my employ who has behaved very ungratefully. I took him, sir, when he
was in danger of starving, and now he leaves me at a day’s notice, after
doing all he can to break up my school.”

“I feel no particular interest in your usher,” said Allan Roscoe,
coldly. “I wish to obtain information about the boy I placed under your
charge. Do you know where he has gone?”

“No; he did not tell me,” answered the principal.

“You wrote me that he had been detected in stealing a wallet!”

“Yes,” answered Socrates, embarrassed. “Appearances were very much
against him.”

“Do you still think he took it?”

“I may have been mistaken,” answered Mr. Smith, nervously, for he began
to see that the course he had been pursuing was a very unwise one.

“Hector has written me, inclosing a statement signed by two of his
schoolfellows, implicating your own nephew, and he charges that you made
the charge against him out of partiality for the same.”

“There is considerable prejudice against my nephew,” said Socrates.

“And for very good reasons, I should judge,” said Allan Roscoe,
severely. “Hector describes him as an outrageous bully and tyrant. I am
surprised, Mr. Smith, that you should have taken his part.”

Now, Socrates had already had a stormy interview with his nephew. Though
partial to Jim, and not caring whether or not he bullied the other
boys, as soon as he came to see that Jim’s presence was endangering
the school, he reprimanded him severely. He cared more for himself--for
number one--than for anyone else in the universe. He had been
exceedingly disturbed by receiving letters from the fathers of Wilkins
and Ben Platt, and two other fathers, giving notice that they should
remove their sons at the end of the term, and demanding, in the
meantime, that his nephew should be sent away forthwith.

And now Allan Roscoe, whom he had hoped would side with him, had also
turned against him. Then he had lost the services of a competent usher,
whom he got cheaper than he could secure any suitable successor, and,
altogether, things seemed all going against him.

Moreover, Jim, who had been the occasion of all the trouble, had
answered him impudently, and Socrates felt that he had been badly used.
As to his own agency in the matter, he did not give much thought to
that.

“My nephew is going to leave the school, Mr. Roscoe,” said Socrates,
half-apologetically.

“I should think it was full time, Mr. Smith.”

“Perhaps so,” said Smith; “but if I have stood by him, it has been
in ignorance. I cannot think him as wrong as your ward has probably
represented. Hector was jealous of him.”

“Of his scholarship, I presume?”

“Well, no,” answered the principal, reluctantly, “but of his physical
superiority, and--and influence in the school. I may say, in fact,
Mr. Roscoe, that till your ward entered the school it was a happy and
harmonious family. His coming stirred up strife and discontent, and
I consider him primarily responsible for all the trouble that has
occurred.”

“I don’t defend Hector Roscoe,” said Allan, “but he writes me that your
nephew was a bully, who imposed upon his schoolfellows, and that he, by
taking their part and stopping this tyranny, incurred his ill-will and
yours.”

“I supposed I should be misrepresented,” said Socrates, meekly. “I am
devoted to my school and my pupils, Mr. Roscoe. I am wearing out my life
in their service. I may make mistakes sometimes, but my heart--my heart,
Mr. Roscoe,” continued Socrates, tapping his waistcoat, “is right, and
acquits me of any intentional injustice.”

“I am glad to hear it, Mr. Smith,” said Allan Roscoe, stiffly. “As
Hector has left you, I have only to settle your bill, and bid you
good-day.”

“Will you not exert your influence to persuade the boy to return?”
 pleaded Socrates.

“As I don’t know where he is, I don’t see how I can,” said Allan Roscoe,
dryly.

“That man is an arch hypocrite!” he said to himself, as he was returning
home.

I may state here that at the end of the term half the pupils left Smith
Institute, and Socrates Smith lamented too late the folly that had made
him and his school unpopular.




CHAPTER XXVI. HECTOR’S ARRIVAL IN NEW YORK.



Mr. Crabb and Hector were sitting side by side in a railroad car,
speeding away from Smith Institute. In the heart of each was a feeling
of relief, which increased as each minute carried them farther away from
the school.

“Hector,” said the usher, looking younger and happier than his pupil had
ever known him, “I feel like a free man now. It is a feeling that I have
not had since I first set foot in Smith Institute.”

“I think you will lead a happier life in New York, Mr. Crabb.”

“I am sure of it. Thanks to your considerate kindness, I shall for the
first time earn an ample salary, and even be able to lay up money. Is my
future pupil about your age?”

“He is a year younger.”

“Where did you make his acquaintance?”

“At Saratoga, My father and I spent two months at Congress Hall two
summers ago, and as Walter’s family were also there, we naturally got to
be friends. He is a capital fellow, and you will be sure to like him.”

“I am ready to like him after reading that letter he wrote you. Is he
fond of study?”

“That is his weak point,” said Hector, laughing. “Walter was never
cut out for a scholar. I don’t mean, of course, that he hasn’t fair
capacity, but his taste doesn’t lie that way. However, he won’t give you
any trouble, only you won’t succeed as well as you may wish in pushing
him on.”

“All boys are not cut out for scholars,” said the usher. “Now you,
Hector, would do excellently, and might hope to make a very successful
professional man.”

Hector shook his head.

“I must look to a different career,” he said. “I am to be the architect
of my own fortune, you know.”

“What are your plans, Hector?” asked the usher.

“I will consult with Mr. Boss, Walter’s father. By the way, he knows
nothing of the change in my circumstances. He supposes me to be the heir
to the Roscoe estate.”

“Trouble has come upon you early, Hector. Should you need help
hereafter, you must remember that I am earning a good salary and--”

“Thank you, Mr. Crabb,” gratefully, “but you will need all you earn. I
don’t look upon my loss of fortune as a trouble. I think it will make me
more manly and self-reliant, and stimulate me to exertion. I have a fair
education, and I am sure I can earn my living in some honest way.”

“If that is your spirit, Hector, I am sure you will succeed. You are
young and hopeful. I am too much inclined to despond. I have always been
timid about the future. It is a matter of temperament.”

It was early in the afternoon when they reached New York. As they
emerged from the depot a bright-faced boy came up eagerly and greeted
them.

“How are you, Hector?” he said. “You see, I came to meet you. I have
been longing to have you come.”

“I am just as glad to see you, Walter,” said Hector, heartily. “Mr.
Crabb, here is your future pupil, Walter Boss.”

“I hope we may soon be friends, Walter,” said the usher, attracted by
the bright, sunny face of the boy.

Walter gave the usher his hand.

“I hope so, too,” he said, smiling. “I’ll try not to worry you any more
than I can help.”

“I have no misgivings,” said Mr. Crabb, as he mentally contrasted his
new pupil with Jim Smith, and two or three others at the institute, who
had been a frequent source of trouble and annoyance.

“Here is the carriage,” said Walter, pointing out a plain but handsome
carriage waiting outside. “Bundle in, both of you! I beg your pardon,
Mr. Crabb, for my familiarity. That was intended for Hector.”

“I am ready to be classed with Hector,” said Mr. Crabb.

“I am glad to hear you say so. I was afraid you would be stiff and
dignified.”

“I think I shall take my cue from you.”

“Oh, my rule is, go as you please. Edward, drive home!”

The house occupied by Mr. Boss was a fine brown-stone dwelling on
Forty-second Street. Arrived there, Mr. Crabb was shown into a spacious
chamber, on the third floor, furnished with a luxury to which the poor
usher was quite unaccustomed.

“Now, Hector, you can have a room to yourself, or you may share my den,”
 said Walter.

“I would rather share the den,” said Hector.

“That’s what I hoped. You see, we shall have ever so much to say to each
other. We haven’t seen each other for over a year.”

A slight shade of gravity overspread Hector’s face. Since he had met his
friend, his father had died, and he had been reduced from the heir of
wealth to a penniless orphan. Of this last change Walter knew nothing,
but Hector did not mean long to leave him in ignorance.

At dinner the two newcomers saw Mr. Ross, from whom they received a
friendly welcome. The usher was put at his ease at once.

“I hope you’ll get along with my boy,” said the bluff city merchant. “Of
one thing you may be assured, your scholarship won’t be severely taxed
in educating him. Walter is a pretty good boy, but he isn’t a prodigy of
learning.”

“I may be some day, father,” said Walter, “with Mr. Crabb’s help.”

“I take it Mr. Crabb isn’t able to perform miracles,” said Mr. Ross,
good-humoredly. “No, Mr. Crabb, I shan’t expect too much of you. Get
your pupil on moderately fast, and I shall be satisfied. I am glad,
Hector, that you were able to pay Walter a visit at this time.”

“So am I, sir.”

“I thought you might not be able to leave your studies.”

“I have given up study, sir.”

“I am surprised at that, Hector. I thought you contemplated going to
college.”

“So I did, sir, but circumstances have changed my plans.”

“Indeed!”

“Yes, sir; I will explain after dinner, and will ask your advice.”

Mr. Ross dropped the subject, and after dinner led the way to the
library, where he sank into an armchair, and, breathing a sigh of
satisfaction, said: “This, Mr. Crabb, is the most enjoyable part of the
twenty-four hours for me. I dismiss business cares and perplexities, and
read my evening paper, or some new book, in comfort.”

As the usher looked about him and saw costly books, engravings,
furniture and pictures, he could well understand that in such
surroundings the merchant could take solid comfort. It was a most
agreeable contrast to the plain and poverty-stricken room at Smith
Institute, where the boys pursued their evening studies under his
superintendence.

“Well, Hector, so you don’t propose to go back to school,” said the
merchant. “Isn’t that rather a sudden resolution?”

“Yes, sir; but, as I said, circumstances have changed.”

“What circumstances? Because you are rich, you don’t think you ought to
be idle, I hope?”

“Oh, no, sir. It is because I have discovered that I am not rich.”

“Not rich! I always understood that your father left a large estate,”
 said Mr. Ross, in surprise.

“So he did, sir.”

“Didn’t it descend to you?”

“I thought so till recently.”

“Why don’t you think so now?”

In answer, Hector told the story of the revelation made to him by Allan
Roscoe, after his father’s death.

“You see, therefore,” he concluded, “that I am penniless, and a
dependent upon Mr. Allan Roscoe’s generosity.”

“This is a most extraordinary story!” said the merchant, after a pause.

“Yes, sir; it changes my whole future.”

“I suppose Mr. Allan Roscoe is the beneficiary, and the estate goes to
him?”

“Yes, sir.”

“Did your father--the late Mr. Roscoe--ever hint to you anything which
could lead you to suspect that you were not his own, but an adopted
son?”

“Never, Mr. Ross,” answered Hector, with emphasis.

“Did he continue to treat you with affection.”

“Always. Nothing in his manner ever would have led me to imagine that I
was not his own son.”

“He left no will?”

“No, sir.”

“What are your plans?”

“I do not wish to remain dependent upon Allan Roscoe. I should like to
obtain a situation of some kind in the city, if I can.”

“I can probably serve you, then, after a while. For the present, stay
here as Walter’s companion.”

“Thank you, sir; I should like nothing better.”




CHAPTER XXVII. LARRY DEANE.



Not altogether in accordance with his inclinations, Walter was set to
work at his studies immediately under the direction of Mr. Crabb. He
asked his father for a week’s vacation to go about the city with Hector,
but his father answered in the negative.

“You are too far behind in your studies, Walter,” he said. “You are two
years, at least, behind Hector, and cannot spare the time as well as
he.”

“Hector will have to go round alone,” objected Walter.

“It will do him no harm to get acquainted with the different parts
of the city, as that will be a kind of knowledge he may require if he
should obtain a situation.”

“I shan’t see much of him.”

“Oh, yes, you will; Mr. Crabb will not make you study all day. Mr.
Crabb, you may work with Walter from nine to one. This, with perhaps an
hour or more devoted to study in the afternoon or evening, will enable
him to make fair progress.”

This arrangement struck Walter favorably, as he could, whenever he
desired it, spend the whole afternoon with Hector.

Hector found it very pleasant to act upon the suggestion made by Mr.
Ross. He had visited the city of New York at different times, but had
never enjoyed the opportunity of exploring it by himself. His first
visit was made to Central Park, where he mingled with the crowds
wandering about in search of pleasure.

He made his way to the lake, and took passage in one of the skiffs
which, in charge of a skilled oarsman, makes a tour of the pretty and
picturesque sheet of water.

The second morning he turned his steps southward, and walked down
Broadway. It was a leisurely walk, for he had no scruple in stopping
wherever he saw anything in the streets or in the shop windows that
seemed to him worthy of attention. About the corner of Canal Street
he was very much surprised at a boy who was on his knees, blacking the
boots of an elderly gentleman--a boy whom he recognized at once as the
son of a man who had for years been in his father’s employ as gardener
at Castle Roscoe.

“What brings him here?” thought Hector, much surprised.

“Larry Deane!” he said, as the boy finished his job, and rose from his
feet to receive his pay.

“Hector Roscoe!” exclaimed Larry, not much less surprised.

“What brings you here, and what has reduced you to such work?” inquired
Hector.

Larry Deane was a boy of about Hector’s age. He was a healthy-looking
country lad, looking like many another farmer’s son, fresh from
the country. He had not yet acquired that sharp, keen look which
characterizes, in most cases, the New York boy who has spent all his
life in the streets.

“I can answer both your questions with the same word, Master Hector,”
 said Larry, as a sober look swept over his broad, honest face.

“Don’t call me master, Larry. We are equals here. But what is that
word?”

“That word is trouble,’” answered the bootblack.

“Come with me into this side street,” said Hector, leading the way into
Howard Street. “You have a story to tell, and I want to hear it.”

“Yes, I have a story to tell.”

“I hope your father and mother are well,” said Hector, interrupting him.

“Yes, they are well in health, but they are in trouble, as I told you.”

“What is the trouble?”

“It all comes of Mr. Allan Roscoe,” answered Larry, “and his son, Guy.”

“Tell me all about it.”

“I was walking in the fields one day,” said Larry, “when Guy came out
and began to order me round, and call me a clodhopper and other unlikely
names, which I didn’t enjoy. Finally he pulled off my hat, and when I
put it back on my head, he pulled it off again. Finally I found the only
way to do was to give him as good as he sent. So I pulled off his hat
and threw it up in a tree. He became very angry, and ordered me to go up
after it. I wouldn’t do it, but walked away. The next day my father
was summoned to the house, where Mr. Allan Roscoe complained of me for
insulting his son. He asked my father to thrash me, and when father
refused, he discharged him from his employment. A day or two afterward a
new gardener came to Roscoe Castle, and father understood that there was
no chance of his being taken back.”

“That was very mean in Mr. Roscoe,” said Hector, indignantly.

“Yes, so it was; but father couldn’t do anything. He couldn’t get a
new place, for it wasn’t the right time of year, and Mr. Roscoe said he
wouldn’t give him a recommendation. Well, we had very little money in
the house, for mother has been sick of late years, and all father’s
extra earnings went to pay for medicines and the doctor’s bill. So one
day I told father I would come to New York and see if I couldn’t find
something to do.”

“I think you did the right thing, Larry,” said Hector, approvingly. “It
was your duty to help your father if you could.”

“I can’t help him much,” answered Larry.

“What made you take up this business, Larry?”

“I couldn’t get anything else to do, besides, this pays better than
working in a store or office.”

“How--much can you earn at it?”

“Six or seven dollars a week.”

“I should think it would require all that to support you.”

“It would if I went to a boarding house, but I can’t afford that.”

“Where do you live?”

“At the Newsboys’ Lodging House.”

“How much does that cost you?”

“For eighteen cents a day I get supper, lodging and breakfast. In the
middle of the day I go to a cheap restaurant.”

“Then you are able to save something?”

“Yes; last week I sent home three dollars, the week before two dollars
and a half.”

“Why, that is doing famously. You are a good boy, Larry.”

“Thank you, Hector; but, though it is doing very well for me, it isn’t
as much as they need at home. Besides, I can’t keep it up, as, after
a while, I shall need to buy some new clothes. If your father had been
alive, my father would never have lost his place. Master Hector, won’t
you use your influence with your uncle to have him taken back?”

Hector felt keenly how powerless he was in the matter. He looked grave,
as he answered:

“Larry, you may be sure that I would do all in my power to have your
father restored to the position from which he never should have been
removed; but I fear I can do nothing.”

“Won’t you write to Mr. Roscoe?” pleaded Larry, who, of course, did not
understand why Hector was powerless.

“Yes, I will write to him, but I am sorry to say that I have very little
influence with Mr. Roscoe.”

“That is strange,” said Larry; “and you the owner of the estate.”

Hector did not care to explain to Larry just how matters stood, so he
only said:

“I can’t explain to you what seems strange to you, Larry, but I may be
able to do so some time. I will certainly write to Mr. Roscoe, as you
desire; but you must not build any hopes upon it. Meanwhile, will you
accept this from me, and send it to your father?”

As he spoke, he drew from his pocketbook a five-dollar bill and handed
it to his humble friend.

Larry would not have accepted it had he known that Hector was nearly as
poor as himself, but, supposing him to be the heir of a large and rich
estate, he felt no hesitation.

“Thank you very much, Hector,” he said; “you had always a kind heart.
This money will do my father very much good. I will send it to him
to-day.”

“Do you generally stand here, Larry?” asked Hector.

“Yes.”

“Then I will take pains to see you again.”

“Shall you stay long in the city, Master Hector?”

“Not Master Hector.”

“Then Hector, if you don’t mind.”

“I shall be here for the present--I don’t know how long.”

“Then let me black your boots for nothing every time you come by--I want
to do something for you.”

“Thank you, Larry; but I don’t like to have a friend perform such a
service. Remember me to your father when you write.”

“I wish I could do something for Larry,” said Hector, to himself, as he
walked away. “As it is, I stand in need of help myself.”

He was to make a friend that day under rather unusual circumstances.




CHAPTER XXVIII. TWO MORE ACQUAINTANCES.



Hector continued his walk downtown. Despite the crowds of persons who
thronged the sidewalks, he did not anticipate meeting anyone else that
he knew. But he was destined to another surprise. On the corner of
Murray Street he saw two persons advancing toward him, the last,
perhaps, that he expected to see. Not to keep the reader in suspense, it
was Allan Roscoe and his son, Guy.

Guy was the first to recognize Hector. Of course, he, too, was
surprised.

“Why, there’s Hector!” he exclaimed, directing his father’s attention to
our hero.

Allan Roscoe looked up quickly. It is hard to tell whether he felt glad
or the reverse at this meeting with the boy whom he called his ward.

An instant later Hector recognized Guy and his father.

“How do you do, Mr. Roscoe?” he said, politely.

“Very well. When did you reach New York?”

“On Saturday.”

It should have been explained that Hector had spent Sunday quietly with
Mr. Ross and Walter, and that this was Monday.

“Ahem! I was very much surprised at your leaving the institute,” said
Mr. Roscoe.

“I explained to you in my letter why I proposed to leave it,” Hector
answered, coldly.

“I did not think your reason sufficient.”

“As Mr. Smith saw fit to bring a base charge against me, and persisted
in it, even after he must have been convinced that his nephew was
guilty, I was unwilling to remain under his charge any longer.”

“The circumstances were against you,” said Mr. Roscoe.

“You might have known me better than that, Mr. Roscoe,” said Hector,
proudly. “Yet you condemned me unheard.”

“Of course, I am very glad that the charge is unfounded,” said Mr.
Roscoe, awkwardly.

“Where there is smoke there is generally fire,” said Guy, spitefully.

“I understand you, Guy,” said Hector, half turning to look at the boy
who had usurped his place. “I hope you won’t think it impolite if I say
that I care nothing whatever for your opinion.”

“You put on as many airs as ever,” sneered Guy. “I should think you
would be a little more humble in your changed position.”

“I have not changed, even if my position has,” answered Hector. “Money
is nothing to be proud of.”

“I apprehend that the world judges differently,” said Allan Roscoe.
“Since you have taken your destiny into your own hands, you will excuse
me for asking how you intend to earn your living?”

“I hope to get a mercantile position,” answered Hector.

“Take my advice,” said Guy, with a derisive smile, “and buy yourself a
blacking box and brush. I am told bootblacks make a good deal of money.”

“Hush, Guy!” said his father. “Do not insult Hector.”

But Hector concerned himself but little with any slight received from
Guy Roscoe. His words, however, recalled his thoughts to the boy he had
so recently met, Larry Deane, and he resolved to see if he could not
help him by an appeal to Allan Roscoe.

“Mr. Roscoe,” said he, quickly, “I nearly forgot something I want very
much to say to you.”

“What is it?” asked his guardian, suspiciously. It occurred to him that
Hector wished to borrow some money, and he was considering how little he
could decently give him.

“I hear you have discharged Reuben Deane from his position?”

“How did you hear it?”

“From his son, Larry.”

“Where did you see Larry?” asked Allan, in some curiosity.

“He has been driven to take up that employment which Guy so kindly
recommended to me.”

“Larry Deane a bootblack! That’s a good one!” exclaimed Guy, with
evident relish.

“I don’t think so,” said Hector. “The poor boy is picking a poor
living, and sending home what he can to his father, who cannot get new
employment. Mr. Roscoe, why did you discharge him?”

“I can answer that question, though it’s none of your business all
the same,” volunteered Guy. “The boy Larry was impudent to me, and his
father took his part.”

“Mr. Roscoe,” said Hector, “Reuben Deane was in my father’s employ
before I was born. Larry and I used to play together when we were little
boys, and since when we were older.”

“A bootblack is a nice playmate,” said Guy, with his usual sneer.

“He was not a bootblack then,” retorted Hector, “nor would he be now but
for your mean spite. Mr. Roscoe, as I happen to know, my father always
valued the services of Reuben Deane, and I ask, in his name, that you
give him back his place.”

“My brother may have been deceived in him,” said Allan Roscoe, coldly,
emphasizing the first two words, in order to remind Hector that he was
no longer to consider him as his father; “but I cannot promise to adopt
all his views and protege’s. I have displaced Deane and substituted for
him a gardener with whom I am better pleased.”

“Have you no sympathy for the poverty and distress of a man who has
served our family faithfully for so many years?” asked Hector, half
indignantly.

“My father is competent to manage his own affairs,” said Guy,
offensively.

“You don’t appear to think so, or you would not answer for him,”
 retorted Hector.

“Boys, I must request you to desist from this bickering,” said Allan
Roscoe. “I am sorry, Hector, that I cannot comply with your request. By
the way, you did not tell me where you were staying.”

“With a gentleman on Forty-second Street.”

“What is his name?”

“Andrew Ross.”

“Not the eminent merchant of that name?” asked Allan Roscoe, in
surprise.

“Yes, I believe so.”

“He is worth a million.”

“I supposed he was rich. He lives in an elegant house.”

“Where did you get acquainted with him, Hector?”

“At Saratoga, a year and a half ago.”

“Did you beg him to take you in?” asked Guy, unpleasantly.

Hector quietly ignored the question.

“Walter Boss and I have been very intimate, and I was invited to pay him
a visit.”

“Does he know that you are a poor boy?” asked Guy.

“I have communicated to Mr. Ross what your father told me,” answered
Hector, coldly. “He is a real friend, and it made no difference in his
treatment of me. I hope to get a situation through his influence.”

“You are lucky to have such a man for a friend,” said Allan Roscoe, who
would himself have liked to become acquainted with a man whose social
position was so high. “I hope you will not misrepresent me to him.
Should any opportunity occur, I will try to procure you employment.”

“Thank you, sir,” said Hector, but his tone lacked heartiness. He saw
that his being a visitor to Mr. Ross and his son had made a difference
in his favor. Guy, too, began to think he might be a little more
gracious. He, like his father, liked to associate with boys of high
social position, and he would have liked to be introduced to Walter
Ross.

“What is your number?” he asked of Hector, “I don’t know but I’ll call
and see you some time. Is Walter Ross generally at home?”

“Don’t put yourself to any inconvenience to call,” said Hector,
significantly. “Walter and I are generally away in the afternoon.”

“Oh, I don’t care to call upon you,” said Guy, annoyed. “I can have all
the company I want.”

“I won’t detain you any longer, Mr. Roscoe,” said Hector, realizing that
the conversation had occupied considerable time. “Good-morning.”

“That boy is as proud as ever,” said Guy, after Hector had left them.
“He doesn’t seem to realize that he has lost his money.”

“He has not had time to realize it yet. It won’t be long before he will
understand the difference it makes.”

“I am glad he isn’t my cousin,” continued Guy. “I dislike him more than
any boy I know.”

Allan Roscoe looked thoughtful.

“I fear that boy will give me trouble yet,” he said to himself. “He
evidently suspects that something is wrong.”




CHAPTER XXIX. JIM SMITH EFFECTS A LOAN.



After parting with Allan Roscoe and Guy, Hector kept on his way
downtown. He did not expect to meet any more acquaintances, but he
was again to be surprised. Standing on the sidewalk having his boots
blacked, he recognized the schoolfellow he had least reason to like--Jim
Smith.

“What brings Jim here?” he asked himself, in some surprise.

He did not feel inclined to go up and claim acquaintance, but it chanced
that he became witness of a piece of meanness characteristic of Jim.

When the young bootblack had finished polishing his shoes, he waited for
his customary fee.

Jim fumbled in his pockets, and finally produced two cents.

“There, boy,” he said, placing them in the hand of the disgusted knight
of the brush.

“What’s that for?” he asked.

“It’s your pay.”

“Look here, mister, you’ve made a mistake; here’s only two cents.”

“I know it.”

“Do you think I work for any such price as that?”

“Perhaps you expect a dollar!” sneered Jim.

“No, I don’t; but a nickel’s my lowest price. Plenty of gentlemen give
me a dime.”

“That’s too much; I’ve paid you all I’m going to.”

“Wait a minute. That boot don’t look as well as the other.”

Jim unsuspiciously allowed the boy to complete his work, but he had
occasion to regret it. The bootblack hastily rubbed his brush in the mud
on the sidewalk and daubed it on one of Jim’s boots, quite effacing the
shine.

“There, that’ll do,” he said, and, scrambling to his feet, ran round the
corner.

Then, for the first time, Jim looked down, and saw what the boy had
done. He uttered an exclamation of disgust and looked round hastily to
see where the offender had betaken himself. His glance fell upon Hector,
who was quietly looking on, and not without a sense of enjoyment.

It often happens that we greet cordially those for whom we have even a
feeling of aversion when we meet them unexpectedly away from our usual
haunts. Jim, who was beginning to regret that circumstances had forced
him to leave the serene sanctuary of Smith Institute, since now he would
be under the necessity of making his own living, was glad to see our
hero.

“Is it you, Roscoe?” he said, eagerly.

“Yes,” answered Hector, coolly.

“What are you doing?”

“Walking about the city, just at present.”

“Suppose we go together.”

Hector hardly knew how to refuse, and the two boys kept down Broadway in
company.

“You’re surprised to see me, ain’t you?” asked Jim.

“Rather so.”

“You see, I got tired of the school. I’ve been there three years, so I
told my uncle I would come to New York and see if I couldn’t get work.”

“I hope you may succeed,” said Hector, for he would not allow his
dislikes to carry him too far. He felt that there was room in the world
for Jim and himself, too.

“Are you going to work?” asked Jim.

“I hope so.”

“Got anything in view?”

“Not exactly.’”

“It would be a good thing if we could get into the same place.”

“Do you say that because we have always agreed so well?” asked Hector,
amused.

“We may be better friends in future,” said Jim, with a grin.

Hector was judiciously silent.

“Where are you staying?”

“Up on Forty-second Street.”

“That’s a good way uptown, isn’t it?”

“Yes, pretty far up.”

“Are you boarding?”

“No; I am visiting some friends.”

“Couldn’t you get me in there as one of your school friends?”

This question indicated such an amount of assurance on the part of his
old enemy that at first Hector did not know how to reply in fitting
terms.

“I couldn’t take such a liberty with my friends,” he said. “Besides, it
doesn’t strike me that we were on very intimate terms.”

But Jim was not sensitive to a rebuff.

“The fact is,” he continued, “I haven’t got much money, and it would
be very convenient to visit somebody. Perhaps you could lend me five
dollars?”

“I don’t think I could. I think I shall have to say good-morning.”

“I can’t make anything out of him,” said Jim to himself,
philosophically. “I wonder if he’s got any money. Uncle Socrates told me
his uncle had cast him off.”

Going up Broadway instead of down, it was not long before Jim met Allan
Roscoe and Guy, whom he immediately recognized. Not being troubled with
immodesty, he at once walked up to Mr. Roscoe and held out his hand.

“Good-morning, Mr. Roscoe!” he said, in an ingratiating voice.

“Good-morning, young man. Where have I met you?” asked Allan Roscoe,
puzzled.

“At Smith Institute. I am the nephew of Mr. Smith.”

“What! Not the nephew who--”

Mr. Roscoe found it hard to finish the sentence. He didn’t like to
charge Jim with stealing to his face.

“I know what you mean,” said Jim, boldly. “I am the one whom your nephew
charged with taking money which he took himself. I don’t want to
say anything against him, as he is your nephew, but he is an artful
young--but no matter. You are his uncle.”

“He is not my nephew, but was only cared for by my brother,” said Allan
Roscoe. “You may tell me freely, my good fellow, all the truth. You say
that Hector stole the money which your uncle lost.”

“Yes; but he has made my uncle believe that I took it. It is hard upon
me,” said Jim, pathetically, “as I was dependent upon my uncle. I have
been driven forth into the cold world by my benefactor because your
nephew prejudiced his mind against me.”

“I believe him, papa,” said Guy, who was only too glad to believe
anything against Hector. “I have thought all along that Hector was
guilty.”

“Is that your son?” asked the crafty Jim. “I wish he had come to the
institute, instead of Hector. He is a boy that I couldn’t help liking.”

There are few who are altogether inaccessible to flattery. At any rate,
Guy was not one of this small number.

“I feel sure you are not guilty,” said Guy, regarding Jim graciously.
“It was a very mean thing in Hector to get you into trouble.”

“It was, indeed,” said Jim. “I am cast out of my uncle’s house, and now
I have no home, and hardly any money.”

“Hector is in the city. Have you seen him?” asked Allan Roscoe.

“Yes; I met him a few minutes since.”

“Did you speak to him?”

“Yes; I reproached him for getting me into trouble, but he only laughed
in my face. He told me he hated you both,” added Jim, ingenuously.

“Just like Hector!” said Guy. “What have I always told you, papa?”

“I am sorry you have suffered such injustice at the hands of anyone in
any way connected with my family,” said Mr. Roscoe, who, like Guy, was
not indisposed to believe anything to the discredit of Hector. “I do
not feel responsible for his unworthy acts, but I am willing to show my
sympathy by a small gift.”

He produced a five-dollar note and put it into Jim’s ready hand.

“Thank you, sir,” he said. “You are a gentleman.”

So the interview closed, and Jim left the spot, chuckling at the manner
in which he had wheedled so respectable a sum out of Allan Roscoe.

Meanwhile Hector, after looking about him, turned, and, getting into
a Broadway stage, rode uptown as far as Twenty-third Street, where
the stage turned down toward Sixth Avenue. He concluded to walk the
remainder of the way.

As he was walking up Madison Avenue, his attention was drawn to a little
girl in charge of a nursemaid. The latter met an acquaintance and forgot
her charge. The little girl, left to herself, attempted to cross the
street just as a private carriage was driven rapidly up the avenue. The
driver was looking away, and it seemed as if, through the double neglect
of the driver and the nurse, the poor child would be crushed beneath the
hoofs of the horses and the wheels of the carriage.




CHAPTER XXX. A BRAVE DEED.



Hector’s heart stood still as he realized the peril of the child. He
dashed forward on the impulse of the moment, and barely succeeded in
catching up the little girl and drawing her back out of harm’s way.
The driver, who had done his best to rein up his horses, but without
success, ejaculated with fervent gratitude, for he, too, had a child of
his own about the age of the little girl, “God bless you, boy.”

The little girl seemed less concerned than anyone of the spectators. She
put her hand confidently in Hector’s, and said: “Take me to Mary.”

“And who is Mary?” asked Hector, kindly.

He did not require an answer, for the nurse, who, rather late in the
day, had awakened to the fact that her charge was in danger, came
running forward, crying: “Oh! Miss Gracie, what made you run away?”

“The little girl would have been killed but for this boy’s timely help,”
 said a middle-aged spectator, gravely.

“I’m sure I don’t know what possessed her to run away,” said Mary,
confusedly.

“She wouldn’t if she had been properly looked after,” said the
gentleman, sharply, for he had children of his own.

Hector was about to release the child, now that he had saved her, but
she was not disposed to let him go.

“You go with me, too!” she said.

She was a pretty child, with a sweet face, rimmed round by golden curls,
her round, red cheeks glowing with exercise.

“What is her name?” asked Hector, of the nurse.

“Grace Newman,” answered the nurse, who felt the necessity of saying
something in her own defense. “She’s a perfect little runaway. She
worries my life out running round after her.”

“Grace Newman!” said the middle-aged gentleman already referred to.
“Why, she must be the child of my friend, Titus Newman, of Pearl
Street.”

“Yes, sir,” said the nurse.

“My old friend little knows what a narrow escape his daughter has had.”

“I hope you won’t tell him, sir,” said Mary, nervously.

“Why not?”

“Because he would blame me.”

“And so he ought!” said the gentleman, nodding vigorously. “It’s no
merit of yours that she wasn’t crushed beneath the wheels of that
carriage. If you had been attending to your duty, she wouldn’t have been
in danger.”

“I don’t see as it’s any business of yours,” said Mary, pertly. “You
ain’t her father, or her uncle.”

“I am a father, and have common humanity,” said the gentleman, “and I
consider you unfit for your place.”

“Come along, Grace!” said Mary, angry at being blamed. “You’ve behaved
very badly, and I’m going to take you home.”

“Won’t you come, too?” asked the little girl, turning to Hector.

“No, there’s no call for him to come,” said the nurse, pulling the child
away.

“Good-by, Gracie,” said Hector, kindly.

“Good-by!” responded the child.

“These nursemaids neglect their charges criminally,” said the gentleman,
directing his remarks to Hector. “Mr. Newman owes his child’s safety,
perhaps her life, to your prompt courage.”

“She was in great danger,” said Hector. “I was afraid at first I could
not save her.”

“A second later and it would have been too late. What is your name, my
brave young friend?”

“Hector Roscoe, sir.”

“It is a good name. Do you live in the city?”

“At present I do, sir. I was brought up in the country.”

“Going to school, I take it.”

“I am looking for a place, sir.”

“I wish I had one to give you. I retired from business two years since,
and have no employment for anyone.”

“Thank you, sir; I should have liked to serve you.”

“But I’ll tell you what, my young friend, I have a considerable
acquaintance among business men. If you will give me your address, I may
have something to communicate to you ere long.”

“Thank you, sir.”

Hector drew a card from his pocket, and added to it the number of Mr.
Ross’ house.

“I am much obliged to you for your kind offer,” he said.

“You don’t look as if you stood in need of employment,” said the
gentleman, noticing the fine material of which Hector’s suit was made.

“Appearances are sometimes deceitful,” said Hector, half smiling.

“You must have been brought up in affluence,” said Mr. Davidson, for
this was his name.

“Yes, sir, I was. Till recently I supposed myself rich.”

“You shall tell me the story some time; now I must leave you.”

“Well,” thought Hector, as he made his way homeward, “I have had
adventures enough for one morning.”

When Hector reached the house in Forty-second Street, he found Walter
just rising from his lessons.

“Well, Hector, what have you been doing?” asked Walter.

“Wandering about the city.”

“Did you see anybody you knew while doing so?”

“Oh, yes! I was particularly favored. I saw Allan Roscoe and Guy--”

“You don’t say so! Were they glad to see you?”

“Not particularly. When Guy learned that I was staying here, he proposed
to call and make your acquaintance.”

“I hope you didn’t encourage him,” said Walter, with a grimace.

“No; I told him that we were generally out in the afternoon.”

“That is right.”

“I suppose you have been hard at work, Walter?”

“Ask Mr. Crabb.”

“Walter has done very well,” said the usher. “If he will continue to
study as well, I shall have no fault to find.”

“If I do, will you qualify me to be a professor in twelve months’ time?”

“I hope not, for in that case I should lose my scholar, and have to bow
to his superior knowledge.”

“Then you don’t know everything, Mr. Crabb?”

“Far from it! I hope your father didn’t engage me in any such illusion.”

“Because,” said Walter, “I had one teacher who pretended to know all
there was worth knowing. I remember how annoyed he was once when I
caught him in a mistake in geography.”

“I shall not be annoyed at all when you find me out in a mistake, for I
don’t pretend to be very learned.”

“Then I think we’ll get along,” said Walter, favorably impressed by the
usher’s modesty.

“I suppose if I didn’t know anything we should get along even better,”
 said Mr. Crabb, amused.

“Well, perhaps that might be carrying things too far!” Walter admitted.

In the afternoon Hector and Walter spent two hours at the gymnasium in
Twenty-eighth Street, and walked leisurely home after a healthful amount
of exercise.

For some reason, which he could not himself explain, Hector said nothing
to Walter about his rescue of the little girl on Madison Avenue, though
he heard of it at the gymnasium.

One of the boys, Henry Carroll, said to Walter: “There was a little girl
came near being run over on Madison Avenue this noon!”

“Did you see it?”

“No, but I heard of it.”

“Who was the little girl?”

“Grace Newman.”

“I know who she is. How did it happen?”

The boy gave a pretty correct account.

“Some boy saved her,” he concluded, “by running forward and hauling her
out of the road just in time. He ran the risk of being run over himself.
Mr. Newman thinks everything of little Grace. I’d like to be in that
boy’s shoes.”

Neither of the boys noticed that Hector’s face was flushed, as he
listened to the account of his own exploit.

The next morning, among the letters laid upon the breakfast table was
one for Hector Roscoe.

“A letter for you, Hector,” said Mr. Ross, examining the envelope in
some surprise. “Are you acquainted with Titus Newman, the Pearl Street
merchant?”

“No, sir,” answered Hector, in secret excitement.

“He seems to have written to you,” said Mr. Ross.

Hector took the letter and tore open the envelope.




CHAPTER XXXI. AN IMPORTANT LETTER.



The letter alluded to in the last chapter ran thus. It was written from
Mr. Newman’s house in Madison Avenue, though inclosed in a business
envelope:

“MASTER HECTOR ROSCOE: I learn that I am indebted to you for the rescue
of my little daughter from imminent peril during my absence from home
yesterday. A friend who witnessed her providential escape has given me
such an account of your bravery in risking your own life to save that of
an unknown child, that I cannot rest till I have had an opportunity
of thanking you in person. You will do me a favor, if not otherwise
engaged, if you will call at my house this evening, about eight o’clock.
Yours gratefully,

“Titus NEWMAN.”

It is needless to say that Hector read this letter with feelings of
gratification. It is true, as we are often told, that “virtue is its own
reward,” but it is, nevertheless, pleasant to feel that our efforts to
do well and serve others are appreciated.

“No bad news, I hope, Hector?” said Walter.

“No,” answered Hector. “You may read the letter, if you like, Mr. Ross.”

Mr. Ross did so, and aloud, much to the surprise of everyone at table.

“You did not tell me of this,” said Walter, in astonishment.

“No,” answered Hector, smiling.

“But why not?”

“Because Hector is modest,” Mr. Ross answered for him. “Now, if you had
done such a thing, Walter, we should have been sure to hear of it.”

“I don’t know,” returned Walter, comically. “You don’t know how many
lives I have saved within the last few years.”

“Nor anyone else, I fancy,” replied his father. “By the way, Hector,
there is a paragraph about it in the Herald of this morning. I read
it, little suspecting that you were the boy whose name the reporter was
unable to learn.”

Hector read the paragraph in question with excusable pride. It was, in
the main, correct.

“How old was the little girl?” asked Walter.

“Four years old, I should think.”

“That isn’t quite so romantic as if she had been three times as old.”

“I couldn’t have rescued her quite as easily, in that case.”

Of course, Hector was called upon for an account of the affair, which
he gave plainly, without adding any of those embellishments which some
boys, possibly some of my young readers, might have been tempted to put
in.

“You are fortunate to have obliged a man like Titus Newman, Hector,”
 said Mr. Ross. “He is a man of great wealth and influence.”

“Do you know him, papa?” asked Walter.

“No--that is, not at all well. I have been introduced to him.”

Punctually at eight o’clock Hector ascended the steps of a handsome
residence on Madison Avenue. The door was opened by a colored servant,
of imposing manners.

“Is Mr. Newman at home?” asked Hector, politely.

“Yes, sar.”

“Be kind enough to hand him this card?”

“Yes, sar.”

Presently the servant reappeared, saying:

“Mr. Newman will see you, sar, in the library. I will induct you
thither.”

“Thank you,” answered Hector, secretly amused at the airs put on by his
sable conductor.

Seated at a table, in a handsomely furnished library, sat a stout
gentleman of kindly aspect. He rose quickly from his armchair and
advanced to meet our hero.

“I am glad to see you, my young friend,” he said. “Sit there,” pointing
to a smaller armchair opposite. “So you are the boy who rescued my dear
little girl?”

His voice softened as he uttered these last few words, and it was easy
to see how strong was the paternal love that swelled his heart.

“I was fortunate in having the opportunity, Mr. Newman.”

“You have rendered me a service I can never repay. When I think that but
for you the dear child--” his voice faltered.

“Don’t think of it, Mr. Newman,” said Hector, earnestly. “I don’t like
to think of it myself.”

“And you exposed yourself to great danger, my boy!”

“I suppose I did, sir; but that did not occur to me at the time. It was
all over in an instant.”

“I see you are modest, and do not care to take too great credit to
yourself, but I shall not rest till I have done something to express my
sense of your noble courage. Now, I am a man of business, and it is my
custom to come to the point directly. Is there any way in which I can
serve you.”

“Yes, sir.”

“I am glad to hear it. Name it.”

“I am looking for a situation in some mercantile establishment, Mr.
Newman.”

“Pardon me, but, judging from your appearance, I should not suppose that
it was a matter of importance to you.”

“Yes, sir; I am poor.”

“You don’t look so.”

“You judge from my dress, no doubt”--Hector was attired in a suit of
fine texture--“I suppose I may say,” he added, with a smile, “that I
have seen better days.”

“Surely, you are young to have met with reverses, if that is what you
mean to imply,” the merchant remarked, observing our hero with some
curiosity.

“Yes, sir; if you have time, I will explain to you how it happened.”

As the story has already been told, I will not repeat Hector’s words.

Mr. Newman listened with unaffected interest.

“It is certainly a curious story,” he said. “Did you, then, quietly
surrender your claims to the estate simply upon your uncle’s unsupported
assertion?”

“I beg pardon, sir. He showed me my father’s--that is, Mr.
Roscoe’s--letter.”

“Call him your father, for I believe he was.”

“Do you, sir?” asked Hector, eagerly.

“I do. Your uncle’s story looks like an invention. Let me think, was
your father’s name Edward Roscoe?”

“Yes, sir.”

“And in what year were you born?”

“In the year 1856.”

“At Sacramento?”

“Yes, sir.”

“Then I feel quite sure that I made your father’s acquaintance in the
succeeding year, and your own as well, though you were an infant--that
is, you were less than a year old.”

“Did my father say anything of having adopted me?”

“No; on the contrary, he repeatedly referred to you as his child, and
your mother also displayed toward you an affection which would have been
at least unusual if you had not been her own child.”

“Then you think, sir--” Hector began.

“I think that your uncle’s story is a mere fabrication. He has contrived
a snare in which you have allowed yourself to be enmeshed.”

“I am only a boy, sir. I supposed there was nothing for me to do but to
yield possession of the estate when my uncle showed me the letter.”

“It was natural enough; and your uncle doubtless reckoned upon your
inexperience and ignorance of the law.”

“What would you advise me to do, sir?”

“Let me think.”

The merchant leaned back in his chair, closed his eyes, and gave himself
up to reflection. In the midst of his reverie the pompous servant
entered, bringing a letter upon a silver salver.

“A letter, sar,” he said.

“That will do. You can go, Augustus.”

“Yes, sar.”

Mr. Newman glanced at the postmark, tore open the letter, read it with a
frown, and then, as if he had suddenly formed a resolution, he said:

“This letter has helped me to a decision.”

Hector regarded him with surprise. What could the letter have to do with
him?

“Have you any objection to going out to California by the next steamer?”
 asked Mr. New-man.

“No, sir,” answered Hector, with animation “Am I to go alone?”

“Yes, alone.”




CHAPTER XXXII. A WAYWARD YOUTH.



It is needless to say that Hector was very much surprised, not to say
startled, at this sudden proposal. What could Mr. Newman possibly want
him to go to California for? If on business, how did it happen that he
trusted a mere boy with so responsible a mission?

The explanation came soon.

“No doubt, you are surprised,” said the merchant, “at the proposal I
have made you. I am not prepared myself to say that I am acting with
good judgment. In making it, I have obeyed a sudden impulse, which
is not always prudent. Yet, in more than one instance, I have found
advantage in obeying such an impulse. But to my explanation. By the way,
let me first ask you two or three questions. Have you any taste for any
kind of liquor?”

“No, sir,” answered Hector, promptly.

“Even if you had, do you think you would have self-control enough to
avoid entering saloons and gratifying your tastes?”

“Yes, sir.”

“That is well. Do you play pool?”

“No, sir,” answered Hector, wondering whither all these questions
tended.

“I ask because playing pool in public rooms paves the way for
intemperance, as bars are generally connected with such establishments.”

“I don’t even know how to play pool, sir,” said Hector.

“Do you ever bet or gamble?” continued the merchant.

“No, sir.”

“You will understand why I ask all these questions when I tell you that
I have a nephew now nineteen years of age, who does all these things. He
is not only my nephew, but my ward. I have a moderate sum of money in my
charge which belongs to him--enough, if he were a young man of correct
habits, to buy him an interest in a respectable business. That use I
had proposed to make of it when he reached twenty-one, or rather, to
recommend to him, but for his yielding to temptation in more than one
form, and, finally, running away from my protection.”

“Where is he now, sir?”

“In California. Three months since he disappeared, and it was some
weeks before I learned where he had gone. As I do not intend to conceal
anything from you, I must tell you that he carried with him five hundred
dollars purloined from my desk. This grieved me most of all. I wrote out
to a mercantile friend in San Francisco, who knows the boy by sight, to
hunt him up, and see if he could do anything for him. He writes
me--this is the letter I hold in my hand--that he has seen Gregory, and
expostulated with him, but apparently without effect. The boy has pretty
much run through his money, and will soon be in need. I do not intend,
however, to send him money, for he would misuse it. I don’t think
it will do him any harm to suffer a little privation, as a fitting
punishment for his wayward courses. I would not wish him to suffer too
much, and I am anxious lest he should go further astray. I now come to
the explanation of my proposal to you. I wish you to go to California,
to seek out Gregory, obtain his confidence, and then persuade him to
give up his bad course, and come home with you, prepared to lead a
worthier life. Are you willing to undertake it?”

“Yes, sir,” answered Hector. “I will undertake it, since you are willing
to place such a responsibility upon me. I will do my best to accomplish
what you desire, but I may fail.”

“In that case I will not blame you,” answered the merchant.

“What sort of a boy is Gregory? Shall I find it difficult to gain his
confidence?”

“No; he is a youth of very amiable disposition--indeed, he was generally
popular among his companions and associates, but he is morally weak, and
finds it difficult to cope with temptation. I believe that a boy like
you will stand a better chance of influencing him than a man of mature
age.”

“I will do my best, sir.”

“One thing more. You may assure Gregory that I forgive him the theft of
my money, though it gave me great pain to find him capable of such an
act, and that I am prepared to receive him back into my favor if he will
show himself worthy of it. I will give you a letter to that effect. Now,
when will you be ready to start?”

“By the next steamer.”

“That is well.”




CHAPTER XXXIII. MR. ROSCOE MAKES A DISCOVERY.



The California steamer was to start in two days. This gave Hector but
little time for preparation, but then he had but scanty preparation to
make. Mr. Ross and Walter were naturally surprised at the confidence
placed in Hector by a stranger, but were inclined to think that our hero
would prove himself worthy of it.

“Don’t be gone long, Hector,” said Walter. “I shall miss you. I depended
upon having your company for a good while yet.”

“Come back to my house, Hector,” said Mr. Ross, cordially, “when you
return, whether you are successful or not. Consider it a home where you
are always welcome.”

“Thank you, sir,” said Hector, gratefully. “I wish you were my uncle
instead of Mr. Allan Roscoe.”

“By the way, Hector, take time, while you are in California, to go to
Sacramento to see if you can learn anything of your early history. It is
most important to you, and I’m sure Mr. Newman will not object.”

“He has already suggested it to me,” said Hector. “Moreover, he has
given me the name of the minister who baptized me, and, should he
be dead or removed, he has given me the name of another person--a
lady--with whom my father boarded during his residence in Sacramento.”

“It is to be hoped that one or the other of these persons may still be
living. It will afford me sincere pleasure if, by reliable testimony,
you can defeat the wicked conspiracy into which Mr. Roscoe has entered,
with the object of defrauding you of your inheritance.”

Hector’s ticket was purchased by Mr. Newman, and he was provided with
a considerable sum of money as well as an order upon a bank in San
Francisco for as much more as he might need.

“You are trusting me to an unusual extent, Mr. Newman,” said Hector.

“That is true, but I have no hesitation in doing so. I am a close
observer, and, though I have seen but little of you, I have seen enough
to inspire me with confidence.”

“I hope I shall deserve it, sir.”

“That depends upon yourself, so far as integrity and fidelity go.
Whether you succeed or not in your undertaking depends partly upon
circumstances.”

My young readers may wonder how Hector would be expected to recognize a
young man whom he had never seen. He was provided with a photograph of
Gregory, which had been taken but six months before, and which, as Mr.
Newman assured him, bore a strong resemblance to his nephew.

“He may have changed his name,” he said, “but he cannot change his face.
With this picture you will be able to identify him.”

The great steamer started on her long voyage. Walter and Mr. Crabb
stood on the pier and watched it till Hector’s face was no longer
distinguishable for the distance, and then went home, each feeling that
he had sustained a loss.

Among those who watched the departure of the steamer was a person who
escaped Hector’s notice, for he arrived just too late to bid good-by to
an acquaintance who was a passenger on board.

This person was no other than Allan Roscoe.

When he recognized Hector’s face among the passengers he started in
surprise and alarm.

“Hector Roscoe going to California!” he inwardly ejaculated. “What can
be his object, and where did he raise money to go?”

Conscience whispered: “He has gone to ferret out the fraud which you
have practiced upon him, and his mission is fraught with peril to you.”

Allan Roscoe returned to his elegant home in a state of nervous
agitation, which effectually prevented him from enjoying the luxuries
he was now able to command. A sword seemed suspended over him, but
he resolved not to give up the large stake for which he played so
recklessly without a further effort.

By the next mail he wrote a confidential letter to an old acquaintance in
San Francisco.




CHAPTER XXXIV. FIRST IMPRESSIONS OF SAN FRANCISCO.



Hector was seasick for the first twenty-four hours, but at the end of
that time he had become accustomed to the rise and fall of the billows,
and was prepared to enjoy himself as well as he could in the confined
quarters of an ocean steamer.

Of course, he made acquaintances. Among them was a clergyman, of middle
age, who was attracted by our hero’s frank countenance. They met
on deck, and took together the “constitutional” which travelers on
shipboard find essential for their health.

“You seem to be alone?” said the clergyman.

“Yes, sir.”

“Pardon me, but it is uncommon to meet one so young as yourself who
is making so long a journey. I suppose, however, you have friends or
relatives in California.”

“No, sir; I know no one, to my knowledge, in the Golden State.”

“Then, perhaps, you go out in search of employment?”

“No, sir; I go out on business.”

“You are a young business man,” said the clergyman, smiling.

“Perhaps I should rather say, on a mission. I am sent out, by a New York
merchant, in search of his nephew, who is somewhere in San Francisco.”

Hector explained himself further. The minister, Mr. Richards, listened
with attention.

“Certainly,” he said, “a great responsibility rests upon you. Mr. Newman
must have great confidence in you.”

“I hope he will not find it misplaced,” answered Hector, modestly.

“It is certainly a compliment to you that a shrewd business man should
consider you worthy of such confidence. The presumption is that he has
good reason for his confidence. I think, my young friend, that you will
enjoy your visit to our State.”

“Then you reside there, sir?”

“Oh, yes. I went out twenty years since; in fact, just after I graduated
from the theological school. I spent a year at the mines; but, at the
end of that time, finding an opening in my profession, I accepted the
charge of a church in Sacramento.”

“In Sacramento?” exclaimed Hector, eagerly.

“Yes. Have you any associations with that city?”

“It is my birthplace, sir.”

“Then you are not a stranger to California?”

“Yes, sir; I came away so early that I have no recollection of the
place.”

“What is your name?” asked the clergyman.

“Hector Roscoe.”

“Roscoe? The name sounds familiar to me,” said the minister,
thoughtfully.

“How long since you went to Sacramento, Mr. Richards?”

“I went there in 1855.”

“And I was born there in 1856. My father and mother lived there for some
time afterwards.”

“It is probable that I met them, for Sacramento was a small place then.
Shall you go there?”

“Yes, sir. I have a special reason for going--a reason most important to
me.”

As Mr. Richards naturally looked inquisitive, Hector confided in him
further.

“You see, sir,” he concluded, “that it is most important to me to
ascertain whether I am really the son of the man whom I have always
regarded as my father. If so, I am heir to a large fortune. If not, my
uncle is the heir, and I certainly should not wish to disturb him in the
enjoyment of what the law awards him.”

“That is quite proper,” said Mr. Richards. “In your investigation, it
is quite possible that I may be able to help you materially, through my
long residence and extensive acquaintance in Sacramento. When you come
there, lose no time in calling upon me. Whatever help I can render you
shall cheerfully be given.”

“Thank you, sir.”

“Shall you be much disappointed if you find that you are only the
adopted, instead of the real, son of Mr. Roscoe?”

“Yes, sir; but it won’t be chiefly on account of the property. I shall
feel alone in the world, without relations or family connections, with
no one to sympathize with me in my successes, or feel for me in my
disappointments.”

“I understand you, and I can enter into your feelings.”

Arrived in San Francisco, Hector took lodgings at a comfortable hotel on
Kearney Street. He didn’t go to the Palace Hotel, or Baldwin’s, though
Mr. Newman had supplied him with ample funds, and instructed him to
spend whatever he thought might be necessary.

“I mean to show myself worthy of his confidence,” said Hector to
himself.

He arrived in the evening, and was glad to remain quietly at the hotel
the first evening, and sleep off the effects of his voyage. After
the contracted stateroom, in which he had passed over twenty days,
he enjoyed the comfort and luxury of a bed on shore and a good-sized
bedroom. But, in the morning, he took a long walk, which was full of
interest. Less than five minutes’ walk from his hotel was the noted
Chinese quarter. Curiously enough, it is located in the central part
of the business portion of San Francisco. Set a stranger down in this
portion of the city, and the traveler finds it easy to imagine himself
in some Chinese city. All around him, thronging the sidewalks, he will
see almond-eyed men, wearing long queues, and clad in the comfortable,
but certainly not elegant, flowing garments which we meet only
occasionally in our Eastern cities, on the person of some laundryman.
Then the houses, too, with the curious names on the signs, speak of a
far-off land. On every side, also, is heard the uncouth jargon of the
Chinese tongue.

There is a part of San Francisco that is known as the Barbary Coast. It
is that part which strangers will do well to avoid, for it is the haunt
of the worst portion of the population. Here floats many a hopeless
wreck, in the shape of a young man, who has yielded to the seductions of
drink and the gaming table--who has lost all hope and ambition, and is
fast nearing destruction.

If Hector allowed himself to explore this quarter, it was not because
he found anything to attract him, for his tastes were healthy, but he
thought, from the description of Gregory Newman, that he would stand a
better chance of meeting him here than in a more respectable quarter.

Hector halted in front of a building, which he judged to be a gambling
house. He did not care to enter, but he watched, with curiosity, those
who entered and those who came out.

As he was standing there, a man of forty touched him on the shoulder.

Hector turned, and was by no means attracted by the man’s countenance.
He was evidently a confirmed inebriate, though not at that time under
the influence of liquor. There was an expression of cunning, which
repelled Hector, and he drew back.

“I say, boy,” said the stranger, “do you want to go in?”

“No, sir.”

“If you do, I know the ropes, and I’ll introduce you and take care of
you.”

“Thank you,” said Hector, “but I don’t care to go in.”

“Are you afraid?” asked the man, with a slight sneer.

“Yes. Haven’t I a reason?”

“Come, sonny, don’t be foolish. Have you any money?”

“A little.”

“Give it to me and I’ll play for you. I’ll double it in ten minutes, and
I’ll only ask you five dollars for my services.”

“Suppose you lose?”

“I won’t lose,” said the man, confidently. “Come,” he said, in a
wheedling tone, “let me make some money for you.”

“Thank you, but I would rather not. I don’t want to make money in any
such way.”

“You’re a fool!” said the man, roughly, and with an air of disgust he
left the spot, much to Hector’s relief.

Still Hector lingered, expecting he hardly knew what, but it chanced
that fortune favored him. He was just about to turn away, when a youth,
two or three years older than himself in appearance, came out of the
gambling house. He was pale, and looked as if he had kept late hours. He
had the appearance, also, of one who indulges in drink.

When Hector’s glance fell upon the face of the youth, he started in
great excitement.

“Surely,” he thought, “that must be Gregory Newman!”




CHAPTER XXXV. THE PRODIGAL.



As the best way of getting into communication with the youth whom he
suspected to be the object of his search, Hector asked him the name of
the street.

On receiving an answer, he said, in an explanatory way:

“I am a stranger here. I only arrived on the last steamer.”

The other looked interested.

“Where do you come from?”

“From New York.”

“I used to live there,” said Gregory--for it was he--with a sigh.

“Have you bettered yourself by coming out here?” asked Hector.

Gregory shook his head.

“No,” he said; “I begin to think I was a fool to come at all.”

“Perhaps you had poor prospects in New York?” said Hector.

“No; my uncle is a rich merchant there. I have some property, also, and
he is my guardian.”

“Did he favor your coming?”

“No; he was very much opposed to it.”

“Perhaps I ought not to take such a liberty, but I begin to agree with
you about your being a fool to leave such prospects behind you.”

“Oh, I am not offended. It is true enough.”

“I suppose you haven’t prospered, then,” said Hector.

“Prospered? Look at me! Do you see how shabby I am?”

Gregory certainly did look shabby. His clothes were soiled and frayed,
and he had the appearance of a young tramp.

“That isn’t the worst of it,” he added, bitterly. “I have spent my last
cent, and am penniless.”

“That is bad, certainly. Did you lose any of it in there?” said Hector,
indicating the gaming house.

“I have lost full half of it there,” answered Gregory. “This morning I
found myself reduced to four bits--”

“To what?” inquired Hector, puzzled.

“Oh, I forgot you had just arrived. Four bits is fifty cents. Well, I
was reduced to that, and, instead of saving it for my dinner, I went in
there and risked it. If I had been lucky, I might have raised it to ten
dollars, as a man next to me did; but I’m out of luck, and I don’t know
what to do.”

“Why don’t you go back to your uncle in New York?”

“What! and walk all the way without food?” said Gregory, bitterly.

“Of course you couldn’t go without money. Suppose you had the money,
would you go?”

“I should be afraid to try it,” said Gregory, smiling.

“Why? Don’t you think he would receive you back?”

“He might but for one thing,” answered Gregory.

“What is that?”

“I may as well tell you, though I am ashamed to,” said Gregory,
reluctantly. “I left New York without his knowledge, and, as I knew he
wouldn’t advance me money out of my own property, I took five hundred
dollars from his desk.”

“That was bad,” said Hector, quietly, but he didn’t look shocked or
terror-stricken, for this would probably have prevented any further
confidence.

“It wasn’t exactly stealing,” said Gregory, apologetically, “for I knew
he could keep back the money from my property. Still, he could represent
it as such and have me arrested.”

“I don’t think he would do that.”

“I don’t want to run the risk. You see now why I don’t dare to go back
to New York. But what on earth I am to do here I don’t know.”

“Couldn’t you get employment?” asked Hector, for he wished Gregory to
understand his position fully.

“What! in this shabby suit? Respectable business men would take me for a
hoodlum.”

Hector knew already that a “hoodlum” in San Francisco parlance is a term
applied to street loafers from fifteen to twenty-five years of age, who
are disinclined to work and have a premature experience of vice.

“Suppose you were assured that your uncle would receive you back and
give you another chance?”

Gregory shook his head.

“I don’t believe he would, and I am afraid I don’t deserve it. No,
I must try to get to the mines in some way. How are you fixed?” said
Gregory, turning suddenly to Hector. “Could you spare a five-dollar gold
piece for a chap that’s been unfortunate?”

“Perhaps I might; but I am afraid you would go back into the gambling
house and lose it, as you did your other money.”

“No, I won’t; I promise you that. Four bits was nothing. Five dollars
would give me a chance of going somewhere where I could earn a living.”

Gregory seemed to speak sincerely, and Hector thought it would do him no
harm to reveal himself and his errand.

“Your name is Gregory Newman, isn’t it?” he inquired.

Gregory stared at him in uncontrollable amazement.

“How do you know that?” he inquired.

“And your uncle’s name is Titus Newman?”

“Yes, but--”

“He lives on Madison Avenue, does he not?”

“Yes, yes; but who are you that seem to know so much about me?”

“My name is Hector Roscoe.”

“Did I know you in New York?”

“No; I never met you, to my knowledge.”

“Then how do you recognize me and know my name?”

In answer, Hector took from his pocket a photograph of Gregory and
displayed it.

“How did you come by that?” asked Gregory, hurriedly. “Are you a
detective?”

Gregory looked so startled that Hector had hard work not to laugh. It
seemed ludicrous to him that he should be supposed to be a detective on
Gregory’s track, as the boy evidently suspected.

“No,” he answered, “I am not a detective, but a friend. I have come out
to San Francisco especially to find you.”

“You won’t inform against me?” asked Gregory, nervously.

“Not at all. I come as a friend, with a message from your uncle---”

“What is it?” asked Gregory, eagerly.

“He wants you to come back to New York, and he will give you another
chance.”

“Is this true?”

“Yes; will you come?”

“I shall be glad to leave San Francisco,” said Gregory, fervently. “I
have had no luck since I arrived here.”

“Do you think you deserved any?” said Hector, significantly.

“No, perhaps not,” Gregory admitted.

“When will you be ready to return?”

“You forget that I have no money.”

“I have, and will pay your passage.”

Gregory grasped the hands of our hero gratefully.

“You are a trump!” said he.

Then he looked at his wretched and dilapidated suit.

“I don’t like to go home like this,” he said. “I should be mortified if
I met my uncle or any of my old acquaintances.”

“Oh, that can be remedied,” said Hector. “If you can lead the way to a
good clothing house, where the prices are moderate, I will soon improve
your appearance.”

“That I will!” answered Gregory, gladly.

Within five minutes’ walk was a good clothing house, on Kearney Street.
The two entered, and a suit was soon found to fit Gregory. Then they
obtained a supply of underclothing, and Gregory breathed a sigh of
satisfaction. His self-respect returned, and he felt once more like his
old self.

“Now,” said Hector, “I shall take you to my hotel, and enter your name
as a guest. You and I can room together.”

“Do you know,” said Gregory, “I almost fear this is a dream, and that
I shall wake up again a tramp, as you found me half an hour ago? I was
almost in despair when you met me.”

Though Gregory seemed quite in earnest in his desire to turn over a new
leaf, Hector thought it prudent to keep the funds necessary for their
journey in his own possession. He gave a few dollars to Gregory as
spending money, but disregarded any hints looking to a further advance.




CHAPTER XXXVI. HOW HECTOR SUCCEEDED IN SACRAMENTO.



Now that Hector had succeeded in the main object of his journey, he had
time to think of his own affairs. It was most important for him to visit
Sacramento and make inquiries into the matter that so nearly concerned
him.

“I must find out,” he said to himself, “whether I am entitled to the
name I bear, or whether I only received it by adoption.”

The second day after his discovery of Gregory Newman, he said to him:

“Gregory, business of importance calls me to Sacramento. Do you wish to
go with me?”

“Does the business in any way relate to me?” asked Gregory.

“Not at all.”

“Then I prefer to remain in San Francisco.”

“Can I trust you not to fall back into your old ways?” asked Hector.

“Yes; I have had enough of them,” answered Gregory, and there was a
sincerity in his tone which convinced Hector that he might safely leave
him.

“I shall probably stay overnight,” he said. “If I stay any longer, I
will telegraph to you.”

Arrived in Sacramento, Hector sought out the residence of the Rev. Mr.
Richards, whose acquaintance he had made on board the steamer.

His clerical friend received him with evident pleasure.

“How have you fared, my young friend?” he asked.

“Very well, sir. I have succeeded in my mission.”

“Then you have found the youth you were in search of?”

“Yes, sir; moreover, I have induced him to return home with me, and turn
over a new leaf.”

“That is indeed good news. And now, I think I have also good news for
you.”

“Please let me know it, sir,” said Hector, eagerly.

“I have found the lady with whom your father and mother boarded while
they were in Sacramento.”

“What does she say?”

“She says,” answered Mr. Richards, promptly, “that you are Mr. Roscoe’s
own son, and were born in her house.”

“Thank Heaven!” ejaculated Hector.

“Nor is this all. I have found the minister who baptized you. He is
still living, at a very advanced age--the Rev. Mr. Barnard. I called
upon him, and recalled his attention to the period when your father
lived in the city. I found that he remembered both your parents very
well. Not only that, but he has a very full diary covering that time, in
which he showed me this record:

“‘Baptized, June 17th, Hector, the son of Thomas and Martha Roscoe; a
bright, healthy child, in whom the parents much delight.”

“Then it seems to me,” said Hector, “that my case is a very strong one.”

“Unusually so. In fact, it could not be stronger. I marvel how Allan
Roscoe, your uncle, could have ventured upon a fraud which could be so
easily proved to be such.”

“He depended upon Sacramento being so far away,” said Hector. “He
thought I would accept my father’s letter without question.”

“That letter was undoubtedly forged,” said the minister.

“It must have been, but it was very cleverly forged. The handwriting
was a very close copy of my father’s.” It was a great pleasure to Hector
that he could say “my father” without a moment’s doubt that he was
entitled to say so.

“He thought, also, that you would not have the means to come here to
investigate for yourself,” said Mr. Richards.

“Yes, and he would have been right but for the commission Mr. Newman
gave me. What course would you advise me to take,” asked Hector, a
little later, “to substantiate my claim?”

“Get Mrs. Blodgett’s and Rev. Mr. Barnard’s sworn affidavits, and place
them in the hands of a reliable lawyer, requesting him to communicate
with your uncle.”

This advice seemed to Hector to be wise, and he followed it.
Fortunately, he had no difficulty in inducing both parties to accede to
his request. The next day he returned to San Francisco.




CHAPTER XXXVII. A NARROW ESCAPE.



Armed with the affidavits which were to restore to him the position in
life of which his uncle had wickedly deprived him, Hector returned to
San Francisco. He found Gregory unaffectedly glad to see him.

“Glad to see you back, Hector,” he said; “I missed you.”

Hector was glad to find that Gregory had not taken advantage of his
absence to indulge in any of his old excesses. He began to hope that he
had already turned over the new leaf which was so desirable.

“I know what you are thinking of,” said Gregory, after Hector had
returned his salutation. “You are wondering whether I ‘cut up’ any while
you were gone.”

“You don’t look as if you had,” said Hector, smiling.

“No; I have had enough of sowing wild oats. It doesn’t pay. Shall I tell
you what I did last evening?”

“If you like.”

“I attended a lecture illustrated with the stereopticon. I was in bed at
ten.”

“Gregory,” said Hector, taking his hand, “you don’t know how glad I am
to hear this. I am sure your uncle will be delighted when you return to
him so changed.”

“I’ve made a great fool of myself,” said Gregory, candidly. “Hereafter I
am going to make you my model.”

Hector blushed deeply, for he was a modest boy.

“You compliment me too much, Gregory,” he said. “Still, if you are in
earnest, I will try to set you a good example.”

“You won’t have any trouble in doing that. You are one of the fellows
that find it easy to be good.”

“I am not sure of that, Gregory. Still, I mean to do my best.”

In the evening the two boys attended a theatrical performance. It was
not till after eleven o’clock that they emerged from the theatre, and
slowly, not by the most direct way, sauntered home.

There was no thought of danger in the mind of either, yet, as a fact,
Hector had never in his life been exposed to peril so serious as that
evening. Lurking behind in the shadow a shabby-looking man followed
the two boys, keeping his eyes steadily on Hector. At a place specially
favorable, our hero was startled by hearing a bullet whiz by his ear. He
turned instantly, and so did Gregory. They saw a man running, and
they pursued him. They might not have caught up with him, but that he
stumbled and fell. Instantly they were upon him.

“Well,” he said, sullenly, “you’ve caught me after all.”

“Were you the man who fired at me?” asked Hector, “or was it my friend
here you sought to kill?”

“I was firing at you,” answered their captive, coolly. “Now, what are
you going to do with me?”

“Was this forced upon you by want? Did you wish to rob me?”

“No; I had another motive.”

“What was it?”

“If I tell you, will you let me go free?”

Hector hesitated.

The man proceeded, speaking with emphasis.

“If I tell you who put me up to this, and furnish you proofs so that you
can bring it to him, will you let me go?”

“You will not renew the attempt?” asked Hector.

“No,” answered the man; “it isn’t likely; I shall have no further
motive.”

“Yes, I agree.”

“Read that letter, then.”

“There isn’t light enough. Will you accompany me to the hotel, where I
can read it?”

“I will.”

The three walked together to the hotel, where Hector and Gregory were
staying. There Hector read the letter. He was astonished and horrified
when he discovered that it was from his uncle to this man, with whom he
seemed to have an acquaintance, describing Hector, and promising him a
thousand dollars if he would put him out of the way.

“This is very important,” said Hector, gravely. “Are you ready to
accompany me to New York and swear to this?”

“Yes, if you will pay my expenses.”

By the next steamer Hector, Gregory and the stranger, who called himself
Reuben Pearce, sailed for New York.




CHAPTER XXXVIII. CONCLUSION.



Allan Roscoe sat at the breakfast table with Guy opposite him. Though
Mr. Roscoe was not altogether free from anxiety since he had learned of
Hector’s expedition to California, he had taught himself to believe that
there was little chance of the boy’s ferreting out the imposition he had
practiced upon him. He had been a poor and struggling man most of his
life, having, when quite a young man, squandered his inheritance, and
his present taste of affluence was most agreeable. He felt that he could
not part with Castle Roscoe.

“But I am safe enough,” he said to himself; “even if Hector discovered
anything, something might happen to him, so that he might be unable to
return.”

“Father,” said Guy, who had just dispatched an egg, “I want ten dollars
this morning.”

“Ten dollars!” said his father, frowning. “How is this? Did I not give
you your week’s allowance two days since?”

“Well, I’ve spent it,” answered Guy, “and I need some more.”

“You must think I am made of money,” said his father, displeased.

“It’s pretty much so,” said Guy, nonchalantly. “Your income must be ten
thousand a year.”

“I have a great many expenses. How have you spent your allowance?”

“Oh, I can’t tell exactly. It’s gone, at any rate. You mustn’t become
mean, father.”

“Mean! Don’t I give you a handsome allowance? Look here, Guy, I can’t
allow such extravagance on your part. This once I’ll give you five
dollars, but hereafter, you must keep within your allowance.”

“Can’t you make it ten?”

“No, I can’t,” said his father, shortly.

Guy rose from the table, and left the room, whistling.

“The old man’s getting mean,” he said. “If he doesn’t allow me more, I
shall have to get in debt.”

As Guy left the room, the mail was brought in. On one of the envelopes,
Mr. Roscoe saw the name of his lawyer. He did not think much of it,
supposing it related to some minor matter of business. The letter ran
thus:

“ALLAN ROSCOE, ESQ.:

“DEAR SIR: Be kind enough to come up to the city at once. Business of
great importance demands your attention.

“Yours respectfully, TIMOTHY TAPE.”

“Mr. Tape is unusually mysterious,” said Allan Roscoe to himself,
shrugging his shoulders. “I will go up to-day. I have nothing to keep me
at home.”

Mr. Roscoe ordered the carriage, and drove to the depot. Guy, noticing
his departure, asked permission to accompany him.

“Not to-day, Guy,” he answered. “I am merely going up to see my lawyer.”

Two hours later Mr. Roscoe entered the office of his lawyer.

“Well, Tape, what’s up?” he asked, in an easy tone. “Your letter was
mysterious.”

“I didn’t like to write explicitly,” said Mr. Tape, gravely.

“The matter, you say, is of great importance?”

“It is, indeed! It is no less than a claim for the whole of your late
brother’s estate.”

“Who is the claimant?” asked Allan Roscoe, perturbed.

“Your nephew, Hector.”

“I have no nephew Hector. The boy called Hector Roscoe is an adopted son
of my brother.”

“I know you so stated. He says he is prepared to prove that he is the
lawful son of the late Mr. Roscoe.”

“He can’t prove it!” said Allan Roscoe, turning pale.

“He has brought positive proof from California, so he says.”

“Has he, then, returned?” asked Allan, his heart sinking.

“He is in the city, and expects us to meet him at two o’clock this
afternoon, at the office of his lawyer, Mr. Parchment.”

Now, Mr. Parchment was one of the most celebrated lawyers at the New
York bar, and the fact that Hector had secured his services showed Allan
Roscoe that the matter was indeed serious.

“How could he afford to retain so eminent a lawyer?” asked Allan Roscoe,
nervously.

“Titus Newman, the millionaire merchant, backs him.”

“Do you think there is anything in his case?” asked Allan, slowly.

“I can tell better after our interview at two o’clock.”

At five minutes to two Allan Roscoe and Mr. Tape were ushered into the
private office of Mr. Parchment.

“Glad to see you, gentlemen,” said the great lawyer, with his usual
courtesy.

Two minutes later Hector entered, accompanied by Mr. Newman. Hector
nodded coldly to his uncle. He was not of a vindictive nature, but he
could not forget that this man, his own near relative, had not only
deprived him of his property, but conspired against his life.

“Hector,” said Allan Roscoe, assuming a confidence he did not feel, “I
am amazed at your preposterous claim upon the property my brother left
to me. This is a poor return for his kindness to one who had no claim
upon him.”

“Mr. Parchment will speak for me,” said Hector, briefly.

“My young client,” said the great lawyer, “claims to be the son of the
deceased Mr. Roscoe, and, of course, in that capacity, succeeds to his
father’s estate.”

“It is one thing to make the claim, and another to substantiate it,”
 sneered Allan Roscoe.

“Precisely so, Mr. Roscoe,” said Mr. Parchment. “We quite agree with
you. Shall I tell you and your learned counsel what we are prepared to
prove?”

Mr. Roscoe nodded uneasily.

“We have the affidavits of the lady with whom your brother boarded
in Sacramento, and in whose house my young client was born. We have,
furthermore, the sworn testimony of the clergyman, still living, who
baptized him, and we can show, though it is needless, in the face of
such strong proof, that he was always spoken of in his infancy by Mr.
and Mrs. Roscoe as their child.”

“And I have my brother’s letter stating that he was only adopted,”
 asserted Allan Roscoe.

“Even that, admitting it to be genuine,” said Mr. Parchment, “cannot
disprove the evidence I have already alluded to. If you insist upon it,
however, we will submit the letter to an expert, and--”

“This is a conspiracy. I won’t give up the estate,” said Allan,
passionately.

“We also claim that there is a conspiracy,” said Mr. Parchment,
smoothly, “and there is one circumstance that will go far to confirm
it.”

“What is that?” demanded Allan Roscoe.

“It is the attempt made upon my young client’s life in San Francisco by
an agent of yours, Mr. Roscoe.”

“It is a lie!” said Allan, hoarsely, shaking, nevertheless, with fear.

At a sign from Mr. Parchment, Hector opened the door of the office to
give admission to Reuben Pearce.

At a sight of this man Allan Roscoe utterly collapsed. He felt that all
was lost!

“Gentlemen,” he said, “I will give up the estate, but for Heaven’s sake,
don’t prosecute me for this!”

There was an informal conference, in which it was agreed that Allan
Roscoe should make no resistance to Hector’s claim, but restore the
estate to him. Hector promised, though this was against his lawyer’s
advice, to give his uncle, who would be left penniless, the sum of two
thousand dollars in cash, and an allowance of a hundred dollars per
month for his life. He appointed Mr. Newman his guardian, being a minor,
and was once more a boy of fortune. He resolved to continue his studies,
and in due time go to college, thus preparing himself for the high
position he would hereafter hold.

As for Allan Roscoe, he and his son, Guy, lost no time in leaving the
neighborhood. Guy was intensely mortified at this turn of the wheel,
which had again brought his cousin uppermost, and was quite ready to
accompany his father to Chicago, where they are living at present. But
he had formed extravagant tastes, and has been a source of trouble and
solicitude to his father, who, indeed, hardly deserves the comfort of a
good son.

Hector lost no time, after being restored to his old position, in
re-engaging Larry Deane’s father, who had been discharged by his uncle.

He paid him his usual wages for all the time he had been out of place,
and considerably raised his pay for the future.

“Larry shall never want a friend as long as I live,” he assured Mr.
Deane. “He was a friend to me when I needed one, and I will take care
to give him a good start in life.” He redeemed this promise by securing
Larry a place in Mr. Newman’s employ, and voluntarily allowed him as
large a weekly sum as the merchant paid him in addition, so that Larry
could live comfortably in the city. I am glad to say that Larry has
shown himself deserving of this kindness, and has already been promoted
to an important and better paid position.

A word about Smith Institute. It never recovered from the blow that it
had received at the time when Hector found himself forced to leave it.
One after another the pupils left, and Mr. Smith felt that his race as
a schoolmaster was run. He advertised the institute for sale, and who do
you think bought it? Who but Hector Roscoe, who probably paid more for
it than anyone else would.

My readers will hardly suppose that he wanted it for himself. In a
cordial letter he presented it to Mr. Crabb, the late usher, when he had
finished his engagement with Walter Boss, and the name was changed to
“Crabb Institute.” It was not long before it regained its old patronage,
for Mr. Crabb was not only a good scholar, but was fair and just to
the pupils, ruling them rather by love than fear. He has married the
daughter of a neighboring clergyman, who is a judicious helper and
contributes to the success of the school.

As for Jim Smith, the last heard of him was to this effect: He had
strayed out to St. Louis, and, after a few months of vicissitude, had
secured the position of bartender in a low liquor saloon. He has very
little chance of rising higher. The young tyrant of Smith Institute has
not done very well for himself, but he has himself to blame for it.

To return to Hector. I think we are justified in predicting for him a
prosperous future. He behaved well in adversity. He is not likely to be
spoiled by prosperity, but promises to grow up a good and manly man, who
will seek to do good as he goes along, and so vindicate his claim to the
exceptional good fortune which he enjoys.

THE END.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Hector’s Inheritance, by Horatio Alger

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK HECTOR’S INHERITANCE ***

***** This file should be named 5674-0.txt or 5674-0.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/5/6/7/5674/

Produced by Carrie Fellman

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase “Project
Gutenberg”), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  “Project Gutenberg” is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation (“the Foundation”
 or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase “Project Gutenberg” appears, or with which the phrase “Project
Gutenberg” is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase “Project Gutenberg” associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
“Plain Vanilla ASCII” or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original “Plain Vanilla ASCII” or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, “Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.”

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
“Defects,” such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the “Right
of Replacement or Refund” described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you ‘AS-IS’ WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm’s
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation’s EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state’s laws.

The Foundation’s principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation’s web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.


The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Telegraph Boy, by Horatio Alger, Jr.

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Telegraph Boy

Author: Horatio Alger, Jr.

Release Date: December 24, 2007 [EBook #24013]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE TELEGRAPH BOY ***




Produced by David Edwards, Mary Meehan and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from scans of public domain material
produced by Microsoft for their Live Search Books site.)









                           THE TELEGRAPH BOY.

                         BY HORATIO ALGER, JR.,

AUTHOR OF "RAGGED DICK SERIES," "LUCK AND PLUCK SERIES," "BRAVE AND BOLD
SERIES," ETC., ETC.

                         HORATIO ALGER'S BOOKS
                          FOR BOYS AND GIRLS.




    THE JOHN C. WINSTON CO.
    PHILADELPHIA
    CHICAGO      TORONTO


    To
    THREE YOUNG FRIENDS,
    LORIN AND BEATRICE BERNHEIMER,
    AND
    FLORINE ARNOLD,
    This Story
    IS AFFECTIONATELY DEDICATED.




PREFACE.


The "Telegraph Boy" completes the series of sketches of street-life in
New York inaugurated eleven years since by the publication of "Ragged
Dick." The author has reason to feel gratified by the warm reception
accorded by the public to these pictures of humble life in the great
metropolis. He is even more gratified by the assurance that his labors
have awakened a philanthropic interest in the children whose struggles
and privations he has endeavored faithfully to describe. He feels it his
duty to state that there is no way in which these waifs can more
effectually be assisted than by contributing to the funds of "The
Children's Aid Society," whose wise and comprehensive plans for the
benefit of their young wards have already been crowned with abundant
success.

The class of boys described in the present volume was called into
existence only a few years since, but they are already so numerous that
one can scarcely ride down town by any conveyance without having one for
a fellow-passenger. Most of them reside with their parents and have
comfortable homes, but a few, like the hero of this story, are wholly
dependent on their own exertions for a livelihood. The variety of
errands on which they are employed, and their curious experiences, are
by no means exaggerated in the present story. In its preparation the
author has been assisted by an excellent sketch published perhaps a year
since in the "New York Tribune."

    HORATIO ALGER, JR.
    NEW YORK, Sept. 1, 1879.




THE TELEGRAPH BOY.




CHAPTER I.

A YOUNG CARPET-BAGGER.


"Twenty-five cents to begin the world with!" reflected Frank Kavanagh,
drawing from his vest-pocket two ten-cent pieces of currency and a
nickel. "That isn't much, but it will have to do."

The speaker, a boy of fifteen, was sitting on a bench in City-Hall Park.
He was apparently about fifteen years old, with a face not handsome, but
frank and good-humored, and an expression indicating an energetic and
hopeful temperament. A small bundle, rolled up in a handkerchief,
contained his surplus wardrobe. He had that day arrived in New York by a
boat from Hartford, and meant to stay in the city if he could make a
living.

Next to him sat a man of thirty-five, shabbily dressed, who clearly was
not a member of any temperance society, if an inflamed countenance and
red nose may be trusted. Frank Kavanagh's display of money attracted his
attention, for, small as was the boy's capital, it was greater than his
own.

"Been long in the city, Johnny?" he inquired.

"I only arrived to-day," answered Frank. "My name isn't Johnny, though."

"It's immaterial. Johnny is a generic term," said the stranger. "I
suppose you have come here to make your fortune."

"I shall be satisfied with a living to begin with," said Frank.

"Where did you come from?"

"A few miles from Hartford."

"Got any relations there?"

"Yes,--an uncle and aunt."

"I suppose you were sorry to leave them."

"Not much. Uncle is a pretty good man, but he's fond of money, and aunt
is about as mean as they make 'em. They got tired of supporting me, and
gave me money enough to get to New York."

"I suppose you have some left," said the stranger, persuasively.

"Twenty-five cents," answered Frank, laughing. "That isn't a very big
capital to start on, is it?"

"Is that all you've got?" asked the shabbily dressed stranger, in a tone
of disappointment.

"Every cent."

"I wish I had ten dollars to give you," said the stranger, thoughtfully.

"Thank you, sir; I wish you had," said Frank, his eyes resting on the
dilapidated attire of his benevolent companion. Judging from that, he
was not surprised that ten dollars exceeded the charitable fund of the
philanthropist.

"My operations in Wall street have not been fortunate of late," resumed
the stranger; "and I am in consequence hard up."

"Do you do business in Wall street?" asked Frank, rather surprised.

"Sometimes," was the reply. "I have lost heavily of late in Erie and
Pacific Mail, but it is only temporary. I shall soon be on my feet
again."

"I hope so, sir," said Frank, politely.

"My career has been a chequered one," continued the stranger. "I, too,
as a mere boy, came up from the country to make my fortune. I embarked
in trade, and was for a time successful. I resigned to get time to write
a play,--a comedy in five acts."

Frank regarded his companion with heightened respect. He was a boy of
good education, and the author of a play in his eyes was a man of
genius.

"Was it played?" he inquired.

"No; Wallack said it had too many difficult characters for his company,
and the rest of the managers kept putting me off, while they were
producing inferior plays. The American public will never know what they
have lost. But, enough of this. Sometime I will read you the
'Mother-in-law,' if you like. Have you had dinner?"

"No," answered Frank. "Do you know where I can dine cheap?" he
inquired.

"Yes," answered the stranger. "Once I boarded at the Astor House, but
now I am forced, by dire necessity, to frequent cheap restaurants.
Follow me."

"What is your name, sir?" asked Frank, as he rose from the bench.

"Montagu Percy," was the reply. "Sorry I haven't my card-case with me,
or I would hand you my address. I think you said your name was not
Johnny."

"My name is Frank Kavanagh."

"A very good name. 'What's in a name?' as Shakespeare says."

As the oddly assorted pair crossed the street, and walked down Nassau
street, they attracted the attention of some of the Arabs who were
lounging about Printing-House square.

"I say, country, is that your long-lost uncle?" asked a boot-black.

"No, it isn't," answered Frank, shortly.

Though he was willing to avail himself of Mr. Percy's guidance, he was
not ambitious of being regarded as his nephew.

"Heed not their ribald scoffs," said Montagu Percy, loftily. "Their
words pass by me 'like the idle wind,' which I regard not."

"Who painted your nose, mister?" asked another boy, of course addressing
Frank's companion.

"I will hand you over to the next policeman," exclaimed Percy, angrily.

"Look out he don't haul you in, instead," retorted the boy.

Montagu Percy made a motion to pursue his tormentors, but desisted.

"They are beneath contempt," he said. "It is ever the lot of genius to
be railed at by the ignorant and ignoble. They referred to my nose being
red, but mistook the cause. It is a cutaneous eruption,--the result of
erysipelas."

"Is it?" asked Frank, rather mystified.

"I am not a drinking man--that is, I indulge myself but rarely. But here
we are."

So saying he plunged down some steps into a basement, Frank following
him. Our hero found himself in a dirty apartment, provided with a bar,
over which was a placard, inscribed:--

"FREE LUNCH."

"How much money have you got, Frank?" inquired Montagu Percy.

"Twenty-five cents."

"Lunch at this establishment is free," said Montagu; "but you are
expected to order some drink. What will you have?"

"I don't care for any drink except a glass of water."

"All right; I will order for you, as the rules of the establishment
require it; but I will drink your glass myself. Eat whatever you like."

Frank took a sandwich from a plate on the counter and ate it with
relish, for he was hungry. Meanwhile his companion emptied the two
glasses, and ordered another.

"Can you pay for these drinks?" asked the bar-tender, suspiciously.

"Sir, I never order what I cannot pay for."

"I don't know about that. You've been in here and taken lunch more than
once without drinking anything."

"It may be so. I will make up for it now. Another glass, please."

"First pay for what you have already drunk."

"Frank, hand me your money," said Montagu.

Frank incautiously handed him his small stock of money, which he saw
instantly transferred to the bar-tender.

"That is right, I believe," said Montagu Percy.

The bar-keeper nodded, and Percy, transferring his attention to the free
lunch, stowed away a large amount.

Frank observed with some uneasiness the transfer of his entire cash
capital to the bar-tender; but concluded that Mr. Percy would refund a
part after they went out. As they reached the street he broached the
subject.

"I didn't agree to pay for both dinners," he said, uneasily.

"Of course not. It will be my treat next time. That will be fair, won't
it?"

"But I would rather you would give me back a part of my money. I may not
see you again."

"I will be in the Park to-morrow at one o'clock."

"Give me back ten cents, then," said Frank, uneasily. "That was all the
money I had."

"I am really sorry, but I haven't a penny about me. I'll make it right
to-morrow. Good-day, my young friend. Be virtuous and you will be
happy."

Frank looked after the shabby figure ruefully. He felt that he had been
taken in and done for. His small capital had vanished, and he was adrift
in the streets of a strange city without a penny.




CHAPTER II.

DICK RAFFERTY.


"I've been a fool," said Frank to himself, in genuine mortification, as
he realized how easily he had permitted himself to be duped. "I ought to
have stayed in the country."

Even a small sum of money imparts to its possessor a feeling of
independence, but one who is quite penniless feels helpless and
apprehensive. Frank was unable even to purchase an apple from the snuffy
old apple-woman who presided over the stand near by.

"What am I going to do?" he asked himself, soberly.

"What has become of your uncle?" asked a boot-black.

Looking up, Frank recognized one of those who had saluted Percy and
himself on their way to the restaurant.

"He isn't my uncle," he replied, rather resentfully.

"You never saw him before, did you?" continued the boy.

"No, I didn't."

"That's what I thought."

There was something significant in the young Arab's tone, which led
Frank to inquire, "Do you know him?"

"Yes, he's a dead-beat."

"A what?"

"A dead-beat. Don't you understand English?"

"He told me that he did business on Wall street."

The boot-black shrieked with laughter.

"He do business on Wall street!" he repeated. "You're jolly green, you
are!"

Frank was inclined to be angry, but he had the good sense to see that
his new friend was right. So he said good-humoredly, "I suppose I am.
You see I am not used to the city."

"It's just such fellows as you he gets hold of," continued the
boot-black. "Didn't he make you treat?"

"I may as well confess it," thought Frank. "This boy may help me with
advice."

"Yes," he said aloud. "I hadn't but twenty-five cents, and he made me
spend it all. I haven't a cent left."

"Whew!" ejaculated the other boy. "You're beginnin' business on a small
capital."

"That's so," said Frank. "Do you know any way I can earn money?"

Dick Rafferty was a good-natured boy, although rough, and now that Frank
had appealed to him for advice he felt willing to help him, if he could.

"What can you do?" he asked, in a business-like tone. "Have you ever
worked?"

"Yes," answered Frank.

"What can you do?"

"I can milk cows, hoe corn and potatoes, ride horse to plough, and--"

"Hold up!" said Dick. "All them things aint goin' to do you no good in
New York. People don't keep cows as a reg'lar thing here."

"Of course I know that."

"And there aint much room for plantin' corn and potatoes. Maybe you
could get a job over in Jersey."

"I'd rather stay in New York. I can do something here."

"Can you black boots, or sell papers?"

"I can learn."

"You need money to set up in either of them lines," said Dick Rafferty.

"Would twenty-five cents have been enough?" asked Frank.

"You could have bought some evening papers with that."

"I wish somebody would lend me some money," said Frank; "I'd pay it back
as soon as I'd sold my papers. I was a fool to let that fellow swindle
me."

"That's so," assented Dick; "but it's no good thinkin' of that now. I'd
lend you the money myself, if I had it; but I've run out my account at
the Park Bank, and can't spare the money just at present."

"How long have you been in business?" asked Frank.

"Ever since I was eight years old; and I'm goin' on fifteen now."

"You went to work early."

"Yes, I had to. Father and mother both died, and I was left to take care
of myself."

"You took care of yourself when you were only eight years old?" asked
Frank, in surprise.

"Yes."

"Then I ought to make a living, for I am fifteen,--a year older than you
are now."

"Oh, you'll get along when you get started," said Dick, encouragingly.
"There's lots of things to do."

"Is there anything to do that doesn't require any capital?" inquired
Frank, anxiously.

"Yes, you can smash baggage."

"Will people pay for that?" asked Frank, with a smile.

"Of course they will. You jest hang round the ferries and steamboat
landin's, and when a chap comes by with a valise or carpet-bag, you jest
offer to carry it, that's all."

"Is that what you call smashing baggage?"

"Of course. What did you think it was?"

Frank evaded answering, not caring to display his country ignorance.

"Do you think I can get a chance to do that?" he asked.

"You can try it and see."

"I came in by the Hartford boat myself, to-day," said Frank. "If I'd
thought of it, I would have begun at once."

"Only you wouldn't have knowed the way anywhere, and if a gentleman
asked you to carry his valise to any hotel you'd have had to ask where
it was."

"So I should," Frank admitted.

"I'll show you round a little, if you want me to," said Dick. "I shan't
have anything to do for an hour or two."

"I wish you would."

So the two boys walked about in the lower part of the city, Dick
pointing out hotels, public buildings, and prominent streets. Frank had
a retentive memory, and stored away the information carefully. Penniless
as he was, he was excited and exhilarated by the scene of activity in
which he was moving, and was glad he was going to live in it, or to
attempt doing so.

"When I am used to it I shall like it much better than the country," he
said to Dick. "Don't you?"

"I don't know about that," was the reply. "Sometimes I think I'll go
West;--a lot of boys that I know have gone there."

"Won't it take a good deal of money to go?" asked Frank.

"Oh, there's a society that pays boys' expenses, and finds 'em nice
homes with the farmers. Tom Harrison, one of my friends, went out six
weeks ago, and he writes me that it's bully. He's gone to some town in
Kansas."

"That's a good way off."

"I wouldn't mind that. I'd like ridin' in the cars."

"It would be something new to you; but I've lived in the country all my
life, I'd rather stay here awhile."

"It's just the way a feller feels," said Dick philosophically. "I've
bummed around so much I'd like a good, stiddy home, with three square
meals a day and a good bed to sleep on."

"Can't you get that here?" asked Frank.

"Not stiddy. Sometimes I don't get but one square meal a day."

Frank became thoughtful. Life in the city seemed more precarious and
less desirable than he anticipated.

"Well, I must go to work again," said Dick, after a while.

"Where are you going to sleep to-night?" asked Frank.

"I don't know whether I'd better sleep at the Astor House or Fifth
avenue," said Dick.

Frank looked perplexed.

"You don't mean that, do you?" he asked.

"Of course I don't. You're too fresh. Don't get mad," he continued
good-naturedly, seeing the flush on Frank's cheek. "You'll know as much
about the city as I do before long. I shall go to the Newsboys' Lodgin'
House, where I can sleep for six cents."

"I wish I had six cents," said Frank. "If I could only get work I'd soon
earn it. You can't think of anything for me to do, can you?"

Dick's face lighted up.

"Yes," he said, "I can get you a job, though it aint a very good one. I
wonder I didn't think of it before."

"What is it?" asked Frank, anxiously.

"It's to go round with a blind man, solicitin' contributions."

"You mean begging?"

"Yes; you lead him into stores and countin' rooms, and he asks for
money."

"I don't like it much," said Frank, slowly, "but I must do something.
After all, it'll be he that's begging, not I."

"I'll take you right round where he lives," said Dick. "Maybe he'll go
out this evenin'. His other boy give him the slip, and he hasn' got a
new one yet."




CHAPTER III.

FRANK FINDS AN EMPLOYER.


A stone's throw from Centre street stands a tall tenement-house,
sheltering anywhere from forty to fifty families in squalid
wretchedness. The rent which each family pays would procure a neat house
in a country town, with perhaps a little land beside; but the city has a
mysterious fascination for the poorer classes, and year after year many
who might make the change herd together in contracted and noisome
quarters, when they might have their share of light and space in country
neighborhoods.

It was in front of this tenement-house that Dick halted, and plunged
into a dark entrance, admonishing Frank to follow. Up creaking and
dilapidated staircases to the fourth floor the boys went.

"Here we are," said Dick, panting a little from the rapidity of his
ascent, and began a vigorous tattoo on a door to the left.

"Is this where the blind gentleman lives?" asked Frank, looking around
him dubiously.

"He isn't much of a gentleman to look at," said Dick, laughing. "Do you
hear him?"

Frank heard a hoarse growl from the inside, which might have been "Come
in." At any rate, Dick chose so to interpret it, and opened the door.

The boys found themselves in a scantily furnished room, with a close,
disagreeable smell pervading the atmosphere. In the corner was a low
bedstead, on which lay a tall man, with a long, gray beard, and a
disagreeable, almost repulsive, countenance. He turned his eyes, which,
contrary to Frank's expectations, were wide open, full upon his
visitors.

"What do you want?" he asked querulously. "I was asleep, and you have
waked me up."

"Sorry to disturb you, Mr. Mills," said Dick; "but I come on business."

"What business can you have with me?" demanded the blind man. "Who are
you?"

"I am Dick Rafferty. I black boots in the Park," replied Dick.

"Well, I haven't got any money to pay for blacking boots."

"I didn't expect you had. I hear your boy has left you."

"Yes, the young rascal! He's given me the slip. I expect he's robbed me
too; but I can't tell, for I'm blind."

"Do you want a new boy?"

"Yes; but I can't pay much. I'm very poor. I don't think the place will
suit you."

"Nor I either," said Dick, frankly. "I'd rather make a living outside.
But I've got a boy with me who has just come to the city, and is out of
business. I guess he'll engage with you."

"What's his name? Let him speak for himself."

"My name is Frank Kavanagh," said our hero, in a clear, distinct voice.

"How old are you?"

"Fifteen."

"Do you know what your duties will be?"

"Yes; Dick has told me."

"I told him you'd want him to go round on a collecting tour with you
every day," said Dick.

"That isn't all. You'll have to buy my groceries and all I need."

"I can do that," said Frank, cheerfully, reflecting that this would be
much more agreeable than accompanying the old man round the streets.

"Are you honest?" queried the blind man, sharply.

Frank answered, with an indignant flush, "I never stole a cent in my
life."

"I supposed you'd say that," retorted the blind man, with a sneer. "They
all do; but a good many will steal for all that."

"If you're afraid I will, you needn't hire me," said Frank,
independently.

"Of course I needn't," said Mills, sharply; "but I am not afraid. If you
take any of my money I shall be sure to find it out, if I am blind."

"Don't mind him, Frank," said Dick, in a low voice.

"What's that?" asked the blind man, suspiciously. "What are you two
whispering about?"

"I told Frank not to mind the way you spoke," said Dick.

"Your friend will lend you some, then."

"Not much," answered Dick, laughing. "I'm dead-broke. Haven't you got
any money, Mr. Mills?"

"I have a little," grumbled the blind man; "but this boy may take it,
and never come back."

"If you think so," said Frank, proudly, "you'd better engage some other
boy."

"No use; you're all alike. Wait a minute, and I'll give you some money."

He drew from his pocket a roll of scrip, and handed one to Frank.

"I don't think that will be enough," said Frank. "It's only five cents."

"Are you sure it isn't a quarter?" grumbled Mills.

"Yes, sir."

"What do you say,--you, Dick?"

"It's only five cents, sir."

"Is that twenty-five?"

"Yes, sir."

"Then take it, and mind you don't loiter."

"Yes, sir."

"And be sure to bring back the change."

"Of course I will," said Frank indignantly, resenting his employer's
suspicion.

"What do you think of him, Frank?" asked Dick, as they descended the
stairs.

"I don't like him at all, Dick," said Frank, decidedly. "I wish I could
get something else to do."

"You can, after a while. As you have no capital you must take what you
can get now."

"So I suppose; but I didn't come to the city for this."

"If you don't like it you can leave in a few days."

This Frank fully resolved to do at the first favorable opportunity.

Dick showed him where he could buy the articles he was commissioned to
purchase; and Frank, after obtaining them, went back to the
tenement-house.

Mills scrupulously demanded the change, and put it back into his pocket.
Then he made Frank pour out the ale into a glass. This he drank with
apparent zest, but offered none to Frank.

"Ale isn't good for boys," he said. "You can cut the bread, and eat two
slices. Don't cut them too thick."

The blind man ate some of the bread himself, and then requested Frank to
help him on with his coat and vest.

"I haven't taken any money to-day," he said "I must try to collect some,
or I shall starve. It's a sad thing to be blind," he continued, his
voice changing to a whine.

"You don't look blind," said Frank, thoughtfully. "Your eyes are open."

"What if they are?" said Mills, testily. "I cannot see. When I go out I
close them, because the light hurts them."

Led by Frank, the blind man descended the stairs, and emerged into the
street.




CHAPTER IV.

"PITY THE BLIND."


"Where shall I lead you?" asked Frank.

"To Broadway first. Do you know Broadway?"

"Yes, sir."

"Be careful when we cross the street, or you will have me run over."

"All right, sir."

"If any one asks you about me, say I am your uncle."

"But you are not."

"What difference does that make, you little fool?" said the blind man,
roughly. "Are you ashamed to own me as your uncle?"

Frank felt obliged, out of politeness, to say "No;" but in his own mind
he was not quite sure whether he would be willing to acknowledge any
relationship to the disagreeable old man whom he was leading.

They reached Broadway, and entered a store devoted to gentlemen's
furnishing goods.

"Charity for a poor blind man!" whined Mills, in the tone of a
professional beggar.

"Look here, old fellow, you come in here too often," said a young
salesman. "I gave you five cents yesterday."

"I didn't know it," said Mills. "I am a poor blind man. All places are
alike to me."

"Then your boy should know better. Nothing for you to-day."

Frank and his companion left the store.

In the next they were more fortunate. A nickel was bestowed upon the
blind mendicant.

"How much is it?" asked Mills, when they were on the sidewalk.

"Five cents, sir."

"That's better than nothing, but we ought to do better. It takes a good
many five-cent pieces to make a dollar. When you see a well-dressed lady
coming along, tell me."

Frank felt almost as much ashamed as if he were himself begging, but he
must do what was expected of him. Accordingly he very soon notified the
blind man that a lady was close at hand.

"Lead me up to her, and say, Can you spare something for my poor, blind
uncle?"

Frank complied in part, but instead of "poor, blind uncle" he said
"poor, blind man." Mills scowled, as he found himself disobeyed.

"How long has he been blind?" asked the lady, sympathetically.

"For many years," whined Mills.

"Is this your boy?"

"Yes, ma'am; he is my young nephew, from the country."

"You are fortunate in having him to go about with you."

"Yes, ma'am; I don't know what I should do without him."

"Here is something for you, my good man," said the lady, and passed on.

"Thank you, ma'am. May Heaven bless you!"

"How much is it?" he asked quickly, when the lady was out of hearing.

"Two cents," answered Frank, suppressing with difficulty an inclination
to laugh.

"The mean jade! I should like to wring her neck!" muttered Mills. "I
thought it was a quarter, at least."

In the next store they did not meet a cordial reception.

"Clear out, you old humbug!" shouted the proprietor, who was in
ill-humor. "You ought to be put in the penitentiary for begging about
the streets."

"I pray to God that you may become blind yourself," said Mills,
passionately.

"Out of my store, or I'll have you arrested, both of you!" said the
angry tradesman. "Here, you boy, don't you bring that old fraud in this
store again, if you know what's best for yourself."

There was nothing to do but to comply with this peremptory order.

"He's a beast!" snarled Mills; "I'd like to put his eyes out myself."

"You haven't got a very amiable temper," thought Frank. "I wouldn't
like to be blind; but even if I were, I would try to be pleasanter."

Two young girls, passing by, noticed the blind man. They were
soft-hearted, and stopped to inquire how long he had been blind.

"Before you were born, my pretty maid," said Mills, sighing.

"I have an aunt who is blind," said one of the girls; "but she is not
poor, like you."

"I am very poor," whined Mills; "I have not money enough to pay my rent,
and I may be turned out into the street."

"How sad!" said the young girl, in a tone of deep sympathy. "I have not
much money, but I will give you all I have."

"May God bless you, and spare your eyes!" said Mills, as he closed his
hand upon the money.

"How much is it?" he asked as before, when they had passed on.

"Twenty-five cents," said Frank.

"That is better," said Mills, in a tone of satisfaction.

For some time afterwards all applications were refused; in some cases,
roughly.

"Why don't you work?" asked one man, bluntly.

"What can I do?" asked Mills.

"That's your lookout. Some blind men work. I suppose you would rather
get your living by begging."

"I would work my fingers to the bone if I could only see," whined Mills.

"So you say; but I don't believe it. At any rate, that boy of yours can
see. Why don't you set him to work?"

"He has to take care of me."

"I would work if I could get anything to do," said Frank.

As he spoke, he felt his hand pressed forcibly by his companion, who did
not relish his answer.

"I cannot spare him," he whined. "He has to do everything for me."

When they were again in the street, Mills demanded, roughly, "What did
you mean by saying that?"

"What, sir?"

"That you wanted to go to work."

"Because it is true."

"You are at work; you are working for me," said Mills.

"I would rather work in a store, or an office, or sell papers."

"That wouldn't do me any good. Don't speak in that way again."

The two were out about a couple of hours, and very tiresome Frank found
it. Then Mills indicated a desire to go home, and they went back to the
room in the old tenement-house. Mills threw himself down on the bed in
the corner, and heaved a sigh of relief.

"Now, boy, count the money we have collected," he said.

"There's ninety-three cents," Frank announced.

"If I had known it was so near a dollar we would have stayed a little
longer. Now, get me my pipe."

"Where is it, sir?"

"In the cupboard. Fill it with tobacco, and light it."

"Are you not afraid of setting the bedding on fire, sir?"

"Mind your own business. If I choose to set it on fire, I will," snarled
Mills.

"Very well, sir; I thought I'd mention it."

"You have mentioned it, and you needn't do it again."

"What a sweet temper you've got!" thought Frank.

He sat down on a broken chair, and, having nothing else to do, watched
his employer. "He looks very much as if he could see," thought Frank;
for Mills now had his eyes wide open.

"What are you staring at me for, boy?" demanded his employer, rather
unexpectedly.

"What makes you think I am staring at you, sir?" was Frank's natural
question. "I thought you couldn't see."

"No more I can, but I can tell when one is staring at me. It makes me
creep all over."

"Then I'll look somewhere else."

"Would you like to do some work, as you said?"

"Yes, sir."

"Then take twenty-five cents, and buy some evening papers and sell them;
but mind you bring the money to me."

"Yes, sir," said Frank, with alacrity.

Anything he thought would be better than sitting in that dull room with
so disagreeable a companion.

"Mind you don't run off with the money," said the blind man, sharply.
"If you do I'll have you put in the Tombs."

"I don't mean to run away with the money," retorted Frank, indignantly.

"And when you've sold the papers, come home."

"Yes, sir."

With a feeling of relief, Frank descended the stairs and directed his
steps to the Park, meaning to ask Dick Rafferty's advice about the
proper way to start in business as a newsboy.




CHAPTER V.

FRANK THROWS UP HIS SITUATION.


Frank found his friend on Park Row, and made known his errand.

"So old Mills wants you to sell papers for his benefit, does he?"

"Yes, but I'd rather do it than to stay with him."

"How much has he agreed to pay you?"

"That isn't settled yet."

"You'd better bring him to the point, or he won't pay you anything
except board and lodging, and mighty mean both of them will be."

"I won't say anything about it the first day," said Frank. "What papers
shall I buy?"

"It's rather late. You'd better try for Telegrams."

Frank did so, and succeeded in selling half a dozen, yielding a profit
of six cents. It was not a brilliant beginning, but he was late in the
field, and most had purchased their evening papers. His papers sold,
Frank went home and announced the result.

"Umph!" muttered the blind man. "Give me the money."

"Here it is, sir."

"Have you given me all?" sharply demanded Mills.

"Of course I have," said Frank, indignantly.

"Don't you be impudent, or I will give you a flogging," said the blind
man, roughly.

"I am not used to be talked to in that way," said Frank, independently.

"You've always had your own way, I suppose," snarled Mills.

"No, I haven't; but I have been treated kindly."

"You are only a boy, and I won't allow you to talk back to me. Do you
hear?"

"Yes."

"Then take care to remember."

"You've got a sweet disposition," thought Frank. "I won't stay with you
any longer than I am obliged to."

Several days passed without bringing any incidents worth recording.
Frank took a daily walk with the blind man, sometimes in the morning,
sometimes in the afternoon. These walks were very distasteful to him.
The companion of a beggar, he felt as if he himself were begging. He
liked better the time he spent in selling papers, though he reaped no
benefit himself. In fact, his wages were poor enough. Thus far his fare
had consisted of dry bread with an occasional bun. He was a healthy,
vigorous boy, and he felt the need of meat, or some other hearty food,
and ventured to intimate as much to his employer.

"So you want meat, do you?" snarled Mills.

"Yes, sir; I haven't tasted any for a week."

"Perhaps you'd like to take your meals at Delmonico's?" sneered the
blind man.

Frank was so new to the city that this well-known name did not convey
any special idea to him, and he answered "Yes."

"That's what I thought!" exclaimed Mills, angrily. "You want to eat me
out of house and home."

"No, I don't; I only want enough food to keep up my strength."

"Well, you are getting it. I give you all I can afford."

Frank was inclined to doubt this. He estimated that what he ate did not
cost his employer over six or eight cents a day, and he generally earned
for him twenty to thirty cents on the sale of papers, besides helping
him to collect about a dollar daily from those who pitied his blindness.

He mentioned his grievance to his friend, Dick Rafferty.

"I'll tell you what to do," said Dick.

"I wish you would."

"Keep some of the money you make by selling papers, and buy a square
meal at an eatin' house."

"I don't like to do that; it wouldn't be honest."

"Why wouldn't it?"

"I am carrying on the business for Mr. Mills. He supplies the capital."

"Then you'd better carry it on for yourself."

"I wish I could."

"Why don't you?"

"I haven't any money."

"Has he paid you any wages?"

"No."

"Then make him."

Frank thought this a good suggestion. He had been with Mills a week, and
it seemed fair enough that he should receive some pay besides a wretched
bed and a little dry bread. Accordingly, returning to the room, he
broached the subject.

"What do you want wages for?" demanded Mills, displeased.

"I think I earn them," said Frank, boldly.

"You get board and lodging. You are better off than a good many boys."

"I shall want some clothes, some time," said Frank.

"Perhaps you'd like to have me pay you a dollar a day," said Mills.

"I know you can't afford to pay me that. I will be satisfied if you will
pay me ten cents a day," replied Frank.

Frank reflected that, though this was a very small sum, in ten days it
would give him a dollar, and then he would feel justified in setting up
a business on his own account, as a newsboy. He anxiously awaited an
answer.

"I will think of it," said the blind man evasively, and Frank did not
venture to say more.

The next day, when Mills, led by Frank, was on his round, the two
entered a cigar-store. Frank was much surprised when the cigar-vender
handed him a fifty-cent currency note. He thought there was some
mistake.

"Thank you, sir," he said; "but did you mean to give me fifty cents?"

"Yes," said the cigar-vender, laughing; "but I wouldn't have done it, if
it had been good."

"Isn't it good?"

"No, it's a counterfeit, and a pretty bad one. I might pass it, but it
would cost me too much time and trouble."

Frank was confounded. He mechanically handed the money to Mills, but did
not again thank the giver. When they returned to the tenement-house,
Mills requested Frank to go to the baker's for a loaf of bread.

"Yes, sir."

"Here is the money."

"But that is the counterfeit note," said Frank, scrutinizing the bill
given him.

"What if it is?" demanded Mills, sharply.

"It won't pass."

"Yes, it will, if you are sharp."

"Do you want me to pass counterfeit money, Mr. Mills?"

"Yes, I do; I took it, and I mean to get rid of it."

"But you didn't give anything for it."

"That's neither here nor there. Take it, and offer it to the baker. If
he won't take it, go to another baker with it."

"I would rather not do it," said Frank, firmly.

"Rather not!" exclaimed Mills, angrily. "Do you pretend to dictate to
me?"

"No, I don't, but I don't mean to pass any counterfeit money for you or
any other man," said Frank, with spirit.

Mills half rose, with a threatening gesture, but thought better of it.

"You're a fool," said he. "I suppose you are afraid of being arrested;
but you have only to say that I gave it to you, and that I am blind, and
couldn't tell it from good money."

"But you know that it is bad money, Mr. Mills."

"What if I do? No one can prove it. Take the money, and come back as
quick as you can."

"You must excuse me," said Frank, quietly, but firmly.

"Do you refuse to do as I bid you?" demanded Mills, furiously.

"I refuse to pass counterfeit money."

"Then, by Heaven, I'll flog you!"

Mills rose and advanced directly towards Frank, with his eyes wide open.
Fortunately our hero was near the door, and, quickly opening it, darted
from the room, pursued by Mills, his face flaming with wrath. It
flashed upon Frank that no blind man could have done this. He decided
that the man was a humbug, and could see a little, at all events. His
blindness was no doubt assumed to enable him to appeal more effectively
to the sympathizing public. This revelation disgusted Frank. He could
not respect a man who lived by fraud. Counterfeit or no counterfeit, he
decided to withdraw at once and forever from the service of Mr. Mills.

His employer gave up the pursuit before he reached the street. Frank
found himself on the sidewalk, free and emancipated, no richer than when
he entered the service of the blind man, except in experience.

"I haven't got a cent," he said to himself, "but I'll get along
somehow."




CHAPTER VI.

FRANK GETS A JOB.


Though Frank was penniless he was not cast down. He was tolerably
familiar with the lower part of the city, and had greater reliance on
himself than he had a week ago. If he had only had capital to the extent
of fifty cents he would have felt quite at ease, for this would have set
him up as a newsboy.

"I wonder if I could borrow fifty cents of Dick Rafferty," considered
Frank. "I'll try, at any rate."

He ran across Dick in City-Hall Park. That young gentleman was engaged
in pitching pennies with a brother professional.

"I say, Dick, I want to speak to you a minute," said Frank.

"All right! Go ahead!"

"I've lost my place."

Dick whistled.

"Got sacked, have you?" he asked.

"Yes; but I might have stayed."

"Why didn't you?"

"Mills wanted me to pass a counterfeit note, and I wouldn't."

"Was it a bad-looking one?"

"Yes."

"Then you're right. You might have got nabbed."

"That wasn't the reason I refused. If I had been sure there'd have been
no trouble I wouldn't have done it."

"Why not?" asked Dick, who did not understand our hero's scruples.

"Because it's wrong."

Dick shrugged his shoulders.

"I guess you belong to the church," he said.

"No, I don't; what makes you think so?"

"Oh, 'cause you're so mighty particular. I wouldn't mind passing it if I
was sure I wouldn't be cotched."

"I think it's almost as bad as stealing to buy bread, or anything else,
and give what isn't worth anything for it. You might as well give a
piece of newspaper."

Though Frank was unquestionably right he did not succeed in making a
convert of Dick Rafferty. Dick was a pretty good boy, considering the
sort of training he had had; but passing bad money did not seem to him
objectionable, unless "a fellow was cotched," as he expressed it.

"Well, what are you going to do now?" asked Dick, after a pause.

"I guess I can get a living by selling papers."

"You can get as good a livin' as old Mills gave you. You'll get a better
bed at the lodgin'-house than that heap of rags you laid on up there."

"But there's one trouble," continued Frank, "I haven't any money to
start on. Can you lend me fifty cents?"

"Fifty cents!" repeated Dick. "What do you take me for? If I was
connected with Vanderbuilt or Astor I might set you up in business, but
now I can't."

"Twenty-five cents will do," said Frank.

"Look here, Frank," said Dick, plunging his hands into his pocket, and
drawing therefrom three pennies and a nickel, "do you see them?"

"Yes."

"Well, it's all the money I've got."

"I am afraid you have been extravagant, Dick," said Frank, in
disappointment.

"Last night I went to Tony Pastor's, and when I got through I went into
a saloon and got an ice-cream and a cigar. You couldn't expect a feller
to be very rich after that. I say, I'll lend you five cents if you want
it."

"No, thank you, Dick. I'll wait till you are richer."

"I tell you what, Frank, I'll save up my money, and by day after
to-morrow I guess I can set you up."

"Thank you, Dick. If I don't have the money by that time myself I'll
accept your offer."

There was no other boy with whom Frank felt sufficiently well acquainted
to request a loan, and he walked away, feeling rather disappointed. It
was certainly provoking to think that nothing but the lack of a small
sum stood between him and remunerative employment. Once started he
determined not to spend quite all his earnings, but to improve upon his
friend Dick's practice, and, if possible, get a little ahead.

When guiding the blind man he often walked up Broadway, and mechanically
he took the same direction, walking slowly along, occasionally stopping
to look in at a shop-window.

As he was sauntering along he found himself behind two gentlemen,--one
an old man, who wore gold spectacles; the other, a stout,
pleasant-looking man, of middle age. Frank would not have noticed them
particularly but for a sudden start and exclamation from the elder of
the two gentlemen.

"I declare, Thompson," he said, "I've left my umbrella down-town."

"Where do you think you left it?"

"In Peckham's office; that is, I think I left it there."

"Oh, well, he'll save it for you."

"I don't know about that. Some visitor may carry it away."

"Never mind, Mr. Bowen. You are rich enough to afford a new one."

"It isn't the value of the article, Thompson," said his friend, in some
emotion. "That umbrella was brought me from Paris by my son John, who
died. It is as a souvenir of him that I regard and value it. I would not
lose it for a hundred dollars, nay, five hundred."

"If you value it so much, sir, suppose we turn round and go back for
it."

Frank had listened to this conversation, and an idea struck him.
Pressing forward, he said respectfully, "Let me go for it, sir. I will
get it, and bring it to your house."

The two gentlemen fixed their eyes upon the bright, eager face of the
petitioner.

"Who are you, my boy?" asked Mr. Thompson.

"I am a poor boy, in want of work," answered our hero promptly.

"What is your name?"

"Frank Kavanagh."

"Where do you live?"

"I am trying to live in the city, sir."

"What have you been doing?"

"Leading a blind man, sir."

"Not a very pleasant employment, I should judge," said Thompson,
shrugging his shoulders. "Well, have you lost that job?"

"Yes, sir."

"So the blind man turned you off, did he?"

"Yes, sir."

"Your services were unsatisfactory, I suppose?"

"He wanted me to pass counterfeit money for him, and I refused."

"If that is true, it is to your credit."

"It is true, sir," said Frank, quietly.

"Come, Mr. Bowen, what do you say,--shall we accept this boy's services?
It will save you time and trouble."

"If I were sure he could be trusted," said Bowen, hesitating. "He might
pawn the umbrella. It is a valuable one."

"I hope, sir, you won't think so badly of me as that," said Frank, with
feeling. "If I were willing to steal anything, it would not be a gift
from your dead son."

"I'll trust you, my boy," said the old gentleman quickly. "Your tone
convinces me that you may be relied upon."

"Thank you, sir."

The old gentleman drew a card from his pocket, containing his name and
address, and on the reverse side wrote the name of the friend at whose
office he felt sure the umbrella had been left, with a brief note
directing that it be handed to the bearer.

"All right, sir."

"Stop a moment, my boy. Have you got money to ride?"

"No, sir."

"Here, take this, and go down at once in the next stage. The sooner you
get there the better."

Frank followed directions. He stopped the next stage, and got on board.
As he passed the City-Hall Park, Dick Rafferty espied him. Frank nodded
to him.

"How did he get money enough to ride in a 'bus?" Dick asked himself in
much wonderment. "A few minutes ago he wanted to borrow some money of
me, and now he's spending ten cents for a ride. Maybe he's found a
pocket-book."

Frank kept on his way, and got out at Wall street. He found Mr.
Peckham's office, and on presenting the card, much to his delight, the
umbrella was handed him.

"Mr. Bowen was afraid to trust me with it over night," said Mr. Peckham,
with a smile.

"He thought some visitor might carry it off," said Frank.

"Not unlikely. Umbrellas are considered common property."

Frank hailed another stage, and started on his way up-town. There was no
elevated railway then, and this was the readiest conveyance, as Mr.
Bowen lived on Madison avenue.




CHAPTER VII.

AN INVITATION TO DINNER.


"Mr. Bowen must be a rich man," thought Frank, as he paused on the steps
of a fine brown-stone mansion, corresponding to the number on his card.

He rang the bell, and asked, "Is Mr. Bowen at home?"

"Yes, but he is in his chamber. I don't think he will see you."

"I think he will," said Frank, who thought the servant was taking too
much upon herself, "as I come by his appointment."

"I suppose you can come into the hall," said the servant, reluctantly.
"Is your business important?"

"You may tell him that the boy he sent for his umbrella has brought it.
He was afraid he had lost it."

"He sets great store by that umbrella," said the girl, in a different
tone. "I'll go and tell him."

Mr. Bowen came downstairs almost immediately. There was a look of
extreme gratification upon his face.

"Bless my soul, how quick you were!" he exclaimed. "Why, I've only been
home a few minutes. Did you find the umbrella at Mr. Peckham's office?"

"Yes, sir; it had been found, and taken care of."

"Did Peckham say anything?"

"He said you were probably afraid to trust it with him over night, but
he smiled when he said it."

"Peckham will have his joke, but he is an excellent man. My boy, I am
much indebted to you."

"I was very glad to do the errand, sir," said Frank.

"I think you said you were poor," said the old man, thoughtfully.

"Yes, sir. When I met you I hadn't a cent in the world."

"Haven't you any way to make a living?"

"Yes, sir. I could sell papers if I had enough money to set me up in
business."

"Does it require a large capital?"

"Oh, no, sir," said Frank, smiling, "unless you consider fifty cents a
large sum."

"Fifty cents!" repeated the old gentleman, in surprise. "You don't mean
to say that this small sum would set you up in business?"

"Yes, sir; I could buy a small stock of papers, and buy more with what I
received for them."

"To be sure. I didn't think of that."

Mr. Bowen was not a man of business. He had an ample income, and his
tastes were literary and artistic. He knew more of books than of men,
and more of his study than of the world.

"Well, my boy," he said after a pause, "how much do I owe you for doing
this errand?"

"I leave that to you, sir. Whatever you think right will satisfy me."

"Let me see, you want fifty cents to buy papers, and you will require
something to pay for your bed."

"Fifty cents in all will be enough, sir."

"I think I had better give you a dollar," said the old gentleman,
opening his pocket-book.

Frank's eyes sparkled. A dollar would do him a great deal of good; with
a dollar he would feel quite independent.

"Thank you, sir," he said. "It is more than I earned, but it will be
very acceptable."

He put on his hat, and was about to leave the house, when Mr. Bowen
suddenly said, "Oh, I think you'd better stay to dinner. It will be on
the table directly. My niece is away, and if you don't stay I shall be
alone."

Frank did not know what to say. He was rather abashed by the invitation,
but, as the old gentleman was to be alone, it did not seem so
formidable.

"I am afraid I don't look fit," he said.

"You can go upstairs and wash your face and hands. You'll find a
clothes-brush there also. I'll ring for Susan to show you the way."

He rang the bell, and the girl who had admitted Frank made her
appearance.

"Susan," said her master, "you may show this young gentlemen into the
back chamber on the third floor, and see that he is supplied with towels
and all he needs. And you may lay an extra plate; he will dine with me."

Susan stared first at Mr. Bowen, and then at Frank, but did not venture
to make any remark.

"This way, young man," she said, and ascended the front stairs, Frank
following her closely.

She led the way into a handsomely furnished chamber, ejaculating, "Well,
I never!"

"I hope you'll find things to your satisfaction, sir," she said, dryly.
"If we'd known you were coming, we'd have made particular preparations
for you."

"Oh, I think this will do," said Frank, smiling for he thought it a good
joke.

"I am glad you think it'll do," continued Susan. "Things mayn't be as
nice as you're accustomed to at home."

"Not quite," said Frank, good-humoredly; "but I shan't complain."

"That's very kind and considerate of you, I'm sure," said Susan, tossing
her head. "Well, I never did!"

"Nor I either, Susan," said Frank, laughing. "I am a poor boy, and I am
not used to this way of living; so if you'll be kind enough to give me
any hints, so I may behave properly at the table, I'll be very much
obliged to you."

This frank acknowledgment quite appeased Susan, and she readily complied
with our hero's request.

"But I must be going downstairs, or dinner will be late," she said,
hurriedly. "You can come down when you hear the bell ring."

Frank had been well brought up, though not in the city, and he was aware
that perfect neatness was one of the first characteristics of a
gentleman. He therefore scrubbed his face and hands till they fairly
shone, and brushed his clothes with great care. Even then they certainly
did look rather shabby, and there was a small hole in the elbow of his
coat; but, on the whole, he looked quite passable when he entered the
dining-room.

"Take that seat, my boy," said his host.

Frank sat down and tried to look as if he was used to it.

"Take this soup to Mr. Kavanagh," said Mr. Bowen, in a dignified tone.

Frank started and smiled slightly, feeling more and more that it was an
excellent joke.

"I wonder what Dick Rafferty would say if he could see me now," passed
through his mind.

He acquitted himself very creditably, however, and certainly displayed
an excellent appetite, much to the satisfaction of his hospitable host.

After dinner was over, Mr. Bowen detained him and began to talk of his
dead son, telling anecdotes of his boyhood, to which Frank listened with
respectful attention, for the father's devotion was touching.

"I think my boy looked a little like you," said the old gentleman. "What
do you think, Susan?"

"Not a mite, sir," answered Susan, promptly.

"When he was a boy, I mean."

"I didn't know him when he was a boy, Mr. Bowen."

"No, to be sure not."

"But Mr. John was dark-complected, and this boy is light, and Mr. John's
hair was black, and his is brown."

"I suppose I am mistaken," sighed the old man; "but there was something
in the boy's face that reminded me of John."

"A little more, and he'll want to adopt him," thought Susan. "That
wouldn't do nohow, though he does really seem like a decent sort of a
boy."

At eight o'clock Frank rose, and wished Mr. Bowen good-night.

"Come and see me again, my boy," said the old gentleman, kindly. "You
have been a good deal of company for me to-night."

"I am glad of it, sir."

"I think you might find something better to do than selling papers."

"I wish I could, sir."

"Come and dine with me again this day week, and I may have something to
tell you."

"Thank you, sir."

Feeling in his pocket to see that his dollar was safe, Frank set out to
walk down-town, repairing to the lodging-house, where he met Dick, and
astonished that young man by the recital of his adventures.

"It takes you to get round, Frank," he said. "I wonder I don't get
invited to dine on Madison avenue."

"I give it up," said Frank.




CHAPTER VIII.

A NEWSBOY'S EXPERIENCES.


Frank slept that night at the lodging-house, and found a much better bed
than he had been provided with by his late employer. He was up bright
and early the next morning, and purchased a stock of morning papers.
These he succeeded in selling during the forenoon, netting a profit of
thirty cents. It was not much, but he was satisfied. At any rate he was
a good deal better off than when in the employ of Mr. Mills. Of course
he had to economize strictly, but the excellent arrangements of the
lodging-house helped him to do this. Twelve cents provided him with
lodging and breakfast. At noon, in company with his friend Dick, he went
to a cheap restaurant, then to be found in Ann street, near Park row,
and for fifteen cents enjoyed a dinner of two courses. The first
consisted of a plate of beef, with a potato and a wedge of bread,
costing ten cents, and the second, a piece of apple-pie.

"That's a good square meal," said Dick, in a tone of satisfaction. "I
oughter get one every day, but sometimes I don't have the money."

"I should think you could raise fifteen cents a day for that purpose,
Dick."

"Well, so I could; but then you see I save my money sometimes to go to
the Old Bowery, or Tony Pastor's, in the evenin'."

"I would like to go, too, but I wouldn't give up my dinner. A boy that's
growing needs enough to eat."

"I guess you're right," said Dick. "We'll go to dinner together every
day, if you say so."

"All right, Dick; I should like your company."

About two o'clock in the afternoon, as Frank was resting on a bench in
the City-Hall Park, a girl of ten approached him. Frank recognized her
as an inmate of the tenement-house where Mills, his late employer,
lived.

"Do you want to see me?" asked Frank, observing that she was looking
towards him.

"You're the boy that went round with the blind man, aint you?" she
asked.

"Yes."

"He wants you to come back."

Frank was rather surprised, but concluded that Mills had difficulty in
obtaining a boy to succeed him. This was not very remarkable,
considering the niggardly pay attached to the office.

"Did he send you to find me?" asked our hero.

"Yes; he says you needn't pass that money if you'll come back."

"Tell him that I don't want to come back," said Frank, promptly. "I can
do better working for myself."

"He wants to know what you are doing," continued the girl.

"Does he? You can tell him that I am a newsboy."

"He says if you don't come back he'll have you arrested for stealing
money from him. You mustn't be mad with me. That's what he told me to
say."

"I don't blame you," said Frank, hotly; "but you can tell him that he is
a liar."

"Oh, I wouldn't dare to tell him that; he would beat me."

"How can he do that, when he can't see where you are?"

"I don't know how it is, but he can go right up to where you are just as
well as if he could see."

"So he can. He's a humbug and a fraud. His eyes may not be very good,
but he can see for all that. He pretends to be blind so as to make
money."

"That's what mother and I think," said the girl. "So you won't come
back?"

"Not much. He can hire some other boy, and starve him. He won't get me."

"Aint you afraid he'll have you arrested for stealing?" asked the girl.

"If he tries that I'll expose him for wanting me to pass a counterfeit
note. I never took a cent from him."

"He'll be awful mad," said the little girl.

"Let him. If he had treated me decently I would have stayed with him.
Now I'm glad I left him."

Mills was indeed furious when, by degrees, he had drawn from his young
messenger what Frank had said. He was sorry to lose him, for he was the
most truthful and satisfactory guide he had ever employed, and he now
regretted that he had driven him away by his unreasonable exactions. He
considered whether it would be worth while to have Frank arrested on a
false charge of theft, but was restrained by the fear that he would
himself be implicated in passing counterfeit money, that is, in
intention. He succeeded in engaging another boy, who really stole from
him, and finally secured a girl, for whose services, however, he was
obliged to pay her mother twenty cents every time she went out with him.
Mean and miserly as he was, he agreed to this with reluctance, and only
as a measure of necessity.

As he became more accustomed to his new occupation Frank succeeded
better. He was a boy of considerable energy, and was on the alert for
customers. It was not long before his earnings exceeded those of Dick
Rafferty, who was inclined to take things easily.

One evening Dick was lamenting that he could not go to the Old Bowery.

"There's a bully play, Frank," he said. "There's a lot of fightin' in
it."

"What is it called, Dick?"

"'The Scalpers of the Plains.' There's five men murdered in the first
act. Oh, it's elegant!"

"Why don't you go, then, Dick?"

"Cause I'm dead-broke--busted. That's why. I aint had much luck this
week, and it took all my money to pay for my lodgin's and grub."

"Do you want very much to go to the theatre, Dick?"

"Of course I do; but it aint no use. My credit aint good, and I haint no
money in the bank."

"How much does it cost?"

"Fifteen cents, in the top gallery."

"Can you see there?"

"Yes, it's rather high up; but a feller with good eyes can see all he
wants to there."

"I'll tell you what I'll do, Dick. You have been a good friend to me,
and I'll take you at my expense."

"You will? To-night?"

"Yes."

"You're a reg'lar trump. We'll have a stavin' time. Sometime, when I'm
flush, I'll return the compliment."

So the two boys went. They were at the doors early, and secured a front
seat in the gallery. The performance was well adapted to please the
taste of a boy, and they enjoyed it exceedingly. Dick was uproarious in
his applause whenever a man was killed.

"Seems to me you like to see men killed, Dick," said his friend.

"Yes, it's kinder excitin'."

"I don't like that part so well as some others," said Frank.

"It's' a stavin' play, aint it?" asked Dick, greatly delighted.

Frank assented.

"I'll tell you what, Frank," said Dick; "I'd like to be a hunter and
roam round the plains, killin' bears and Injuns."

"Suppose they should kill you? That wouldn't suit you so well, would
it?"

"No, I guess not. But I'd like to be a hunter, wouldn't you?"

"No, I would rather live in New York. I would like to make a journey to
the West if I had money enough; but I would leave the hunting to other
men."

Dick, however, did not agree with his more sensible companion. Many boys
like him are charmed with the idea of a wild life in the forest, and
some have been foolish enough to leave good homes, and, providing
themselves with what they considered necessary, have set out on a
journey in quest of the romantic adventures which in stories had fired
their imaginations. If their wishes could be realized it would not be
long before the romance would fade out, and they would long for the good
homes, which they had never before fully appreciated.

When the week was over, Frank found that he had lived within his means,
as he had resolved to do; but he had not done much more. He began with
a dollar which he had received from Mr. Bowen, and now he had a dollar
and a quarter. There was a gain of twenty-five cents. There would have
been a little more if he had not gone to the theatre with Dick; but this
he did not regret. He felt that he needed some amusement, and he wished
to show his gratitude to his friend for various kind services. The time
had come to accept Mr. Bowen's second dinner invitation. As Frank looked
at his shabby clothes he wished there were a good pretext for declining,
but he reflected that this would not be polite, and that the old
gentleman would make allowances for his wardrobe. He brushed up his
clothes as well as he could, and obtained a "_boss shine_" from Dick.
Then he started for the house on Madison avenue.

"I'll lend you my clo'es if you want 'em," said Dick.

"There are too many spots of blacking on them, Dick. As I'm a newsboy,
it wouldn't look appropriate. I shall have to make mine answer."

"I'll shine up the blackin' spots if you want me to."

"Never mind, Dick. I'll wait till next time for your suit."




CHAPTER IX.

VICTOR DUPONT.


As Frank was walking on Madison avenue, a little before reaching the
house of Mr. Bowen he met a boy of his own age, whom he recognized.
Victor Dupont had spent the previous summer at the hotel in the country
village where Frank had lived until he came to the city. Victor was
proud of his social position, but time hung so heavily upon his hands in
the country that he was glad to keep company with the village boys.
Frank and he had frequently gone fishing together, and had been
associated in other amusements, so that they were for the time quite
intimate. The memories of home and past pleasures thronged upon our hero
as he met Victor, and his face flushed with pleasure.

"Why, Victor," he said, eagerly, extending his hand, "how glad I am to
see you!"

Frank forgot that intimacy in the country does not necessarily lead to
intimacy in the city, and he was considerably surprised when Victor, not
appearing to notice his offered hand, said coldly, "I don't think I
remember you."

"Don't remember me!" exclaimed Frank, amazed. "Why, I am Frank Kavanagh!
Don't you remember how much we were together last summer, and what good
times we had fishing and swimming together?"

"Yes, I believe I do remember you now," drawled Victor, still not
offering his hand, or expressing any pleasure at the meeting. "When did
you come to the city?"

"I have been here two or three weeks," replied Frank.

"Oh, indeed! Are you going to remain?"

"Yes, if I can earn a living."

Victor scanned Frank's clothes with a critical, and evidently rather
contemptuous, glance.

"What are you doing?" he asked. "Are you in a store?"

"No; I am selling papers."

"A newsboy!" said Victor, with a curve of the lip.

"Yes," answered Frank, his pleasure quite chilled by Victor's manner.

"Are you doing well?" asked Victor, more from curiosity than interest.

"I am making my expenses."

"How do you happen to be in this neighborhood? I suppose you sell papers
down-town."

"Yes, but I am invited to dinner."

"Not here--on the avenue!" ejaculated Victor.

"Yes," answered Frank, enjoying the other's surprise.

"Where?"

Frank mentioned the number.

"Why, that is next to my house. Mr. Bowen lives there."

"Yes."

"Perhaps you know some of the servants," suggested Victor.

"I know one," said Frank, smiling, for he read Victor's thoughts; "but
my invitation comes from Mr. Bowen."

"Did you ever dine there before?" asked Victor, puzzled.

"Yes, last week."

"You must excuse my mentioning it, but I should hardly think you would
like to sit down at a gentleman's table in that shabby suit."

"I don't," answered Frank; "but I have no better."

"Then you ought to decline the invitation."

"I would, but for appearing impolite."

"It seems very strange that Mr. Bowen should invite a newsboy to
dinner."

"Perhaps if you'd mention what you think of it," said Frank, somewhat
nettled, "he would recall the invitation."

"Oh, it's nothing to me," said Victor; "but I thought I'd mention it, as
I know more of etiquette than you do."

"You are very considerate," said Frank, with a slight tinge of sarcasm
in his tone.

By this time he had reached the house of Mr. Bowen, and the two boys
parted.

Frank could not help thinking a little about what Victor had said. His
suit, as he looked down at it, seemed shabbier than ever. Again it
occurred to him that perhaps Mr. Bowen had forgotten the invitation, and
this would make it very awkward for him. As he waited for the door to
open he decided that, if it should appear that he was not expected, he
would give some excuse, and go away.

Susan opened the door.

"Mr. Bowen invited me to come here to dinner to-night," began Frank,
rather nervously.

"Yes, you are expected," said Susan, very much to his relief. "Wipe your
feet, and come right in."

Frank obeyed.

"You are to go upstairs and get ready for dinner," said Susan, and she
led the way to the same chamber into which our hero had been ushered the
week before.

"There won't be much getting ready," thought Frank. "However, I can stay
there till I hear the bell ring."

As he entered the room he saw a suit of clothes and some underclothing
lying on the bed.

"They are for you," said Susan, laconically.

"For me!" exclaimed Frank, in surprise.

"Yes, put them on, and when you come down to dinner Mr. Bowen will see
how they fit."

"Is it a present from him?" asked Frank, overwhelmed with surprise and
gratitude, for he could see that the clothes were very handsome.

"Well, they aint from me," said Susan, "so it's likely they come from
him. Don't be too long, for Mr. Bowen doesn't like to have any one late
to dinner."

Susan had been in the service of her present mistress fifteen years, and
was a privileged character. She liked to have her own way; but had
sterling qualities, being neat, faithful, and industrious.

"I wonder whether I am awake or dreaming," thought Frank, when he was
left alone. "I shouldn't like to wake up and find it was all a dream."

He began at once to change his shabby clothes for the new ones. He
found that the articles provided were a complete outfit, including
shirt, collar, cuffs, stockings; in fact, everything that was needful.
The coat, pants, and vest were a neat gray, and proved to be an
excellent fit. In the bosom of the shirt were neat studs, and the cuffs
were supplied with sleeve-buttons to correspond. When Frank stood before
the glass, completely attired, he hardly knew himself. He was as well
dressed as his aristocratic acquaintance, Victor Dupont, and looked more
like a city boy than a boy bred in the country.

"I never looked so well in my life," thought our young hero,
complacently. "How kind Mr. Bowen is!"

Frank did not know it; but he was indebted for this gift to Susan's
suggestion. When her master told her in the morning that Frank was
coming to dinner, she said, "It's a pity the boy hadn't some better
clothes."

"I didn't notice his clothes," said Mr. Bowen. "Are they shabby?"

"Yes; and they are almost worn out. They don't look fit for one who is
going to sit at your table."

"Bless my soul! I never thought of that. You think he needs some new
clothes."

"He needs them badly."

"I will call at Baldwin's, and order some ready-made; but I don't know
his size."

"He's about two inches shorter than you, Mr. Bowen. Tell 'em that, and
they will know. He ought to have shirts and stockings, too."

"So he shall," said the old man, quite interested. "He shall have a full
rig-out from top to toe. Where shall I go for the shirts and things?"

Susan had a nephew about Frank's age, and she was prepared to give the
necessary information. The old gentleman, who had no business to attend
to, was delighted to have something to fill up his time. He went out
directly after breakfast, or as soon as he had read the morning paper,
and made choice of the articles already described, giving strict
injunctions that they should be sent home immediately.

This was the way Frank got his new outfit.

When our hero came downstairs Mr. Bowen was waiting eagerly to see the
transformation. The result delighted him.

"Why, I shouldn't have known you!" he exclaimed, lifting both hands. "I
had no idea new clothes would change you so much."

"I don't know how to thank you, sir," said Frank, gratefully.

"I never should have thought of it if it hadn't been for Susan."

"Then I thank you, Susan," said Frank, offering his hand to the girl, as
she entered the room.

Susan was pleased. She liked to be appreciated; and she noted with
satisfaction the great improvement in Frank's appearance.

"You are quite welcome," she said; "but it was master's money that paid
for the clothes."

"It was your kindness that made him think of it," said Frank.

From that moment Susan became Frank's fast friend. We generally like
those whom we have benefited, if our services are suitably
acknowledged.




CHAPTER X.

A NEW PROSPECT.


"Well, Frank, and how is your business?" asked the old gentleman, when
they were sitting at the dinner-table.

"Pretty good, sir."

"Are you making your expenses?"

"Yes, sir; just about."

"That is well. Mind you never run into debt. That is a bad plan."

"I shan't have to now, sir. If I had had to buy clothes for myself, I
might have had to."

"Do you find the shirts and stockings fit you?"

"Yes, sir; they are just right."

"I bought half a dozen of each. Susan will give you the bundle when you
are ready to go. If they had not been right, they could have been
exchanged."

"Thank you, sir. I shall feel rich with so many clothes."

"Where do you sleep, Frank?"

"At the Newsboy's Lodging-House."

"Is there any place there where you can keep your clothes?"

"Yes, sir. Each boy has a locker to himself."

"That is a good plan. It would be better if you had a room to yourself."

"I can't afford it yet, sir. The lodging-house costs me only forty-two
cents a week for a bed, and I could not get a room for that."

"Bless my soul! That is very cheap. Really, I think I could save money
by giving up my house, and going there to sleep."

"I don't think you would like it, sir," said Frank, smiling.

"Probably not. Now, Frank, I am going to mention a plan I have for you.
You don't want to be a newsboy all your life."

"No, sir; I think I should get tired of it by the time I was fifty."

"My friend Thompson, the gentleman who was walking with me when we
first saw you, is an officer of the American District Telegraph Company.
They employ a large number of boys at their various offices to run
errands; and, in fact, to do anything that is required of them. Probably
you have seen some of the boys going about the city."

"Yes, sir; they have a blue uniform."

"Precisely. How would you like to get a situation of that kind?"

"Very much, sir," said Frank, promptly.

"Would you like it better than being a newsboy?"

"Yes, sir."

"My friend Thompson, to whom I spoke on the subject, says he will take
you on in a few weeks, provided you will qualify yourself for the post."

"I will do that, sir, if you will tell me how."

"You must be well acquainted with the city in all its parts, know the
locations of different hotels, prominent buildings, have a fair
education, and be willing to make yourself generally useful. You will
have to satisfy the superintendent that you are fitted for the
position."

"I think my education will be sufficient," said Frank, "for I always
went to school till just before I came to the city. I know something
about the lower part of the city, but I will go about every day during
the hours when I am not selling papers till I am familiar with all parts
of it."

"Do so, and when there is a vacancy I will let you know."

"How much pay shall I get, sir, if they accept me?"

"About three dollars a week at first, and more when you get familiar
with your duties. No doubt money will also be given you by some who
employ you, though you will not be allowed to ask for any fees. Very
likely you will get nearly as much in this way as from your salary."

Frank's face expressed satisfaction.

"That will be bully," he said.

"I beg pardon," said the old gentleman, politely. "What did you
remark?"

"That will be excellent," said Frank, blushing.

"I thought you spoke of a bully."

"It was a word I learned from Dick Rafferty," said Frank, feeling rather
embarrassed.

"And who is Dick Rafferty?"

"One of my friends at the Lodging-House."

"Unless his education is better than yours I would not advise you to
learn any of his words."

"I beg your pardon, sir."

"You must excuse my offering you advice. It is the privilege of the old
to advise the young."

"I shall always be glad to follow your advice, Mr. Bowen," said Frank.

"Good boy, good boy," said the old gentleman, approvingly. "I wish all
boys were like you. Some think they know more than their grandfathers.
There's one of that kind who lives next door."

"His name is Victor Dupont, isn't it, sir?"

Mr. Bowen looked surprised. "How is it that you know his name?" he
asked.

"We were together a good deal last summer. His family boarded at the
hotel in the country village where I used to live. He and I went
bathing and fishing together."

"Indeed! Have you seen him since you came to the city?"

"I met him as I was on my way here this afternoon."

"Did he speak to you?"

"Yes, sir; though at first he pretended he didn't remember me."

"Just like him. He is a very proud and conceited boy. Did you tell him
you were coming to dine with me?"

"Yes, sir. He seemed very much surprised, as I had just told him I was a
newsboy. He said he was surprised that you should invite a newsboy to
dine with you."

"I would much rather have you dine with me than him. What more did he
say?"

"He said he shouldn't think I would like to go out to dinner with such a
shabby suit."

"We have removed that objection," said Mr. Bowen, smiling.

"Yes, sir," said Frank; "I think Victor will treat me more respectfully
now when he meets me."

"The respect of such a boy is of very little importance. He judges only
by the outside."

At an early hour Frank took his leave, promising to call again before
long.

"Where can I send to you if you are wanted for a telegraph boy?" asked
Mr. Bowen.

"A letter to me addressed to the care of Mr. O'Connor at the
lodging-house will reach me," said Frank.

"Write it down for me," said the old gentleman. "You will find writing
materials on yonder desk."

When Frank made his appearance at the lodging-house in his new suit,
with two bundles, one containing his old clothes, and the other his
extra supply of underclothing, his arrival made quite a sensation.

"Have you come into a fortun'?" asked one boy.

"Did you draw a prize in the Havana lottery?" asked another.

"Have you been playing policy?" asked a third.

"You're all wrong," said Dick Rafferty. "Frank's been adopted by a rich
man upon Madison avenue. Aint that so, Frank?"

"Something like it," said Frank. "There's a gentleman up there who has
been very kind to me."

"If he wants to adopt another chap, spake a good word for me," said
Patsy Reagan.

"Whisht, Patsy, he don't want no Irish bog-trotter," said Phil Donovan.

"You're Irish yourself, Phil, now, and you can't deny it."

"What if I am? I aint no bog-trotter--I'm the son of an Irish count. You
can see by my looks that I belong to the gintry."

"Then the gintry must have red hair and freckles, Phil. There aint no
chance for you."

"Tell us all about it, Frank," said Dick. "Shure I'm your best friend,
and you might mention my name to the ould gintleman if he's got any more
good clothes to give away."

"I will with pleasure, Dick, if I think it will do any good."

"You won't put on no airs because you're better dressed than the likes
of us?"

"I shall wear my old clothes to-morrow, Dick. I can't afford to wear my
best clothes every day."

"I can," said Dick, dryly, which was quite true, as his best clothes
were the only ones he had.

Bright and early the next morning Frank was about his work, without
betraying in any way the proud consciousness of being the owner of two
suits. He followed Mr. Bowen's advice, and spent his leisure hours in
exploring the city in its various parts, so that in the course of a
month he knew more about it than boys who had lived in it all their
lives. He told Dick his object in taking these long walks, and urged him
to join him in the hope of winning a similar position; but Dick decided
that it was too hard work. He preferred to spend his leisure time in
playing marbles or pitching pennies.




CHAPTER XI.

THE TELEGRAPH BOY.


Six weeks later Frank Kavanagh, through the influence of his patron,
found himself in the uniform of a District Telegraph Messenger. The blue
suit, and badge upon the cap, are familiar to every city resident. The
uniform is provided by the company, but must be paid for by weekly
instalments, which are deducted from the wages of the wearers. This
would have seriously embarrassed Frank but for an opportune gift of ten
dollars from Mr. Bowen, which nearly paid the expense of his suit.

[Illustration: FRANK, THE TELEGRAPH BOY.]

Frank was employed in one of the up-town offices of the company. For the
information of such of my young readers as live in the country it may be
explained that large numbers of houses and offices in the city are
connected with the offices of the District Telegraph by machines,
through which, at any time in the day or night, a messenger may be
summoned for any purpose. It is only necessary to raise a knob in the
box provided, and a bell is rung in the office of the company. Of course
there is more or less transient business besides that of the regular
subscribers.

Boys, on arriving at the office, seat themselves, and are called upon in
order. A boy just returned from an errand hangs up his hat, and takes
his place at the foot of the line. He will not be called upon again till
all who are ahead of him have been despatched in one direction or
another.

Frank was curious to know what would be his first duty, and waited
eagerly for his turn to come.

At length it came.

"Go to No. -- Madison avenue," said the superintendent.

A few minutes later Frank was ascending the steps of a handsome
brown-stone residence.

"Oh, you're the telegraph boy," said a colored servant. "You're to go
upstairs into missus's sitting-room."

Upon entering, Frank found himself in the presence of a rather stout
lady, who was reclining on a sofa.

He bowed politely, and waited for his instructions.

"I hope you are a trustworthy boy," said the stout lady.

"I hope so, ma'am."

"Come here, Fido," said the lady.

A little mass of hair, with two red eyes peeping out, rose from the
carpet and waddled towards the lady, for Fido was about as stout as his
mistress.

"Do you like dogs?" asked Mrs. Leroy, for this was the lady's name.

"Yes, ma'am," answered Frank, wondering what that had to do with his
errand.

"I sent for you to take my sweet darling out for an airing. His health
requires that he should go out every day. I generally take him myself,
but this morning I have a severe headache, and do not feel equal to the
task. My dear little pet, will you go out with this nice boy?"

Fido looked gravely at Frank and sneezed.

"I hope the darling hasn't got cold," said Mrs. Leroy, with solicitude.
"My lad, what is your name?"

"Frank Kavanagh, ma'am."

"Will you take great care of my little pet, Frank?"

"I will try to, madam. Where do you want him to go?"

"To Madison Park. He always likes the park, because it is so gay. When
you get there you may sit down on one of the benches and give him time
to rest."

"Yes, ma'am. How long would you like me to stay out with him?"

"About an hour and a half. Have you a watch?"

"No; but I can tell the time by the clock in front of the Fifth-avenue
Hotel."

"To be sure. I was going to lend you my watch."

"Shall I start now?"

"Yes. Here is the string. Don't make Fido go too fast. He is stout, and
cannot walk fast. You will be sure to take great care of him?"

"Yes, madam."

"And you keep watch that no bad man carries off my Fido. I used to send
him out by one of the girls, till I found that she ill-treated the poor
thing. Of course I couldn't stand that, so I sent her packing, I can
tell you."

"I will try to follow your directions," said Frank, who wanted to laugh
at the lady's ridiculous devotion to her ugly little favorite.

"That is right. You look like a good boy. I will give you something for
yourself when you come back."

"Thank you, ma'am," said Frank, who was better pleased with this remark
than any the lady had previously made.

Mrs. Leroy kissed Fido tenderly, and consigned him to the care of our
hero.

"I suppose," said Frank to himself, "that I am the dog's nurse. It is
rather a queer office; but as long as I am well paid for it I don't
mind."

When Fido found himself on the sidewalk he seemed disinclined to move;
but after a while, by dint of coaxing, he condescended to waddle along
at Frank's heels.

After a while they reached Madison Park, and Frank, according to his
instructions, took a seat, allowing Fido to curl up at his side.

"This isn't very hard work," thought Frank. "I wish I had a book or
paper to read, to while away the time."

While he was sitting there Victor Dupont came sauntering along.

"Halloa!" he exclaimed, in surprise, as he recognized Frank, "is that
you?"

"I believe it is," answered Frank, with a smile.

"Are you a telegraph boy?"

"Yes."

"I thought you were a newsboy?"

"So I was; but I have changed my business."

"What are you doing here?"

"Taking care of a dog," said Frank, laughing.

"Is that the dog?"

"Yes."

"It's a beastly little brute. What's its name?"

"Fido."

"Who does it belong to?"

Frank answered.

"I know," said Victor; "it's a fat lady living on the avenue. I have
seen her out often with little pug. How do you feel, Fido?" and Victor
began to pull the hair of the lady's favorite.

"Don't do that, Victor," remonstrated Frank.

"Why not?"

"Mrs. Leroy wouldn't like it."

"Mrs. Leroy isn't here."

"I am," said Frank, emphatically, "and that is the same thing."

Victor, by way of reply, pinched Fido's ear, and the little animal
squeaked his disapproval.

"Look here, Victor," said Frank, decidedly, "you must stop that."

"Must I?" sneered Victor, contemptuously. "'Suppose I don't?"

"Then I shall punch you," said Frank, quietly.

"You are impertinent," said Victor, haughtily. "You needn't put on such
airs because you are nurse to a puppy."

"That is better than being a puppy myself," retorted Frank.

"Do you mean to insult me?" demanded Victor, quickly.

"No, unless you choose to think the remark fits you."

"I have a great mind to give you a thrashing," said Victor, furiously.

"Of course I should sit still and let you do it," said Frank, calmly.
"Fido is under my care, and I can't have him teased. That is right,
isn't it?"

"I did wrong to notice you," said Victor. "You are only a dog's nurse."

Frank laughed.

"You are right," he said. "It is new business for me, and though it is
easy enough I can't say I like it. However, I am in the service of the
Telegraph Company, and must do whatever is required."

Victor walked away, rather annoyed because he could not tease Frank.

"The boy has no pride," he said to himself, "or he wouldn't live out to
take care of dogs. But, then, it is suitable enough for him."

"Is that dawg yours?" asked a rough-looking man, taking his seat on the
bench near Frank.

"No, sir."

"How old is it?"

"I don't know."

"Looks like a dawg I used to own. Let me take him."

"I would rather not," said Frank, coldly. "It belongs to a lady who is
very particular."

"Oh, you won't, won't you?" said the man, roughly. "Danged if I don't
think it is my dawg, after all;" and the man seized Fido, and was about
to carry him away.

But Frank seized him by the arm, and called for help.

"What's the matter?" asked a park policeman who, unobserved by either,
had come up behind.

"This man is trying to steal my dog," said Frank.

"The dog is mine," said the thief, boldly.

"Drop him!" said the officer, authoritatively. "I have seen that dog
before. He belongs to neither of you."

"That is true," said Frank. "It belongs to Mrs. Leroy, of Madison
avenue, and I am employed to take it out for an airing."

"It's a lie!" said the man, sullenly.

"If you are seen again in this neighborhood," said the policeman, "I
shall arrest you. Now clear out!"

The would-be thief slunk away, and Frank thanked the officer.

"That man is a dog-stealer," said the policeman. "His business is to
steal dogs, and wait till a reward is offered. Look out for him!"




CHAPTER XII.

A WAYWARD SON.


When Frank carried Fido back to his mistress, he thought it his duty to
tell Mrs. Leroy of the attempt to abduct the favorite.

Mrs. Leroy turned pale.

"Did the man actually take my little pet?" she asked.

"Yes, ma'am. He said it was his dog."

"The horrid brute! How could I have lived without my darling?" and the
lady caressed her favorite tenderly. "How did you prevent him?"

"I seized him by the arm, and held him till a policeman came up."

"You are a brave boy," said Mrs. Leroy, admiringly. "But for you, Fido
would have been stolen."

"The policeman said the man was a professional dog-stealer. He steals
dogs for the reward which is offered."

"I was sure I could trust you with my pet," said Mrs. Leroy. "You
deserve a reward yourself."

"I was only doing my duty, ma'am," said Frank, modestly.

"It isn't everybody that does that."

Mrs. Leroy rose, and, going to her bureau, drew an ivory portemonnaie
from a small upper drawer; from this she extracted a two-dollar bill,
and gave it to Frank.

"This is too much," said Frank, surprised at the size of the gift.

"Too much for rescuing my little pet? No, no, I am the best judge of
that. I wouldn't have lost him for fifty times two dollars."

"You are very liberal, and I am very much obliged to you," said Frank.

"If I send again for a boy to take out Fido, I want you to come."

"I will if I can, ma'am."

For several days, though Frank was employed on errands daily, there was
nothing of an unusual character. About eleven o'clock one evening (for
Frank had to take his turn at night work) he was sent to a house on
West Thirty-eighth street. On arriving, he was ushered into the presence
of a lady of middle age, whose anxious face betrayed the anxiety that
she felt.

"I have a son rather larger and older than you," she said, "who, to my
great sorrow, has been led away by evil companions, who have induced him
to drink and play cards for money. I will not admit them into my house,
but I cannot keep him from seeking them out. He is no doubt with them
to-night."

Frank listened with respectful sympathy, and waited to hear what he was
desired to do in the matter.

"The boy's father is dead," continued Mrs. Vivian, with emotion, "and I
cannot fill his place. Fred is unwilling to obey his mother. His
companions have persuaded him that it is unmanly."

"I would gladly obey my mother if I could have her back," said Frank.

"Is your mother dead, then?" inquired Mrs. Vivian, with quick sympathy.

"I have neither father nor mother," Frank answered gravely.

"Poor boy! And yet you do not fall into temptation."

"I have no time for that, ma'am; I have to earn my living."

"If I could get Fred to take a position it might be a benefit to him,"
said Mrs. Vivian, thoughtfully. "But the question now is, how I may be
able to find him."

"When did you see him last?" asked Frank.

"About three o'clock this afternoon I gave him seventy-five dollars, and
sent him to pay a bill. I was perhaps imprudent to trust him with such a
sum of money; but for a few days past he has been more steady than
usual, and I thought it would show my confidence in him if I employed
him in such a matter."

"I should think it would, ma'am."

"But I am afraid Fred fell in with some of his evil companions, and let
them know that he was well provided with money. That would be enough to
excite their cupidity."

"Who are the companions you speak of?" asked Frank.

"Boys, or rather young men, for they are all older than Fred, of lower
social rank than himself. I don't attach any special importance to that,
nor do I object to them on that ground; but they are, I have reason to
think, ill-bred and disreputable. They know Fred to be richer than
themselves, and induce him to drink and play, in the hope of getting
some of his money. I have sent for you to go in search of my son. If you
find him you must do your best to bring him home."

"I will," said Frank. "Can you give me any idea where he may be found?"

Mrs. Vivian wrote on a card two places,--one a billiard saloon, which
she had reason to suspect that her son frequented.

"Now," said Frank, "will you be kind enough to describe your son to me,
so that I may know him when I see him?"

"I will show you his photograph," said Mrs. Vivian.

She opened an album, and showed the picture of a boy of seventeen, with
a pleasant face, fair complexion, and hair somewhat curly. His forehead
was high, and he looked gentlemanly and refined.

"Is he not good-looking?" said the mother.

"He looks like a gentleman," said Frank.

"He would be one if he could throw off his evil associates. Do you think
you will know him from the picture?"

"Yes, I think so. Is he tall?"

"Two or three inches taller than you are. You had better take the
picture with you. I have an extra one, which you can put in your pocket
to help you identify him. By the way, it will be as well that you should
be supplied with money in case it is necessary to bring him home in a
cab."

Frank understood what the mother found it difficult to explain. She
feared that her boy might be the worse for drink.

She handed our hero a five-dollar bill.

"I will use it prudently, madam," said he, "and account to you for all I
do not use."

"I trust you wholly," said the lady. "Now go as quickly as possible."

Frank looked at the two addresses he had on the card. The
billiard-saloon was on the east side of the city, in an unfashionable
locality.

"I'll go there first," he decided.

Crossing to Third avenue he hailed a car, and rode down-town. His
knowledge of the city, gained from the walks he took when a newsboy,
made it easy for him to find the place of which he was in search. Though
it was nearly midnight, the saloon was lighted up, and two tables were
in use. On the left-hand side, as he entered, was a bar, behind which
stood a man in his shirt-sleeves, who answered the frequent calls for
drinks. He looked rather suspiciously at Frank's uniform when he
entered.

"What do you want?" he asked. "Have you any message for me?"

"No," said Frank, carelessly. "Let me have a glass of lemonade."

The bar-keeper's face cleared instantly, and he set about preparing the
beverage required.

"Won't you have something in it?" he asked.

"No, sir," said Frank.

"You boys are kept out pretty late," said the bar-keeper, socially.

"Not every night," said Frank. "We take turns."

Frank paid ten cents for his lemonade, and, passing into the
billiard-saloon, sat down and watched a game. He looked around him, but
could not see anything of Fred. In fact, all the players were men.

Sitting next to him was a young fellow, who was watching the game.

"Suppose we try a game," he said to Frank.

"Not to-night. I came in here to look for a friend, but I guess he isn't
here."

"I've been here two hours. What does your friend look like?"

"That's his picture," said Frank, displaying the photograph.

"Oh, yes," said his new acquaintance, "he is here now. His name is Fred,
isn't it?"

"Yes," answered Frank, eagerly; "I don't see him. Where is he?"

"He's playing cards upstairs, but I don't believe he can tell one card
from the other."

"Been drinking, I suppose," said Frank, betraying no surprise.

"I should say so. Do you know the fellows he's with?"

"I am not sure about that. How long has Fred been upstairs?"

"About an hour. He was playing billiards till he couldn't stand
straight, and then they went upstairs."

"Would you mind telling him that there is a friend downstairs who wishes
to see him, that is, if you know the way?"

"Oh, yes, I live here. Won't you come up with me?"

"Perhaps I had better," said Frank, and followed his companion through a
door in the rear, and up a dark and narrow staircase to the street
floor.

"It'll be a hard job to get him away," thought Frank; "but, for his
mother's sake, I will do my best."




CHAPTER XIII.

A TIMELY RESCUE.


As Frank entered the room he hastily took in the scene before him. Round
a table sat three young men, of not far from twenty, the fourth side
being occupied by Fred Vivian. They were playing cards, and sipping
drinks as they played. Fred Vivian's handsome face was flushed, and he
was nervously excited. His hands trembled as he lifted the glass, and
his wandering, uncertain glances showed that he was not himself.

"It's your play, Fred," said his partner.

Fred picked up a card without looking at it, and threw it down on the
table.

"That settles it," said another. "Fred, old boy, you've lost the game.
You're another five dollars out."

Fred fumbled in his pocket for a bill, and it was quickly taken from his
hand before he could well see of what value it was. Frank, however,
quickly as it was put away, saw that it was a ten. It was clear that
Fred was being cheated in the most barefaced manner.

Frank's entrance was evidently unwelcome to most of the company.

"What are you bringing in that boy for, John?" demanded a low-browed
fellow, with a face like a bull-dog.

"He is a friend of Fred," answered John.

"He's a telegraph boy. He comes here a spy. Fred don't know him. Clear
out, boy!"

Frank took no notice of this hostile remark, but walked up to Fred
Vivian.

"Fred," said he, thinking it best to speak as if he knew him, "it is
getting late, and your mother is anxious about you. Won't you come home
with me?"

"Who are you?" asked Fred, with drunken gravity. "You aint my mother."

"I come from your mother. Don't you know me? I am Frank Kavanagh."

"How do, Frank? Glad to see you, ol' feller. Take a drink. Here, you
boy, bring a drink for my frien', Frank Kavanagh."

The three others looked on disconcerted. They were not ready to part
with Fred yet, having secured only a part of his money.

"You don't know him, Fred," said the one who had appropriated the
ten-dollar bill. "He's only a telegraph boy."

"I tell you he's my frien', Frank Kav'nagh," persisted Fred, with an
obstinacy not unusual in one in his condition.

"Well, if he is, let him sit down, and have a glass of something hot."

"No, I thank you," said Frank, coldly. "Fred and I are going home."

"No, you're not," exclaimed the other, bringing his fist heavily down
upon the table. "We won't allow our friend Fred to be kidnapped by a boy
of your size,--not much we won't, will we, boys?"

"No! no!" chimed in the other two.

Fred Vivian looked at them undecided.

"I guess I'd better go," he stammered "There's something the matter with
my head."

"You need another drink to brace you up. Here, John, bring up another
punch for Fred."

Frank saw that unless he got Fred away before drinking any more, he
would not be in a condition to go at all. It was a critical position,
but he saw that he must be bold and resolute.

"You needn't bring Fred anything more," he said. "He has had enough
already."

"I have had enough already," muttered Fred, mechanically.

"Boys, are we going to stand this?" said the low-browed young man. "Are
we going to let this telegraph boy interfere with a social party of
young gentlemen? I move that we throw him downstairs."

He half rose as he spoke, but Frank stood his ground.

"You'd better not try it," he said quietly, "unless you want to pass the
night in the station-house."

"What do you mean, you young jackanapes?" said the other angrily. "What
charge can you trump up against us?"

"You have been cheating Fred out of his money," said Frank, firmly.

"It's a lie! We've been having a friendly game, and he lost. If we'd
lost, we would have paid."

"How much did he lose?"

"Five dollars."

"And you took ten from him."

"It's a lie!" repeated the other; but he looked disconcerted.

"It is true, for I noticed the bill as you took it from him. But it's
not much worse than playing for money with him when he is in no
condition to understand the game. You'd better give him back that
ten-dollar bill."

"I've a great mind to fling you downstairs, you young scamp!"

"You are strong enough to do it," said Frank, exhibiting no trace of
fear, "but I think you would be sorry for it afterwards. Come, Fred."

Though Frank was so much younger and smaller, there was something in his
calm, self-possessed manner that gave him an ascendency over the weak,
vacillating Fred. The latter rose, and, taking our hero's arm, turned to
leave the room.

"Let him go," said the leader, who had been made uneasy by Frank's
threat, and saw that it was politic to postpone his further designs upon
his intended victim. "If he chooses to obey a small telegraph boy, he
can."

"Don't mind him, Fred," said Frank. "You know I'm your friend."

"My friend, Frank Kavanagh!" repeated Fred, drowsily. "I'm awful sleepy,
Frank. I want to go to bed."

"You shall go to bed as soon as you get home, Fred."

"I say, boy," said the leader, uneasily, "that was all a lie about the
ten-dollar bill. You didn't see straight. Did he, Bates?"

"Of course he didn't."

"One lies and the other swears to it," thought Frank.

"Nothing will be done about it," he said, "if you will let Fred alone
hereafter. The money you have won from him belongs to his mother, and,
unless you keep away from him, she will order your arrest."

"You're altogether too smart for a boy of your size," sneered the other.
"Take your friend away. We don't care to associate with a milksop, who
allows himself to be ordered around by women and children."

Fortunately Fred was too drowsy to pay heed to what was being said; in
fact he was very sleepy, and was anxious to go to bed. Frank got him
into a cab, and in twenty minutes they safely reached his mother's house
in Thirty-eighth street.

Mrs. Vivian was anxiously awaiting the return of the prodigal.

"O Fred," she said, "how could you stay away so, when you know how
worried I get? You have been drinking, too."

"This is my friend, Frank Kavanagh," hiccoughed Fred.

"Shall I go up and help put him to bed?" asked Frank.

"Does he require help?" asked Mrs. Vivian, sorrowfully.

"He has been drinking a good deal."

"Yes, you may go up. I will lead the way to his chamber. Afterwards I
want to speak to you."

"All right."

"Where did you find him?" asked Mrs. Vivian, when Frank with some
difficulty had prepared his charge for bed.

"In the billiard-saloon to which you directed me. He was upstairs
playing cards for money. They were cheating him in the most outrageous
manner."

"I suppose they got all his money."

"Not all; but they would soon have done so. Here is his pocket-book,
which I just took from his pocket."

"There are twenty dollars left," said 'Mrs. Vivian, after an
examination. "They must have secured the rest. O my poor boy! Would that
I could shield you from these dangerous companions!"

"I don't think they will trouble him again, Mrs. Vivian."

"Why not? You do not know them."

"I told them that, if they came near him, hereafter, you would have them
arrested for swindling your son out of money belonging to you."

"Will that have any effect upon them?"

"Yes, because they know that I am ready to appear as a witness against
them."

"Did Fred show any unwillingness to come with you?"

"No; I made him think I was an old acquaintance of his. Besides, he was
feeling sleepy."

"You have acted with great judgment for so young a lad," said Mrs.
Vivian. "I wish Fred had a companion like you to influence him for good.
Where do you live?"

"At the Newsboys Lodging-House. I cannot afford to hire a room."

Mrs. Vivian looked thoughtful.

"Give me your name and address," she said.

These she noted down.

"I won't keep you any longer to-night," she said, "for you must be
tired. You will hear from me again."

"Oh," said Frank, "I nearly forgot. Here is the balance of the money you
handed me for expenses."

"Keep it for yourself," said Mrs. Vivian, "and accept my thanks
besides."

Though Frank had paid for the cab, there was a balance of nearly two
dollars in his hands which he was very glad to keep.




CHAPTER XIV.

FRANK MAKES AN EVENING CALL.


The next day Frank chanced to meet Mrs. Vivian in the street. She
recognized him at once.

"I see you are kept busy," she said, pleasantly.

"Yes," answered Frank. "Our business is pretty good just now. How is
your son?"

"He slept well, and woke much refreshed this morning. He is a good boy
naturally, but unable to withstand temptation. I have decided to send
him to the country for a few weeks, to visit a cousin of about his own
age. There he will be secure from temptation, and will have a chance to
ride. I would have sent him away before, but that it would leave me
alone in the house. You told me last evening that you had no
boarding-place."

"My only home is at the lodging-house," said Frank.

"How would you like to occupy a room at my house while my son is away?"

"Very much," said Frank, promptly.

"I shall find it convenient to have you in the house, and shall feel
safer."

"I am afraid I shouldn't be a match for an able-bodied burglar," said
Frank, smiling.

"Perhaps not; but you could summon a policeman. When can you come and
see me about this arrangement?"

"I am off duty to-night."

"Very well; I will expect you. Fred will not go away till to-morrow, and
you will have a chance to see him under more favorable circumstances
than last evening."

"Thank you very much for your kind invitation," said Frank, politely.

Mrs. Vivian bade him good-morning, very favorably impressed with his
manners and deportment.

Frank looked upon the proposal made him by Mrs. Vivian as a piece of
great good-fortune. In his new position, excellent as were the beds at
the lodging-house, he found it inconvenient to go there to sleep. Once
or twice, on account of the late hour at which he was released from
duty, he was unable to secure admittance, and had to pay fifty cents for
a bed at a hotel on the European system. He had for some time been
thinking seriously of hiring a room; but the probable expense deterred
him. At Mrs. Vivian's he would have nothing to pay.

In the evening he changed his uniform for the neat suit given him by Mr.
Bowen, and about eight o'clock rang the bell of the house in
Thirty-eighth street.

He was at once ushered into the presence of Mrs. Vivian and her son.

"I am glad to see you, my young friend," said Mrs. Vivian, glancing with
approval at the neat appearance of her young visitor. "Fred, this is the
young man who brought you home last night."

"I am much obliged to you," said Fred Vivian, offering his hand to
Frank. "I am ashamed of having been found in such a place."

"I don't think the young men with you were very much your friends," said
Frank; "I detected one in cheating you."

"You mean at cards?"

"I don't mean that, though I presume they did; but you handed a
ten-dollar bill to one of them, and he took it as a five."

"Are you sure of that?" asked Fred, his face flushing with indignation.

"Yes, I saw the number of the bill, though he put it away very quickly."

"And I had been treating that fellow all the afternoon! I gave him a
good dinner, too."

"Are you surprised at such treatment from such a person?" asked his
mother. "I should have expected it."

"I will never notice the fellow again as long as I live," said Fred, who
seemed a good deal impressed by his companion's treachery. "Why, it's
nothing better than robbery."

"You have given it the right name, Fred," said his mother, quietly.

"He ought to give the money back," said Fred.

"Let it go, my son. I am willing to lose it, if it severs all
acquaintance between you and your unworthy companions."

"Have I ever met you before?" asked Fred, turning to Frank.

"Not before last evening."

"I thought you spoke of yourself as an old acquaintance."

"That was to induce you to come with me," explained Frank. "I hope you
will excuse the deception."

"Certainly I will. I had been drinking so much that it was quite
necessary to treat me as a child; but I don't mean to be caught in such
a scrape again."

"May you keep that resolution, Fred!" said his mother, earnestly.

"I will try to, mother."

"My mother tells me that you are going to take my place while I am in
the country," said Fred, turning to Frank.

"I shall be very glad to do so," said our hero. "I never had such a good
home before."

"You are a telegraph boy, are you not?" asked Fred.

"Yes," answered Frank.

"Tell me about it. Is it hard work?"

"Not hard, but sometimes when I have been kept pretty busy, I get tired
towards night."

"I should think it would be rather good fun," said Fred.

"Do you think you would like it?" asked his mother, with a smile.

"I might like it for about half a day, but all day would be too much for
me. However, I am too old for such a position."

Fred had no false pride, and though he knew that Frank was in a social
position considerably below his own, he treated him as an equal. Those
who are secure of their own position are much more likely to avoid
"putting on airs" than those who have recently been elevated in the
social scale. Frank was destined that same evening to see the contrast
between true and false gentility.

It so happened that Victor Dupont, already mentioned, was an
acquaintance and former school-fellow of Fred Vivian. It also chanced
that he selected this evening for a call, as the Vivians stood very high
socially, being an old family. Victor was rather proud of his
acquaintance with them, and took occasion to call frequently.

As he was ushered into the room he did not at first recognize Frank in
his new clothes.

"Victor, this is a friend of mine, Frank Kavanagh," said Fred,
introducing his two visitors. "Frank, let me introduce my old
school-fellow Victor Dupont."

"We are already acquainted," said Frank. "Good-evening, Victor."

Victor stared in amusing astonishment at Frank.

"How do you happen to be here?" asked Victor, brusquely.

"By Mrs. Vivian's kind invitation," said Frank, quite at ease.

"How do you two happen to know each other?" asked Fred.

"We met in the country last summer," said Frank, finding Victor did not
answer.

"I suppose you had a very good time together," said Mrs. Vivian.

"Our acquaintance was very slight," said Victor superciliously.

"We must have gone fishing together at least a dozen times," said Frank,
quietly.

"How in the world did the fellow thrust himself in here?" said Victor to
himself. "They can't know his low position."

In the amiable desire of enlightening the Vivians Victor took an early
opportunity to draw Fred aside.

"Have you known Frank Kavanagh long?" he asked.

"Not very long."

"Do you know that he is a telegraph boy?"

"Oh, yes," answered Fred, smiling.

"He used to be a newsboy, and sell papers in the lower part of the
city."

"I didn't know that," said Fred indifferently.

"I must say that I am rather surprised to see him here."

"Why?" asked Fred, with provoking calmness.

"Oh, you know, he is much below us in a social point of view."

"I know that he is a poor boy; but some of our most prominent men were
once poor boys."

"I don't believe in mixing up different ranks."

"You didn't think so in the country last summer."

"Oh, well, a fellow must have some company, and there was no better to
be had."

"You will probably be surprised to hear that your old acquaintance is to
live here while I am in the country. I am going away to-morrow to spend
a few weeks with my cousin."

"Is it possible!" exclaimed Victor, in surprise and annoyance. "Perhaps
he is to be here as an errand boy?" he suggested, evidently relieved by
the idea.

"Oh, no; he will be treated in all respects as one of the family."

"Hadn't you better tell your mother that he was once a newsboy? She
might recall the invitation."

"It would make no difference with her. It seems to me, Victor, you are
prejudiced against Frank."

"No, I am not; but I like to see newsboys and telegraph messengers keep
their place."

"So do I. I hope Frank will keep his place till he can find a better
one."

"That isn't what I meant. How can you associate with such a boy on an
equality?"

"Because he seems well-bred and gentlemanly."

"I don't believe he gets more than three or four dollars a week," said
Victor, contemptuously.

"Then I really hope his wages will soon be increased."

Victor saw that he could do Frank no harm, and was forced, out of
policy, to treat our hero with more politeness than he wished.

When Frank rose to go, Mrs. Vivian desired him to send round his trunk,
and take possession of his room the next day.

"She doesn't suspect that I never owned a trunk," thought Frank. "I will
buy one to-morrow, though I haven't got much to put in it."




CHAPTER XV.

AT WALLACK'S THEATRE.


The next day Frank devoted what small leisure he had to the purchase of
a trunk, in which he stored his small supply of clothing, leaving out,
however, the clothes in which he made his first appearance in the city.
These he gave to his friend, Dick Rafferty, to whom they were a welcome
gift, being considerably better than those he usually wore. Dick might,
out of his earnings, have dressed better, but when he had any extra
money it went for some kind of amusement. He was one of the steadiest
patrons of the Old Bowery, and was often to be seen in the gallery of
other places of amusement. He was surprised to hear of Frank's intended
removal from the lodging-house.

"I say, Frank," he said, "you're gettin' on fast. Here you are, goin' to
live in a tip-top house up-town. You'll be a reg'lar swell."

"I hope not, Dick. I don't like swells very much."

"You won't notice your old friends bimeby."

"That shows you don't know me, Dick. I shall be glad to notice you
whenever we meet."

"I don't see why I can't be in luck too," said Dick. "I wish I could
find some rich lady to give me a room in her house."

"You'll have to get some new clothes first, Dick."

"I know I aint got a genteel look," said Dick, surveying his well-worn
clothes, soiled and ragged; "but it wouldn't be no use if I was to dress
in velvet."

"Unless you kept your face clean," suggested Frank.

"A feller can't be washin' his face all the time," said Dick.

"It's the fashion to have a clean face in good society," said Frank,
smiling.

"It must be a good deal of trouble," said Dick. "Is my face very dirty?"

"Not very. There's a black spot on each cheek, and one on the side of
your nose, and your chin looks a little shady."

"A feller can't keep very clean in my business."

"I suppose it is rather hard," Frank admitted; "but you won't be a
boot-black always, I hope."

"I'd just as lieves give it up for bankin', or cashier of a
savings-bank," said Dick. "Them's light, genteel kinds of business, and
don't dirty the hands."

"Well, Dick, if I hear of an opening in either line I'll let you know.
Now I must go and buy a trunk."

"I never expect to get as far as a trunk," said Dick. "I shall feel like
a gentleman when I can set up one. It wouldn't be no use to me now. I'd
have to stuff it with rocks to make a show."

"Poor Dick!" thought Frank as he left his friend. "He takes the world
too easy. He hasn't any ambition, or he wouldn't be content to keep on
blacking boots when there are so many better ways of making a living. If
I ever get a chance to give him a lift I will. He aint much to look at,
but he's a good-hearted boy, and would put himself to a good deal of
trouble to do me a favor."

It was not much trouble to pack his trunk. Indeed, he had scarcely
enough clothing to fill it one-third full.

"I may have to adopt Dick's plan, and fill it with rocks," said Frank to
himself. "Some day I shall be better supplied. I can't expect to get on
too fast."

The room assigned to Frank was a small one; but it was neatly furnished,
and provided with a closet. The bed, with its clean white spread, looked
very tempting, and Frank enjoyed the prospect of the privacy he would
have in a room devoted to his sole use. At the lodging-house, though his
bed was comfortable, there were sixty to eighty boys who slept in the
same room, and of course he had no more rights than any other.

"I hope you like your room, Frank," said Mrs. Vivian.

"It is the best I ever had," he replied.

"How early are you obliged to be on duty?" she asked.

"At eight o'clock."

"I do not breakfast till that hour; but I will direct the cook to have a
cup of coffee and some breakfast ready for you at seven."

"Am I to take my meals here?" asked Frank, in surprise.

"Certainly. Did you think I was going to send you out to a restaurant?"
inquired Mrs. Vivian, smiling.

"I am very much obliged to you; but I am afraid it will inconvenience
the cook to get me an early breakfast."

"I am glad to see you so considerate of others. I can answer for Mary,
however, who is very obliging. You can get lunch outside, as I suppose
it will be inconvenient for you to leave your duties to come so far as
Thirty-eighth street."

"You are very kind to me, Mrs. Vivian," said Frank, gratefully.

"I shall claim an occasional service of you in return," said Mrs.
Vivian.

"I hope you will," said Frank, promptly.

Two days after he had taken up his residence in his new quarters Frank
was called upon to render a very agreeable service.

"I have two tickets for Wallack's theatre for this evening," said Mrs.
Vivian. "Will it be agreeable for you to accompany me?"

"I should like it very much."

"Then you shall be my escort. When Fred is at home he goes with me; but
now I must depend on you. Have you a pair of kid gloves?"

Frank was obliged to confess that he had not. In fact he had never owned
a pair in his life.

"I will give you a pair of mine. Probably there is little difference in
the size of our hands."

This proved to be true.

Somehow Frank in his new life seemed always running across Victor
Dupont. That young gentleman and his sister sat in the row behind Mrs.
Vivian and her youthful escort, but did not immediately become aware of
it.

"Why, Victor," said his sister, who had been looking about her, "there
is Mrs. Vivian in the next row. Who is that nice-looking boy with her?
It can't be Fred, for he is larger."

Victor turned his glance in the direction of Mrs. Vivian. His surprise
and disgust were about equal when he saw the country-boy he had looked
down upon, faultlessly attired, with neat-fitting gloves, and a rose in
his button-hole and looking like a gentleman.

"I never saw such cheek!" he exclaimed, in disgust.

"What do you mean, Victor?" asked his sister, looking puzzled.

"Do you want to know who that boy is with Mrs. Vivian?"

"Yes; he is very nice-looking."

"Then you can marry him if you like. That boy is a telegraph messenger.
I used to know him in the country. A few weeks ago he was selling papers
in front of the Astor House."

"You don't say so!" ejaculated Flora Dupont, "Aren't you mistaken?"

"I guess not. I know him as well as I know you."

"He is a good-looking boy, at any rate," said Flora, who was less
snobbish than her brother.

"I can't see it," said Victor, annoyed. "He looks to me very common and
vulgar. I don't see how Mrs. Vivian can be willing to appear with him at
a fashionable theatre like this."

"It's a pity he is a telegraph boy, he is so nice-looking."

Just then Frank, turning, recognized Victor and bowed. Victor could not
afford not to recognize Mrs. Vivian's escort, and bowed in return.

But Victor was not the only one of Frank's acquaintances who recognized
him that evening. In the upper gallery sat Dick Rafferty and Micky Shea,
late fellow-boarders at the lodging-house. It was not often that these
young gentlemen patronized Wallack's, for even a gallery ticket there
was high-priced; but both wanted to see the popular play of "Ours," and
had managed to scrape together fifty cents each.

"Dick," said Micky, suddenly, "there's Frank Kavanagh down near the
stage, in an orchestra seat."

"So he is," said Dick. "Aint he dressed splendid though, wid kid gloves
on and a flower in his button-hole, and an elegant lady beside him? See,
she's whisperin' to him now. Who'd think he used to kape company wid the
likes of us?"

"Frank's up in the world. He's a reg'lar swell now."

"And it's I that am glad of it. He's a good fellow, Frank is, and he
won't turn his back on us."

This was proved later in the evening, for, as Frank left the theatre
with Mrs. Vivian, he espied his two old friends standing outside, and
bowed with a pleasant smile, much to the gratification of the two street
boys, who were disposed to look upon their old friend as one of the
aristocracy.




CHAPTER XVI.

FRANK AS A DETECTIVE.


Of course Frank's daily duties were far the most part of a commonplace
character. They were more varied, to be sure, than those of an
errand-boy, or shop-boy, but even a telegraph messenger does not have an
adventure every day. Twice in the next three weeks our hero was summoned
by Mrs. Leroy to give her pet dog an airing. It was not hard work, but
Frank did not fancy it, though he never failed to receive a handsome fee
from the mistress of Fido.

One day Frank was summoned to a fashionable boarding-house in a side
street above the Fifth-avenue hotel. On presenting himself, the servant
said, "It's one of the boarders wants you. Stay here, and I'll let him
know you've come."

"All right!" said Frank.

"Come right up," said the girl, directly after, speaking from the upper
landing.

Frank ascended the stairs, and entered a room on the second floor. A
gentleman, partially bald, with a rim of red hair around the bare
central spot, sat in a chair by the window, reading a morning paper.

"So you're the telegraph boy, are you?" he said.

"Yes, sir."

"You are honest, eh?"

"I hope so, sir."

"Because I am going to trust you with a considerable sum of money."

"It will be safe, sir."

"I want you to do some shopping for me. Are you ever employed in that
way?"

"I was once, sir."

"Let me see,--I want some linen handkerchiefs and some collars. Are you
a judge of those articles?"

"Not particularly."

"However, I suppose you know a collar from a pair of cuffs, and a
handkerchief from a towel," said the stranger, petulantly.

"I rather think I can tell them apart," said Frank.

"Now let me see how many I want," said the stranger, reflectively. "I
think half-a-dozen handkerchiefs will do."

"How high shall I go?" asked Frank.

"You ought to get them for fifty cents apiece, I should think."

"Yes, sir, I can get them for that."

"And the collars--well, half-a-dozen will do. Get them of good quality,
size 15, and pay whatever is asked."

"Yes, sir; do you want anything more?"

"I think not, this morning. I have a headache, or I would go out
myself," explained the stranger. "I live up the Hudson, and I must go
home this afternoon by the boat."

"Do you want me to buy the articles at any particular store?" inquired
Frank.

"No; I leave that to your judgment. A large store is likely to have a
better assortment, I suppose."

"Very well, sir."

"Come back as soon as you can, that's all."

"You haven't given me the money yet, sir," said Frank.

"Oh, I beg pardon! That is an important omission."

The stranger drew out a pocket-book, which appeared to be well filled,
and extracted two bills of twenty dollars each, which he passed to
Frank.

"This is too much, sir," said the telegraph boy. "One of these bills
will be much more than sufficient."

"Never mind. I should like to have them both changed. You can buy the
articles at different places, as this will give you a chance to get
change for both."

"I can get them changed at a bank, sir."

"No," said the stranger, hastily, "I would rather you would pay them for
goods. Shopkeepers are bound to change bills for a customer."

"I don't see what difference it makes to you as long as they are
changed," thought Frank. However it was not his business to question his
employer's decision.

Sixth avenue was not far distant, and as Frank was left to his own
choice he betook himself hither on his shopping tour. Entering a large
retail store, he inquired for gentleman's linen handkerchiefs.

"Large or small?" asked the girl in attendance.

"Large, I should think."

He was shown some of good quality, at fifty cents.

"I think they will do," said Frank, after examination. "I will take
half-a-dozen."

So saying he drew out one of the twenty-dollar bills.

"Cash!" called the saleswoman, tapping on the counter with her pencil.

Several small boys were flitting about the store in the service of
customers. One of them made his appearance.

"Have you nothing smaller?" asked the girl, noticing the denomination of
the bill.

"No," answered Frank.

She put the bill between the leaves of a small blank book, and handed
both that and the goods to the boy.

Frank sat down on a stool by the counter to wait.

Presently the cash-boy came back, and the proprietor of the store with
him. He was a portly man, with a loud voice and an air of authority. To
him the cash-boy pointed out Frank.

"Are you the purchaser of these handkerchiefs?" he asked.

"Yes, sir," answered Frank, rather surprised at the question.

"And did you offer this twenty-dollar bill in payment?"

"Yes, sir."

"Where did you get it? Think well," said the trader, sternly.

"What is the matter? Isn't the bill a good one?" asked Frank.

"You have not answered my question. However, I will answer yours. The
bill is a counterfeit."

Frank looked surprised, and he understood at a flash why he had been
trusted with two of these bills when one would answer.

"I have nothing to do with that," said the telegraph boy. "I was sent
out to buy some articles, and this money was given me to pay for them."

"Have you got any other money of this description?" asked the trader,
suspiciously.

"Yes," answered Frank, readily. "I have another twenty."

"Let me see it."

"Certainly. I should like to know whether that is bad too."

The other twenty proved to be a fac-simile of the first.

"I must know where you got this money," said the merchant. "You may be
in the service of counterfeiters."

"You might know, from my uniform, that I am not," said Frank,
indignantly. "I once lost a place because I would not pass counterfeit
money."

"I have a detective here. You must lead him to the man who supplied you
with the money."

"I am quite willing to do it," said our hero. "He wanted to make a tool
of me. If I can put him into the hands of the law, I will."

"That boy is all right," said a gentleman standing by. "The rogue was
quite ingenious in trying to work off his bad money through a telegraph
messenger."

"What is the appearance of this man?" asked the detective as they walked
along.

"Rather a reddish face, and partly bald."

"What is the color of the hair he has?"

"Red."

"Very good. It ought to be easy to know him by that description."

"I should know him at once," said Frank, promptly.

"If he has not changed his appearance. It is easy to do that, and these
fellows understand it well."

Reaching the house, Frank rang the bell, the detective sauntering along
on the opposite side of the street.

"Is Mr. Stanley at home?" asked Frank.

"I will see."

The girl came down directly, with the information that Mr. Stanley had
gone out.

"That is queer," said Frank. "He told me to come right back. He said he
had a headache, too, and did not want to go out."

As he spoke, his glance rested on a man who was lounging at the corner.
This man had black hair, and a full black beard. By chance, Frank's eye
fell upon his right hand, and with a start he recognized a large ring
with a sparkling diamond, real or imitation. This ring he had last seen
on Mr. Stanley's hand. He crossed the street in a quiet, indifferent
manner, and imparted his suspicions to the detective.

"Good!" said the latter; "you are a smart boy."

He approached the man alluded to, who, confident in his disguise, did
not budge, and, placing his hand on his shoulder, said, "Mr. Stanley, I
believe."

"You are mistaken," said the man, shrugging his shoulders in a
nonchalant way, with a foreign accent, "I am M. Lavalette. I do not know
your M. Stanley."

"I am afraid you are forgetful, monsieur. I beg pardon, but do you wear
a wig?" and with a quick movement he removed the stranger's hat, and,
dislodging his black wig, displayed the rim of red hair.

"This is an outrage!" said the rogue, angrily; "I will have you
arrested, monsieur."

"I will give you a chance, for here is an officer," said the detective.

"I give this man in charge for passing counterfeit money," said the
detective. "The next time, Mr. Stanley, don't select so smart a
telegraph boy. He recognized you, in spite of your disguise, by the ring
upon your finger."

The rogue angrily drew the ring from his finger, and threw it on the
sidewalk.

"Curse the ring!" he said. "It has betrayed me."

It only remains to add that Stanley was convicted through Frank's
testimony. He proved to be an old offender, and the chief of a gang of
counterfeiters.




CHAPTER XVII.

FRANK MEETS AN OLD ACQUAINTANCE.


Frank was more fortunate than the generality of the telegraph boys in
obtaining fees from those who employed him. He was not allowed to
solicit gifts, but was at liberty to accept them when offered. In one
way or another he found his weekly receipts came to about seven dollars.
Out of this sum he would have been able to save money, even if he had
been obliged to pay all his expenses, that is by the exercise of strict
economy. But, as we know, he was at no expense for room or board, with
the exception of a light lunch in the middle of the day. Making a little
calculation, he found that he could save about four dollars a week. As
it had only been proposed to him to stay at Mrs. Vivian's while Fred was
in the country, it seemed prudent to Frank to "make hay while the sun
shone," and save up a little fund from which he could hereafter draw, in
case it were necessary.

So when he had saved ten dollars he presented himself at the counter of
the Dime Savings-Bank, then located in Canal street, and deposited it,
receiving a bank-book, which he regarded with great pride.

"I begin to feel like a capitalist," he said to himself. "I am rather
better off now than I was when I led round old Mills, the blind man. I
wonder how he is getting along."

As Frank entered Broadway from Canal street, by a strange coincidence he
caught sight of the man of whom he had been thinking. Mills, with the
same querulous, irritable expression he knew well, was making his way up
Broadway, led by a boy younger than Frank.

"Pity a poor blind man!" he muttered from time to time in a whining
voice.

"Look out, you young rascal, or you will have me off the sidewalk,"
Frank heard the blind man say; "I'll have a reckoning with you when I
get home."

The boy, who was pale and slight, looked frightened.

"I couldn't help it, Mr. Mills," he said. "It was the crowd."

"You are getting careless, that's what's the matter," said Mills,
harshly. "You are looking in at the shop windows, and neglect me."

"No, I am not," said the boy, in meek remonstrance.

"Don't you contradict me!" exclaimed the blind man, grasping his stick
significantly. "Pity a poor blind man!"

"What an old brute he is!" thought Frank; "I will speak to him."

"How do you do, Mr. Mills?" he said, halting before the blind man.

"Who are you?" demanded Mills, quickly.

"You ought to know me; I am Frank Kavanagh, who used to go round with
you."

"I have had so many boys--most of them good for nothing--that I don't
remember you."

"I am the boy who wouldn't pass counterfeit money for you."

"Hush!" said the blind man apprehensively, lest some one should hear
Frank. "There was some mistake about that. I remember you now. Do you
want to come back? This boy doesn't attend to his business."

Frank laughed. Situated as he was now, the proposal seemed to him an
excellent joke, and he was disposed to treat it as such.

"Why, the fact is, Mr. Mills, you fed me on such rich food that I
shouldn't dare to go back for fear of dyspepsia."

"Or starvation," he added to himself.

"I live better now," said Mills. "I haven't had any boy since, that
suited me as well as you."

"Thank you; but I am afraid it would be a long time before I got rich on
the wages you would give me."

"I'll give you fifty cents a week," said Mills, "and more if I do well.
You can come to-day, if you like."

"You are very kind, but I am doing better than that," said Frank.

"What are you doing,--selling papers?"

"No; I have given that up. I am a telegraph boy."

"How much do you make?"

"Seven dollars last week."

"Why, you will be rich," said the blind man, enviously. "I don't think I
get as much as that myself, and I have to pay a boy out of it."

His poor guide did not have the appearance of being very liberally paid.

"Then you won't come back?" said Mills, querulously.

"No, I guess not."

"Come along, boy!" said Mills, roughly, to his little guide. "Are you
going to keep me here all day?"

"I thought you wanted to speak to this boy."

"Well, I have got through. He has deserted me. It is the way of the
world. There's nobody to pity the poor, blind man."

"Here's five cents for old acquaintance' sake. Mr. Mills," said Frank,
dropping a nickel into the hand of the boy who was guiding him.

"Thank you! May you never know what it is to be blind!" said Mills, in
his professional tone.

"If I am, I hope I can see as well as you," thought Frank. "What a
precious old humbug he is, and how I pity that poor boy! If I had a
chance I would give him something to save him from starvation."

Frank walked on, quite elated at the change in his circumstances which
allowed him to give money in charity to the person who had once been his
employer. He would have given it more cheerfully if in his estimation
the man had been more worthy.

Frank's errand took him up Broadway. He had two or three stops to make,
which made it inconvenient for him to ride. A little way in front of him
he saw a boy of fourteen, whom he recognized as an errand-boy, and a
former fellow-lodger at the Newsboy's Lodging-House. He was about to
hurry forward and join John Riley,--for this was the boy's name,--when
his attention was attracted, and his suspicions aroused, by a man who
accosted John. He was a man of about thirty, rather showily dressed,
with a gold chain dangling from his vest.

"Johnny," he said, addressing the errand-boy "do you want to earn ten
cents?"

"I should like to," answered the boy, "but I am going on an errand, and
can't spare the time."

"It won't take five minutes," said the young man. "It is only to take
this note up to Mr. Conant's room, on the fourth floor of this
building."

They were standing in front of a high building occupied as offices.

The boy hesitated.

"Is there an answer?" he asked.

"No; you can come right down as soon as the letter is delivered."

"I suppose I could spare the time for that," said John Riley.

"Of course you can. It won't take you two minutes. Here is the ten
cents. I'll hold your bundle for you while you run up."

"All right!" said the errand-boy, and, suspecting nothing, he
surrendered his parcel, and taking the note and the dime, ran upstairs.

No sooner was he out of sight than the young man began to walk off
rapidly with the bundle. It was an old trick, that has been many times
played upon unsuspecting boys, and will continue to be played as long as
there are knavish adventurers who prefer dishonest methods of getting a
living to honest industry.

In this case, however, the rogue was destined to disappointment. It may
be stated that he had been present in the dry-goods store from which the
parcel came, and, knowing that the contents were valuable, had followed
the boy.

No sooner did Frank understand the fellow's purpose than he pursued him,
and seized him by the arm.

"What do you want of me?" demanded the rogue, roughly. "I am in a hurry
and can't be detained."

"I want you to give me that bundle which you are trying to steal from my
friend, John Riley."

The rogue's countenance changed.

"What do you mean?" he demanded, to gain time.

"I mean that I heard your conversation with him, and I know your game.
Come back, or I will call a policeman."

The young man was sharp enough to see that he must give up his purpose.

"There, take the bundle," he said, tossing it into Frank's arms. "I was
only going for a cigar; I should have brought it back."

When John Riley came downstairs, with the letter in his hand,--for he
had been unable to find any man named Conant in the building,--he found
Frank waiting with the parcel.

"Holloa, Frank! Where's that man that sent me upstairs? I can't find Mr.
Conant."

"Of course you can't. There's no such man in the building. That man was
a thief; but for me he would have carried off your bundle."

"What a fool I was!" said the errand-boy. "I won't let myself be fooled
again."

"Don't give up a bundle to a stranger again," said Frank. "I'm only a
country boy, but I don't allow myself to be swindled as easily as you."

"I wish that chap would come here again," said Johnny, indignantly. "But
I've come out best, after all," he added, brightening up. "I've made ten
cents out of him."




CHAPTER XVIII.

A RICH WOMAN'S SORROW.


One day Frank was summoned to a handsome residence on Madison avenue.

"Sit down in the parlor," said the servant "and I will call Mrs.
Graham."

As Frank looked around him, and noted the evidences of wealth in the
elegant furniture and rich ornaments profusely scattered about, he
thought, "How rich Mrs. Graham must be! I suppose she is very happy. I
should be if I could buy everything I wanted."

It was a boy's thought, and betrayed our hero's inexperience. Even
unlimited means are not sure to produce happiness, nor do handsome
surroundings prove wealth.

Five minutes later an elderly lady entered the room. She was richly
dressed, but her face wore a look of care and sorrow.

As she entered, Frank rose with instinctive politeness, and bowed.

"You are the telegraph boy," said the lady, inquiringly.

"Yes, ma'am."

Mrs. Graham looked at him earnestly, as if to read his character.

"I have sent for you," she said, at length, "to help me in a matter of
some delicacy, and shall expect you not to speak of it, even to your
employers."

"They never question me," said Frank, promptly. "You may rely upon my
secrecy."

Frank's statement was correct. The business entrusted to telegraph
messengers is understood to be of a confidential nature, and they are
instructed to guard the secrets of those who make use of their services.

"I find it necessary to raise some money," continued the lady,
apparently satisfied, "and am not at liberty, for special reasons, to
call upon my husband for it. I have a diamond ring of considerable
value, which I should like to have you carry, either to a jeweller or a
pawnbroker, and secure what advance you can upon it."

"And I believed she had plenty of money," thought Frank, wondering.

"I will do the best I can for you, madam," said our hero.

Mrs. Graham drew from her pocket a small box, containing a diamond ring,
which sparkled brilliantly in the sunshine.

"It is beautiful," said Frank, admiringly.

"Yes, it cost originally eight hundred dollars," said the lady.

"Eight hundred dollars!" echoed Frank, in wonder. He had heard of
diamond rings, and knew they were valuable, but had no idea they were so
valuable as that.

"How much do you expect to get on it?" he asked.

"Nothing near its value, of course, nor is that necessary. Two hundred
dollars will be as much as I care to use, and at that rate I shall be
able the sooner to redeem it. I believe I will tell you why I want the
money."

"Not unless you think it best," said Frank.

"It is best, for I shall again require your services in disposing of the
money."

The lady sat down on the sofa beside Frank, and told him the story which
follows:--

"I have two children," she said, "a daughter and a son. The son has
recently graduated from college, and is now travelling in Europe. My
daughter is now twenty-six years of age. She was beautiful, and our
social position was such that my husband, who is a proud man,
confidently anticipated that she would make a brilliant match. But at
the age of nineteen Ellen fell in love with a clerk in my husband's
employ. He was a young man of good appearance and character, and nothing
could be said against him except that he was poor. This, however, was
more than enough in Mr. Graham's eyes. When Lawrence Brent asked for the
hand of our daughter, my husband drove him from the house with insult,
and immediately discharged him from his employ. Ellen was high-spirited,
and resented this treatment of the man she loved. He soon obtained a
place quite as good as the one he had lost, and one day Ellen left the
house and married him. She wrote to us, excusing her action, and I would
gladly have forgiven her; but her father was obdurate. He forbade my
mentioning her name to him, and from that day to this he has never
referred to her.

"I am now coming to the business in which you are to help me. For years
my son-in-law was able to support his wife comfortably, and also the two
children which in time came to them. But, a year since, he became sick,
and his sickness lasted till he had spent all his savings. Now he and
his poor family are living in wretched lodgings, and are in need of the
common necessaries of life. It is for them I intend the money which I
can secure upon this ring."

Frank could not listen without having his sympathies aroused.

"I shall be still more glad to help you," he said, "now that I know how
the money is to be used."

"Thank you," said the lady. "You are a good boy, and I see that I can
trust you implicitly."

She handed Frank the box, enjoining upon him to be careful not to lose
it.

"It is so small that it might easily slip from your pocket," she said.

"I shall take the best care of it," said Frank. "Where would you advise
me to go first?"

"I hardly know. If I wished to sell it I would carry it to Tiffany; but
it was purchased there, and it might in that case come to my husband's
ears. There is a pawnbroker, named Simpson, who, I hear, is one of the
best of his class. You may go there first."

"How much shall I say you want on it?" asked Frank.

"Don't mention my name at all," said the lady, hastily.

"I suppose I shall have to give some name," said Frank, "in order that
the ticket may be made out."

"What is your own name?"

"Frank Kavanagh."

"Have you a mother living?"

"No," said Frank, gravely.

"Then let the ticket be made out in your name."

"If you wish it."

"Shall I bring the money to you, Mrs. Graham?"

"No; my husband might be at home, and it would arouse his suspicions. At
twelve o'clock I will meet you at Madison Park, at the corner opposite
the Union League Club House. You can then report to me your success."

"Very well," said Frank.

He went at once to the pawnbroker mentioned by Mrs. Graham. But for his
uniform he would have been questioned closely as to how he came by the
ring; but telegraph boys are so often employed on similar errands that
the pawnbroker showed no surprise. After a careful examination he agreed
to advance two hundred dollars, and gave Frank the money and the ticket.
When Frank gave his own name, he said, "That is your name, is it not?"

"Yes, sir."

"But the ring does not belong to you?"

"No; it belongs to a lady who does not wish her name known."

"It is all the same to us."

"That was easily done," thought Frank. "Now I must go and meet Mrs.
Graham."

"Have you got the money?" asked Mrs. Graham, anxiously, as Frank made
his appearance.

"Yes," replied Frank.

"How much?"

"The amount you asked for."

"That is well. Now I shall be able to relieve my poor daughter. I cannot
bear to think of her and her poor children suffering for the lack of
bread, while I am living in luxury. I wish Mr. Graham was not so
unforgiving."

"Will you take the money now?" asked Frank.

"I wish you to take fifty dollars to my daughter."

"I will do so with pleasure. What is her address?"

Mrs. Graham drew out a card, on which she had pencilled her daughter's
address. It proved to be a tenement-house on the east side of the city,
not far from Fourteenth street.

"I wish I could go myself," said Mrs. Graham, sadly; "but I do not dare
to do so at present. Give Ellen this money, with my best love; and say
to her that a month hence I will again send her the same sum. Tell her
to keep up good courage. Brighter days may be in store."

"I will be sure to remember," said Frank, in a tone of sympathy.

The errand was to his taste; for he was about to carry help and comfort
to those who needed both.




CHAPTER XIX.

A MESSENGER OF GOOD TIDINGS.


There stands a large tenement-house on East Fourteenth street, five
stories in height, and with several entrances. Scores of barefooted and
scantily attired children play in the halls or on the sidewalk in front,
and the great building is a human hive, holding scores of families. Some
of them, unaccustomed to live better, are tolerably content with their
squalid and contracted accommodations; but a few, reduced by gradual
steps from respectability and comfort, find their positions very hard to
bear.

On the third floor three small rooms were occupied by Mr. and Mrs.
Robert Morgan, and their two children. She was the daughter of Mrs.
Graham, and had been reared in affluence. How she had incurred her
father's displeasure has already been told. He had been taken sick some
months before, his little stock of money had melted away, and now he was
unable even to pay the small expenses of life in a tenement-house.

Just before Frank made his appearance there was sadness in the little
household.

"How much money is there left, Ellen?" asked Robert Morgan.

"Seventy-five cents," she answered, in a tone which she tried to make
cheerful.

"And our week's rent will become due to-morrow."

"I may hear from mother," suggested Mrs. Morgan.

"If you don't, I don't know what will become of us all. We shall be
thrust into the street. Even this squalid home will be taken from us."

"Don't get discouraged, Robert."

"Isn't there enough to make me despondent, Ellen? I can see now that I
did very wrong to marry you."

"Do you regret our marriage, then, Robert?" asked his wife.

"Only because it has brought you poverty and discomfort."

"I have not yet regretted it."

"How different a position you would have occupied if I had not dragged
you down! You would still be living in luxury."

"I should not have you and these dear children."

"And will they compensate you for what has come upon you?"

"Yes," she answered, emphatically.

"You have more philosophy than I have, Ellen."

"More trust, perhaps. Do you know, Robert, I think we are on the eve of
good fortune?"

"I hope so, but I see no prospects of it."

Just then there was a knock at the door.

Thinking that it might be some humble neighbor, on a borrowing
expedition, Mrs. Morgan opened the door. Before her stood our hero in
his uniform.

"Is this Mrs. Robert Morgan?" asked Frank.

"Yes," she answered.

"I come from your mother."

"From my mother? Robert, do you hear that?" said the poor woman, in a
voice of gladness. "Here is a messenger from my mother. Didn't I tell
you there was good luck in store for us?"

Mr. Morgan did not answer. He waited anxiously to hear what Frank had to
communicate.

"Your mother sends you her love, and fifty dollars," continued Frank.
"She hopes to call soon herself."

"Fifty dollars!" exclaimed Ellen Morgan, in delight. "It is a fortune."

"Thank Heaven!" ejaculated her husband, in great relief.

"A month hence you may expect a similar sum," said Frank. "I suppose I
shall bring it. Shall I find you here?"

Ellen Morgan looked at her husband.

"No," said he. "Let us get out of this neighborhood as soon as possible.
Can't you find a respectable place to-day?"

"Yes," said his wife. "I shall be glad to move. I saw some neat rooms on
West Twentieth street on Monday. They will cost us but little more, and
will suit us better."

"I will send my mother my new address," she said to Frank.

"Then you may send it under cover to me, and I will see that she gets it
privately," said Frank, who had received instructions to that effect
from Mrs. Graham.

When Frank had left the room the little household seemed quite
transformed. Hope had entered, and all looked more cheerful.

"We are provided for, for two months, Robert," said his wife. "Is not
that a piece of good luck?"

"Yes, indeed it is," he answered heartily. "Before that time I can get
to work again, and with health and employment I shall not need to ask
favors of any one."

"I wish father were as forgiving as mother," said Ellen Morgan.

"Your father is a hard man. He will never forgive you for marrying a
poor man. He would punish you by starvation."

"He is very proud," said Mrs. Morgan. "I was an only daughter, you know,
and he had set his heart upon my making a brilliant marriage."

"As you might have done."

"As I did not care to do. I preferred to make a happy marriage with the
man of my choice."

"You are a good wife, Ellen."

"I hope you will always find me so, Robert."

"I should have sunk utterly if you had been like some women."

In the afternoon Mrs. Morgan went out, taking one of her children with
her. She went to the rooms on West Twentieth street, and, finding them
still vacant, secured them, paying a month's rent in advance, as her
mother's timely gift enabled her to do. Before the next evening they
were installed in their new home, and Mrs. Morgan sent a note to her
mother, under cover to Frank, apprising her of the removal.

Two days later Frank received a summons to the house on Madison avenue.
He obeyed, thinking he should probably be sent with some message to Mrs.
Morgan.

He found Mrs. Graham in a state of nervous excitement.

"My husband has been stricken with paralysis," she said. "It is terribly
sudden. He went out yesterday, apparently in vigorous health. He was
brought home pale and helpless."

"Can I do anything for him or you?" asked Frank.

"Yes; you can go at once to my daughter, and summon her to her father's
bedside."

Frank was surprised, remembering how obdurate Mrs. Graham had described
her husband to be.

"You look surprised," she said; "but sickness often produces a great
change in us. My husband's pride has given way. His affection has
returned; and it is at his request that I send for Ellen."

Frank had come to feel a personal interest in the family, and he gladly
set out for the modest home in West Twentieth street. He felt that it
was pleasant to be a messenger of reconciliation.

Mrs. Morgan recognized him at once, and received him cordially.

"Do you come from my mother?" she asked.

"Yes. She wishes you to come home at once."

"But--my father."

"Your father is very sick; and he joins in the request."

"It has come at last,--the time I have looked forward to for so long,"
said Ellen Morgan, clasping her hands. "Robert, do you feel equal to
looking after the children while I am gone?"

"Yes, Ellen. Go at once. God grant that your father's heart may be
softened, for your sake. For myself I am content to live in poverty; but
I don't like to see you suffer."

"What is the matter with father? Did my mother tell you?"

Frank explained, and thus gave her fresh cause for anxiety.

On reaching her father's chamber she was shocked by his changed
appearance; but her heart was gladdened by the wan smile that lighted
up his face, assuring her that she was welcome. From the doctor she
received the assurance that her father was in no immediate danger.
Indeed, he expressed a confident hope that Mr. Graham would rally from
his present attack, and be able to go about his business again, though
caution would be required against undue excitement or fatigue.

The doctor's prediction was verified. Mr. Graham recovered; but his old
pride and obduracy did not come back. He became reconciled to his
son-in-law, and provided him a well-paid position in his own mercantile
establishment, and provided rooms in the Madison-avenue mansion for the
little family whom Frank had first visited in the squalid tenement-house
in Fourteenth street, and the glad voices of children made the house no
longer lonely.

"You must call and see us often," said Ellen Morgan to our hero. "I
shall always remember you as the messenger who brought us good tidings
at the darkest hour in our fortunes. We shall always welcome you as a
friend."




CHAPTER XX.

A NEW JOB, AND A LETTER FROM HOME.


One morning an elderly gentleman entered the office in which Frank was
employed, and sought an interview with the superintendent.

"I want a smart boy for detective work," he said. "Have you one you can
recommend?"

The superintendent cast his eyes over the line of boys, and called
Frank. Our hero's recognition of the disguised counterfeiter by his ring
had given him a reputation for shrewdness.

"I think this boy will suit you," he said. "Do you wish him to go with
you now?"

"Yes; I may want him a week."

"Very well."

Frank accompanied the gentleman into the street.

"Have you no other clothes except this uniform?" asked Mr. Hartley.

"Yes, sir."

"Then go and put them on. Then report to me at No. -- Broadway."

"All right, sir."

"It is fortunate I have a good suit," thought Frank.

He was not long in exchanging his uniform for the neat suit given him by
Mr. Bowen. Thus attired, he presented himself in Mr. Hartley's
counting-room. The merchant surveyed him with approval.

[Illustration: THE MERCHANT SURVEYED WITH APPROVAL.]

"You will enter my service as errand-boy," he said. "You will be sent to
the post-office, the bank, and on similar errands, in order not to
excite suspicion of the real object of your presence. Keep your eyes
open, and I will take an opportunity of explaining to you later what I
wish you to do."

Frank bowed.

"Mr. Haynes," said the merchant, calling a thin, sallow young man, "I
have engaged this boy as an errand-boy. Has any one been to the
post-office this morning?"

"No, sir."

"Then he will go."

Haynes regarded Frank with disfavor.

"I have a nephew who would have liked the position," he said.

"Too late now," said the merchant, curtly.

"What is your name, boy?" asked Haynes, coldly..

"Frank Kavanagh."

"How did Mr. Hartley happen to engage you?" asked the subordinate.

"A gentleman recommended me," Frank answered.

"I had already mentioned my nephew to him. I am surprised he said
nothing to me about engaging a boy."

Frank said nothing, feeling no particular interest in the matter. As he
was only filling temporarily the position of errand boy, it made little
difference to him whether he was acceptable to Mr. Haynes or not.

In the course of the day Mr. Hartley handed Frank a card, containing the
street and number of his residence, with a pencilled invitation to call
that evening.

Of course Frank did so.

Seated alone with the merchant in his back parlor, the latter said, "I
have invited you here because I could not speak with you freely at the
store. How do you like Mr. Haynes?"

Frank was surprised at the abruptness of the question.

"I don't like him," he answered, candidly.

"Why not?"

"There is no good reason that I know of," said Frank; "but I think his
manner is disagreeable."

"Our instincts are often to be trusted," said the merchant,
thoughtfully. "I confess that I myself don't like Haynes, nor do I feel
implicit confidence in him, though he has been eight years in the
service of our house. He is outwardly very circumspect, and apparently
very faithful, but there is something in his eye which I don't like."

Frank had noticed this, but Mr. Hartley's remark called fresh attention
to its furtive, crafty expression.

Frank's curiosity was aroused, naturally enough. He wondered what Mr.
Haynes had to do with his mission. He did not have long to wait for
information.

"I will come to the point," said Mr. Hartley, after a pause. "I am an
importing merchant, and deal, among other articles, in silks. During the
last year I have discovered that some one is systematically robbing me,
and that parts of my stock have been spirited away. The loss I have
sustained is already considerable, and unless the leakage is put a stop
to, I may as well give up business. You can now guess why I have engaged
you. No one will suspect an errand boy of being a detective, while a man
would very probably excite distrust, and put the rogue on his guard."

Frank listened attentively to his employer.

"Do you suspect any one in particular, Mr. Hartley?" he asked.

"It must be some one in my employ," he said. "The man who, more than any
other, has facilities for robbing me is the man of whom I have spoken to
you."

"Mr. Haynes?"

"Yes, Mr. Haynes. He holds an important position, and enjoys special
privileges. On the other hand, so far as I can learn, he lives in a
sober, inexpensive way, quite within his salary, which is liberal. He is
prominently connected with an up-town church, and it seems very
improbable that he would be guilty of robbery, or breach of trust; yet
there have been such cases before. At any rate, I cannot wholly divest
myself of suspicion."

"What do you wish me to do?" asked Frank.

"To watch Mr. Haynes carefully, both in and out of the store, to
ascertain whether he has any unexplained expenses, or any questionable
companions. I want to know how he spends his time out of the office. It
may be that the result of my investigation will be to his credit. It may
be that he is all that he seems,--a reputable member of the church and
of society, with nothing against him but an unpleasant manner. Should
this be the case, I shall be glad to correct my suspicions, and give him
back my confidence. In that case, we must look elsewhere for the rogue
who is robbing me."

"Have you any particular instructions to give me?" asked Frank.

"No, only to follow Haynes, and find out all you can about him. Use
great care in doing it, not to arouse his or any one else's suspicion. I
will find an opportunity for you to make your reports."

"Very well, sir."

       *       *       *       *       *

When Frank got home, he found a letter awaiting him from his country
home. It was in answer to one which he had written to his uncle, Deacon
Pelatiah Kavanagh, in reference to a trunk which had belonged to his
father.

This is the letter:--

     MY DEAR NEPHEW,--I am glad to learn that you are making a living in
     the city. It is much better that you should earn your own living
     than to be a burden upon me, though of course I would not see you
     suffer. But a man's duty is to his own household, and my income
     from the farm is very small, and Hannah and I agreed that we had
     little to spare for others.

     There is an old trunk, belonging to your deceased father, in the
     attic. It contains some old clothes, which may be made over for
     you, and so save you expense. I would use them myself, and allow
     you for them, but your father was a much smaller man than I, and
     his clothes would not fit me. I will send the trunk by express to
     the address which you gave me. Of course I shall expect you to pay
     the express, as I have no interest in it, or its contents.

     Your cousin Jonathan has left school, and is working on the farm. I
     feel _so_ glad that he has no extravagant tastes, but inherits the
     careful and economical habits of his mother and myself. I am sure
     he will never waste or squander the little property which I hope to
     leave him.

"I don't believe he will," thought Frank, "for he is about as mean as
his mother, and that is saying a good deal."

     Your aunt and I hope that you will steer clear of the temptations
     of the city. Do not seek after vain amusements, but live a sober
     life, never spending a cent unnecessarily, and you will in time
     become a prosperous man. I would invite you to come and stop with
     us over Sunday, but for the railroad fare, which is high. It will
     be better to save your money, and put off the visit till you can
     afford it.

     Your uncle,
     PELATIAH KAVANAGH.

Reading this letter, it would hardly be supposed that the writer owned
ten thousand dollars in stocks, bonds, and mortgages, over and above an
excellent farm. Such, however, was the worldly position of the man who
sent Frank to the city in quest of a living, because he could not afford
to provide for him. With some men prudence is a virtue; with Deacon
Pelatiah Kavanagh it was carried so far as to be a positive defect.




CHAPTER XXI.

FRANK'S FIRST DISCOVERY.


So far as Frank could observe, Mr. Haynes was an active, energetic
salesman. He appeared to understand his duties thoroughly, and to go
about them in a straightforward manner. So far as his personal habits
were concerned, they seemed irreproachable. He was neatly but plainly
dressed, wore no jewelry, and carried a plain silver watch, which, when
new, probably did not cost over twenty dollars.

Frank had no difficulty in ascertaining where he lived. It was in a
brick house, on Waverley place, very unpretentious and certainly not
fashionable. In order to find out how much he paid for his
accommodations Frank visited the house on pretence of being in search of
board.

"We have a hall bed-room on the third floor, at five dollars a week,
including board," said the landlady. "How would that suit you?"

"I may have a friend board with me," said Frank. "In that case we should
need a large room. Have you any vacant?"

"There is the front room on the third floor. We would let it to two
gentlemen at eleven dollars for the two."

"Isn't the back room cheaper?" inquired our hero.

"Yes; but it is occupied by a business gentleman."

"Can you tell me his name? I may be acquainted with him."

"His name is Haynes."

"How much does he pay?"

"He pays eight dollars a week, and has the room alone."

"I suppose his room is not likely to become vacant soon?"

"Oh, dear, no. He has been with us for several years. We should be sorry
to lose him. Last Christmas he gave my daughter a present of a nice
silk-dress pattern."

Frank was struck by this information.

"I don't believe he paid anything for the silk," thought he. "I wish I
could find out."

He had learned all he cared for, and left, saying he might call again.

"His expenses seem very moderate for a man in his position," thought
Frank. "I wonder if he makes any investments."

Fortune favored our hero in the prosecution of his inquiry. Keeping
Haynes in sight, as was his custom, he observed that the latter, in
pulling out a handkerchief from the breast-pocket of his coat, had
brought with it a letter also. Frank, quickly and unobserved, picked it
up, and when he was alone looked at the address. It was directed to
James Haynes, at his residence in Waverley place. On the envelope was
the printed address of a real-estate broker in Brooklyn.

Frank knew that there was at that time considerable speculation in
Brooklyn real estate, and he examined the letter. It ran thus:--

     We have found a corner lot, with several lots adjoining, near
     Prospect Park, which may be obtained for five thousand dollars,
     half cash. We have no hesitation in recommending the purchase,
     being convinced, from the tendencies of the market, that the buyer
     will double his money in a comparatively short time. If you are
     engaged at other times, come over on Sunday afternoon, and we will
     show you the property. The house you purchased of us last year is
     worth fully a thousand dollars more than the price you gave.

"I wonder how much he gave," said Frank to himself.

The letter was signed "Henderson & Co., No. -- Fulton street."

Our hero was elated by the discovery he had made, and he sought an
interview with Mr. Hartley.

"Have you discovered anything?" asked the merchant, noticing the eager
look of his young detective.

Without attaching especial importance to the fact, Frank answered, "I
have found out that Mr. Haynes owns a house in Brooklyn."

"Indeed!" said Hartley, quickly. "But," he continued more slowly, "he
might buy one with the money saved from his salary."

"He is also thinking of buying some lots near Prospect Park."

"How did you learn this?" asked the merchant, surprised.

"I would rather not tell you," said Frank, who was not quite sure
whether Mr. Hartley would sanction his examination of a private letter.
"You may be sure that it is true."

"Very well; I will rest contented with that assurance. I will leave you
to work in your own way. Your information is important, for it seems to
show that Mr. Haynes has made investments beyond his ability, if he were
dependent upon his savings alone."

"That is what I thought," said Frank. "I must try to find out where he
gets this extra money."

"If you do that, and prove my suspicions correct, I will make you a
handsome present, besides paying the company regular rates for your
services."

"Thank you, sir. I will try to earn your gifts."




CHAPTER XXII.

FOLLOWING UP A CLUE.


This is not a detective story, and I shall not, therefore, detail the
steps by which our young hero succeeded in tracing out the agency of
Haynes in defrauding the firm by which he was employed. It required not
one week, but three, to follow out his clues, and qualify himself to
make a clear and intelligible report to Mr. Hartley. He had expressly
requested the merchant not to require any partial report, as it might
interfere with his working unobserved. Towards the end of the third week
he asked an interview with Mr. Hartley.

"Well, Frank," said the merchant, familiarly, "who is the rogue?"

"Mr. Haynes," answered our hero.

"You speak confidently," said his employer; "but surmise will not do. I
want proof, or I cannot act."

"I will tell you what I have discovered," said Frank; "and I leave you
to judge for yourself."

"Have you a customer in Hartford named Davis?" he asked.

"Yes; and a very good customer. He is frequent in his orders, and makes
prompt payments. I wish I had more like him."

"If you had more like him you would soon be bankrupt," said Frank,
quietly.

"What do you mean?" asked Mr. Hartley, in genuine surprise. "How can a
customer who buys largely, and pays promptly, be undesirable?"

"Did you know that Mr. Davis is a brother-in-law of Mr. Haynes?"

"No; but even if he is I have to thank Mr. Haynes for securing me so
excellent a customer."

Hartley spoke confidently, evidently believing that Frank was on the
wrong tack.

"I have noticed," said Frank, "that when goods are packed to go to Mr.
Davis, Mr. Haynes personally superintends the packing, and employs one
particular man to pack."

"What then?"

"I think he has something to conceal."

"I don't understand what he can have to conceal. If Davis is his
brother-in-law, it is natural that he should feel a special interest in
filling his orders."

"I shouldn't wonder if Mr. Haynes were a partner as well as a
brother-in-law of Mr. Davis."

Mr. Hartley looked surprised.

"That may be true; though I don't know why you should conjecture it.
Admitting that you are right, I don't know that I have any right to
object. I should like it better, however, if I were frankly told by Mr.
Haynes of this circumstance."

"I will tell you what I think I have discovered," continued Frank. "The
cases that are shipped to Mr. Davis not only contain the goods he has
ordered, but valuable silks that he has not ordered, and does not
propose to pay for."

"I see, I see," exclaimed Mr. Hartley, a light dawning upon him for the
first time. "I was stupid not to comprehend your meaning earlier. What
warrant have you for suspecting this?"

"First, your steady losses of goods; next, the ease with which Mr.
Haynes, in his position of trust, could carry out this plan. Why should
he superintend the packing of Mr. Davis's goods, alone of all your
customers?"

"There is weight in what you say, Frank. You are certainly an
extraordinary boy. You have shown so much shrewdness that I now ask your
advice. What steps shall I take to ascertain whether Mr. Haynes is
really guilty of what we suspect him?"

"There is an order now being filled for Mr. Davis," answered Frank.
"When the order is filled, can't you open the case, and find out whether
the contents correspond exactly to the bill?"

"The very thing. To facilitate matters I will send Mr. Haynes to
Brooklyn on a confidential errand. Fortunately there is a matter that
will give me a good excuse for doing so. Go back to your post, and when
Mr. Haynes appears to be at liberty send him to me."

Half an hour later Mr. Haynes entered the counting room of his
employer.

"You sent for me, sir?" he said, a little uneasily; for, when conscience
accuses, the mind is always apprehensive.

"Yes, Mr. Haynes," said the merchant, in his usual tone. "Have you any
objection to go to Brooklyn for me, on a confidential errand?"

"None in the world, sir," said Haynes, relieved. "I shall be glad to
take the trip this fine morning. It is almost too pleasant to remain
in-doors."

"Thank you; I will give you your instructions, and shall be glad to have
you go at once."

It is not necessary to our story that we should know the nature of the
errand on which Haynes was sent. It served the purpose of getting him
out of the way.

When the suspected clerk was fairly on his way Mr. Hartley went to the
packing-room, and looked about him till he discovered the case addressed
to

    H. L. DAVIS & CO.,
    HARTFORD, CONN.

"Open this case," said he to one of the workmen. "There was a mistake
recently in sending some goods to Davis, and I wish to compare these
with the bill."

"I think they are all right, sir," said the man addressed. "Mr. Haynes
saw them packed."

"Mr. Haynes will not be responsible for any mistake," said Mr. Hartley.
"I would rather see for myself."

The case was opened, and the merchant discovered about two hundred
dollars' worth of silk, which was not included in the bill.

"Go and call Mr. Hunting," said Mr. Hartley, quietly.

Mr. Hunting filled one of the most important positions in the
establishment. To him his employer explained the nature of his
discovery.

"Mr. Hunting," he said, "I wish you to see and attest the fraud that has
been attempted upon me. This case was packed under the special charge of
Mr. Haynes."

"Is it possible that Mr. Haynes knew of this?" exclaimed his
fellow-clerk.

"Davis is his brother-in-law," said Mr. Hartley, significantly.

"Has this been going on long, do you think, sir?"

"For several years, I suspect. Mr. Haynes has, no doubt, found it very
profitable."

"Shall I close up the case again, sir?" asked the workman.

"Yes, but it is not to go. You may await my further orders."

The silk was taken out, and replaced in the silk department.

"So much has been saved, at least," said the merchant.

"When Mr. Haynes comes back," he said to the usher, "send him to me."




CHAPTER XXIII.

BROUGHT TO BAY.


Mr. Haynes had a private reason for accepting readily the commission to
visit Brooklyn. It occurred to him at once that it would give him an
excellent chance to call on his real-estate agent, and confer with him
upon future investments. For James Haynes had the comfortable
consciousness that he was a prosperous man. Month by month, and year by
year, he was adding largely to his gains, and while he was still a young
man he would be rich, _if all went well_.

Of course this meant if his peculations remained undiscovered. Why
should they not be? He plumed himself on the skill with which he managed
to rob his employer. He was no vulgar bungler to break into the store,
or enter into an alliance with burglars. Not he! The property he took
was carried off openly before Mr. Hartley's very eyes, and he knew
nothing of it. He did not even suspect that he was being robbed. This is
what Mr. Haynes thought; but, as we know, he was mistaken. Even now he
was in a net; but did not know it.

After attending to Mr. Hartley's commission Haynes went to see his
broker. The conversation he had with the broker was of a very
encouraging character. He was congratulated upon his investments, and
assured that they would pay him handsomely.

James Haynes returned from Brooklyn in a very pleasant mood.

"A year or two more of life as a clerk, and I will throw off the yoke,"
he said to himself. "I must be worth at least fifteen thousand dollars
now, apart from any rise in the value of my investments. When I reach
twenty-five thousand I will resign my position, and go to Europe. I
shall than possess an income adequate to my simple wants."

"Is Mr. Hartley in the counting-room?" he asked, as he reëntered the
store.

"Yes, sir, and he wishes to see you."

"Of course he wants to see me,--to hear my report."

The merchant looked up as Haynes entered the counting-room.

"So you are back?" he said, gravely.

"Yes, sir; I was detained a little, but I fulfilled my commission."

"That is well."

Here Haynes made his report. Mr. Hartley listened with an abstracted
air, for his thoughts were upon the defalcation of the man before him.

Finishing his statement, James Haynes turned to leave the office, but
his employer called him back.

"Wait a minute, Mr. Haynes," he said, gravely. "I wish to ask you one or
two questions."

"Certainly, sir."

"I believe we have transactions with a party in Hartford, with the
firm-name of H. L. Davis & Co.?"

"Yes, sir," said Haynes, starting and flushing a little.

"Is Mr. Davis a relative of yours?"

"Yes, sir. I wonder where he heard that?" Haynes asked himself. "Is
there any trouble? Is he behind in his payments?" inquired the clerk.

"No; he has always settled his bills with commendable promptness."

"I insisted on that," said Haynes, in a satisfied tone. "I didn't want
you to lose by any connection of mine."

"And you are quite sure that I have lost nothing by Mr. Davis?" demanded
the merchant, regarding Haynes intently.

The latter changed color.

"How is that possible," he inquired, "since he has met his payments
promptly?"

"You have personally seen to the packing of Mr. Davis's goods, I
believe, Mr. Haynes?"

"Well--generally," stammered the rather disconcerted clerk.

"At all events, you did so this morning?"

"Ye-es."

"After you started for Brooklyn, I had the case opened, and found some
patterns of silk not included in the bill."

"I suppose there was a mistake," said Haynes, turning pale.

"You think this has not happened before?"

"I am sure of it."

"Mr. Haynes," said his employer, sternly, "you may as well drop the mask
of innocence. I have been robbed systematically for the last three
years, and I now understand how it was done. You and Davis, between you,
have plundered me in an exceedingly ingenious manner. It will go hard
with you before a jury."

"You won't have me arrested!" exclaimed Haynes, his pallor indicating
his dismay.

"Why should I not?"

"You could prove nothing."

"I will take my chance of that. Have you nothing more to say?"

"I--though I do not admit that your charge is correct--I am willing to
make over to you the greater part of my property, to avoid the scandal
of a trial."

"That will not do, Mr. Haynes. Were I to accept this upon such a ground,
you could rightfully bring against me a charge of blackmail."

"What, then, are your terms?" asked Haynes, sullenly.

"You must write out a confession of your guilt, which I shall put among
my private papers, and not make public unless necessary, and in addition
you must make over to me property to the amount of ten thousand dollars.
It will not make up my losses, but I will accept it as restitution in
full."

Against this James Haynes most strongly protested, alleging that the sum
demanded was far beyond the amount of his purloinings; but finally he
yielded, being privately resolved to make his brother-in-law pay
one-half of the forfeiture.

"You will leave my service at the end of the week, Mr. Haynes," said his
employer, "and during next week you must attend to the transfer."

"How did he find out?" said Haynes to himself, as with grave face he
went about the duties of the place he was so soon to leave. "If I could
find out, I would have my revenge."




CHAPTER XXIV.

AN OPEN ENEMY.


Frank remained with Mr. Hartley till the guilty clerk left the
establishment. This was at the special request of the merchant, who did
not care to let Mr. Haynes suspect who had been instrumental in bringing
his guilt to light.

"I suppose you have no further use for me, now, Mr. Hartley?" said the
telegraph boy.

"Not at present, Frank," said his employer, kindly.

"Then I will report for duty at the telegraph office."

"Wait a moment. You have done me a great service."

"I am glad of that sir," answered Frank, modestly.

"You have shown uncommon shrewdness and intelligence."

Frank looked gratified, and expressed his thanks for the compliment.

"I want to make you a present, in addition to the wages which you
receive from the office," said Mr. Hartley.

"Thank you, sir."

Mr. Hartley drew from his desk a five-twenty government bond, of one
hundred dollars, and handed it to our hero.

"Do you mean all this for me?" asked Frank, quite overwhelmed by the
magnitude of the gift.

"It is not more than you deserve. I might have given you the money value
of the bond; but I give it to you in this shape, because I hope you will
keep it as an investment. It will yield you six dollars interest
annually in gold. I hope the time will come when you will have more
interest in the same way."

"I hope I shall, sir. I shall feel quite rich now."

"You are richer in the qualities which have won you this acknowledgment.
How do you like the telegraph service?"

"Very well, sir, for the present. It is much better than being a
newsboy."

"Exactly; but there are positions you would prefer?"

"Yes, sir; I would like to be in some mercantile business, where I might
work my way up. In a few years I shall be too old for a telegraph boy,
and then I shall be out of place."

"I will relieve your fears on that score. In six months I shall make
some changes in the list of employees. When that time comes I will find
a place for you."

"There is nothing I should like better, sir," said Frank, his face
flushing with pleasure.

"I am satisfied that you will make a useful and intelligent clerk. Until
I want you, remain where you are. The discipline of your present office
will do you no harm, but will help qualify you for usefulness and
success in the mercantile career."

"Thank you, sir. Now I have something to look forward to I shall work
much more cheerfully."

Frank went back to the office, and resumed his ordinary duties. One day
he was riding down Broadway in a stage, when he became sensible that he
had attracted the attention of a gentleman sitting opposite. This led
him to scan the face of the man who was observing him. He at once
recognized Mr. Haynes.

The stage was not full, and the latter came over, and took a seat next
to the telegraph boy.

"Isn't your name Frank Kavanagh?" he asked, abruptly.

"Yes, sir."

"Were you not for a short time in the employ of Mr. Hartley?"

"Yes," answered Frank, feeling embarrassed, for he knew that he was
suspected.

"I infer from your uniform that you have left Mr. Hartley."

"Yes."

"Why did you leave him?" asked Haynes, sharply.

"Because he had no further occasion for my services. Why did _you_
leave him?" asked Frank, in turn.

James Haynes colored, and looked angry. However, he answered the
question.

"I have other business views," he said, briefly.

"So have I."

The next question was also of an embarrassing character.

"Were you a telegraph boy before you entered Mr. Hartley's employ?"

"I was," answered Frank.

"Were you detailed for duty there?"

Our hero thought that he had answered questions enough by this time, and
signified as much to his questioner.

"If I had been," he said, "I shouldn't be permitted to inform a
stranger."

"I have particular reasons for asking the question," said Haynes.

"Then you can ask Mr. Hartley, or the superintendent of my office.
Good-morning, sir, I get out here."

Frank pulled the strap, and got out. But he was not rid of his
questioner. Haynes got out too, and walked beside our hero.

"I believe," he said, sternly, "that you were sent for to act as a spy
on me."

"What makes you think so?" asked the telegraph boy, looking him in the
eye.

"There was a difficulty between Mr. Hartley and myself, occasioned by a
base and groundless charge, concocted by some enemy. I believe that you
had something to do with this."

"I have brought no groundless charge against any one," said Frank.

"Did you make any report to Mr. Hartley in regard to me?"

"I must refer you to Mr. Hartley for information," said Frank. "I have
an errand in here;" and he entered a store in the lower part of
Broadway.

"There is no doubt about it," thought Haynes.

"That boy was a spy upon me. I have learned all I cared to. I owe you a
debt of gratitude for this, Frank Kavanagh, and mean to pay the debt."

When Frank came out he thought it possible that Haynes might be waiting
for him; but the disgraced clerk was gone.

"I suppose he would injure me if he had a chance," thought the telegraph
boy. "I won't give him the chance if I can help it."




CHAPTER XXV.

WHAT THE OLD TRUNK CONTAINED.


Mention has been made of an old trunk belonging to Frank's father,
which, had been forwarded to him from the country by his Uncle Pelatiah.
It may be mentioned here that our hero's father had been agent of a
woollen mill in a large manufacturing town. For a considerable number of
years he had been in receipt of a handsome salary, and had lived in good
style, but still within his income. He was naturally supposed to possess
a comfortable property.

His death was sudden. He was thrown from a carriage, and, striking his
head upon the curbstone, was picked up senseless, and died unconscious.
Upon examining into his affairs his administrator was unable to find any
property beyond what was needed to pay the few debts he left behind him.
So it came about that Frank was left a penniless orphan. His Uncle
Pelatiah was his nearest relative, and to him he was sent. Pelatiah
Kavanagh was not a bad man, nor was he intentionally unkind; but he was
very close. All his life he had denied himself, to save money; and in
this he had been ably assisted by his wife, who was even closer and
meaner than her husband. It may readily be supposed that it was very
disagreeable to both husband and wife to have a penniless nephew thrown
upon their care and protection.

"How could your brother be so thoughtless and inconsiderate as to use up
all his money, and leave his son destitute? Didn't he have a handsome
income?"

"Yes," said Pelatiah. "He got two thousand dollars a year, and maybe
more."

"You don't say so!" ejaculated his wife. "He'd ought to have saved
two-thirds of it. I declare it's scandalous for a man to waste his
substance in that way."

"My brother was allus free with his money. He wasn't so keerful as you
and I be."

"I should think not, indeed. We don't begin to spend half as much as he
did, and now he comes upon us to support his child."

"It don't seem right," said Pelatiah.

"Right? It's outrageous!" exclaimed Mrs. Kavanagh, energetically. "I
declare I have no patience with such a man. It would only be right to
send this boy Frank to the poor-house."

"The neighbors would talk," protested Pelatiah, who was half inclined to
accept his wife's view, but was more sensitive to the criticism of the
community in which he lived.

"Let 'em talk!" said his more independent helpmate. "It isn't right that
this boy should use up the property that we have scraped together for
his cousin Jonathan."

"We must keep him for a while, Hannah; but I'll get rid of him as soon I
can consistently."

With this Mrs. Kavanagh had to be satisfied; but, during her nephew's
stay of two months in the farm-house, she contrived to make him
uncomfortable by harsh criticisms of his dead father, whom he had
tenderly loved.

"You must have lived very extravagant," she said, "or your father would
have left a handsome property."

"I don't think we did, Aunt Hannah."

"You father kept a carriage,--didn't he?"

"Yes; he had considerable riding to do."

"How much help did he keep?"

"Only one servant in the kitchen, and a stable-boy."

"There was no need of a boy. You could have done the work in the
stable."

"I was kept at school."

"Oh, of course!" sneered his aunt. "You must be brought up as a young
gentleman. Our Jonathan never had any such chances, and now you're
livin' on him, or about the same. I suppose you kept an extravagant
table too. What did you generally have for breakfast?"

So Aunt Hannah continued her catechising, much to Frank's discomfort.
She commented severely upon the wastefulness of always having pastry for
dinner.

"We can't afford it," she said, emphatically; "but then again we don't
mean to have our Jonathan beholden to anybody in case your uncle and I
are cast off sudden. What did you have for dinner on Sunday?"

"Meat and pudding and ice-cream,--that is, in warm weather."

"Ice-cream!" ejaculated Aunt Hannah, holding up both hands. "No wonder
your father didn't leave nothin'. Why, we don't have ice-cream more'n
once a year, and now we can't afford to have it at all, since we've got
another mouth to feed."

"I am sorry that you have to stint yourself on my account," replied
Frank, feeling rather uncomfortable.

"I suppose it's our cross," said Mrs. Kavanagh, gloomily; "but it does
seem hard that we can't profit by our prudence because of your father's
wasteful extravagance."

Such remarks were very disagreeable to our young hero, and it was hard
for him to hear his father so criticised. He supposed they must have
lived extravagantly, since it was so constantly charged by those about
him, and he felt puzzled to account for his father's leaving nothing.
When, after two months, his uncle and aunt, who had deliberated upon
what was best to be done, proposed to him to go to New York and try to
earn his own living, he caught at the idea. He knew that he might suffer
hardships in the new life that awaited him, but if he could support
himself in any way he would escape from the cruel taunts to which he was
now forced to listen every day. How he reached the city, and how he
succeeded, my readers know. We now come to the trunk, which, some time
after its reception, Frank set about examining.

He found it was filled with clothing belonging to his father. Though a
part were in good condition it seemed doubtful whether they would be of
much service to him. It occurred to him to examine the pockets of the
coats. In one he found a common yellow envelope, bearing his father's
name. Opening it, he found, to his great astonishment, that it was a
certificate of railroad stock, setting forth his father's ownership of
one hundred shares of the capital stock of the said railway.

Our hero was greatly excited by his discovery. This, then, was the form
in which his father had invested his savings. What the shares were worth
he had no idea; but he rejoiced chiefly because now he could defend his
father from the charge of recklessly spending his entire income, and
saving nothing. He resolved, as soon as he could find time, to visit a
Wall-street broker, by whom he had occasionally been employed, and
inquire the value of the stock. Two days afterwards the opportunity
came, and he availed himself of it at once.

"Can you tell me the value of these shares, Mr. Glynn?" he asked.

"They are quoted to-day at one hundred and ten," answered the broker,
referring to a list of the day's stock quotations.

"Do you mean that each share is worth a hundred and ten dollars?" asked
Frank, in excitement.

"Certainly."

"Then the whole are worth five thousand five hundred dollars?"

"Rather more; for the last semi-annual dividend has not been collected.
To whom do they belong?"

"They did belong to my father. Now I suppose they are mine."

"Has your father's estate been administered upon?"

"Yes; but these shares had not then been found."

"Then some legal steps will be necessary before you can take possession,
and dispose of them. I will give you the address of a good lawyer, and
advise you to consult him at once."

Frank did so, and the lawyer wrote to Uncle Pelatiah to acquaint him
with the discovery. The news created great excitement at the farm.

"Why, Frank's a rich boy!" ejaculated Aunt Hannah.

"And my brother wasn't so foolishly extravagant as we supposed."

"That may be; but with his salary we could have saved more."

"Perhaps we might; but these shares are worth almost six thousand
dollars. That's a good deal of money, Hannah."

"So it is, Pelatiah. I'll tell you what we'd better do."

"What?"

"Invite Frank to come back and board with us. He can afford to pay
handsome board, and it seems better that the money should go to us than
a stranger."

"Just so, Hannah. He could board with us, and go to school."

"You'd better write and invite him to come. I allus liked the boy, and
if we could have afforded it, I'd have been in favor of keepin' him for
nothing."

"So would I," said his uncle; and he probably believed it, though after
what had happened it will be rather difficult for the reader to credit
it.

The letter was written, but Frank had no desire to return to the old
farm, and the society of his uncle's family.

"I have got used to the city," he wrote, "and have made a good many
friends here. I don't know yet whether I shall take a business position,
or go to school; but, if the latter, the schools here are better than in
the country. I hope to come and see you before long; but, I would prefer
to live in New York."

"He's gettin' uppish," said Aunt Hannah, who was considerably
disappointed, for she had made up her mind just how much they could
venture to charge for board, and how this would increase their annual
savings.

"I suppose it's natural for a boy to prefer the city," said his uncle.

"If the boy has a chance to handle his money there won't be much of it
left by the time he's twenty-one," said Aunt Hannah. "You ought to be
his guardian."

"He has the right to choose his own guardian," said Uncle Pelatiah.
"He'll take some city man likely."

Frank did, in fact, select the lawyer, having learned that he was a man
of high reputation for integrity. He offered it to Mr. Bowen; but that
gentleman, while congratulating his young friend upon his greatly
improved prospects, said that he was a man of books rather than of
business, and would prefer that some other person be selected.

The next thing was to resign his place as telegraph boy.

"We are sorry to lose you," said the superintendent. "Your are one of
our best boys. Do you wish to go at once?"

"No, sir; I will stay till the end of the month."

"Very well. We shall be glad to have you."

Three weeks yet remained till the close of the month. It was not long,
but before the time had passed Frank found himself in a very unpleasant
predicament, from no fault of his own, but in consequence of the enmity
of the clerk whom he had been instrumental in displacing.




CHAPTER XXVI.

A TRAP, AND WHO FELL INTO IT.


No one rejoiced more sincerely at Frank's good luck than Mrs. Vivian.
Her interest in our hero had increased, and while at first she regarded
herself as his patroness she had come now to look upon him as a member
of the family. Fred had already returned, and Frank, bearing in mind
that he had only been invited to remain during his absence, proposed to
find another home, but Mrs. Vivian would not hear of it.

"No," she said, "Fred needs a young companion, and I prefer you to any
one I know of."

As Fred was of his mother's opinion, Frank readily agreed to stay. He
occupied a room adjoining the one assigned to Fred, and during his hours
of leisure the two were constantly together.

"I shall be glad when you leave the telegraph office," said Fred. "Then
we can be together more."

"You may get tired of me."

"If I do I will let you know."

Two days afterwards Frank was riding down town in a Sixth-avenue car.
Until he had taken his seat he was not aware that James Haynes was a
passenger. When a lady who sat between them got out, Haynes moved up, so
as to sit next to our hero.

"I see you are still in the telegraph service," he said.

"Yes, sir," answered Frank, briefly.

"I wonder Mr. Hartley didn't offer you a permanent position in his
employ," said Haynes, with a sneer. "Spies are useful sometimes."

"He may give me a position sometime," said Frank, not regarding the
sneer.

"You earned it," said Haynes, unpleasantly.

"Thank you," said Frank, knowing that Haynes would be provoked by his
appearing to accept the compliment in good faith.

Haynes scowled, but said no more. He drew a morning paper from his
pocket, and appeared to be absorbed in reading it.

At Canal street Frank rose to leave the car. He had not yet reached the
door, when Haynes sprang to his feet, followed him quickly, and,
grasping him by the arm, said, "Not so fast young man! Give me back my
pocket-book."

Frank was struck with amazement.

"What do you mean?" he asked, indignantly.

"I mean that you have relieved me of my pocket-book. Gentlemen," turning
to his fellow-passengers, "I demand that this boy be searched."

"You can search me if you like," said Frank. "You know very well that
your accusation is false."

"I shall be satisfied if you produce what is in your pockets."

"That's fair," said a passenger.

Our hero thrust his hand into his pocket. To his dismay he drew out a
Russia-leather pocket-book, of which he knew nothing.

"That is my pocket-book, gentlemen," said Haynes, triumphantly. "I can
tell you exactly what is in it. You will find two five-dollar bills, a
two and a one. Be kind enough to examine it, sir."

The pocket-book was examined, and, of course, Haynes was correct.

Suspicious glances were directed at poor Frank. Innocent as he was, he
was so overwhelmed by the suddenness of the charge, and the apparent
proof of it, that he looked confused and embarrassed.

"You are beginning early, my boy," said a tall gentleman, in a white
cravat,--a clergyman. "It is well that you are checked in the beginning
of a guilty career."

"Sir," said Frank, "I am as innocent as you are. This man is my enemy,
and he must have put the pocket-book in my pocket. He threatened some
time since to get me into a scrape."

"That story is rather too thin," said Haynes, looking around him with a
sneer. "You won't find any one here quite verdant enough to believe
it."

"There you are mistaken," said a gentleman who was seated directly
opposite to Haynes and Frank. "_I_ believe it."

Haynes scowled at him malignantly.

"I really don't think it very important what you believe, sir. The boy
is evidently a professional thief, and you may belong to the same gang
for aught I know. I propose to give him in charge to the next policeman
we meet."

"Do so," said the stranger, coolly. "I shall be present at his trial,
and offer some important testimony."

"Indeed!" said Haynes, uneasily. "May I ask what it is?"

"Certainly. _I saw you thrust the wallet into the boy's pocket!_ Of that
I am willing to make oath."

James Haynes turned pale. There was a sudden change in public opinion.
It was he who now had become an object of suspicion.

"Young man," said the clergyman, solemnly, "what could have induced you
to enter into such a wicked conspiracy against the poor boy?"

"Mind your own business!" said Haynes, rudely. "It is a lie."

"It is the truth," said the volunteer witness, calmly.

Here a policeman became visible from the car-window, leisurely walking
his beat on the western sidewalk.

"There's a policeman," said Frank's new friend. "Call him, and have the
boy arrested."

"He would be cleared by false testimony," said Haynes, sullenly. "I have
my money back, and will let him go."

"Then," said the stranger, rising, and displaying the badge of a
detective, "I shall arrest you on a charge of conspiracy."

Haynes was fairly caught in his own trap.

"This is a put-up job, gentlemen," he said. "Am I to be robbed first,
and arrested afterwards for exposing the thief?"

He looked about him appealingly; but in vain. Public sentiment was
wholly against him now.

"O you ould villain!" said a stout Irish woman, "to try to ruin the
poor b'ye. Hangin's too good for you."

This was rather an extreme sentiment; but Haynes saw that he was in
peril. He gave an unexpected spring, and, reaching the platform, sprang
out, running up a side street.

"Do you know him?" asked the detective of Frank.

"Yes, sir."

"How do you account for his hostility to you?"

Frank briefly recounted the story already known to the reader.

"He can easily be found then."

"I hope you will not arrest him, sir," said Frank. "He has been pretty
well punished already, and I don't think he will trouble me again."

"If he does, send for me," and the detective handed Frank his card and
address.

"It is fortunate for me," said the telegraph boy, "that you saw him put
the money in my pocket."

"You would have experienced some inconvenience; but the story you have
told me would have cleared you with the jury."

"My young friend," said the clergyman, "I owe you an apology. I too
hastily assumed that you were guilty."

"It looked like it, sir. You were quite justified in what you said. Mr.
Haynes did not appear to relish your remarks to him," added Frank,
laughing.

"His crime was greater and meaner than the one charged upon you. To
steal is certainly a grave offence,--yet sometimes it is prompted by
necessity; but a deliberate attempt to fasten a false charge upon a
fellow-creature is vastly more atrocious."

"So it is, sir," said the old Irish woman, nodding assent vigorously. "I
quite agree wid your honor. It is owtracious."

The passengers smiled at the old woman's mistake; but it was clear that
they agreed with her in sentiment.

Meanwhile the car had been speeding along, and was near its terminus.
Frank bethought himself that he had been carried considerably beyond
his destination.

He pulled the bell, and, as he got out, he said, "Thank you all for
taking my part."

"We don't quite deserve that," said one of the passengers, after Frank
had left the car. "I was at first of opinion that the boy was guilty."

"We have been saved from doing a great injustice," said the clergyman.
"It should be a lesson to all of us not to be too hasty in our
judgments."

James Haynes in his hurried exit from the car fully believed that he
would be pursued and arrested. He was relieved to find his fears
groundless. But he was disappointed at the failure of his scheme. He had
carefully prepared it, and for several days he had been in readiness to
carry it into execution whenever he should meet Frank. This morning had
brought the opportunity; but it had miscarried.

"But for that cursed detective I would have carried the thing through,"
he muttered. "He spoiled all. I _hate_ that boy!"

But, though revengeful, Haynes was prudent. He gave up the thought of
injuring Frank because he saw that it would be dangerous to himself. He
did not remain long in New York, but soon joined his confederate in
Hartford.




CHAPTER XXVII.

FRANK BECOMES A GOOD SAMARITAN.


The close of the month came, and Frank laid aside his uniform. He was a
telegraph boy no more.

The superintendent shook hands with him cordially, and bade him good-by.

"Come and see us sometimes," he said. "I wish you all success. Your
services have been very satisfactory, and you have gained an excellent
reputation."

"Thank you, sir," said Frank. "I have tried to do my duty. Good-by,
boys!"

He shook hands with all his young comrades, with whom he was very
popular. They knew of his good fortune, and were disposed to regard him
as very rich. Six thousand dollars in a boy's eyes is a fortune.

"Now you're rich, Frank, I suppose you won't notice the likes of us,"
said Johnny O'Connor.

"I hope you don't think as badly of me as that, Johnny," said Frank,
earnestly. "I am not rich; but, even if I were, I should always be glad
to meet any of you. If I am ever able to do a favor to any of you I
will."

"I believe you, Frank," said Johnny. "You was always a good feller."

"Where's Tom Brady?" asked Frank, looking about him. "Is he out on an
errand?"

"Tom's sick," said the superintendent. "He's got a fever."

"It's bad for him," said Johnny, "for his mother and sister depended on
Tom's wages. Poor Tom felt bad because he had to give up work."

"Where does he live?" asked Frank, with quick sympathy.

"No. -- East Fourteenth street," answered Johnny. "I know, because I
live in the same block."

"I'll go and see him."

Frank's heart was not hardened by his own prosperity. He knew what it
was to be poor, and could enter into the feelings of the unfortunate
telegraph boy.

Half an hour found him in front of a large tenement-house, in front of
which were playing children of all ages, most of them showing in their
faces that unhealthy pallor which so generally marks a tenement-house
population.

"Do you know where Mrs. Brady lives?" asked Frank of a girl of twelve.

"Which Brady is it?" asked the girl. "There's three lives here."

"It's Tom Brady's mother," answered our hero.

"Is it Tom, the telegraph boy?"

"Yes."

"I'll show you then. Tom's been sick for some time."

"I know it. I have come to see him."

"Do you know Tom?" asked the girl, in some surprise; for Frank, having
laid aside his uniform, was handsomely dressed, and looked like the son
of a rich man.

"Yes, Tom is a friend of mine. I am sorry he's sick."

Up two flights of rickety stairs Frank followed the girl, who halted
before a door.

"That's the place," said his young guide, and disappeared down the
stairs, sliding down the banisters. Young ladies in the best society do
not often indulge in this amusement, but Mary Murphy knew little of
etiquette or conventionality.

In answer to Frank's knock, the door was opened by Mrs. Brady, a poorly
clad and care-worn woman.

"What is your wish, young gentleman?" she said.

"I've come to see Tom. How is he?"

"Do you know my Tom?" asked Mrs. Brady, in surprise.

"Yes; is he very sick?"

"The poor boy has got a fever."

"Can I see him?"

"If you'll come into such a poor place, sir. We're very poor, and now
that Tom's wages is stopped I don't know how we'll get along at all."

"Better than you think, perhaps, Mrs. Brady," said Frank, cheerfully.
"Why, Tom, what made you get sick?"

He had entered the room, and reached the bed on which the sick boy was
lying.

Tom looked up in surprise and pleasure.

"Is it you, Frank?" he said. "I'm glad you've come to see me. But how
did you find me out?"

"Johnny O'Connor told me where you lived. How long have you been sick?"

"Three days. It's rough on a poor boy like me. I ought to be earning
money for my mother."

"We'll miss Tom's wages badly," said Mrs. Brady; "I can't earn much
myself, and there's three of us to feed, let alone the rint."

"How did you get off, Frank?" asked Tom.

"I've left the office."

"Was this young gentleman a telegraph boy?" asked Mrs. Brady, in
surprise.

"Yes," said Tom; "but he's come into a fortune, and now he won't have to
work."

"I'm sure I'm glad of his good luck, and it's a great condescension for
a rich young gentleman to come and see my Tom."

"I have come into some money, but not a fortune, Mrs. Brady," said
Frank; "but it does not make me any better than when I was a poor
telegraph boy."

Evidently Mrs. Brady was not of this opinion, for she carefully dusted
with her apron the best chair in the room, and insisted on Frank's
seating himself in it.

"Have you had a doctor, Mrs. Brady?" asked Frank.

"Yes."

"What does he say?"

"He says that Tom will be sick for three or four weeks, and I don't know
what we'll do without his wages all that time."

"That's what troubles me," said Tom. "I wouldn't mind it so much if I'd
get my pay reg'lar while I'm sick."

"Then you needn't be troubled, Tom," said Frank, promptly, "for you
shall get it regularly."

"They won't give it to me," said Tom, incredulously.

"They won't, but I will."

"Do you mean it, Frank?"

"Certainly I do. I will give you a week's pay this morning, and I will
call every week, and pay you the same."

"Do you hear that, mother?" said Tom, joyfully.

"God bless you, young gentleman, for your kindness to us!" said Mrs.
Brady, gratefully.

"Oh, it isn't much," said Frank; "I can spare it well enough. I have had
such good luck myself that I ought to do something for those who need
it."

"You're a good feller, Frank," said Tom, warmly. "I'll get well quick
now. If you ever want anybody to fight for you, just call on Tom Brady."

"I generally do my own fighting, Tom," said Frank, laughing, "but I'll
remember your offer. When you are well, you must come and spend an
evening with me."

"I'm sure he'll be proud to do the same," said Mrs. Brady.

"I must bid you good-by, now, Tom. Keep a 'stiff upper lip,' and don't
be down-hearted. We must all be sick sometimes, you know, and you'll
soon be well."

"I won't be down-hearted now," said Tom, "with my wages comin' in
reg'lar. Remember me to the boys, Frank."

"I will, Tom."

When Frank reached home he found a large, overgrown boy, with big red
hands, and clothes of rural cut, who apparently did not know what to do
with his legs and arms, waiting to see him.

It was his cousin Jonathan.




CHAPTER XXVIII.

A COUNTRY COUSIN.


Jonathan was a loose-jointed, heavily built, and awkward boy of
seventeen, bearing not the slightest resemblance to his cousin Frank.
Still he was a relation, and our hero was glad to see him.

"How are you, Jonathan?" said Frank, cordially. "I wasn't expecting to
see you. Are all well at home?"

"They're pooty smart," answered Jonathan. "I thought I'd come down and
look round a little."

"I shall be glad to show you round. Where would you like to go?--to
Central Park?"

"I don't care much about it," said the country cousin. "It's only a big
pasture, dad says. I'd rather go round the streets. Is there any place
where I can buy a few doughnuts? I feel kinder empty."

"Do you prefer doughnuts to anything else?" asked Frank, with a smile.

"I hear they're cheap,--only a cent apiece," answered Jonathan, "and I
calc'late five or six will be enough to fill me up."

"You needn't mind the expense, cousin; I shall pay for your dinner."

Jonathan's heavy face lighted up with satisfaction.

"I don't care if you do," he said. "I hear you've got a lot of money
now, Frank."

"I shall have enough, to make me comfortable, and start me in business."

"I wish I had as much money as you," said Jonathan, longingly.

"You are all right. Some time you will have more than I."

"I don't know about that. Dad keeps me awful close."

"You have all you want, don't you?"

"I've got some money in the bank," said Jonathan, "but I'd like to put
in more. I never thought you'd have more money than I."

"You used to tell me I ought to go to the poor-house," said Frank,
smiling.

"That's because you was livin' on dad, you know," explained Jonathan.
"It wasn't fair to me, because he wouldn't have so much to leave me."

In the country Frank had not found much satisfaction in the company of
his cousin, who inherited the combined meanness of both parents, and
appeared to grudge poor Frank every mouthful he ate; but in the sunshine
of his present prosperity he was disposed to forgive and forget.

Frank led the way to a restaurant not far away, where he allowed his
cousin to order an ample dinner, which he did without scruple, since he
was not to pay for it.

"It costs a sight to live in the city," he said, as he looked over the
bill of fare.

"It costs something in the country, too, Jonathan."

"I wish you'd come and board with dad. He'd take you for five dollars a
week, and it will cost you more in New York."

"Yes, it will cost me more here."

"Then you'll come, won't you? You'll be company for me."

Frank doubted whether Jonathan would be much company for him.

"You didn't use to think so, Jonathan."

"You couldn't pay your board then."

"Now that I can I prefer to remain in the city. I mean to go to school,
and get a good education."

"How much do you have to pay for board here?"

"I can't tell what I shall have to pay. At present I am staying with
friends, and pay nothing."

"Do you think they'd take me for a week the same way?" asked Jonathan,
eagerly. "I'd like to stay a week first-rate if it didn't cost nothing."

"I shouldn't like to ask them; but some time I will invite you to come
and pay me a visit of a week; it shall not cost you anything."

"You're a real good feller, Frank," said Jonathan, highly pleased by the
invitation. "I'll come any time you send for me. It's pretty high
payin' on the railroad, but I guess I can come."

Frank understood the hint, but did not feel called upon to pay his
cousin's railway fare in addition to his week's board.

"What do you think of that?" asked Jonathan, presently, displaying a
huge ring on one of his red fingers.

"Is that something you have bought in the city?" asked Frank.

"Yes," answered his cousin, complacently. "I got it at a bargain."

"Did you buy it in a jewelry store?"

"No; I'll tell you how it was. I was goin' along the street, when I saw
a well-dressed feller, who looked kinder anxious. He come up to me, and
he said, 'Do you know any one who wants to buy a splendid gold ring
cheap?' Then he told me he needed some money right off to buy vittles
for his family, bein' out of work for a month. He said the ring cost him
fifteen dollars, and he'd sell it for three. I wasn't goin' to pay no
such price, and I finally beat him down to a dollar," said Jonathan,
chuckling. "I guess that's doing pretty well for one day. He said any
jeweller would pay me six or seven dollars for it."

"Then why didn't he sell it to a jeweller him self, instead of giving it
to you for a dollar?"

"I never thought of that," said Jonathan, looking puzzled.

"I am afraid it is not so good a bargain as you supposed," said Frank.

Great drops of perspiration came out on Jonathan's brow.

"You don't think it's brass, do you?" he gasped.

"Here is a jewelry store. We can go in and inquire."

They entered the store, and Frank, calling attention to the ring,
inquired its probable value.

"It might be worth about three cents," said the jeweller, laughing. "I
hope you didn't give much more for it."

"I gave a dollar," said Jonathan, in a voice which betrayed his
anguish.

"Of whom did you buy it?"

"Of a man in the street."

"Served you right, then. You should have gone to a regular jewelry
store."

"The man said it cost him fifteen dollars," said Jonathan, sadly.

"I dare say. He was a professional swindler, no doubt."

"I'd like to give him a lickin'," said Jonathan, wrathfully, as they
left the store.

"What would you do if you was me?" he asked of his cousin.

"Throw it away."

"I wouldn't do that. Maybe I can sell it up in the country," he said,
his face brightening up.

"For how much?"

"For what I gave."

"But that would be swindling."

"No, it wouldn't. I have a right to ask as much as I gave. It's real
handsome if it is brass."

"I don't think that would be quite honest, Jonathan."

"You wouldn't have me lose the dollar, would you? That would be smart."

"I would rather be honest than be smart."

Jonathan dropped the subject, but eventually he sold the ring at home
for a dollar and a quarter.




CHAPTER XXIX.

CONCLUSION.


After he had accompanied his cousin to the depot, where he took the cars
for home, Frank met Victor Dupont, on Madison avenue.

"Where's your uniform?" he asked.

"I have taken it off."

"Aint you a telegraph boy any longer?"

"No, I have left the office."

"They turned you off, I suppose," said Victor, with a sneer.

"They would like to have had me stay longer," said Frank, with a smile.

Victor shrugged his shoulders incredulously.

"Are you going back to your old business of selling papers?" he asked.

"I think not."

"What are you going to do for a living?"

"I am much obliged to you for your interest in my affairs, Victor; I
don't mean to go to work at all at present,--I am going to school."

"How are you going to pay your expenses, then?" asked Victor, in
surprise.

"I have had some money left me."

"Is that so? How much?"

"Some thousands of dollars,--enough to support me while I am getting an
education."

"Who left it to you?"

"My father left it, but I have only just received it."

"You are awfully lucky," said Victor, evidently annoyed. "Are you going
to live with the Vivians?"

"I don't know."

"I shouldn't think you would. It would be imposing upon them."

"Thank you for your kind advice. Won't you take me to board at your
house?"

"We don't take boarders," said Victor, haughtily.

It so happened that Frank entered himself as a scholar at the school
where Victor was a student, and was put in the same class. Frank at
once took a higher place, and in time graduated with the highest honors,
while Victor came out nearly at the foot.

Frank did remain with the Vivians; they would not hear of his leaving
them, nor would they permit him to pay any board.

"You are a companion for Fred," said Mrs. Vivian, "and you exert a good
influence over him. Having your company, he does not wish to seek
society outside. You must let me look upon you as one of my boys, and
accept a home with us."

Against this, Frank could urge no objection. He was offered a home far
more attractive than a boarding-house, which his presence made more
social and attractive. Having no board to provide for, the income of his
little property was abundant to supply his other wants, and, when he
left school, it was unimpaired.

It was a serious question with our hero whether he would continue his
studies through a collegiate course. He finally decided in the negative,
and accepted a good position in the mercantile establishment of Mr.
Hartley. Here he displayed such intelligence and aptitude for business
that he rose rapidly, and in time acquired an interest in the firm, and
will in time obtain a junior partnership. It must not be supposed that
all this came without hard work. It had always been Frank's custom to
discharge to the utmost of his ability the duties of any position in
which he was placed. To this special trait of our hero, most of his
success was owing.

Our hero had the satisfaction of giving a place to his companion in the
telegraph office, Tom Brady, who was in time able to earn such a salary
as raised his mother and sister above want. Frank did not forget his old
street comrade, Dick Rafferty, but gave him a position as porter, Dick's
education not being sufficient to qualify him for a clerkship. He even
sought out old Mills, the blind man, to whom he had small reason to feel
grateful; but found that the old man had suddenly died, leaving behind
him, to the surprise of every one who knew him, several hundred dollars
in gold and silver, which were claimed by a sister of the deceased, to
whom they were most acceptable.

Here end the experiences of the Telegraph Boy. He has been favored above
most of his class; but the qualities which helped him achieve success
are within the reach of all. Among the busy little messengers who flit
about the city, in all directions, there are some, no doubt, who will in
years to come command a success and prosperity as great as our hero has
attained. In a republic like our own, the boy who begins at the bottom
of the ladder may in time reach the highest round.


THE END.




HORATIO ALGER, JR.


The enormous sales of the books of Horatio Alger, Jr., show the
greatness of his popularity among the boys, and prove that he is one of
their most favored writers. I am told that more than half a million
copies altogether have been sold, and that all the large circulating
libraries in the country have several complete sets, of which only two
or three volumes are ever on the shelves at one time. If this is true,
what thousands and thousands of boys have read and are reading Mr.
Alger's books! His peculiar style of stories, often imitated but never
equaled, have taken a hold upon the young people, and, despite their
similarity, are eagerly read as soon as they appear.

Mr. Alger became famous with the publication of that undying book,
"Ragged Dick, or Street Life in New York." It was his first book for
young people, and its success was so great that he immediately devoted
himself to that kind of writing. It was a new and fertile field for a
writer then, and Mr. Alger's treatment of it at once caught the fancy of
the boys. "Ragged Dick" first appeared in 1868, and ever since then it
has been selling steadily, until now it is estimated that about 200,000
copies of the series have been sold.--"Pleasant Hours for Boys and
Girls."

       *       *       *       *       *

A writer for boys should have an abundant sympathy with them. He should
be able to enter into their plans, hopes, and aspirations. He should
learn to look upon life as they do. Boys object to be written down to. A
boy's heart opens to the man or writer who understands him.--From
"Writing Stories for Boys," by Horatio Alger, Jr.




FAMOUS ALGER BOOKS.


RAGGED DICK SERIES.

    RAGGED DICK.
    FAME AND FORTUNE.
    MARK THE MATCH BOY.
    ROUGH AND READY.
    BEN THE LUGGAGE BOY.
    RUFUS AND ROSE.


TATTERED TOM SERIES.

    TATTERED TOM.
    PAUL THE PEDDLER.
    PHIL THE FIDDLER.
    SLOW AND SURE.


TATTERED TOM SERIES. SECOND SERIES.

    JULIUS.
    THE YOUNG OUTLAW.
    SAM'S CHANCE.
    THE TELEGRAPH BOY.


CAMPAIGN SERIES.

    FRANK'S CAMPAIGN.
    PAUL PRESCOTT'S CHARGE.
    CHARLIE CODMAN'S CRUISE.


LUCK AND PLUCK SERIES. FIRST SERIES.

    LUCK AND PLUCK.
    SINK OR SWIM.
    STRONG AND STEADY.
    STRIVE AND SUCCEED.


LUCK AND PLUCK SERIES. SECOND SERIES.

    TRY AND TRUST.
    BOUND TO RISE.
    RISEN FROM THE RANKS.
    HERBERT CARTER'S LEGACY.


BRAVE AND BOLD SERIES.

    BRAVE AND BOLD.
    JACK'S WARD.
    SHIFTING FOR HIMSELF.
    WAIT AND HOPE.


PACIFIC SERIES.

    THE YOUNG ADVENTURER.
    THE YOUNG MINER.
    THE YOUNG EXPLORERS.
    BEN'S NUGGET.


ATLANTIC SERIES.

    THE YOUNG CIRCUS RIDER.
    DO AND DARE.
    HECTOR'S INHERITANCE.
    HELPING HIMSELF.


WAY TO SUCCESS SERIES.

    BOB BURTON.
    THE STORE BOY.
    LUKE WALTON.
    STRUGGLING UPWARD.


NEW WORLD SERIES.

    DIGGING FOR GOLD.
    FACING THE WORLD.
    IN A NEW WORLD.


VICTORY SERIES.

    ONLY AN IRISH BOY.
    ADRIFT IN THE CITY.
    VICTOR VANE, OR THE YOUNG SECRETARY.


FRANK AND FEARLESS SERIES.

    FRANK HUNTER'S PERIL.
    FRANK AND FEARLESS.
    THE YOUNG SALESMAN.


GOOD FORTUNE LIBRARY.

    WALTER SHERWOOD'S PROBATION.
    A BOY'S FORTUNE.
    THE YOUNG BANK MESSENGER.


HOW TO RISE LIBRARY.

    JED, THE POORHOUSE BOY.
    RUPERT'S AMBITION.
    LESTER'S LUCK.




THE JOHN C. WINSTON CO.'S POPULAR JUVENILES: HARRY CASTLEMON BOOKS


HOW I CAME TO WRITE MY FIRST BOOK.

When I was sixteen years old I belonged to a composition class. It was
our custom to go on the recitation seat every day with clean slates, and
we were allowed ten minutes to write seventy words on any subject the
teacher thought suited to our capacity. One day he gave out "What a Man
Would See if He Went to Greenland." My heart was in the matter, and
before the ten minutes were up I had one side of my slate filled. The
teacher listened to the reading of our compositions, and when they were
all over he simply said: "Some of you will make your living by writing
one of these days." That gave me something to ponder upon. I did not say
so out loud, but I knew that my composition was as good as the best of
them. By the way, there was another thing that came in my way just then.
I was reading at that time one of Mayne Reid's works which I had drawn
from the library, and I pondered upon it as much as I did upon what the
teacher said to me. In introducing Swartboy to his readers he made use
of this expression: "No visible change was observable in Swartboy's
countenance." Now, it occurred to me that if a man of his education
could make such a blunder as that and still write a book, I ought to be
able to do it, too. I went home that very day and began a story, "The
Old Guide's Narrative," which was sent to the _New York Weekly_, and
came back, respectfully declined. It was written on both sides of the
sheets but I didn't know that this was against the rules. Nothing
abashed, I began another, and receiving some instruction, from a friend
of mine who was a clerk in a book store, I wrote it on only one side of
the paper. But mind you, he didn't know what I was doing. Nobody knew
it; but one day, after a hard Saturday's work--the other boys had been
out skating on the brick-pond--I shyly broached the subject to my
mother. I felt the need of some sympathy. She listened in amazement, and
then said: "Why, do you think you could write a book like that?" That
settled the matter, and from that day no one knew what I was up to until
I sent the first four volumes of Gunboat Series to my father. Was it
work? Well, yes; it was hard work, but each week I had the satisfaction
of seeing the manuscript grow until the "Young Naturalist" was all
complete.--_Harry Castlemon in the Writer._


GUNBOAT SERIES.

    Frank the Young Naturalist.
    Frank on a Gunboat.
    Frank in the Woods.
    Frank before Vicksburg.
    Frank on the Lower Mississippi.
    Frank on the Prairie.


ROCKY MOUNTAIN SERIES.

    Frank Among the Rancheros.
    Frank in the Mountains.
    Frank at Don Carlos' Rancho.


SPORTSMAN'S CLUB SERIES.

    The Sportsman's Club in the Saddle.
    The Sportsman's Club
    Among the Trappers.
    The Sportsman's Club Afloat.


FRANK NELSON SERIES.

    Snowed up.
    Frank in the Forecastle.
    The Boy Traders.


ROUGHING IT SERIES.

    George in Camp.
    George at the Fort.
    George at the Wheel.


ROD AND GUN SERIES.

    Don Gordon's Shooting Box.
    The Young Wild Fowlers.
    Rod and Gun Club.


GO-AHEAD SERIES.

    Tom Newcombe.
    Go-Ahead.
    No Moss.


WAR SERIES.

    True to His Colors.
    Rodney the Partisan.
    Rodney the Overseer.
    Marcy the Blockade-Runner.
    Marcy the Refugee.
    Sailor Jack the Trader.


HOUSEBOAT SERIES.

    The Houseboat Boys.
    The Mystery of Lost River Cañon.
    The Young Game Warden.


AFLOAT AND ASHORE SERIES.

    Rebellion in Dixie.
    A Sailor in Spite of Himself.
    The Ten-Ton Cutter.




THE JOHN C. WINSTON CO.'S POPULAR JUVENILES: J. T. TROWBRIDGE.


Neither as a writer does he stand apart from the great currents of life
and select some exceptional phase or odd combination of circumstances.
He stands on the common level and appeals to the universal heart, and
all that he suggests or achieves is on the plane and in the line of
march of the great body of humanity.

The Jack Hazard series of stories, published in the late _Our Young
Folks_, and continued in the first volume of _St. Nicholas_, under the
title of "Fast Friends," is no doubt destined to hold a high place in
this class of literature. The delight of the boys in them (and of their
seniors, too) is well founded. They go to the right spot every time.
Trowbridge knows the heart of a boy like a book, and the heart of a man,
too, and he has laid them both open in these books in a most successful
manner. Apart from the qualities that render the series so attractive to
all young readers, they have great value on account of their
portraitures of American country life and character. The drawing is
wonderfully accurate, and as spirited as it is true. The constable,
Sellick, is an original character, and as minor figures where will we
find anything better than Miss Wansey, and Mr. P. Pipkin, Esq. The
picture of Mr. Dink's school, too, is capital, and where else in fiction
is there a better nick-name than that the boys gave to poor little
Stephen Treadwell, "Step Hen," as he himself pronounced his name in an
unfortunate moment when he saw it in print for the first time in his
lesson in school.

On the whole, these books are very satisfactory, and afford the critical
reader the rare pleasure of the works that are just adequate, that
easily fulfill themselves and accomplish all they set out to
do.--_Scribner's Monthly_.


JACK HAZARD SERIES.

    Jack Hazard and His Fortunes.
    The Young Surveyor.
    Fast Friends.
    Doing His Best.
    A Chance for Himself.
    Lawrence's Adventures.



CHARLES ASBURY STEPHENS.

This author wrote his "Camping Out Series" at the very height of his
mental and physical powers.

     "We do not wonder at the popularity of these books; there is a
     freshness and variety about them, and an enthusiasm in the
     description of sport and adventure, which even the older folk can
     hardly fail to share."--_Worcester Spy._

     "The author of the Camping Out Series is entitled to rank as
     decidedly at the head of what may be called boys'
     literature."--_Buffalo Courier._


CAMPING OUT SERIES.


CAMPING OUT. As Recorded by "Kit."

     "This book is bright, breezy, wholesome, instructive, and stands
     above the ordinary boys' books of the day by a whole head and
     shoulders."--_The Christian Register, Boston_.


LEFT ON LABRADOR; OR, THE CRUISE OF THE SCHOONER YACHT "CURLEW." As
Recorded by "Wash."

     "The perils of the voyagers, the narrow escapes, their strange
     expedients, and the fun and jollity when danger had passed, will
     make boys even unconscious of hunger."--_New Bedford Mercury._


OFF TO THE GEYSERS; OR THE YOUNG YACHTERS IN ICELAND. AS RECORDED BY
"WADE."

     "It is difficult to believe that Wade and Raed and Kit and Wash
     were not live boys, sailing up Hudson Straits, and reigning
     temporarily over an Esquimaux tribe."--_The Independent, New York._


LYNX HUNTING: From Notes by the Author of "Camping Out."

     "Of first quality as a boys' book, and fit to take its place beside
     the best."--_Richmond Enquirer._


FOX HUNTING. As Recorded by "Raed."

     "The most spirited and entertaining book that has as yet appeared.
     It overflows with incident, and is characterized by dash and
     brilliancy throughout."--_Boston Gazette._


ON THE AMAZON; OR, THE CRUISE OF THE "RAMBLER." As Recorded by "Wash."

     "Gives vivid pictures of Brazilian adventure and
     scenery."--_Buffalo Courier._




FAMOUS STANDARD JUVENILES FOR GIRLS


A GOOD GIRL'S BOOK IS HARD TO FIND!

One often hears the above quoted. _These_ books have stood the tests of
time and careful mothers, and will be of the greatest interest to girls
of all ages. Free from any unhealthy sensationalism, yet full of
incident and romance, they are the cream of the best girls' books
published.


WAYS AND MEANS LIBRARY. By Margaret Vandegrift.

    Queen's Body Guard.
    Rose Raymond's Wards.
    Doris and Theodora.
    Ways and Means.


STORIES FOR GIRLS.

    Dr. Gilbert's Daughters.
    Marion Berkley.
    Hartwell Farm.


HONEST ENDEAVOR LIBRARY. By Lucy C. Lillie.

    The Family Dilemma.
    Allison's Adventures.
    Ruth Endicott's Way.


MILBROOK LIBRARY. By Lucy C. Lillie.

    Helen Glenn.
    The Squire's Daughter.
    Esther's Fortune.
    For Honor's Sake.


RECENT SUCCESSES

The following, though of recent date, have at once reached such a height
of popularity that they can already be classified as standards.

    Lady Green Satin. By Baroness Deschesney.
    Marion Berkley. By Elizabeth B. Comins.
    Lenny, the Orphan. By Margaret Hosmer.
    Family Dilemma. By Lucy C. Lillie.
    Question of Honor. By Lynde Palmer
    Girl's Ordeal, A. By Lucy C. Lillie.
    Elinor Belden; or The Step Brothers. By Lucy C. Lillie.
    Where Honor Leads. By Lynde Palmer.
    Under the Holly. By Margaret Hosmer.
    Two Bequests. The; or, Heavenward Led. By Jane R. Sommere.
    The Thistles of Mount Cedar. By Ursula Tannenforst.




HURLBUT'S STORY OF THE BIBLE told for YOUNG AND OLD

by Rev. Jesse Lyman Hurlbut, D.D.

A Veritable "Arabian Nights" of Entertainment Containing 168 Complete
Illustrated Stories


THE BIBLE MADE FASCINATING TO CHILDREN.--The heroes and the noble men
and women of the Bible are made to appear as living, acting people. The
book is an original work, and in no sense an imitation. It has been in
preparation for a number of years.

THE DISTINGUISHED AUTHOR.--Dr. Hurlbut has long been associated with,
and director of, the Sunday School work of one of the largest
denominations, and he has been more closely associated with the detail
work of the Chautauqua movement than has any other man. He is also well
known as a writer.

REMARKABLE FOR THE BEAUTY AND NUMBER OF ITS ILLUSTRATIONS.--There are
sixteen pictures in color prepared for this work by the distinguished
artist, W. H. Margetson, and reproduced with the beauty and
attractiveness of the artist's original work. There are also nearly 300
half-tone engravings in this remarkable book, which is as original in
the selection of its illustrations as it is in its stories.

WHAT OTHERS THINK OF IT

     "It is a needed and original work. Not an imitation."--_Christian
     Advocate_, New York.

     "Written in such a style as to fascinate and hold the interest of
     child or man."--REV. F. E. CLARK, Pres. Society of Christian
     Endeavor.

     "It is a beautiful book. I hope every family in the land will
     secure 'Hurlbut's Story of the Bible,'"--GENERAL O. O. HOWARD.

     "The best book of its kind, and that kind the most important."--REV.
     JAMES A. WORDEN, Presbyterian B'd of Pub. and S. S. Work.

     "I like very much the vocabulary you have used, and I can see how
     careful you have been in choosing understandable words."--MR.
     PHILIP E. HOWARD, _Sunday-School Times_, Philadelphia.

     "It is the completest and best thing of the kind I have seen. The
     book is splendidly illustrated." MARIAN LAWRANCE, General Secretary
     International Sunday-School Association.

     "Many will be drawn to the Bible who otherwise might look upon it
     as only adapted for older people."--HON. DAVID J. BREWER, Justice
     of the Supreme Court of the United States.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Telegraph Boy, by Horatio Alger, Jr.

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE TELEGRAPH BOY ***

***** This file should be named 24013-8.txt or 24013-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/4/0/1/24013/

Produced by David Edwards, Mary Meehan and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from scans of public domain material
produced by Microsoft for their Live Search Books site.)


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Young Miner, by Horatio Alger, Jr.

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: The Young Miner
       or Tom Nelson in California

Author: Horatio Alger, Jr.

Release Date: September 18, 2007 [EBook #22669]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE YOUNG MINER ***




Produced by David Edwards, Marcia Brooks and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from scans of public domain material
produced by Microsoft for their Live Search Books site.)







[Illustration: THE PACIFIC SERIES.]

THE

YOUNG MINER;

OR,

TOM NELSON IN CALIFORNIA.

BY

HORATIO ALGER, JR.,

AUTHOR OF "RAGGED DICK," "TATTERED TOM," "LUCK AND PLUCK," "BRAVE AND
BOLD" SERIES, ETC., ETC.

PHILADELPHIA:

HENRY T. COATES & CO.




FAMOUS ALGER BOOKS.

       *       *       *       *       *

=RAGGED DICK SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 6 vols. 12mo. Cloth.

RAGGED DICK.
FAME AND FORTUNE.
MARK THE MATCH BOY.
ROUGH AND READY.
BEN THE LUGGAGE BOY.
RUFUS AND ROSE.

=TATTERED TOM SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 4 vols. 12mo. Cloth. FIRST
SERIES.

TATTERED TOM.
PAUL THE PEDDLER.
PHIL THE FIDDLER.
SLOW AND SURE.

=TATTERED TOM SERIES=. 4 vols. 12mo. Cloth. SECOND SERIES.

JULIUS.
THE YOUNG OUTLAW.
SAM'S CHANCE.
THE TELEGRAPH BOY.

=CAMPAIGN SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 3 vols.

FRANK'S CAMPAIGN.
PAUL PRESCOTT'S CHARGE.
CHARLIE CODMAN'S CRUISE.

=LUCK AND PLUCK SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 4 vols. 12mos. Cloth.
FIRST SERIES.

LUCK AND PLUCK.
SINK OR SWIM.
STRONG AND STEADY.
STRIVE AND SUCCEED.

=LUCK AND PLUCK SERIES=. 4 vols. 12mo. Cloth. SECOND SERIES.

TRY AND TRUST.
BOUND TO RISE.
RISEN FROM THE RANKS.
HERBERT CARTER'S LEGACY.

=BRAVE AND BOLD SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 4 vols. 12mo. Cloth.

BRAVE AND BOLD.
JACK'S WARD.
SHIFTING FOR HIMSELF.
WAIT AND HOPE.

=PACIFIC SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 4 vols. 12mo.

THE YOUNG ADVENTURER.
THE YOUNG MINER.
THE YOUNG EXPLORERS.
BEN'S NUGGET.

=ATLANTIC SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 4 vols.

THE YOUNG CIRCUS RIDER.
DO AND DARE.
HECTOR'S INHERITANCE.
HELPING HIMSELF.

=WAY TO SUCCESS SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 4 vols. 12mo. Cloth.

BOB BURTON.
THE STORE BOY.
LUKE WALTON.
STRUGGLING UPWARD.

=NEW WORLD SERIES=. By HORATIO ALGER, JR. 3 vols. 12mo. Cloth.

DIGGING FOR GOLD.
FACING THE WORLD.
IN A NEW WORLD.

=_Other Volumes in Preparation._=

       *       *       *       *       *

COPYRIGHT BY A. K. LORING, 1879.

To
GENEVIEVE AND ANITA ALGER,
This Volume
IS AFFECTIONATELY DEDICATED.




PREFACE.


When "The Young Adventurer" was published, a year since, as the initial
volume of The Pacific Series, it was announced that the second volume
would be "The Young Pioneer." This has been changed to "The Young
Miner," in order to avoid confusion with a book bearing a title somewhat
similar to the one first proposed.

Those who were interested in Tom Nelson's trip across the Plains will
find in the present story a record of his adventures in the Land of
Gold. Though his prosperity was chiefly due to his own energy and
industry, it is also true that he was exceptionally lucky. Yet his good
fortune has been far exceeded by that of numerous adventurous spirits in
Colorado, within the last twelve months. Some measure of prosperity
generally awaits the patient and energetic worker, and seldom comes to
those who idly wait for something to turn up.

NEW YORK, Oct. 1, 1879.




THE YOUNG MINER;

OR,

TOM NELSON IN CALIFORNIA.




CHAPTER I.

THE GOLD-SEEKERS.


A dozen men, provided with rockers, were busily engaged in gathering and
washing dirt, mingled with gold-dust, on the banks of a small stream in
California. It was in the early days, and this party was but one of
hundreds who were scattered over the new Eldorado, seeking for the
shining metal which throughout the civilized world exercises a sway
potent and irresistible.

I have said there were a dozen men, but this is a mistake. One of the
party was a well-grown boy of sixteen, with a good-humored and even
handsome face. He was something more than good-humored, however. There
was an expression on his face which spoke of strength and resolution
and patient endurance. The readers of "The Young Adventurer" will at
once recognize in our young hero Tom Nelson, the oldest son of a poor
New England farmer, who, finding no prospects at home, had joined the
tide of emigrants pouring from all parts of the country to the land of
which so many marvelous stories were told. Tom had come to work; and
though he doubtless shared to some extent the extravagant anticipations
of the great body of Eastern visitors who hoped to make a fortune in a
year, he did not expect to succeed without hard toil.

His companions belonged to the same party with whom he had crossed the
plains, under the leadership of Phineas Fletcher, a broad-shouldered
Illinois farmer, who had his family with him. Next to Tom was Donald
Ferguson, a grave Scotchman, and Tom's special friend; a man of
excellent principles, thoroughly reliable, and held in high respect by
all though not possessed of popular manners. On the other side was
Lawrence Peabody, a young Boston clerk, who had spent several years
behind a dry-goods counter. He was soft and effeminate, with no talent
for "roughing it," and wholly unfitted for the hard work which he had
undertaken. He was deeply disappointed in his first work at
gold-hunting, having come out with the vague idea that he should pick up
a big nugget within a short time that would make his fortune and enable
him to go home a rich man. The practical side of gold-seeking--this
washing particles of dust from the dirt of the river-bed--was in the
highest degree unsatisfactory and discouraging. He was not a bad fellow;
and his companions, though they laughed at him, were well disposed
towards him.

Among the rest, mention may be made of John Miles, Henry Scott, and
Chapman, owner of a refractory donkey named after King Solomon.

Not far away from the river were the tents occupied by the miners. There
was but one house, roughly built of logs. This was occupied by Captain
Fletcher and his family. He had not had the trouble of building it, but
had found it ready for occupation, having been constructed by a
previous party who had wandered farther down the river in search of
richer washings. In fact, it was this building which had decided our
party to remain.

"There isn't much difference in places," said Fletcher. "We may as well
stay here."

"Then why was it deserted?" suggested John Miles, dubiously. "That's
rather against it, isn't it, captain?"

"Not necessarily, Miles. You've been on berrying parties, haven't you,
when at home?"

"Many a time."

"You've noticed that many of the pickers leave good places, just from
love of novelty, and wander about the field, often faring worse than if
they remained where they were?"

"That's so, captain."

"Then let us give this place a try. We'll make more working steady in a
medium place than wandering here, there, and everywhere."

So the whole party agreed to "give the place a try."

There had been no brilliant success as yet, but fair luck. In six days
Tom had washed out twenty-five dollars' worth of gold-dust, in spite of
awkwardness and inexperience. Others had done better, but poor Lawrence
Peabody had barely five dollars' worth to show. It must be said,
however, that he had not averaged more than two or three hours of real
labor in every twenty-four. He spent the rest of the time in wandering
about aimlessly, or sitting down and watching the labors of his
companions, while he enlivened them by pathetic lamentations over his
unfortunate position, so far away from Boston and the refining
influences of civilization.

A little transcript of a conversation between Tom and himself will throw
light upon the characters of both.

"This is beastly work," sighed Peabody, resting from his by no means
arduous labors, and looking over to Tom. "I tell you, it isn't fit for a
gentleman."

"It is rather hard to keep one's hands clean, Mr. Peabody," said Tom;
"but you mustn't think of the present. Think of the time when you will
go home, your pockets full of gold."

"I don't see any prospect of it, Tom," sighed Peabody. "Here I've been
hard at work for a week, and I haven't got over five dollars' worth of
dust."

"I have five times as much," said Tom.

"Some people are lucky," said Peabody.

"You haven't worked like Tom," said the Scotchman, plainly. "You haven't
averaged over two hours a day, while Tom has worked eight or ten."

"I have worked till my back was like to break," said the young man from
Boston. "I am not accustomed to manual labor, Mr. Ferguson. My friend
Tom has worked on a farm, while I have been engaged in mercantile
pursuits. Oh, why did I leave Boston!"

"I am sure I can't guess," said Ferguson, dryly.

"I never expected anything like _this_."

"What did you expect, if I may be so bold as to inquire?"

"I thought I should find the gold in big nuggets worth thousands of
dollars apiece. I was always reading in the papers about finding them. I
think it's a great shame to deceive people by such stories. I don't
believe there are any nuggets."

"Oh, yes, there are; but they are few and far between," said Fletcher.
"A neighbor of mine found one worth three thousand dollars. Altogether
he brought home five thousand dollars, and invested it in a farm and
saw-mill. He is doing a good business. When he came to California he had
nothing."

"That is what I should like, Captain Fletcher," said Tom. "If I could
only manage to carry home five thousand dollars, I could make my father
comfortable for life."

"I shouldn't be satisfied with five thousand dollars," said Peabody,
whose ideas were lofty.

"How much would satisfy you?"

"About fifty thousand," said the young Bostonian, his face lighting up
at the thought of so large a sum.

"And what would you do with it, if I may make so bold?" asked Ferguson.

"I would buy a nice house at the South End, furnish it handsomely, and
live in style."

"I suppose you would marry?" suggested Tom, smiling.

"I probably should," answered Peabody, gravely.

"Perhaps you have the lady already selected."

"I have."

"Who is she?" asked John Mills. "Come, now, Peabody, don't be bashful."

"It is the daughter of a Boston merchant."

"Does the lady love you?"

"We understand each other," answered Peabody, loftily. "She would marry
me, poor as I am, but for her purse-proud, mercenary sire. It will be a
happy day when, with my pockets full of gold, I enter his presence and
claim his daughter's hand."

"I wish you success, Mr. Peabody," said Tom. "I hope you have no
rivals."

"Yes, there is one."

"Are you not afraid of him?"

"Oh, no; he is a fellow of no style," said Peabody, drawing up his
slender form, and looking as stylish as a very dirty shirt, muddy boots,
and a soiled suit would allow.

"I think I shall wait awhile before getting married," said Tom. "I am
afraid I wouldn't stand any chance with an heiress, Mr. Peabody. Do you
think I can ever be stylish?"

The Bostonian understood Tom to be in earnest, and told him he thought
in time, under proper training, he might become fairly stylish.

The conversation was interrupted by the ringing of a bell from the
log-house. Mrs. Fletcher, by an arrangement with the party, prepared
their meals, and thus they fared better than most of the early pioneers.
Their labor gave them a good appetite, and they were more solicitous
about quantity than quality. Slow as he was at his work, there was no
one who exhibited greater alacrity at meal-times, than Lawrence Peabody.
At such times he was even cheerful.




CHAPTER II.

MISSOURI JACK.


At the end of a month the settlement had considerably increased. A large
party from Missouri went to work farther up stream, and a few stray
emigrants also added themselves to the miners at River Bend, for this
was the name selected by Captain Fletcher for the location. The new
arrivals were a rougher and more disorderly class than Fletcher and his
companions. Already there was a saloon, devoted to the double purpose of
gambling and drinking; and the proprietor, Missouri Jack (no one knew
his last name), was doing a thriving business. Indeed his income
considerably exceeded that of any one in the settlement.

Neither Tom nor any of his party contributed much to Missouri Jack's
profits. In consequence, they had to bear the ill-will and sometimes
open abuse of Jack and his friends.

"Come in and take a drink, stranger," called out Jack, the day after the
opening of the saloon, to Captain Fletcher.

"No, thank you."

"It shan't cost you a cent."

"It would cost me my health," returned Fletcher.

"Do you mean to say I sell bad whiskey?" demanded Jack, angrily,
emphasizing the inquiry by an oath.

"I don't know anything about it."

"Then what _do_ you mean?"

"I mean that all whiskey is bad for the health," replied Fletcher.

"Oh, you're a temperance sneak!" exclaimed Missouri Jack,
contemptuously.

"I am a temperance man; you may leave out the other word," calmly
answered Fletcher.

"You're not a man!" exploded Jack. "A man that's afraid of whiskey is
a--a--isn't half a man. He isn't fit to be a woman."

"Have it as you like," said Fletcher, unruffled. "I shall not drink to
please any man. I had a younger brother--a bright, promising young man
poor Ben was--who drank himself to death. He'd have been alive now but
for whiskey."

"Oh, dry up your pious talk! You make me sick!" exclaimed Missouri Jack
in deep disgust.

Next he accosted John Miles, who curtly declined and received in return
a volley of abuse. Now Miles was a powerful man, and not possessed of
Fletcher's self-control. He paused, and surveyed Jack with a menacing
look.

"Look here, stranger," he said, sharply, "just have a care how you use
that tongue of yours. This is a free country, and if I choose to decline
your whiskey, there's no law against it that I know of."

"You're a white-livered sneak!"

Missouri Jack did not proceed with his remarks, for John Miles, seizing
him by the shoulder, tripped him up, and strode away, leaving him
prostrate, and pouring out a volley of curses. Being a bully, and
cowardly as most bullies are, he did not pursue his broad-shouldered
enemy, but vowed vengeance whenever a good opportunity came.

In fact, the only one of the original miners who accepted Jack's
invitation was Lawrence Peabody.

"Step in, stranger, and have a drink!" said Jack, a little dubiously,
having met with such poor luck heretofore.

The young Bostonian paused. He was not a drinker at home, but in his
discontent and disappointment he was tempted.

"My dear sir, you are very polite," he said.

"I hope you ain't one of them temperance sneaks," said Jack, his brow
clouding in anticipation of a refusal.

"I assure you I am not," Peabody hastened to say. "I have participated
in convivial scenes more than once in Boston."

"I don't understand college talk," said Jack; "but if you want a glass
of prime whiskey, just say the word."

"I don't care if I do," said Peabody, following his new friend into the
saloon.

The draught of prime whiskey scorched his throat as he swallowed it
down, but it was followed by a sense of exhilaration, and Peabody's
tongue was loosened.

"You're a gentleman!" said Missouri Jack. "You ain't like them fellows
you're with. They're sneaks."

"Really, you compliment me, Mr.--, what may I call your name?"

"Missouri Jack--that's the peg I hang on to."

"My dear Mr. Jack, I am glad to know you. You are really quite an
accession to our settlement."

"Well, if I ain't, my saloon is. How you've managed to live so long
without liquor beats me. Why, it ain't civilized."

"It _was_ pretty dull," admitted Peabody.

"No life, no amusement; for all the world like a parcel of Methodists.
What luck have you met with, stranger?"

"Beastly luck!" answered Peabody. "I tell you, Mr. Jack, California's a
fraud. Many a time I've regretted leaving Boston, where I lived in
style, and moved in the first circles, for such a place as this.
Positively, Mr. Jack, I feel like a tramp, and I'm afraid I look like
one. If my fashionable friends could see me now, they wouldn't know me."

"I ain't got no fashionable friends, and I don't want any," growled
Missouri Jack, spitting on the floor. "What I want is, to meet
gentlemen that ain't afraid to drink like gentlemen. I say, stranger,
you'd better leave them Methodist fellers, and join our gang."

"Thank you, Mr. Jack, you're very kind, and I'll think of it," said
Peabody, diplomatically. Though a little exhilarated, he was not quite
blind to the character of the man with whom he was fraternizing, and had
too much real refinement to enjoy his coarseness.

"Have another drink!"

"Thank you."

Peabody drank again, this time with a friend of Jack's, a man of his own
stripe, who straggled into the saloon.

"Do you play euchre?" asked Jack, producing a dirty pack of cards.

"I know little of it," said Peabody; "but I'll try a game."

"Then you and me and Bill here will have a game."

"All right," said Peabody, glad to while away the time.

"What'll you put up on your game, stranger?" asked Bill.

"You don't mean to play for money, do you?" asked Peabody, a little
startled.

"Sartain I do. What's the good of playin' for nothing?"

So the young Bostonian, out of his modest pile was tempted to stake an
ounce of gold-dust. Though his head was hardly in a condition to follow
the game intelligently, he won, or at least Bill and Jack told him he
had, and for the first time Lawrence felt the rapture of the successful
gambler, as he gathered in his winnings.

"He plays a steep game, Bill," said Jack.

"Tip-top--A No. 1."

"I believe I do play a pretty good game," said the flattered Peabody.
"My friends in Boston used to say so."

"You're hard to beat, and no mistake," said Bill. "Try another game."

"I'm ready, gentlemen," said Peabody, with alacrity.

"It's a great deal easier earning money this way," he reflected,
regarding complacently the two ounces of dust which represented his
winnings, "than washing dirt out of the river." And the poor dupe
congratulated himself that a new way of securing the favors of fortune
had been opened to him.

The reader will easily guess that Lawrence Peabody did not win the next
game, nor will he be surprised to hear that when he left the saloon his
pockets were empty.

"Better luck next time, stranger," said Jack, carelessly. "Take a drink
before you go?"

Peabody accepted the invitation, and soon after staggered into the tent
occupied by Tom and his friend Ferguson.

"What's the matter, Mr. Peabody?" asked Tom. "Are you sick?"

"Yes," answered Peabody, sinking to the floor. "Something's the matter
with my head. I don't feel well."

"Have you been to the saloon, Mr. Peabody?" asked Ferguson.

"Yes," answered the Bostonian.

"And while there you drank some of their vile whiskey, didn't you?"

"I'm a free man, Mr. Ferguson. If I choose to drink, what--what business
is it--yours?"

"None, except as a friend I advise you not to go there again."

Further inquiries elicited the facts about the gambling, and Ferguson
and Tom seriously remonstrated with Peabody, who, however, insisted that
Mr. Jack, as he called him, was a hospitable gentleman.

The dust which Peabody had lost should have been paid to Capt. Fletcher,
as his share of the expenses that same evening. Of course this was now
impossible. Fletcher warned him that any subsequent failure from the
same cause would be followed by an exclusion from his table.




CHAPTER III.

HOW TOM GOT ON.


About this time Tom took account of stock. He had come out to California
with the noble and praiseworthy purpose of earning money to help his
father pay off the mortgage on his little farm. He was the more anxious
to succeed, because two hundred dollars of the amount had been raised to
defray his expenses across the continent. The mortgage, amounting now to
twenty-two hundred dollars, was held by Squire Hudson, a wealthy
resident of the same town, who hoped eventually to find an excuse for
fore-closing the mortgage, and ejecting Mr. Nelson's family. He was
actuated not alone by mercenary motives, but also to gratify an ancient
grudge. In early life Mrs. Nelson, Tom's mother, had rejected the suit
of the wealthy squire, and this insult, as he chose to characterize it,
he had never forgotten or forgiven.

Had Tom been aware of the Squire's feelings, towards his family, he
never would have been willing to have the mortgage increased for his
sake, much as he wished to go to California. But neither Tom nor his
father dreamed of Squire Hudson's secret animosity, and regarded his
willingness to advance the extra two hundred dollars as an evidence of
friendship.

But I have said that Tom took account of stock--in other words,
ascertained how much he was worth. First, then, of the money borrowed
for his trip--the original two hundred dollars--he had twenty-five
dollars left over. Besides this sum, after paying all expenses, he had
accumulated, by hard work and strict economy, fifty dollars' worth of
gold-dust.

"I wish father had this money," said Tom to his tent-mate, Ferguson. "I
am afraid he stands in need of it."

"There may be a way to send it to him, Tom."

"I wish there were."

"There's one of our party going to San Francisco next week. He can buy
a draft there, and send it to your father."

"Who is going?" asked Tom, eagerly.

"John Miles. You can trust him with the money, Tom."

"Of course I can. I'd trust John Miles with any sum."

"Who's that taking liberties with my name?" asked a manly voice, and
John Miles himself stepped into the tent, bending his head as he
entered.

"I hear you are going to San Francisco, John?"

"Yes, I start next week."

"Will you come back again?"

"I intend to. I am going to prospect a little, and buy some things for
myself and Captain Fletcher."

"Will you do me a favor?"

"Of course I will, if it isn't too large a one," answered Miles.

Tom explained what he wished, and John Miles cordially assented.

"You're a good boy, Tom," he said, "to think of your father so soon."

"I feel anxious about him," said Tom. "He raised money to send me out
here, and I don't want him to suffer for it."

"That's the right way to feel, Tom. I wish I had a father and mother to
look out for," said Miles, soberly, "but you're in better luck than I.
Both died when I was a mere lad. How much do you want to send?"

"Seventy-five dollars."

"Have you saved up so much already?" asked Miles, in surprise.

"Part of it I had left over when I got here."

"Will you have any left?"

"No."

"Isn't it well to reserve a little, then?"

"Oh, I shall have some more soon," answered Tom, sanguine, as most boys
are.

"Suppose you are sick?"

"If he is sick he shall suffer for nothing," said the Scotchman. "While
I have money, Tom shall not feel the want of it."

"Thank you, Mr. Ferguson," said Tom, gratefully.

"That old fellow has a heart, after all," thought Miles, who had been
disposed to look upon Ferguson ever since their first acquaintance, as
rather miserly.

The Scotchman was certainly frugal, and counted his pennies carefully,
but he was not mean, and had conceived a strong affection for his young
companion, whom he regarded much as a son or a nephew.

"Suppose you take the money now, John," said Tom.

"Shall I scribble a receipt, Tom? I am afraid my writing materials have
given out."

"I don't want any receipt," said Tom; "I'll trust you without one."

"Nevertheless, lad," said the cautious Scotchman, "it may be well--"

"Yes, Tom, Mr. Ferguson is right. Of course I know that you trust me;
but if anything should happen to me,--any accident, I mean,--the paper
may be useful to you."

"Just as you like, Mr. Miles, but I don't ask it, remember that."

"Yes, I will remember it, and I don't mean to meet with any accident if
I can help it. Mr. Ferguson, can you oblige me with a pipeful of
tobacco? I'll join you in smoking."

Smoking was the Scotchman's solitary extravagance, not a costly one,
however, as he never smoked cigars, but indulged only in a democratic
clay pipe.

John Miles threw himself on the ground between Tom and his Scotch
friend, and watched complacently the wreaths of smoke as they curled
upwards.

"Tom, you ought to smoke," he said. "You don't know how much enjoyment
you lose."

"Don't tempt the lad," said Ferguson. "It's a bad habit."

"You smoke yourself."

"That is true, but it isn't well for a growing boy. It can do him no
good."

"I smoked before I was as old as Tom."

"So did I, but I wish I had not."

"Well, perhaps you're right, but it's a comfort when a man's tired or
out of spirits."

"I am not troubled in that way," said Tom. "I mean with being out of
spirits."

"Youth is a hopeful age," said the Scotchman. "When we are young we are
always hoping for something good to befall us."

"And when one is older, how is it, Mr. Ferguson?"

"We fear ill more than we hope for good," he replied.

"Then I want to remain young as long as I can."

"A good wish, Tom. Some men are always young in spirit; but those that
have seen the evil there is in the world find it harder to be hopeful."

"You speak as if you had had experience of the evil, Mr. Ferguson."

"So I have," answered the Scotchman slowly. Then, after a pause, "I will
tell you about it: it's no secret."

"Not if it is going to pain you."

"Oh, the pain is past. It's only a matter of money, and those wounds
heal."

"Only a matter of money!" said John Miles to himself. "I must have
misjudged Ferguson. I thought money was all in all with him. I did not
think he would speak so lightly of it."

"When I was a young man," Ferguson began, "my father died, leaving me a
thousand pounds, and a small annuity to my mother. With this money I
felt rich, but I knew it would not support me, nor was I minded to be
idle. So I began to look about me, to consider what business I had best
go into, when a young man, about my own age, a clerk in a mercantile
house, came to me and proposed a partnership. He was to put in five
hundred pounds, and contribute his knowledge of business, which was
greater than mine. He was a young man of good parts, and had a brisk,
pleasant way with him, that made him a favorite in business circles. I
thought it was a good chance, and, after taking a little time for
thought, agreed to his proposal. So the firm of McIntire and Ferguson
was formed. We went into business, and for a time all seemed to go
well. As my partner chose to keep the books, I was not so clear as I
wished to be about matters, but we seemed to be prospering. One morning,
however, on coming to business, I found that my partner had disappeared,
after possessing himself of all the money he could collect on the credit
of the firm. Of course we were bankrupts, or rather I was, for he left
me to bear the brunt of failure."

"Have you ever seen him since, Mr. Ferguson?"

"From that day to this--twenty years--I have never set eyes on Sandy
McIntire."

"It was a mean trick to serve you, Ferguson," said Miles.

"Yes," said the Scotchman, soberly. "I minded the loss of money, but the
loss of confidence was a sore thought too, after all the trust I had put
in that man."

Presently Miles rose to go.

"I'll take care of your money, Tom," he said, "and do my best to get it
safely to your father."

"Thank you, John."

As Miles left the tent, he did not observe a crouching figure on the
other side of it. It was the figure of Bill Crane, a crony of Missouri
Jack, in fact, the man who helped him to fleece poor Peabody of his
scanty hoard.

Bill looked after Miles enviously.

"I wonder how much money he's got?" thought Bill. "I'd like some of it,
for I'm bust. I must tell Jack. I don't dare to tackle him alone."




CHAPTER IV.

A FOILED ROBBER.


In the grand rush to the newly discovered gold-fields all classes were
represented. There were men of education, representatives of all the
learned professions, men versed in business, and along with them
adventurers and men of doubtful antecedents, graduates of prisons and
penitentiaries. Bill Crane, introduced in the last chapter, belonged to
the latter undesirable class. He had served a term at Sing-Sing as a
housebreaker, and later another term in a Western penitentiary. He had
come to California with a prejudice against honest labor, and a
determination to make a living by the use of the peculiar talents on
which he had hitherto relied. He had spent a week at River Bend, chiefly
at the saloon of Missouri Jack, whom he found a congenial spirit, and
had picked up a little money from flats like the young Bostonian; but,
on the whole, he had found it an unprofitable field for the exercise of
his special talents.

"I must make a raise somehow," he bethought himself, "and then I'll make
tracks for some other settlement."

Precisely how to raise the fund of which he stood in need was difficult
to decide. Moneyed men were not plenty at River Bend. Captain Fletcher
and his party had been at work but a short time, and were not likely to
have collected much.

As we know, Bill Crane overheard a part of the closing conversation
between Tom and John Miles. From this he learned that Miles, besides his
own money, would be in charge of seventy-five dollars belonging to our
young hero. It was not much, but it was something.

"If the whole doesn't come to over two hundred dollars, I can make it
do," thought Crane. "It will get me out of this beastly hole, and carry
me to San Francisco."

John Miles slept by himself under a small tent at the northern end of
the small encampment. He looked like a man who ate well and slept well,
and this would be favorable to Bill Crane, who proposed to effect the
robbery in the night. He had half a mind to secure the aid of Missouri
Jack, but then Jack would expect to go shares in the "plunder," and
there was likely to be little enough for one. So Bill decided to make
the attempt alone.

In a small camp like that at River Bend, the movements and plans of each
individual were generally known. So it was generally understood that
John Miles intended to start on Thursday for the city.

The previous evening he spent with Tom and Ferguson, with whom he was
more intimate than any others of the party. He would not have been drawn
to the Scotchman, but for his being Tom's room-mate. Through him he came
to appreciate and respect the Scot's sterling virtues, and to overlook
his dry, phlegmatic manner.

"I hope you'll have good luck, Mr. Miles," said Tom.

"Thank you, my boy."

"I would join with my young friend Tom," said Ferguson, "if I were quite
clear in my mind whether good luck is the right term to use."

"Don't you think some men are luckier than others, Mr. Ferguson?" asked
Tom.

"Some men are more successful, doubtless; but what we call good luck,
generally comes from greater industry, good judgment, and, above all,
the prompt use of opportunities."

"There is something in that," said Miles; "but when two men work side by
side with equal industry, and one finds a nugget worth thousands of
dollars, while the other plods along at a few dollars a day, isn't there
some luck there?"

"It may be so," said the Scotchman, cautiously, "but such cases are
exceptional."

"So one boy is born to an inheritance of wealth and another to an
inheritance of hard work. Isn't there any luck there?"

"The luck may be on the side of the poor boy," was the reply. "He is
further removed from temptation."

John Miles laughed.

"Well, at any rate, it seems you believe in luck after all. I am sure
you both wish me to be prosperous, whether you call it luck or by some
other name. Tom, if I meet with any good opening that I think will suit
you, I shall write you. You don't want to stay here, particularly?"

"No; the place is not so pleasant since these new people have come here.
Missouri Jack isn't a neighbor that I like."

"He is exerting a bad influence," said Ferguson. "I am afraid Peabody
visits him too often for his own good."

"He ought to have stayed in Boston," said Miles. "He is not the man for
such a life as ours. He is too delicate to work, or thinks he is, and I
see no other reliable road to success."

"I saw Peabody reeling out of the saloon this afternoon," said Tom. "I
asked him if he considered it was 'high-toned' to drink in a saloon, as
that is the word he is always using, but he said it didn't make much
difference out here, where he wasn't known."

"Peabody isn't overstocked with brains, though he does come from
Boston," said Miles.

Ten o'clock came, and Miles rose to go.

"I must have a good night's rest," he said, "for to-morrow night must
see me many miles on my road. Tom, I will attend to that commission of
yours just as soon as I have the opportunity."

"Thank you, Mr. Miles."

John Miles walked slowly toward his tent. Arrived there, he threw
himself down on his rude couch, and in less than fifteen minutes, he was
sound asleep. He had done his usual day's work, and made some
preparations for his journey besides, and these made slumber sweet and
refreshing.

Before settling himself for the night, however, Miles carefully
deposited a bag of gold-dust under his head, wrapped up in an extra pair
of pantaloons. Had he known that Bill Crane had formed a plan to rob him
that very night, he would have taken extra precautions, but he was not
inclined to be suspicious, or to anticipate danger.

Perhaps an hour later, Tom, who found himself unusually restless, got up
from his hard couch, leaving Ferguson fast asleep, and went out into
the air, thinking that a walk would do him good and dispose him to
sleep. The night was dark, but not wholly so. There was no moon, but a
few stars were shining; and as his eyes became accustomed to the faint
light, he could easily distinguish objects at the distance of a few
rods.

Tom's thoughts reverted to his humble home, more than three thousand
miles away. Probably the fact that he had committed to John Miles a sum
of money to send to his father, had turned his thoughts in that
direction.

"Father will be glad to get the seventy-five dollars," thought Tom, "and
I am sure he will need it. I wish it could get there more quickly, but
it is a long way off."

Tom was not homesick, and was far from wishing himself back, with his
object in coming yet unaccomplished, but it did occur to him, that he
would like to see his father and mother, and brothers and sisters, if
only for a few minutes.

When he came out he had no particular direction in mind in which he
wished to walk, but chance directed his steps toward the tent of his
friend, John Miles.

When he came near it, his attention was arrested by the sight of a
crouching figure which appeared to be entering the tent. His first
thought was, that Miles, like himself, had got up from his couch and was
just returning. He was on the point of calling out "John," when a sudden
doubt and suspicion silenced him.--"Might not it be a robber?"

Tom was determined to find out. He crept nearer, so that he could have a
clearer view of the figure.

"It's Bill Crane!" he said to himself, with sudden recognition. "What's
he up to?"

Tom could guess. He didn't know the man's antecedents, but he had read
his character aright. He was instantly on the alert. Crane evidently was
on a thief's errand, and was likely to steal not only Miles's money but
Tom's. Our hero was alive to the emergency, and resolved to foil him. He
had his revolver with him; for in the unsettled state of society, with
no one to enforce the laws, and indeed no laws to enforce, it was the
custom for all men to go armed.

Tom was not long left in doubt as to Crane's intentions. He saw him
cautiously pulling at something in the tent, and felt sure that it was
the bag of treasure. He decided that the time had come to act.

"Put that back," he exclaimed in boyish, but clear, commanding tone.

Bill Crane turned suddenly, panic-stricken.

He saw Tom standing a few feet from him, with a revolver in his hand.

All was not lost. He might, he thought, intimidate the boy.

"Mind your business, you young cub," he growled.

"What are you about?" demanded Tom.

"I am going to sleep with Miles. He invited me. Does that satisfy you?"

"No, it doesn't, for I know that it's a lie. You are here to rob him."

"You'd better not insult me, boy, or I'll have your life."

"Get up this instant and leave the tent, or I'll fire," said Tom,
resolutely.

"A young cub like you can't frighten me. That shooting-iron of yours
isn't loaded," said Bill Crane, rather uneasily.

"It'll be rather a bad thing for you to take the risk," said Tom, with a
coolness that surprised himself, for the situation was a strange one for
a boy brought up in a quiet New England farming town.

"What do you want of me?" growled the desperado, uncomfortably, for he
was satisfied that the weapon was loaded, and Tom looked as if he would
shoot.

"I want you to leave that tent at once," said Tom.

"Suppose I don't."

"Then I shall fire at you."

"And be hung for attempted murder."

"I think I could explain it," said our hero. "You know very well what
will happen to you if you are caught."

Bill Crane did know. Hanging was the penalty for theft in the early
days of California, and he had no desire to swing from the branch of a
tree.

"You're a young fool!" he said roughly, as he rose from his stooping
posture. "I wanted to ask Miles to do a little commission for me in
Frisco. I had no thought of robbing him."

"You can see him in the morning about it," said Tom, resolutely.

"I'll be even with you for this," said the foiled thief, as he sullenly
obeyed the boy, half-ashamed to do so.

Tom went back to his tent, aroused Ferguson, and the two took turns in
guarding the tent of Miles during the night. Tom did not wish to awaken
him, for he needed rest on the eve of a long and fatiguing journey.




CHAPTER V.

MILES SETS OUT ON HIS JOURNEY.


"When Miles woke up in the morning he found Tom beside him.

"Hallo, Tom!" he said, in some surprise. "This is an early call."

"I have been here half the night," said Tom, quietly.

"How is that?"

"I was afraid you would be robbed."

"Did you have any particular reason for fearing it?" asked Miles,
quickly.

Thereupon Tom described his chance visit of the evening before, and what
he saw. As might have been expected, John Miles was indignant.

"The miserable sneak! I'd like to wring his neck," he exclaimed. "Did
you say he had his hand upon the bag of gold-dust, Tom?"

"Yes; I distinctly saw him attempting to draw it out from under your
head."

"If the boys knew of this, Crane's fate would be sealed. A thief in a
mining camp has a short shrift."

"You mean he would be hung?" asked Tom, in surprise.

"Yes, he would grace a limb of yonder tree, and I am not sure but it
would be the best way to dispose of him."

Tom shuddered.

"It would be a terrible fate," he said. "I should like to see him
punished, but I don't want him hanged."

"Then you will have to keep your mouth shut. Once let the boys get hold
of what happened, and nothing will save him."

"Then I shall keep it to myself."

"I will see Crane, and let him understand that I am aware of the attempt
he made," said Miles.

After breakfast he came upon Crane within a few rods of Missouri Jack's
saloon.

"Look here, Bill Crane," said Miles, "I've got something to say to you."

"What is it?" returned Crane, sullenly, looking ill at ease.

"I understand you favored me with a visit, last night."

"Who told you so?"

"Tom Nelson."

"The young cub had better mind his own business," growled Crane, in a
menacing tone.

"He did me a service in preventing your intended theft."

"If he says I meant to rob you, he lies!"

"Nevertheless, if he should make public what he saw, the boys would be
likely to believe him rather than you," said Miles, significantly.

"Is he going to tell?" asked Crane, nervously.

"He has told me, but is not likely to speak of it to others, being
unwilling that you should suffer the punishment you deserve."

"He is very kind," sneered Bill Crane, but he felt very much relieved.

"You probably owe your life to his kindness," said Miles, quietly. "He
tells me you wish me to do something for you in Frisco."

"I've changed my mind," said Crane, abruptly; "I may go there myself,
soon."

Miles smiled.

"I thought it might be something urgent," he said, "since it led you to
come to my tent at midnight."

"I thought you would be starting away early this morning."

"Well thought of, Bill Crane; but it is only fair to tell you that I
don't believe a word you say. I have one thing to say to you before I
go, and you had better bear it in mind. If you harm a hair of Tom
Nelson's head, and I believe you quite capable of it, I will never rest
till I have found you out and punished you for it."

"I am not afraid of you, John Miles," retorted Crane, but he looked
uncomfortable.

"You will have cause to be, if you injure Tom."

Miles walked off, leaving behind him a bitter enemy.

"I _hate_ him--him and the boy too!" muttered Bill Crane. "If I dared, I
would put my mark on him before he leaves the camp."

But Crane did not dare. He knew that he was in a very critical position.
His safety depended on the silence of two persons--one of whom would
soon be gone. He was not aware that Ferguson also knew of his attempted
crime, or the danger would have seemed greater. However much he thirsted
for vengeance, it would not do to gratify it now. He must bide his time.

Bill Crane was cunning as well as malignant. He decided to quiet Tom's
suspicions if he could, and ensure his continued silence, by an
affectation of friendliness. He waited till he saw our hero washing dust
beyond earshot of any listeners, and strolled up to him.

"How are you getting on, Tom?" he asked, with an appearance of
friendliness.

Tom looked up quickly. Considering all that had happened, he was
somewhat struck by Crane's effrontery.

"Fairly well," he answered coldly.

"Shan't I relieve you a few minutes?" proposed Crane.

"No, thank you."

"It's pretty hard work, and don't pay as well as it might. I think
California's a humbug, for my part."

"Have you tried washing for gold?" asked Tom. "I haven't seen you at
work."

"Not here. I've tried it elsewhere, but it's slow."

"Then, why do you stay here?" asked Tom, naturally.

Crane shrugged his shoulders.

"Because I haven't money to get away," he said. "I'm waiting for
something to turn up. If I could only get to Frisco, I would go into
some business. I would like to have gone with Miles."

"Was that what you were going to propose to him, last night?" asked Tom,
dryly.

"Yes, I wanted to speak to him on that subject. I had a great mind to
ask him to lend me a little money, and take me along with him. I would
have arranged to pay him soon after we reached Frisco."

Tom knew that the fellow was lying, and remained silent.

"You made a little mistake about my intentions," continued Bill Crane,
smoothly, "but perhaps it was natural under the circumstances."

Tom thought it was, but still preserved silence, much to Crane's
discomfiture.

Bill Crane eyed him sharply, and saw his incredulity, but for that he
cared little, if only he could secure his silence.

"I think you will see that it isn't fair to me to speak of this matter,"
he continued.

"I had made up my mind not to speak of it," said Tom. "I don't want to
get you into trouble."

"Good-morning, Mr. Crane," said Lawrence Peabody, who had just come up.

"Good-morning, Peabody. I was watching our friend Tom. How are you
getting on?"

"I haven't done anything yet to-day. It's dirty work. I don't think
it's fit for a gentleman; Tom, there, is used to work, and he don't
mind."

"Shall we go round to Jack's?"

"All right!"

And the two walked away together.

"I am sorry Peabody doesn't keep better company," Tom said to himself.
"Bill Crane won't do him any good."




CHAPTER VI.

ROBBED IN HIS SLEEP.


Tom was right in concluding that Bill Crane's influence over Peabody was
anything but good. The young Bostonian, however, was not long subjected
to it. During the night following John Miles's departure, the little
settlement at River Bend was called upon to deplore the loss of an
eminent member.

In brief, somewhere between midnight and dawn Mr. William Crane took his
departure, without the ceremony of leave-taking. Had he gone alone no
one perhaps would have felt any violent sorrow, but he took with him a
horse belonging to Adam Dietrich, an industrious young German, who had
only recently arrived. No one had seen the two go together, but it was
only natural to suppose that Crane had spirited away the horse.

Dietrich borrowed a horse, and, accompanied by a friend, set out in
search of the thief, but returned at night unsuccessful. Had it been wet
weather, it might have been possible to track the fugitive; but it was
very dry, and the trail was soon lost. It was almost impossible to tell
what direction Crane would choose, and continued pursuit would not pay,
so Adam sadly returned to his work.

Little doubt was entertained among the miners that Crane was responsible
for the loss of the horse. Had he been caught, there would have been
small chance for him, so generally was he pronounced guilty. A few of
his companions, especially Missouri Jack, defended him.

"Bill Crane wouldn't steal a horse any more than I would," said Jack;
and there were those who agreed with him without acquitting Bill. "Bill
ain't no saint, but he ain't a thief."

Whether Jack believed what he said, admits of a doubt. Crane needed a
different advocate to clear him from suspicion.

It may as well be stated that Crane did steal the horse. He had a
decided objection to walking as long as he could ride, and, having no
animal of his own, annexed the property of his neighbor.

He had two motives which influenced him to leave the settlement. First,
he was in Tom's power, and he was by no means certain that our hero
would keep silence touching his night-attempt at robbery. In the second
place, he still coveted the bag of gold-dust which John Miles carried
away with him. He had been prevented from taking it; but, as Miles was
travelling alone, he foresaw a better chance of success if he should
follow on his track.

How or under what circumstances he should make the new attempt he left
to be decided later. The first thing, obviously, was to overtake him.

Crane experienced the same difficulty in tracking Miles that had led to
the failure of his own pursuers. It was only on the fifth day, that, as
he halted his steed on the hillside, and cast long glances about him, he
caught sight, a mile away, of the object of his pursuit. He could not
mistake the sturdy, broad-shouldered figure, and large, massive head.

"That's Miles, sure enough!" he exclaimed, joyfully. "I thought I had
missed him, but I'm in luck. That bag must be mine."

The most direct course was to ride up in the fashion of a highwayman,
and demand the bag. But Crane did not mean to proceed in this fashion.
Physically, though not a weak man, he was not a match for Miles, and he
knew it. Cunning must supply the place of strength. He knew that Miles
was a sound sleeper, and could think of no better plan than repeating
the visit he had made in camp. It was already late in the afternoon when
he caught sight of the sturdy miner. It was his policy now to keep him
in sight, but not to approach near enough for recognition. Once seen,
Miles would be on his guard, and the game would be spoiled. Crane
halted, therefore, and drew back within the shadow of the trees,
henceforth advancing cautiously.

John Miles did not once turn back. Had he done so, it is quite possible
that he might have caught a glimpse of his pursuer. He had travelled
since morning, and his faithful horse was beginning to show signs of
fatigue.

"You are tired, my poor Dick," he said kindly, stroking the horse. "You
deserve supper and rest, and you shall have it."

Dick appeared to understand what his rider said, for he gave a short
neigh of satisfaction.

John Miles looked around him. Just ahead was a large tree, under whose
broad branches it would be pleasant to recline. Not far away was a
slender mountain-stream trickling over the rocks. Nothing could have
been better.

Miles slid from his horse and made preparations to encamp for the night,
first leading his faithful steed to the stream, where he quenched his
thirst. Then he brought out his slender stock of provisions and partook
of supper.

"It's pleasant to rest after a long day's ride," soliloquized Miles. "I
must have made forty miles to-day. I could easily have gone farther, had
it been on the prairies at home, but these mountain-roads are hard upon
man and beast."

After supper Miles threw himself upon the ground, and his mind became
busy with his plans and prospects.

"I shall reach Frisco in three days, according to my calculations," he
reflected; "and then, first of all, I must attend to Tom's commission.
That's a good boy, Tom. I wish he were here with me to-night. Why didn't
I urge him to come with me? He is not doing very well where he is, and
there are plenty of chances for a smart boy in the city. If I find any
opening for him, I will send for him. I don't know what gives me such an
interest in that boy, but I'd sooner do him a good turn than any man I
know. I hope that thief Crane won't play any trick upon him. If he does,
I swear I'll get even with him."

John Miles little suspected that he himself stood in more peril from the
man he denounced than our hero. Had he known that Bill Crane was lurking
in the vicinity, he would scarcely have courted slumber so fearlessly.

Physical fatigue and the stillness of outward nature speedily brought
on a feeling of drowsiness that was not long in bringing sleep. Twilight
had hardly given place to night when our traveller had become "to dumb
forgetfulness a prey."

This was what Bill Crane had been waiting for. He rightly calculated
that Miles would soon be asleep. He inferred this from his own feelings.
He, too, had travelled many miles, and felt drowsy; but, with the object
he had in view near accomplishment, he was able to resist the promptings
of nature.

Crane rode till he was but a few rods from Miles, then dismounted and
tethered his horse. With stealthy step he approached the sleeper. With
satisfaction he regarded the upturned face of the man whom, if waking,
he would have feared, and noted his deep, regular breathing.

"You wouldn't sleep so sound, John Miles," he said to himself, "if you
knew I was standing over you. How easily I could put a bullet into you!
But then I wouldn't have the satisfaction of anticipating your
disappointment when you wake up and find your treasure gone! No, you
may live. I have no use for your life, that is, if you don't wake up. In
that case, I may have to kill you."

The bag of gold-dust lay under the head of Miles. He knew of no better
place for it, calculating that any attempt at removal would arouse him.
So it might under ordinary circumstances, but unusual fatigue made him
sleep like a log. Bill Crane kneeled down, and by delicate manipulation
succeeded in drawing the bag from beneath the sleeper's head. Lest the
removal of the pillow might awaken Miles, he replaced it by a coat,
which he folded up so as to produce about the same elevation above the
ground.

The transfer was made, without in the least interfering with the
slumbers of the tired traveller.

Bill Crane rose to his feet, triumphant. Not only was he possessed of a
sum of which he stood sorely in need, but he had the satisfaction of
outwitting his adversary. Moreover, he had obtained Tom's money in
addition, and thus revenged himself upon the boy who had once thwarted
him.

"Good-by, John Miles!" he said, lifting his hat mockingly. "Sorry to
inconvenience you, but can't help it. A long sleep, and pleasant
dreams!"

Thus speaking, he turned away, unconscious that he had been observed by
a third party.




CHAPTER VII.

THE HEATHEN CHINEE.


This third party belonged to that peculiar race immortalized by Bret
Harte. He was a heathen Chinee! His face was smooth and bland, and wore
an expression of childlike innocence which was well calculated to
deceive. Ah Sin possessed the usual craft of his countrymen, and
understood very well how to advance his worldly fortunes. He belonged to
the advance guard of immigrants from the Central Flowery Kingdom, and
with a companion, Ah Jim, was engaged in mining in the immediate
neighborhood. His gains had not been great thus far, but then his
expenses had amounted to little or nothing. He and his friend had
brought two bags of rice from San Francisco, and they were well
satisfied with this solitary article of diet.

Ah Sin, from a distance, had seen John Miles encamp for the night, and,
impelled by curiosity or a more questionable motive, had approached to
take a view of the stranger. Before reaching him he caught sight of Bill
Crane, and his almond eyes straightway watched the movements of that
gentleman, while he himself kept sufficiently in the background to
escape observation.

When he saw Crane stealthily remove the bag from under the sleeper's
head, he became very much interested, and a bland smile overspread his
face, while his cue vibrated gently with approval.

"'Melican man very smart," he murmured to himself. "He steal his
friend's money while he sleep."

My readers are probably aware that our Mongolian visitors find a
difficulty in pronouncing the letter _r_, and invariably replace it by
_l_.

"Suppose other 'Melican man wake up, he make a low," continued Ah Sin,
softly.

But the other 'Melican man did not wake up, and Bill Crane got away with
his booty, as we already know. Cautiously the Chinaman followed him,
and ascertained where he intended to pass the night. It was at a
moderate distance from the cabin which the two Chinamen had selected for
their mining camp.

Bill Crane jumped from his horse, stretched his limbs, and gaped.

"I'm powerful sleepy," he soliloquized. "I can't go any farther
to-night. I don't like to rest so near Miles, but I can be on the road
before he wakes up. I guess it will be safe enough."

Crane, having made up his mind to rest, rolled himself up in his
blanket, and stretched himself out, first tying his horse to a sapling.
The place was retired, and he felt moderately confident that, even if he
overslept himself, he would not be discovered.

"I'd like to see Miles when he discovers his loss," he said to himself,
smiling at the thought. "He'll be ready to tear his hair, and won't have
the least idea how the gold-dust was spirited away. You excel me in
brute strength, John Miles, but one thing I am pretty sure of, you
haven't got my brains," and he complacently tapped his forehead.

"There must be at least two hundred dollars' worth in that bag," he
reflected. "It isn't a great haul, but it will do. It will last me some
time, and perhaps start me in something in Frisco. Bill Crane, you've
done a good stroke of business to-day. You are entitled to a good
night's rest, and you shall have it."

First, however, he concealed the bag. He did not think it safe to place
it under his head as Miles had done. He scooped a hole in the earth near
by, deposited the bag, replaced the dirt, and spread a few leaves over
the top.

"No one will think of searching there," thought Crane. "Even if Miles
himself surprises me here, he won't suspect anything."

Bill Crane felt that he was unusually sharp and crafty, and felt great
contempt for the stupidity of the man whom he had overreached. The time
was not far off when he had occasion to doubt whether he had not
overrated his own artfulness.

A pair of almond eyes, lighted up with mild wonder, followed closely
all the movements of William Crane. When the bag was concealed, and
Crane lay down to sleep, the Chinaman nodded blandly, and remarked
softly, "All light! Me go find Ah Jim."

Ah Sin had to walk but half a mile to find the partner of his toils. Ah
Sin and Ah Jim, though not related to each other, were as like as two
peas. The same smooth face, the same air of childlike confidence, the
same almond eyes, a pigtail of the same length, a blouse and loose pants
of the same coarse cloth, were characteristic of both.

When the two met, they straightway plunged into a conversation in which
Ah Sin had most to say.

Ah Jim listened attentively, and was evidently well pleased with what
his companion said. I am afraid my young friends are not well up in the
Chinese tongue, and would not understand the conversation, however
faithfully reported. They must infer what it was from what followed.

The two Chinamen bent their steps towards the resting-place of Bill
Crane. Ah Sin carried a bag of about the same size as the one Crane had
stolen, which he carefully filled with sandy earth. With stealthy steps
these two innocent heathen drew near the spot, and looked searchingly at
the recumbent form of the eminent representative of American
civilization.

Ah Sin turned to Ah Jim with a pleased smile.

"All light!" he said. "'Melican man asleep."

A similar smile lighted up the face of Ah Jim. "'Melican man sleep
sound," he said; "no wake up."

Quite unaware of the honor done him by the special Chinese embassy which
had taken this early opportunity to call upon him, Bill Crane slept on.
There was a smile upon his upturned face as if he were dreaming of
something pleasant. He should have been a prey to remorse, if his
conscience had done its duty, but Bill's conscience had grown callous,
and gave him very little trouble. It was only when he was found out that
he became sensible of a kind of mental discomfort which came as near to
remorse as he was capable of feeling.

Reassured by the deep, regular breathing of the sleeper, Ah Sin and his
friend proceeded to their work. The former drew a slender stiletto-like
knife from a fan which protruded above the collar of his blouse, and,
stooping down, began skilfully to remove the dirt which covered the bag
of gold-dust. From time to time he stole a glance at the sleeper to mark
the first indications of returning consciousness. It was well for Crane
that his sleep continued. A Chinaman does not set a high value upon
human life, and the long stiletto would have been plunged into the
'Melican man before he was well aware of what was going on. Bill Crane's
good genius saved him from this sudden exit by continuing the profound
slumber in which he was repairing the ravages of fatigue.

The Chinamen therefore met with no interruption in their work. They drew
out from its place of concealment the buried bag, and emptying the
contents of their own poured into it the combined treasures of Miles and
poor Tom. Then they filled the first bag with the worthless dust which
they had brought with them, and carefully reburied it in the ground.

They did their work so carefully and well that no one was likely to
suspect that the bag had been tampered with.

Having done their work, Ah Sin and his friend smiled upon each other in
bland satisfaction, which was further expressed by a low guttural
chuckle.

"All light," said Ah Sin, with a nod.

"All light," chimed in Ah Jim, nodding in return.

A consciousness of lofty virtue could not have produced a happier
expression upon any face than appeared on the mild countenance of the
Chinamen.

"'Melican man much supplised when he wake up," remarked Ah Jim.

"Chinamen make much money," returned his friend.

The two enterprising visitors returned to their quarters, and concealed
their booty in a safe place. Then they too lay down and slept the sleep
of confiding innocence.

Bret Harte has not told us whether the heathen Chinee has a conscience;
but if he has, neither Ah Sin nor Ah Jim experienced any inconvenience
from its possession. Neither they nor Bill perhaps can fairly be taken
as fair representatives of the different religious systems under which
they were trained. Bill Crane could hardly claim any superiority over
the heathen Chinee in point of honesty.




CHAPTER VIII.

BILL CRANE'S DISAGREEABLE DISCOVERY.


It was five o'clock in the morning when Bill Crane opened his eyes. He
felt refreshed by his night's sleep, yet under ordinary circumstances
would have deferred getting up for at least an hour. But the
consciousness that he had a treasure to guard, and the knowledge that he
was at any moment liable to be called to account by the real owner,
whose camp was scarcely more than a mile distant, aroused him to
exertion.

"I must get away while John Miles is still asleep," he bethought
himself. "Let me get to Frisco first, and I can at once dispose of it,
and he will never find me out."

Crane did not wait to prepare breakfast. That he could take on the road
an hour or two later, when he felt safe from interruption. He rose and
shook himself. This was his scanty toilet. Next he must take the bag
from its place of concealment, and then he could commence his journey.

While uncovering the bag, Crane did not discover that it had been
tampered with, partly because it was still there. It was natural to
suppose that, if discovered by a third party, it would be carried away.
He did not even open the bag, not thinking it necessary.

"John Miles hasn't waked up yet," he said to himself with a smile. "When
he does, there'll be some swearing, I'll be bound. You're a good boy,
John Miles, but you ain't so smart as you think you are. I think I have
got the start of you this time."

Bill Crane rode off smiling.

His course led him by the camp of the Chinamen. Early as it was they
were astir. Ah Sin saw the rider, and at once recognized him as the man
he had robbed. How could Crane know that those pleasant-faced barbarians
had served him such a trick?

"Hallo, Chinamen!" he said aloud. "Have they got out here already? I'll
speak to them. Hallo, John!" he said, halting his horse, for even then
every Chinaman was John.

"How do, John?" replied Ah Sin, smiling blandly.

"My name isn't John, but no matter. What are you two doing?"

"Looking for gold," was the reply.

"Do you find any?"

"Velly little. Bad place."

"Have you been in San Francisco?"

"Yes, John."

"Why didn't you stay there?"

"Too many Chinamen--too little washee,--washee."

"What have you got in the way of provisions? Mine are stale. I'd like to
buy some of you."

"We have got a little lice, John."

"Got a little what? Oh, I know: you mean rice. Why don't you pronounce
your English better?"

"Because Chinamen not 'Melican men."

"Then I suppose I may as well be moving on, as I can't get anything out
of you. Oh, have you got any tea, John?"

"Yes, John."

"Got any made?"

Ah Sin produced a cup, for he and his friend had just prepared their
breakfast, and being warm, Bill Crane gulped it down with a relish.

"After all, a man needs some warm drink in the morning," he said to
himself. "How much to pay, John?"

"Nothing, John. 'Melican man welcome."

"John, you're a gentleman, or rather both of you are gentlemen, even if
you are heathens. I'll remember you in my prayers."

The eminent Christian, Bill Crane, rode off from the Chinese camp,
calmly confident of his moral superiority to the two benighted heathen
whom he left behind him. Whether he remembered his promise to intercede
for them in prayer is a little doubtful, or would have been, if he had
had occasion to pray himself. It is to be feared that prayer and William
Crane had long been strangers.

As Crane rode away, the two Chinamen exchanged glances. A gentle smile
lighted up their yellow faces, and they were doubtless thinking of
something pleasant. They exchanged a few guttural remarks which I should
like to be able to translate, for they doubtless referred to Bill Crane,
whom they had kindly supplied with a cup of tea gratis. Yet, perhaps,
considering all things, it was the dearest cup of tea Crane had ever
drank, since it was the only return he got for a bag of gold-dust worth
over two hundred dollars. But there is an old saying, "Where ignorance
is bliss, 'tis folly to be wise." Crane was just as happy as if the bag
really contained gold-dust. But this happy ignorance was not to last
long.

After riding five or six miles our traveller thought he might venture to
dismount for rest and refreshment. He selected as his breakfast-table
the green sward beside a sparkling mountain streamlet. He dismounted,
permitting his horse to graze while he took out the stale provisions
which must constitute his morning meal. They were not very palatable,
and Crane sighed for the breakfasts of old, the memory of which at this
moment was very tantalizing. But he comforted himself with the thought
that he had the means of making up for his enforced self-denial when he
reached San Francisco.

This naturally led him to open the bag, and feast his eyes over his
easily obtained wealth. He untied the string, and with a smile of
pleased anticipation peered at the contents.

His face changed suddenly.

Was he dreaming? In place of the shining dust, his eyes rested on--sand.

He hastily thrust in his finger, and stirred the grains. But nothing
else was to be discovered. The bag contained nothing but worthless sand.

Crane stared at the deceptive bag in the most lugubrious astonishment.
Surely the bag contained gold-dust when he concealed it. There could be
no doubt on that point, for he had opened it and seen the contents for
himself. But in that case, how could such a change have been effected in
one night? It had not been touched; so, at any rate, he believed. He had
found it in the morning in the exact spot where he had placed it
overnight, and yet--

Bill Crane took another look at the contents of the bag, hoping that he
had been deceived by some ocular delusion, but the second examination
brought him no comfort. He sank back, feeling in a state of mental and
bodily collapse.

Never was poor thief so utterly bewildered as Bill Crane. He could
almost believe that some magical transformation had been practiced at
his expense. Was it possible, he thought, that John Miles, discovering
his loss, had visited him, and played this trick upon him? He could not
believe this. It was not in accordance with John's direct,
straightforward nature. Instead of acting in this secret manner, he
would have sternly charged Crane with the robbery, and punished him on
the spot. Leaving him out of the account, then, the mystery deepened. It
never occurred to Crane to suspect the Chinamen who had so hospitably
furnished him with a cup of tea. Even if they had come into his mind, he
would have been puzzled to account for their knowledge of his having the
bag in his possession.

Bill Crane was decidedly unhappy. His glowing anticipations of
prosperity, based upon the capital contained in the bag, were rudely
broken in upon, and the airy fabric of his hopes dashed to the ground.
He felt that fortune had been unkind--that he was a deeply injured man.
Had his claim to the stolen property been the best possible, he could
not have felt the injustice of fate more keenly.

"It's always the way!" he exclaimed in deep dejection. "I always was
unlucky. Just as I thought I was on my feet again, this cursed gold-dust
turns to sand. Here am I out in the wilderness without an ounce to my
name. I don't know what to do. I'd give a good deal, if I had it, to
find out what became of the gold-dust."

As he spoke, Crane, in a fit of ill-temper, kicked the unlucky bag to a
distance, and slowly and disconsolately mounting his horse, plodded on
his way. All his cheerfulness was gone. It was some comfort, but still
scant, to think that John Miles was as unlucky as himself. Both had
become penniless tramps, and were alike the sport of Fortune. There was
a difference in respect to their desert, however. John Miles may
rightly claim the reader's sympathy, while Bill Crane must be considered
to have met with a disaster which he richly deserved.




CHAPTER IX.

CLEANED OUT.


John Miles slept long, and awoke feeling refreshed and cheerful. He had
a healthy organization, and never failed to eat and sleep well. Like
Crane, he had no toilet to make, but sprang to his feet already dressed.

His first thought was naturally of his treasure. His heart gave a quick
bound when he failed to discover it in the place where he remembered to
have put it. In dismay he instituted a search, which, of course, proved
unavailing.

"Who could have taken it?" thought Miles, large drops of perspiration
gathering upon his forehead.

All about him was loneliness. He could see no signs of life. Yet the bag
could not have gone away of itself. There was certainly human agency in
the matter.

Miles confessed to himself with sadness that he had been imprudent to
leave the bag where it would naturally excite the cupidity of any
passing adventurer. That it must have been taken by such a one seemed
evident. In that case, the chance of recovering it seemed slender
enough. Nevertheless, John Miles decided to make an effort, hopeless as
it was, to discover the whereabouts of his lost property.

"If it had been mine, I wouldn't have cared so much," he said to
himself, with a sigh; "but poor Tom's money is gone too. I will make it
up to him if I live, but I am afraid his father will be inconvenienced
by the delay."

Miles made preparations for his departure, and strode away, looking
searchingly to the right and left in search of something that might
throw light upon his loss. Presently he espied the two Chinamen. Could
they have taken it? He would at any rate speak to them.

"Good-morning, John," he said, when he came within hearing distance.

Ah Sin bobbed his head, and repeated "Good-morning, John."

"Do you live here?"

"Yes, we washee-washee for gold."

"Does anyone else live near by?"

The two inclined their heads, and answered in the negative.

"Have you seen anyone pass last night or this morning?"

"Yes," answered Ah Sin. "'Melican man stay all nightee--over there.
Chinaman give him a cup of tea this morning."

"How long ago?" asked Miles, eagerly.

"Two hours," answered Ah Jim.

"In what direction did he go?"

The two Chinamen readily told him.

Miles decided to tell them of the loss of his bag of gold-dust. Possibly
they could throw some light upon his loss.

"Some one stole a small bag of dust from me last night," he said. "I
suspect it was the man you describe. Did he appear to have any such
article with him?"

"Yes," answered Ah Sin, who, with natural cunning, saw that this
information would divert suspicion from them. "It was so large,"
indicating the size with his hands.

Of course his description was accurate, for he had very good reason to
know the size of the bag.

"He must have been the thief," said Miles, eagerly. "In what direction
did you say he went?"

Ah Sin pointed to the west.

"I will follow him. It is on my way. If I catch the villain, it will be
the worse for him."

"He velly bad man," said Ah Sin, sympathizingly.

"That's where you are right, my heathen friend. Well, good-morning,
John. I am much obliged to you for your information."

"Velly welcome, John."

As John Miles rode away, Ah Sin turned to his friend Ah Jim, and
remarked,--

"S'pose he catch him, he kill him."

"All lightee!" returned Ah Jim. "He velly bad man, he thief."

The two Chinamen exchanged glances. If they had been white men, there
would have been a smile or a wink, but these children of Confucius
looked so serenely virtuous, so innocent of guile, that the most
experienced detective would have seen nothing in their faces indicating
any guilty knowledge of the lost treasure. But, guileless as they
seemed, they had proved more than a match for Bill Crane and his victim.

       *       *       *       *       *

John Miles rode away with a faint hope that he might overtake the man,
whoever he might be, who had stolen his precious bag. In due time he
reached the spot where Crane had examined the bag, and on discovering
its worthless contents, had thrown it away. The thief had not taken the
trouble to empty it.

When Miles saw it he hurried to it, hoping he might find some of the
treasure inside. Of course he was disappointed, and at the same time
bewildered.

"This is certainly my bag," he said to himself. "Here are my initials,
J. M. Then there are other marks well known to me. I could swear to it
anywhere. But how does it happen that it is full of sand, and why has
the thief thrown it away? That beats me!"

Miles decided that for some reason unknown the thief had transferred its
contents to some other bag--perhaps his own--and then had discarded the
original one, in wanton humor filling it instead with sand.

"He may have been afraid it would be found on him," thought Miles. "The
marks on the bag would have been evidence enough to condemn him. By
throwing away my bag he thinks himself safe."

His solution of the puzzle was ingenious, but as we know he erred in two
respects. Bill Crane had not filled the bag with sand and thrown it away
from prudential considerations, nor had he profited by the theft he had
committed. He had been as badly outwitted as his victim, and the profit
had gone to the bland and obliging Chinamen, who had thus far escaped
suspicion.

John Miles slackened his rein, and thought seriously and sadly of the
position to which he was reduced. What was he to do? He was, in the
expressive language of the country, "cleaned out," and brought to a pass
where he must begin life over again, with the disadvantage of being
seventy-five dollars in debt, for he was resolved that Tom's loss should
be paid back to the uttermost penny.

Presently philosophy came to his aid.

"It might have been worse," he reflected. "Two hundred dollars is too
large a sum to lose, but it wont take long to make up if I have any sort
of luck. I wish I were in San Francisco. It may trouble me to get there
without means."

When misfortune comes it is always best to look it manfully in the face,
and not to shrink from or over estimate it. John Miles had a strong,
healthy nature, with a good deal of confidence in his own resources, and
in an hour or two he was again looking hopefully forward to the future.
Not that he cherished a hope of recovering his lost money. There seemed
to be no way of identifying it, even if he should track the thief. One
ounce of gold-dust looks like another, and there is no way of
distinguishing individual property in that form.

John Miles pushed on slowly. About noon he found himself threading a
narrow cañon, shaded by gigantic redwood tress, with steep, almost
perpendicular sides, with here and there a narrow streamlet descending
in a cascade, and lighting up the darkened scene with its silvery
reflections.

"This is a pretty spot, but it would be lonely to live here," thought
Miles. "Yet," shading his eyes, "there seems to be a cabin of some sort.
Is it possible that anybody lives in this cañon?"

Ten minutes' ride brought him to a rude cabin, with a gigantic tree
spreading at a great height protecting branches over it. That it was
inhabited was clear, for in front of it stood a strongly built, robust
woman, who seemed to be nearing forty.

She bent a searching look upon the intruder, who bent his head
courteously.

"Good-morning, ma'am," said Miles.

"Good-morning, stranger," was the reply. "Where might you be going?"

"I am on my way to the city. Am I on the right track?"

"I reckon so."

"Do you live here--alone?" asked John Miles, in some curiosity.

"It looks like it, doesn't it?" returned the woman. "I've been alone
since my man pegged out."

"Is that long?"

"A matter of three weeks."

"I sympathize with you," said Miles. "You must be very lonely."

"Yes," said the widow. "Jim was good company, and I feel kind of
lonesome without him, you better believe."

"There isn't much sentiment there," thought Miles. "She doesn't appear
to be heart-broken. Do you mean to stay here alone?" he inquired. "Are
you not afraid?"

"What's there to be afraid of?"

"Some tramp or adventurer might attack and injure, or at least rob you."

"Look here, stranger! do you see that?" and the woman produced a
revolver. "Do you see that shooting-iron?"

"It looks as if it might be a good one," said Miles, who began to think
the woman better able to take care of herself than he had at first
supposed.

"You bet it is! I know how to use it, too. If one of them tramps gets in
front of it, and sasses me, he'd better say his prayers mighty quick,
for he'll need 'em. He needn't reckon much on my being a woman. I can
shoot jest as true as my man could when he was alive."




CHAPTER X.

A CALIFORNIA WIDOW.


John Miles eyed the woman curiously. There did not seem much that was
feminine left in her. Life in the wilderness had made her as bold and
self-reliant as a man. She was not compelled to plead for woman's
rights. She resolutely took a man's rights, and was prepared to
maintain them against all comers.

"I rather think you can take care of yourself, ma'am," he said.

"You can bet your bottom dollar on that, stranger," said the woman,
cheerfully. "Brown--that's my husband--knew what I was. We was ekal
partners--Brown and me--and he knew too much to tread on me."

"I'm glad I wasn't Brown," thought John Miles. "When I marry, it'll be a
woman, and not a man in petticoats."

"If you're hungry, stranger," said the woman, "just jump off that horse
of yours, and come in. I can give you a square meal, and I reckon you
haven't had one lately."

"You are right, Mrs. Brown," said Miles, dismounting with alacrity. "My
provisions are dry and stale, and I shall enjoy a square meal amazingly.
But I ought to tell you that last night I was robbed of a bag of
gold-dust, and I have nothing to pay you."

"Who asks for pay?" returned the woman. "I don't keep a hotel, but I'm
tired of eating alone. I want to see how it seems to have a man setting
opposite me agin. So come in, and I won't keep you waiting long."

"Thank you, Mrs. Brown. If you don't mind, I'll light my pipe, and sit
out here till I've had a smoke."

"You can smoke inside if you want to. I always let Brown. It makes me
feel better, now that he's pegged out, that I didn't deny him any of his
little comforts."

"Clearly Mrs. Brown was a considerate wife," thought Miles; "but she
doesn't look like a woman to fall in love with."

Tying his horse, he threw himself down on the grass, and enjoyed the
luxury of a smoke while Mrs. Brown was heard bustling about inside,
preparing the square meal which she had promised to her unexpected
guest.

Presently she reappeared.

"The victuals is ready, if you are, stranger," she said.

"I am ready, Mrs. Brown," said Miles, rising at once, and entering the
cabin.

The cabin was rough, and ill-adapted to a fastidious tenant, but it
looked comfortable. What attracted Miles most, however, was a table set
in the middle of the floor, covered with a substantial and appetizing
meal. Mrs. Brown was a fair cook--perhaps her only feminine
accomplishment. She placed Miles at the head of the table, and seated
herself opposite him. She watched his attacks upon the fare she had
provided with evident satisfaction.

"I hope you like it," she said.

"Mrs. Brown, I haven't tasted anything so good for a long time."

She nodded, with a pleased look.

"Brown allus liked my cookin," she said. "He had a good appetite most
generally, and it was a pleasure to see him eat. It's kinder lonesome
cookin' for yourself. Then, too, it takes away my appetite sittin' down
alone to eat."

"You must be very lonely, Mrs. Brown."

"Yes, its lonesome like bein' a widder. I'm kinder used to seein' a man
about the house."

"So I suppose."

"Be you a married man?" asked the lady, pointedly.

"No, ma'am."

"How old be you?"

"Twenty-eight," answered Miles, rather amused.

"Then you're old enough to get married?"

"Oh yes, I am old enough."

"Be you in love with any girl?"

"The old woman's getting curious," thought Miles. "However, I don't mind
gratifying her curiosity."

"No, I'm not in love," he replied.

Mrs. Brown eyed him thoughtfully. She seemed to be revolving some plan
in her mind.

"Take a good look at me, stranger," she said, bracing herself up, as if
on exhibition.

"Certainly," said John Miles, considerably astonished.

"I want to ask you a few questions."

"Go ahead, Mrs. Brown."

"Am I hump-backed?"

"Certainly not. Who said you were?"

"Just attend to my questions, if you please, stranger. Am I
squint-eyed?"

"Mrs. Brown must be crazy," thought Miles. However, he answered in the
negative.

"Am I as homely as a hedge-fence?" pursued the widow.

"Has anybody been calling you so? If so, tell me who it is."

"Never you mind, stranger. Am I old and wrinkled?"

"Certainly she's out of her mind," thought Miles. "I must humor her."

"I think you are a very good-looking woman," he said, soothingly.

"No, I'm not," said the strong-minded lady, "but at the same time I
ain't a scarecrow."

"Certainly not."

"Don't talk too much, stranger. I expect you're surprised at my
questions, but I'll come to the p'int at once. I'm tired of livin' here
alone. I didn't think I'd miss Brown so much. He wasn't any great shakes
of a man, but he was better than nothing. He was company for me, Brown
was, in the long evenin's, and I miss him. I've made up my mind to take
on somebody in his place, and I reckon I'd like to engage you, stranger.
Will you marry me?"

Mrs. Brown did not blush when she asked this extraordinary question. She
was entirely self-possessed, and could not have been cooler, if she had
been transacting an ordinary piece of business.

John Miles had never before received a proposal of marriage. He felt as
awkward and confused as a young girl, and began to hesitate and
stammer.

"Really, Mrs. Brown," he began, "you have taken me by surprise."

"I expect I have," said the widow, "but I'll give you time to think it
over. Brown left me I pretty comfortable, though I did more to get the
property together than he. You wouldn't think it, perhaps, but I've got
five thousand dollars in gold hid away somewheres near, and there's a
claim not far away, that belongs to me, and will pay for workin'."

"I am glad you are so well off, Mrs. Brown," said Miles.

"If you marry me," continued the widow, "you can work that claim. You're
a strong, able-bodied man, and a year from now, if you want to, we'll go
to the city, and settle down. I'm older than you; but a matter of a few
years don't make much difference. You were robbed, you told me?"

"Yes, of all that I had."

"How much was it?"

"About two hundred dollars."

"That ain't much."

"It's a good deal when it's all you have," answered Miles.

"If you marry me you won't miss it," said Mrs. Brown. "I won't give you
my money right off, for you might run off with it, but at the end of the
first year you shall have half of it. There's a parson a few miles up
the cañon, at Dirt Hole, that will marry us any time we ride over. What
do you say, stranger?"

It was an embarrassing moment for John Miles. He had no desire to
succeed the deceased Brown, notwithstanding the little property he had
left behind him. Mrs. Brown did not in the least resemble the wife of
whom he had sometimes dreamed. But how could he decline without exciting
the resentment of that singular female? He bore in mind that Mrs. Brown
carried a revolver, and she might take a notion to shoot him down. He
must temporize.

"Your proposal is a very kind and flattering one, Mrs. Brown, but I
don't care to marry just at present. I want to go to the city and try
my fortune. I've only lately arrived in California, and I am not ready
to settle down yet."

To his relief Mrs. Brown accepted his objection in good part.

"No offence, stranger," she said. "I didn't know how you might feel
about it. I've made you a fair offer."

"Indeed you have. The time may come when I shall return, and--"

"I won't promise to wait for you, stranger. Somebody else may happen
along that'll take the situation."

"It would be too much to expect you to wait for me, I admit."

"All right, stranger. You've answered fair, and now we'll let the matter
drop."

When Miles left the cabin he carried with him an addition to his stock
of provisions, for which he was indebted to Mrs. Brown's liberality. It
was evident that she bore no malice, notwithstanding her suit had been
rejected.




CHAPTER XI.

BILL CRANE'S GOOD LUCK.


About an hour after John Miles rode away from the widow's door Mr.
William Crane came in sight of the cabin. He had strayed from the direct
course, and that had delayed him. Otherwise he would not have fallen
behind Miles.

Bill Crane was in rather a melancholy mood. He had not got over his
disappointment of the morning. He was fagged out and hungry, and felt
that luck was against him. When he saw the cabin, and the widow Brown
sitting in the door-way, it instantly occurred to him that here was a
chance to get a dinner. He had nothing to pay, to be sure, but he need
say nothing about it till after the dinner was eaten.

As he rode up, he removed his hat, and said, "Good-day, ma'am."

Mrs. Brown scrutinized the new-comer with critical eyes. She decided
that he was not as good-looking as John Miles. Indeed Bill Crane never
could have been accounted handsome; but on this point the widow was not
exacting. She was looking for somebody to fill the place of her lamented
Brown, and relieve her loneliness, and it was Crane's eligibility in
this respect that she was considering. Beauty was but skin deep, as Mrs.
Brown was practical enough to admit, and she was not overstocked with
that attractive quality herself. Though Crane did not know it, the
resolute, middle-aged female, from whom he hoped to obtain a gratuitous
dinner, was making up her mind to offer him the position of husband.

"Good-day, stranger," she answered composedly. "Are you travelin' fur?"

"I'm thinkin' of goin' to Frisco," he said, "but it's a long journey and
I'm fagged out. If you have no objection, I'll stop at your place and
see if I can rest a few minutes."

"You can stop if you want to," she said. "I don't see much company, and
I like to see a new face now and then."

"So do I," said Crane, thinking a little flattery might help him;
"especially when it's the face of a good-looking woman."

"I ain't good-lookin' enough to hurt me," returned Mrs. Brown, with a
frankness which rather disconcerted and puzzled Crane, "but I don't mind
you callin' me so. If you are anyways hungry, I haven't cleared away the
dinner, and--"

"You are very kind," broke in Crane, eagerly; "I don't mind saying I am
a little bit hungry."

"All right, stranger. If you'll wait long enough for me to make some hot
tea, and warm the victuals, you shall have a chance to judge of my
cookin'."

Bill Crane was quite elated. He decided that the widow would not ask him
for payment, thus saving him from embarrassing excuses. In due time he
was called in and seated in the chair not long since occupied by John
Miles.

"You're the second man that's dined with me to-day," said the widow.

"And who was the first lucky man?" inquired Crane, suspecting at once
that it might have been Miles.

"I don't know his name, but he was a good-looking young man, who said he
had had a bag of gold-dust stolen from him."

"That's Miles," thought Crane; and he at once decided not to betray any
knowledge of him.

"He was in bad luck," said Bill. "Did he know who stole it?"

"He didn't tell me. I don't think he knew."

"That's well," thought Crane.

"Did he say where he was going?"

"To the city."

"Do you live here all the year round, Mrs.----?"

"My name's Brown, stranger."

"All I can say is, that Brown is a lucky man. Another cup of tea if you
please, Mrs. Brown."

"You might not like to exchange places with him, for all his luck,
stranger," remarked the widow.

"Indeed I would," said Bill, with a languishing look.

"He's six feet under ground!" explained Mrs. Brown, dryly.

"Dead?" ejaculated Crane.

"Yes; he's been dead these three weeks."

"And you are a widow?"

"That's so, stranger."

"But you don't mean to stay a widow?" interrogated Crane.

"Well, it is kinder lonesome. It seems natural like to have a man
round."

"I wonder if she's got any money," thought Crane. "I'll find out if I
can."

"Yes, Mrs. Brown, I feel for you," he said. "A woman can't struggle with
the world as a man can."

"I don't know about that, stranger. I can take care of myself, if that's
what you mean."

"But a woman needs a man to protect and work for her," insinuated
Crane.

"I don't need any one to protect me," said the widow; "and, as for
support, I've got a matter of five thousand dollars laid by, and a good
claim that'll pay for the workin'. I don't think I shall need to go to
the poor-house yet awhile."

Bill Crane's eyes sparkled. The widow Brown seemed wonderfully
attractive in his eyes. He was willing to barter his young affections
for five thousand dollars and a claim, even if the widow had been thrice
as homely as she was. If he had known that Mrs. Brown was bent on
marriage his way would have been clearer. His mind was made up. He would
woo and win his fair hostess if he could.

"When did Brown die?" he inquired.

"Three weeks ago, stranger."

"You must miss him."

"Yes, he was a quiet man, Brown was. He never gave me any trouble, and
it was natural to see him round."

"You must not mourn for him too much, Mrs. Brown."

"I shan't make a fool of myself," said the widow. "He's gone, and he
won't come back. There's no use cryin'."

"She's rather a queer specimen," thought Crane. "She hasn't broken her
heart, it seems."

"You ought to marry again," he said.

"I mean to," said Mrs. Brown.

"Well, that's frank," thought Crane. "There ain't any nonsense about
her."

"Your second husband will be a lucky man, Mrs. Brown."

"Well, he'll have a good livin', and, if he treats me right, he'll get
treated right too."

"This is a cold world, Mrs. Brown. I've been drifting about till I'm
tired. I'd like to settle down with a good wife."

"If you want to take Brown's place, say so," remarked the widow, in a
business-like tone.

Bill Crane was staggered by the promptness with which his hint was
taken, but did not hesitate to follow it up.

"That's what I mean," he said.

"What's your name, stranger?"

"William Crane."

"You haven't got another wife anywhere, have you?"

"Of course not."

"I've got to take your word for it, I s'pose. I guess I'll take the
risk. I'll marry you if you say so."

"How soon?" asked Crane, eagerly.

"Well, there's a parson a few miles from here. We can ride right over
and be back by sundown, if that will suit you."

"A capital idea, Mrs. Brown. You won't be Brown long," he added,
sportively. "How will you like to be called Mrs. Crane?"

"One name will do as well as another," said the widow, philosophically.

Crane wanted to make inquiries about the five thousand dollars and the
claim; but he reflected that it might be inferred that his views were
mercenary. It would be more politic to wait till after marriage. He did
not understand the character of the woman he was going to marry. She
understood very well that Crane was marrying her for her money; but she
felt lonesome, and it suited her to have a husband, and she was willing
to overlook such a trifle.

The widow had a horse of her own. Directly after dinner it was
harnessed, and the two rode over to Dirt Hole, a small mining
settlement, where the Rev. Pelatiah Pond, a Methodist minister, united
them in the bonds of matrimony.

When Mr. and Mrs. Crane reached home, Bill ventured to inquire, "Have
you got the money in the house, Mrs. Crane,--the five thousand dollars,
I mean?"

"It's put away in a safe place."

"You'd better let me take care of it for you, my dear."

"Not at present, Mr. Crane. A year from now I will let you have half of
it, if you behave yourself."

"As your husband, madam, I insist."

"Stop right there, stranger--Mr. Crane, I mean," said the bride,
decidedly. "Do you see that? and she whipped out a revolver.

"Good gracious, Mrs. Crane! Do you want to murder me?"

"No, I didn't marry you for that; but I want you to understand that the
money is in my hands, and I don't allow any man to insist. I may let you
have some of it when I get ready. Do you understand?"

"I believe I do," murmured Crane. "I'm regularly taken in and done for,"
he reflected sadly.

But directly after their return Mrs. Crane prepared a nice supper, and
Crane, as he ate it, and smoked a pipe later, began to be reconciled to
his new situation.




CHAPTER XII.

TOM RECEIVES NEWS FROM HOME.


Meanwhile Tom, happily unconscious that the money entrusted to John
Miles had been lost, continued to work diligently at his claim. His
success varied from day to day; but, on the whole, he was gaining. He
spent nothing except for absolute necessities, and in spite of all
temptations he gave a wide berth to Missouri Jack's saloon. In this way
he gained the ill-will of the saloon-keeper, who felt a certain portion
of every miner's gains ought to find its way into his till.

One evening Tom met the saloon-keeper when out walking. The latter had
not at that time given up securing Tom's patronage.

"Good-evening, young feller," said Jack.

Tom answered the greeting politely.

"Why don't you come round to the saloon evenings? We always have a jolly
crowd there. After a hard day's work it'll do you good to take a social
glass."

"I would rather not drink, thank you," said Tom.

"You ain't afraid of a little drink, I hope, are you?"

"Yes, I would rather let it alone."

"Oh, you're too good to live," said Jack, in deep disgust.

"I hope not," answered Tom, smiling; "for I hope to live a good many
years."

That was the last attempt Missouri Jack made to secure Tom as a patron.
Our hero spoke in so decided a tone that he understood the uselessness
of the attempt.

Two months passed, and Tom heard nothing from John Miles. He was not
surprised or disquieted, for he knew that mails to the interior were
very irregular, and, besides, Miles might not be fond of letter-writing.
He took it for granted that the seventy-five dollars had been forwarded
home, and were now in his father's hands. He had saved as much more, and
would like to have sent that too, for its possession gave him anxiety;
but there seemed to be no opportunity.

About this time he received two letters. The first was from John Miles,
written from San Francisco. After acquainting Tom with his loss of the
bag of gold-dust, he proceeded:--

"I should not have cared so much, Tom, had the loss been mine only; but
it was hard to think that I had lost your money too, and was unable to
pay it back. I know, from what you said, that your father needed the
money, and that the delay would put him to a good deal of inconvenience.
You shall have it all back, Tom, every cent; but you will have to wait
awhile. On reaching Frisco I got work, and soon saved up enough to pay
the debt, when, as bad luck would have it, I fell sick, and before I got
well all my money had been used up. Now I am well again, and at work,
and if I have good luck will be able soon to send on the money to your
father. I know you will understand the circumstances, and will excuse
the delay.

"The very day I discovered my loss I had a chance to marry a fortune.
You will stare at that, and wonder how it happened. At a lonely cabin I
made the acquaintance of a widow, who was looking out for a second
husband. She was left with a comfortable property, which, with her hand,
she was willing to bestow upon your friend; but she didn't tempt me
much. I believe her fortune amounted to five thousand dollars and a
claim. It would be a good chance for you, if you were old enough, Tom.

"I don't know when this letter will reach you, for the country mails--at
least to such out-of-the-way places as River Bend--go quite irregularly.
However, I hope you will get it after a while, and won't be too much
troubled about the money; if I live it shall be repaid."

Tom showed this letter to Ferguson.

"It's a pity, my lad, that the money was stolen," said the Scotchman;
"but you'll get it again. John Miles is an honest man."

"I am sure of that, Mr. Ferguson. I don't know that I ought to make him
pay it back, though. It isn't his fault that it was lost."

"That's true, my lad, and you might offer to share the loss with him,
but I doubt if he would accept your offer. He will feel better to pay it
all back."

"At any rate I will write him, and make him the offer."

"That's fair, Tom; but you'll see what he'll say."

It may be stated here that Miles utterly declined to accept any
abatement of the debt.

"I ought to have taken better care of the money," he said. "It's my
fault, and I shall pay it in full."

The next letter was from home. Tom opened and read it eagerly. It was
mainly from his father, but there was a note from each member of the
family.

His father wrote:--

     MY DEAR TOM,--We are glad to hear that you have reached
     California after a wearisome journey, and are now at work. We
     have travelled so little that we can hardly realize that you are
     more than three thousand miles away from us, with so many
     mountains, plains, and valleys between. Of course you cannot tell
     us much in your letters of your various experiences. I wish we
     could have you with us this evening, and hear some of them from
     your own lips.

     I am anxious to hear that you are succeeding in the object of
     your journey, and that you will not find the stories of the rich
     gold fields greatly exaggerated. I do not myself believe all I
     hear, yet I think there must be gold enough to pay those who
     search for it diligently. You must remember, my dear boy, that
     hard work is better than luck, and more to be relied upon. Don't
     expect to make your fortune all at once by finding a big nugget,
     but work steadily, and you will meet with more or less success.

     If you succeed moderately, I shall be glad you went away, for
     here prospects are not very good. Our little farm seems to be
     less productive every year. The soil is not very good, as you
     know, and I cannot afford fertilizers. This year the crops were
     not as good as usual, and we have felt the decrease sensibly. If
     there were not a mortgage on the farm, I could get along very
     well, but the interest now amounts to one hundred and thirty-two
     dollars annually, and it is hard to get that amount together.
     Next month sixty-six dollars come due, and I don't know how I am
     to find the money. Squire Hudson could afford to wait; but I am
     afraid he won't. The older and richer he gets, the more grasping
     he becomes, I sometimes think. However, I don't want to borrow
     trouble. If it is absolutely necessary I can sell off one of the
     cows to raise the money, and before the year comes round I think
     you will be able to help me.

     Walter, though only twelve years old,--his thirteenth birthday
     comes next month,--helps me about the farm, and is very useful in
     doing chores. He likes farm-work, and will be ready to succeed me
     in time. As for Sarah, she is a good, sensible girl, and helps
     her mother in a good many ways. Though I am a poor man, and
     always expect to remain so, I feel that I am blessed in having
     good, industrious children, who promise to grow up and do me
     credit. I should not be willing to exchange one of my boys for
     Squire Hudson's son Sinclair. He is, to my mind, a very
     disagreeable boy, who makes himself ridiculous by the airs he
     puts on. I have seen him once or twice lately when he appeared to
     have been drinking; but I hope I am mistaken in this. He is an
     only son, and it would be a pity that he should go astray.

Tom looked thoughtful after reading this letter.

"Is it bad news, Tom, lad?" asked Ferguson.

"Times are hard at home, Mr. Ferguson," answered Tom. "Father is very
much in need of money. It would have been a great help to him if he had
received that seventy-five dollars."

"You have as much as that on hand now, Tom. If it isn't enough, I will
lend you some."

"Thank you, Mr. Ferguson. You are a good friend, and I wouldn't mind
accepting your offer, if I needed it. But father won't need any more
than I can send him. Only I don't know how to get it to him."

"If you were in San Francisco, you would have no difficulty in sending
the money."

"No."

"I've been thinking, Tom," said Ferguson, after a while, "that it might
be a good plan for us to take a little vacation, and visit the city. We
have been working steadily here over three months, and the change would
do us good. Besides, we might on the way come across some better place.
This isn't as good now as when we began to work it."

"That is true," said Tom.

"Suppose, then, we stay a week longer, sell out our claim if we can,
and start in the direction of the city."

"You and I?"

"Yes; we shall be better off without company."

"We had better not let Peabody know we are going, or he will want to
accompany us."

"I could almost be willing to take him, poor creature, to get him away
from that Missouri Jack; but, as you say, he would not be a help to us."

So it was decided that, in a few days, as soon as they were ready, Tom
and Ferguson should leave River Bend.




CHAPTER XIII.

A SPECULATIVE INVESTMENT.


It leaked out after a while that Tom and Ferguson were intending to
leave River Bend, and considerable regret was expressed by the other
members of the party. Tom was a general favorite. His youth and his
obliging disposition made him liked by all except Missouri Jack and his
set. It cannot be said that his Scotch friend was popular, but he was,
at all events, highly respected as a man of high principle and rigid
honesty. This was not the way the miners expressed it. They called him a
"square" man, and that word expressed high moral praise. They all felt
that Tom was going off in good company.

Before they went, the two had a chance for a speculation. Two weeks
before, a man came to River Bend, across the country, with a horse and
wagon, the latter an old express wagon, which he had brought round the
Horn from some one of the Eastern States. What had induced him to take
so much trouble to convey such bulky articles was not quite clear. Now
that he was a miner he had no use for them, and at River Bend they were
not saleable. This man, Abner Kent, came to Ferguson's tent, where he
and Tom were resting after the labors of the day. He was a tall man,
with a shambling gait and an angular face.

"Good-evening," he said. "If you ain't busy I'll sit down a few
minutes."

"We are glad to see you Mr. Kent," said Ferguson. "Tom and I were
discussing our plans, but we've plenty of time for that. Come in. Here's
a place for you."

"I hear that you are going to leave us, you two?"

"Yes, Tom has some business in San Francisco, and I want to see a little
more of the country."

"How are you going?"

"We'll take the cars if we can find any," answered Tom. "If we can't
we'll foot it."

"That's what I came to see you about. You know I've got a horse and
wagon."

"Yes."

"Why don't you buy it? You'll go easier and quicker."

"We can't afford it," said Ferguson. "Poor men must walk."

"You don't see the point. When you get through with the team, you can
easily sell them for more than you gave. It will be a good speculation."

"That will depend on how much we give," said the Scotchman, shrewdly.

"To be sure, Mr. Ferguson. Now about that, I'll be easy. They ain't any
good to me here. I'll take--let me see--four hundred dollars cash.
You'll maybe double your money inside of a month."

The team did seem cheap at this price, as prices of all articles in a
new country are very much enhanced.

"Tom and I will talk it over and let you know to-morrow morning," said
Ferguson.

"That's all right. It's a good chance for you."

When Kent was gone Tom asked, "What do you think of his offer, Mr.
Ferguson?"

"I think it will be a good investment, Tom, and that we shall be less
likely to be robbed than if we carried gold-dust with us. You know how
John Miles got robbed."

"I have only a hundred dollars," said Tom, doubtfully.

"I have enough to add to it, but I think we can get the team cheaper. I
don't want to beat the man down, but a bargain is a bargain, and we must
look out for our own interest."

"You know more about such things than I do, Mr. Ferguson; I will agree
to anything you say."

"Very well, my lad, I shall be sure to consult your interest as well as
my own. It will be very comfortable for us to have a team of our own."

"It will seem strange to me," said Tom, laughing. "What will they think
at home when they hear that I have set up a carriage?"

"They might think it imprudent to invest all you had in that way; but
we'll make money out of it yet, or I am sorely mistaken."

The next morning, while Tom and Ferguson were at work, Kent came up to
them.

"What have you decided about the team?" he asked.

"We are not willing to pay four hundred dollars," said Ferguson.

"That's a fair price."

"It may be, but it will take all the money Tom and I can raise. You know
it wouldn't be quite prudent for us to part with all our funds."

"I will take a note for part of the money," said Kent.

"That's very considerate of you, but scarcely prudent."

"Then don't you want it at all?" asked Kent, disappointed.

"Yes; we are prepared with an offer. We'll give you three hundred
dollars."

Kent shook his head.

"That's too little," he said.

Ferguson remained silent. He wished to give Kent time to reflect upon
his offer.

"Have you sold these claims of yours?" asked Kent, after a pause.

"No."

"Then add them to your offer, and I accept it."

This proposal struck Ferguson favorably. They could not carry away their
claims, and very possibly no other purchaser might offer, as, except as
regards location, other places along the river-bank could be had without
cost.

"What do you say, Tom?" asked Ferguson.

"I agree if you do, Mr. Ferguson."

"Then it's a bargain, Mr. Kent. I hope it'll prove satisfactory to both
of us."

"I don't think you'll regret it. It's a good speculation."

When the two friends had settled for their purchase, Tom paying one
hundred and Ferguson two hundred dollars, our hero found himself left
with twenty dollars, or its equivalent in gold-dust, while his companion
had about one hundred and fifty left over.

"We shall go off in style," said Tom; "riding in our own carriage. But
there's one thing I have been thinking of. I want to send a hundred
dollars home as soon as I get the chance. Suppose we can't sell the
team?"

"Have no fears about that, Tom. I'll lend you the money if that is the
case; but, mark my word, we shan't have it left on our hands, of that
you may be sure."

The night before they were to start Lawrence Peabody dropped in. He was
looking down in the mouth.

"How does the world use you, Mr. Peabody?" inquired Tom.

"Fortune is against me," said Peabody. "I'm tired of River Bend."

Tom glanced at his companion. He could guess what was coming.

"Won't you take me with you, Tom?" entreated the young Bostonian.

"You must ask Mr. Ferguson. He is the head of our party."

Peabody looked appealingly towards Ferguson, but the Scotchman shook his
head.

"You mustn't be offended, Mr. Peabody," he said, "when I tell you that
you are responsible for your own bad luck. You have had just as good a
chance as Tom or I."

"Your claim was better."

"There was no difference that I can see, except that we worked, and you
didn't. You don't expect gold to come to you?"

"You and Tom are more used to hard work than I," murmured Peabody.

"If you did not feel able to work, you should not have come to
California. A man must work harder here than at home, and then he stands
a chance of succeeding better."

"Then you won't take me?" asked Peabody, sadly.

"Are you in debt to Captain Fletcher for board?"

Peabody reluctantly admitted that he was, but had no idea how much he
owed.

"Fletcher tells me that he shall not trust you any longer."

Lawrence Peabody looked frightened.

"What shall I do?" he faltered. "I shall starve."

"You can't blame the captain; he knows that you spend the little money
you do earn at the saloon. But he will give you a chance. There is no
one to wash clothes in the camp, and we have all observed that you keep
yours looking well. If you will set up a laundry, you can make more
money than in any other way."

"But then I should be a common washer-woman," objected Peabody. "What
would my friends in Boston say?"

"They won't hear of it. Besides, a man can do here what he would not do
at home."

It may be stated here that Peabody, finding work absolutely needful,
went into partnership with a Chinaman, who arrived at the camp a day or
two later, and succeeded in making a fair living, which hitherto he had
been unable to do. After he was employed, his visits to the saloon
became less frequent. At times he was disturbed by the fear that his
friends at home might learn the character of his employment; apart from
this he found his new business, with the income it yielded, not
distasteful.




CHAPTER XIV.

A NEW ACQUAINTANCE.


Having made all necessary preparations, Ferguson and Tom set out on
their way. They took a course differing somewhat from that chosen by
John Miles, one object being to survey the country, and find, if
possible, a suitable place for continuing their search for gold. After
their three months' steady work both of our travellers were prepared to
enjoy the journey. Their road was difficult at times, from its
steepness, and more than once they found it necessary, out of
consideration for the horse, to get out and walk. But this only added to
the romantic charm of the trip.

"It's like a constant picnic," said Tom. "I should like to travel this
way for a year, if I did not feel the need of working."

"We might tire of it after a while," suggested Ferguson,--"in the rainy
season, for example."

"That would not be so pleasant, to be sure," Tom admitted. "Do you have
such fine scenery in Scotland, Mr. Ferguson?"

"Our mountains are not so high, my lad, nor our trees so gigantic; but
it's the associations that make them interesting. Every hill has a
legend connected with it, and our great novelist, Walter Scott, has
invested them with a charm that draws pilgrims from all parts of the
world to see them. Now this is a new country--beautiful, I grant, but
without a history. Look around you, and you will see nothing to remind
you of man. It is nature on a grand scale, I admit, but the soul is
wanting."

"I like mountains," said Tom, thoughtfully. "There is something grand
about them."

"There are some famous mountains in your native State, New Hampshire,
are there not, Tom?"

"Yes; but I have only seen them from a distance. They are not above
thirty miles away from where I was born; but poor people don't travel in
search of scenery, Mr. Ferguson."

"No, my lad, and there's another thing I have noticed. We don't care
much for the curiosities that are near us. The people about here, if
there are any settled inhabitants, care nothing about the mountains, I
doubt."

"That is true. In our village at home there is an old man nearly eighty
years old who has never visited the mountains, though he has lived near
them all his life."

"I can well believe it, my lad. But what is that?"

The sound which elicited this exclamation was a loud "Hollo!" evidently
proceeding from some one in their rear.

Both Tom and the Scotchman turned, and their eyes rested on a horseman
evidently spurring forward to overtake them. Tom, who was driving,
reined in the horse, and brought him to a stop. The horseman was soon
even with them.

He was evidently a Yankee. All Yankees do not carry about with them an
unmistakable certificate of their origin, but Ebenezer Onthank was a
typical New Englander. His face was long and thin, his expression shrewd
and good-natured, his limbs were long and ungainly. In later life, with
the addition of forty or fifty pounds of flesh, he would be much
improved in appearance.

"Good-morning, gentlemen," said he. "It seems kinder good to see a human
face again. It ain't very populous round here, is it?"

"We haven't seen any large towns," said Tom, smiling.

"Where are you steerin'?" inquired the Yankee. "I'm expectin' to fetch
up at San Francisco some time, if I don't get lost in the woods."

"That is our destination, my friend," returned Ferguson.

"Would you mind my joining your party?" asked Onthank. "It's lonesome
travelin' by one's self without a soul to speak to."

"We shall be glad of your company," said the Scotchman, sincerely, for,
though naturally cautious, he could not suspect the new-comer of
anything which would make him an undesirable companion.

"Perhaps you'd like to know who I am," said the new acquaintance. "My
name is Ebenezer Onthank, from Green Mountain Mills, in Vermont. My
father is deacon of the Baptist Church at home."

"I suppose you will take his place when you get older," said Tom,
gravely.

"No, I guess not. I wonder what Susan Jones would say to my bein' a
deacon!" and Ebenezer burst into a loud laugh.

"Is Miss Jones a particular friend of yours?" asked Tom, slyly.

"I should say she was. Why, I expect to marry her when I get home."

"I congratulate you."

"Don't be too fast. We ain't hitched yet. Say, boy, where do you come
from?"

"From Vernon, in New Hampshire."

"You don't say! Why, that ain't more'n fifty miles from Green Mountain
Mills; cu'rus we should meet so fur away from hum, ain't it? When did
you start?"

"Seven or eight months ago."

"I've been in California six months. Does that gentleman come from your
town?"

"My friend," answered the Scotchman, not without a touch of pride, "I am
not an American; I am from the Highlands of Scotland."

"You be? Sho! Well, of course you can't help that."

"Help it, sir? I am proud of hailing from the land of Scott and Burns."

"Well, I guess it's a pretty nice sort of country," said Mr. Onthank,
patronizingly. "I guess you'll like America best, though."

"I am by no means sure of that, my friend," said Ferguson, a little
nettled. "America's all very well, but--"

"Why, you could put Scotland into its waist-coat pocket, and there'd be
plenty of room left," said Ebenezer, energetically.

"I admit that, as regards size, Scotland cannot compare with this
country."

"Say, have you got mountains as high as them, or trees as high as that?"
pointing to a gigantic redwood.

"No; but size is not everything."

"That's so. Vermont is a little State, but she's smart, I tell you. But
you haven't told me your names yet."

"I am called Donald Ferguson, Mr. Onthank. My young friend here answers
to the name of Thomas Nelson."

"Commonly called Tom," added our hero, smiling.

"Why, I've got a brother Tom," said Mr. Onthank. "Cu'rus, isn't it?"

Considering that Tom is by no means an uncommon name, it could hardly be
called very remarkable, but Tom politely assented.

"Is he older than I am?" he inquired.

"Yes, my brother Tom is twenty-one years old. I expect he voted at the
last town-meeting. I'm four years older than Tom."

"Have you been fortunate so far in California, Mr. Onthank?"

"Can't say I have. I guess I've wandered round too much. Been a sort of
rollin' stone; and my granny used to say that a rollin' stone gathers no
moss. I've got about enough money to get me to San Francisco, and I own
this animal; but I haven't made a fortune yet. What luck have you two
had?"

"Pretty fair, but it will take a good while to make our fortunes. We own
this team, and that's about all we do own."

"A sort of an express wagon, isn't it?"

"Yes."

"Ain't goin' into the express business, be you?"

"Probably not. We bought it on speculation."

"That reminds me of old Sam Bailey in our town. He was always tradin'
horses. Sometimes he made money, and then again he didn't. How much did
you give?"

Tom told him.

"That was a pretty stiff price, wasn't it?"

"It would be considered so at home, but we hope to get a good deal more,
when we come to sell it."

Their new friend kept on with them, amusing them with his homely
sayings, and original views of things. His conversation beguiled the
tedium of the journey, so that all were surprised when the shadows
deepened, and supper-time came. Selecting a favorable place they
encamped for the night.




CHAPTER XV.

A GRIZZLY BEAR.


Ebenezer Onthank was an early riser. He had been brought up on a farm,
where, during a part of the year it was the custom for the "menfolks" to
rise between four and five o'clock in the morning to begin the labors of
the day. His old habit clung to him, and at five o'clock, when Tom and
Ferguson were yet asleep, Mr. Onthank sprang from his leafy couch
refreshed and vigorous.

Seeing his companions yet sleeping, he concluded to take a walk.

"It'll give me an appetite for breakfast," thought he, "and a chance to
see something of the country."

As to the appetite, Ebenezer was generally well provided. Indeed,
latterly his appetite had exceeded his means of gratifying it, and more
than once he had longed to be back at his old home in the Vermont
farm-house, where the table was always generously, if not elegantly,
furnished. If Ebenezer had a special weakness it was for doughnuts,
which he called nut-cakes.

"If I only had a few of marm's nut-cakes," he had said the night before
to his new-found friends, "I'd be a happy man."

"What are nut-cakes?" asked the Scotchman, puzzled.

"Don't you know what nut-cakes are?" inquired Ebenezer, astonished at
Ferguson's ignorance.

"I never heard of them before," said Ferguson.

"Well, I declare! I thought everybody knew what nut-cakes are,"
ejaculated the Yankee. "Don't you ever make 'em in Scotland?"

"Not that I ever heard."

"Then you don't know what is good. You know what they are, Tom?"

"Oh, yes," said Tom, smiling. "We often have them at home. Perhaps Mr.
Ferguson would understand better if he heard them called doughnuts or
crullers."

Thus defined Mr. Ferguson acknowledged that he had heard of them, and he
thought he had once tasted one. Scotland, however, fell considerably in
the estimation of Mr. Onthank, when he learned that his favorite article
of food was almost unknown in that distant country.

"You Scotchmen don't know what is good," he said. "If you ever come to
Green Mountain Mills, I'll get marm to fry a batch of nut-cakes, and
you'll say they're goloptious."

This last word was not familiar to Ferguson, but the smack of the lips
with which it was accompanied made it sufficiently intelligible. He
assured Ebenezer politely that he hoped some day to accept his kind
invitation.

When Ebenezer left the camp he had no definite plan of exploration.
Everything was alike new to him, and it mattered little in what
direction his steps led him. It was a charming morning. The sun had
risen, and hill and valley were glorified by its slanting rays. The air
was bracing, and Ebenezer, though neither a poet nor a sentimentalist,
felt his spirits rise, as with vigorous steps he strode on, letting his
eyes wander at will over the landscape.

"Looks kinder han'some," he said to himself. "I wish Susan Jones was
with me now. Gals like to walk round and look at scenery, and pick
flowers, and so on. As for me, a good field of corn suits me better than
all the flowers in the world. They're only good to smell of; out here
though I'd like a good 'claim' best. It seems cu'rus to think how much
money you can get sometimes from a hole in the ground. Beats cornfields
for profit, by a great sight, if you only get hold of the right place. I
just wish I could find a big nugget, as big as my head. I guess it would
make me the richest man in Green Mountain Mills. I'd be a bigger man
than the old deacon. They'd be glad to make me selectman, and perhaps
send me to Montpelier after a while to make laws. Well, there's no
knowin' what may turn up. Why shouldn't I light on a nugget as well as
the next man?"

In this pleasant channel the thoughts of our Yankee adventurer were
running as he strode over the uneven ground, with all the vigor gained
by his hardy training. But his walk was destined to be interrupted in a
decidedly unpleasant manner. All at once he became conscious of a huge
object, scarcely thirty yards distant, whose attention he had already
attracted. Mr. Onthank had been long enough in California to recognize
in the huge, unwieldy figure--a grizzly bear!

Ebenezer Onthank was no coward, but it must be admitted that when he saw
the eyes of the grizzly fixed upon him he turned pale, and his limbs
trembled. He had heard from fellow-miners stories of the great strength
and ferocity of this most formidable beast. The grizzly bear shows no
fear of man. He is always ready to make an attack, even when not
stimulated by hunger. Even the lion is crafty and cunning, and likes to
attack his enemy unawares; but the grizzly boldly advances to the attack
without seeking to surprise his adversary. If out of humor it makes no
account of odds, but will as readily attack a party as a single foe.
Col. Albert S. Evans, the author of an interesting volume, containing
sketches of life in California, says, "I am satisfied that an average
grizzly could at any time whip the strongest African lion in a fair
stand-up fight, while a full-grown bull is no more to him than a rat is
to the largest house-cats."

Twenty-five years ago the grizzly was to be found in various parts of
California. As the State has become settled his haunts have become
contracted, but even now, as the writer just quoted assures us, he is
still found in great numbers in the Coast Range Mountains from San Diego
to Del Norte. In describing Samson, a famous specimen once on exhibition
in San Francisco, we are told that "his strength was that of an
elephant, and his claws, eight inches in length, curved like a rainbow
and sharp as a knife, would enable him to tear open anything made of
flesh and blood as you or I would open a banana."

Such was the new acquaintance who confronted Mr. Onthank, and barred
his progress.

"Jerusalem!" ejaculated the surprised and dismayed Yankee, and he
instinctively felt for his rifle. But, alas! he had left it in the camp.
It was thoughtless and imprudent to venture out unarmed; but the scene
was so quiet and peaceful that no thought of danger had entered the mind
of our unlucky friend.

The bear sat upon his haunches, and stared at the intruder. Ebenezer,
brought to a stand-still, returned his gaze. They were less than a
hundred feet apart, and the situation was decidedly critical.

"I guess he wants to chaw me up for his breakfast," thought Ebenezer,
despairingly, "and I don't see what I can do to prevent it."

The bear, however, seemed in no hurry to commence the attack. He
surveyed our Yankee with dignified gravity, conscious that he had him at
advantage. When Ebenezer felt for his rifle he uttered a low growl,
being possibly aware of his purpose. Possibly he laughed in his sleeve
(some of my young critics may suggest that bears have no sleeves) at his
failure.

Ebenezer looked about him despairingly. No man will surrender at
discretion to a grizzly, for he can hope for no mercy. But what could be
done? Once subjected to the terrible hug, and the life would be crushed
out of him in less than a minute.

"If Ferguson and Tom were only here!" thought poor Ebenezer.

But the camp was at least two miles away, and his two companions,
unconscious of his terrible peril, were calmly sleeping, and not likely
to awaken till he was a crushed and bleeding corpse.

In great crises the mind travels rapidly. I shall not attempt to record
the thoughts that chased one another through the mind of the luckless
adventurer. But they were by no means pleasant.

"I shall never see Green Mountain Mills again," he thought, with an
inward groan. "I shall never marry Susan Jones, or eat any of marm's
nut-cakes. If I only had my rifle here, I'd make one effort for my life.
I'd spoil the beauty of that ugly devil anyhow."

Still, as if charmed, he stood staring open-eyed at the grizzly.

Bruin, deciding that this had lasted long enough, began in a slow and
dignified manner to approach the intruder upon his solitude.

This broke the charm. With a wild shout Ebenezer Onthank took to his
heels and flew over the ground at a rate of speed which Weston, the
champion runner, would scarcely be able to equal.

The grizzly accepted the challenge, and increased his own speed,
developing an activity hardly to be expected of his huge and unwieldy
form.

It was man against beast, with the odds decidedly in the favor of the
latter.




CHAPTER XVI.

UP A TREE.


The race between the Yankee and the bear was an exciting one, to the
former at least. He was fleet of foot, and in a hundred yards' dash
would have won without great difficulty; but in wind and endurance the
grizzly excelled him. So, as the race continued, Mr. Onthank, looking
back from time to time, was painfully conscious that his enemy was
gaining upon him. The perspiration came out upon his face in large
drops, and he panted painfully. He felt that the chances were against
him, and he could almost feel in advance the fatal hug which would
slowly press the life out of him. As he felt his strength failing he
looked around him despairingly. Just before him was a moderate-sized
tree. Though he knew that bears can climb, he gathered his remaining
strength, seized a low hanging branch, and swung himself up just in
time to avoid his persistent foe, who was close upon his heels. He did
not tarry where he was, but climbed higher up, until from a height of
twenty feet he could look down upon the bear.

Bruin looked up placidly, but did not begin to climb at once. Probably
he was fatigued with his race. Moreover he knew that his intended victim
could not get away. The latter was emphatically and literally "treed."
The bear sat upon his haunches and complacently regarded the Yankee.

Ebenezer Onthank made himself as comfortable as he could under the
circumstances. He was by no means easy in mind, however. He was "holding
the fort," it is true; but the enemy was in force outside, and evidently
intended to remain. Worse still, he would probably after a while climb
the tree, and this would bring matters to a crisis.

"You pesky critter! Why don't you go along about your business?"
exclaimed the unhappy adventurer, shaking his fist at the foe.

Bruin deigned no reply, but continued to survey him with steady,
unwinking eyes.

"If I only had a gun, I'd pepper you," continued Ebenezer. "I should
like to put a bullet into that impudent eye of yours."

Though the bear had never received an English education, his instinct
probably enabled him to understand the feelings of his intended victim,
but he remained as placid as ever.

So an hour passed. At the end of that time the situation remained
unchanged. The unfortunate Yankee was getting hungry, as well as tired
of his somewhat constrained position. Bears probably have more patience
than the human family, for Bruin had scarcely moved, except occasionally
to wag his great head. He felt that in the game that was being played it
was his adversary's turn to make the next move.

"I wish Tom and the Scotchman would find me out," thought Onthank. "What
on earth makes them sleep so late?" he continued, irritably. "They must
be naturally lazy."

He may be excused for feeling irritated, though there was no particular
reason to expect his two friends to curtail their hours of slumber
because he had done so. But he was not in a position where it is easy to
be reasonable, and in his situation every minute seemed to him as long
as five.

Meanwhile, in the camp, a mile away, Tom and Ferguson had awakened.

"How did you sleep, Tom?" asked the Scotchman.

"Tip-top. Did you rest well?"

"I have a gift of sleep," replied Ferguson. "But where is our Yankee
friend?"

"I suppose he has taken an early walk," said Tom. "He will be back
before long, I guess. We'd better not wait breakfast for him. I'm hungry
for one."

The two friends proceeded to break their fast, washing down the rather
stale provisions with water from a spring near by.

"I wish it were coffee," said Tom. "I'm tired of cold water."

"Doubtless the coffee would be more gratifying to the palate, Tom; but
it's likely the water is better for the health."

"I suppose you would refuse a cup of hot coffee, Mr. Ferguson, if it
were offered you," said Tom, smiling.

"I don't say that, Tom. I would risk its effect upon my health for once.
But, as we haven't got it, we may as well make the best of what we
have."

Soon after their simple meal, which did not consume much time, Tom
suggested to his companion that they set out in search of Mr. Onthank.
He did not suspect that their missing companion was in trouble, but he
thought that it would be pleasant to take a walk.

"You can go, if you like, Tom," said Ferguson, with characteristic
caution. "I will remain behind to look after the camp."

"All right, Mr. Ferguson. I'll soon be back."

"Don't go too far away, my lad; and mind your bearings, so that you can
find your way back."

"Never fear, Mr. Ferguson. It wouldn't be very easy to be lost here.
I'll keep my eyes open, and bring Mr. Onthank back with me if I see him
anywhere."

Ferguson sat down, and indulged himself in reading, probably for the
hundredth time, Walter Scott's Marmion, of which he had a small pocket
edition; while Tom went on his way.

A fortunate chance directed our hero by an almost straight course to the
very tree where Ebenezer Onthank was still perched with the grizzly
standing guard beneath. From time to time he looked about him anxiously,
in the hope of seeing the approach of one of his travelling companions.

It was with a feeling of joy, not wholly unmingled with anxiety, that he
descried Tom descending a hillock not many rods away. As yet it was
evident that our hero had not caught sight of the bear and his prisoner.
It was very necessary to put him on his guard.

"Tom!" shouted Mr. Onthank, at the top of his voice.

Tom heard the call in spite of the distance, and looked about him, but
did not immediately catch sight of the speaker. It did not occur to him
to look upwards.

"Tom!" shouted the Yankee again. "Here I am. Look up in the tree."

That time Tom's glance detected his companion, and, not yet having
discovered the bear, he was led to wonder why Mr. Onthank had climbed
the tree. As he was advancing incautiously, Onthank shouted again,
"There's a cursed grizzly under the tree. Don't come too near."

Tom saw the bear, and he paused suddenly. He was startled in truth, for
he had been long enough in California to be aware that it was a
dangerous beast.

"Isn't Ferguson with you?" asked Onthank, anxiously, for he knew that a
boy of sixteen, even if armed, was no match for the king of the
California sierras.

"No, he's behind in the camp," shouted Tom, in reply.

By this time the bear became aware that there was a second intruder
within his precincts. He turned his head deliberately and surveyed our
hero. It is not within the range of the author to read the thoughts of a
grizzly, but, from the indifference with which he turned away and
resumed his watch, it may be inferred that he considered Tom too small
game to merit his attention. This was rather satisfactory to our young
hero, who was not ambitious to come in close quarters with so formidable
an antagonist.

Startled as he was, Tom maintained his ground. He wanted to help
Onthank; but he did not know how to do it.

"What can I do to help you, Mr. Onthank?" shouted Tom.

"Blamed if I know," answered the Yankee, helplessly. "I wish Ferguson
were here. It won't do for you to attack the beast single-handed."

"Shall I go back for Ferguson?" asked Tom.

"I don't know; how far away is the camp?"

"It must be as much as a mile."

"While you are away the brute may take it into his head to climb the
tree, and then I am gone up."

"Haven't you any weapon?"

"No."

"I'll fire at the bear if you say so."

"It would be of no use. If you missed, or only grazed him, he would make
for you."

"I wish you had my rifle," said Tom.

"So do I. I'd let him have it straight in the eye. Have you had
breakfast?"

"Yes."

"I'm as hungry as a bear--as this bear who probably wants me for his
breakfast. O Tom, if I was only back at Green Mountain Mills once more,
I'd be content to live and die there, and all the gold in California
wouldn't bring me out here again."

Tom stood silent and perplexed. While he was considering whether he
could do anything to help his friend, the bear slowly rose, approached
the tree, and, grasping it between his paws, prepared to climb. He was
evidently tired of waiting.

"He's coming, Tom!" shouted Onthank. "O Lord, what shall I do?"




CHAPTER XVII.

AN EXCITING PURSUIT.


Mr Onthank's reflections when the grizzly was slowly but steadily
climbing the tree were by no means pleasant.

"If he once grips me, I am gone," he said, despairingly.

"Shall I shoot?" asked Tom, looking on in excitement.

"You might hit me," said Ebenezer, who knew nothing of Tom's skill as a
marksman.

"No, I won't."

"I think I'll swing off," said the Yankee, "and join you."

Whether this was or was not a wise thing to do Tom did not feel
qualified to decide. It was evident that Onthank must do something
speedily, or he would be in the power of the bear. He waited nervously
till Bruin was uncomfortably near, and then, seizing the branch with
his hands, swung to the ground. The height was considerable, and the
fall jarred him; but, quickly recovering himself, he ran towards Tom.

"Now we must run for our lives, Tom," he said, suiting the action to the
word.

Tom fully understood the necessity, and followed suit, first hazarding a
glance at the discomfited bear.

When the grizzly witnessed the escape of his victim he showed no
excitement, nor did he accelerate his motions. He began deliberately to
back down the tree. This required some little time, which Tom and his
friend made the most of.

"Give me your rifle," said Onthank.

"I'd rather keep it," said Tom.

"I can make better use of it," said the Yankee.

"I don't know about that," said Tom. "At any rate I will keep it."

He felt that it was hardly reasonable to expect him, in the presence of
such a danger, to give up his only instrument of defence.

"You are only a boy," said his companion, discontented.

"I can shoot," answered Tom, briefly.

Onthank was not in general an unreasonable man, but danger makes men
selfish.

"Give it to me," he said, in a tone of authority, and he tried to wrest
it from Tom's hands.

"You shall not have it," exclaimed Tom, indignantly. "Take away your
hand, or I'll shoot you!"

Of course Tom was excited, and would not have carried out his threat,
but he was fully resolved to stand up for his rights.

Whether Ebenezer would have yielded the point, being stronger than Tom,
is uncertain; but our hero shouted "Look out for the bear!" and the
Yankee, in alarm, released his hold, and the two entered upon a race, in
which the Yankee's superior length of limb enabled him to keep the first
place.

Bruin was now on terra firma, and was on his way, wagging his great
head, developing an alarming rate of speed. Tom was somewhat hampered
by the weapon which he carried, and he was getting out of breath.
Onthank was three or four rods ahead of him. The situation had changed,
and it was now Tom that was in the greater peril.

"Don't give out, Tom!" called out Ebenezer, encouragingly.

"I won't," gasped Tom, "if I can help it."

"Is he gaining on us?"

"Yes," returned our hero.

"Then I'll try another tree," said Onthank, and he caught a branch, and
clambered up into a tree quite similar to the other in which he had been
besieged.

Tom would gladly have followed his example, but the branch was too high
for him to reach readily, and the grizzly was too near to give him
adequate time. Poor boy! He began to despair, and was at an utter loss
what to do. To face round and fire at the foe seemed about all that was
left him, but he wanted to reserve his fire to the last. He caught sight
of another tree, of a larger trunk than the one which Onthank had
ascended, and ran towards it, pursued by the grizzly. Then commenced a
dodging game, which seemed to afford but a brief respite from
destruction.

"This can't last long," thought poor Tom. "I suppose I must die."

In that brief time of peril many thoughts passed through his mind. To
die at his age would be sad enough; but the thought that his expedition
would be a failure, only involving his father deeper in difficulty and
debt chiefly troubled him. The mortgage would be foreclosed, and his
father and whole family deprived of their humble home. Onthank watched
the boy's peril, unable to give him assistance. To do him justice he
almost forgot his own danger in the more apparent and immediate peril of
his young companion.

"Be careful!" he shouted, quite needlessly. "Don't let him grip you.
Give it to him right in the eye."

Tom was so absorbed, and his mind so painfully occupied by his efforts
to keep out of his enemy's clutches, that he was not conscious of the
warning.

Active and alert as he was, the result was hardly a matter of doubt. He
would tire sooner than the bear, and if he ran again he was sure to be
overtaken. This, however, was what he did. Of course the grizzly
instantly pursued him. Poor Tom breathed a prayer for help, though there
seemed no chance of his prayer being answered; but sometimes God sends
assistance when there seems no chance of escape.

The galloping of a horse was heard. There was a whirling sound, and
Bruin, already within two yards of Tom, was jerked back, and brought to
a stand-still by a lasso which wound about his neck. A shout caused Tom
suddenly to turn his head, and to his joy he saw a mounted Mexican
_vaquero_, who had brought him timely relief.

Bruin growled angrily on finding himself balked of his prey. He was not
disposed to yield to his new antagonist. Rising and sitting on his
haunches he began coolly to draw in the lasso, against the combined
strength of man and horse. The muscular force of a big grizzly is
simply enormous. Usually he is attacked from two sides, two lassos being
thrown around him. For a single antagonist he is sometimes more than a
match, as seemed likely in the present case. The _rieta_ being attached
to the pommel of the saddle, of course the bear, in pulling as he did,
hand over hand, steadily brought the _vaquero_ and his steed nearer. The
horse, terrified, trembled in every limb, and tried to rear; but his
strength was as nothing when opposed to the steady power of his massive
antagonist.

Relieved from the immediate attentions of the grizzly, Tom did not
continue to run, but stood still, and, forgetting his own peril,
remained an excited spectator of the struggle between the bear and the
_vaquero_.

The Mexican in an excited manner shouted to him to shoot. This brought
Tom to a sense of his duty. A third person had been brought into danger
by an effort to give him assistance, and he was too manly to leave him
to his fate. He raised his rifle, and, taking quick aim, fired. Our
young hero was of course inexperienced, and it was only by a piece of
good fortune that his bullet inflicted a serious wound, striking the
bear in the throat. The blood began to flow and the grizzly, growling
fiercely, slackened his hold on the lasso. The _vaquero_ followed up
Tom's shot by another, equally effective, and the powerful animal
dropped to the ground, dangerous still if approached, but unfitted for
pursuit.

The _vaquero_ reined his horse back, and his dark face became illumined
with a smile of satisfaction.

"He will do no more harm," he said in good English, but with a foreign
accent. "The danger is over."

"Is the critter used up?" shouted Onthank, cautiously, from his elevated
perch. "Is he defunct?"

"He soon will be," answered Tom. "I guess it will be safe to come down."

Ebenezer Onthank needed no second invitation. He "shinned" down the tree
in a manner not unlike the grizzly, and approached the spot where the
huge foe was lying, the life-blood flowing from his throat.

"I'd like to kick you, you big brute!" said Mr. Onthank.

The bear slowly turned upon him his glazing eyes, and they expressed so
much ferocity that almost involuntarily the Yankee drew back. The bear
partly raised himself, and tried to drag himself towards his
adversaries; but the effort was vain.

"He is one of the largest I have seen," said the _vaquero_. "See how
strong he is!"

"It was lucky for me that you came up," said Tom. "He was almost upon
me."

"I had about given you up, Tom," said Onthank, "and I thought my turn
was coming next."

"We are much indebted to you, sir," said Tom, gratefully, to the
Mexican. "You have saved my life."

The _vaquero_ courteously expressed his satisfaction, and, remounting
his horse, resumed his journey.

"I never want to see another grizzly," said Onthank. "This one is enough
for me, darn his ugly pictur'!"

"I quite agree with you, Mr. Onthank," said Tom.




CHAPTER XVIII.

TOM'S OLD HOME.


Leaving Tom for a time, we will cross the continent, and, a little
earlier in point of time, look in upon Mark Nelson and his family at
their humble home in New Hampshire.

For years Mr. Nelson had been struggling to provide a comfortable living
for his wife and children. The struggle was not an easy one. His small
farm was sterile, and yielded grudgingly its annual crops. Then the
mortgage held by Squire Hudson imposed a burden of interest very hard to
meet. Each half year sixty-six dollars must be raised somehow to satisfy
the squire's demand. Though a rich man, with ready money in plenty, he
never failed to call for his money on the very day it was due. Once or
twice he had granted a delay of a day or two; but his manner was so
unpleasant that the farmer, except from dire necessity, was hardly
likely to ask a renewal of the favor.

The six months immediately following Tom's departure from home were not
favorable to his father. There was a drought of considerable duration,
which made the crops smaller than usual, and thus materially decreased
the farmer's income. When the semi-annual interest became due, with the
most energetic effort Mark Nelson had got together but thirty-six
dollars towards it, leaving a deficit of thirty dollars.

"I feel anxious about to-morrow, Mary," he said, as the little family
sat together the night before in the plain sitting-room. "I have never
been so much behindhand before with the interest."

"How much do you lack, Mark?" asked Mrs. Nelson.

"Thirty dollars."

"That is a good deal of money," said his wife, gravely.

"Yes; I don't know where to raise it. If Squire Hudson were only a
little considerate. But he isn't, and, even if he were, I am afraid
there is no prospect of my raising the money at present."

"You may get some money from Tom soon," suggested Sarah.

"I can't rely upon that. Tom will doubtless send when he is able, for he
understands my circumstances, and is a thoughtful boy; but it is going
to take time for him to earn a surplus--enough to send on."

"He may find a big nugget," said Walter, the second boy, who eagerly
read the letters from California which from time to time appeared in the
weekly paper.

"He _may_, but the chances are against it."

"I was reading in last week's paper about a man finding a nugget worth
over two thousand dollars."

"Such nuggets are as rare as large prizes in a lottery, I suspect," said
Mark Nelson, who had a large share of plain common-sense.

Walter looked rather disappointed, having made up his mind that Tom
would certainly find a big lump of gold, and come home rich.

"Don't you think Tom will find some gold?" he asked.

"Yes, I have no doubt he will gather some gold-dust. I have no doubt,
too, that he will earn more than he or I can do at home; but I haven't
much faith in these extraordinary pieces of good luck."

"Still, Tom _may_ find a nugget," persisted Walter.

"Yes, he _may_, and I shall be very glad if he does; but we must not
build too many air-castles on that chance."

"I wish I could see the dear boy again," sighed his mother, looking up
from the stocking she was laboriously darning.

"So do I," said Walter. "He would have a lot to tell us."

"California seems so far away," resumed Mrs. Nelson, "and he has no one
there to look after him, and mend his clothes--"

"And darn his stockings," said Walter, smiling.

"If he walked all the way across the continent," said Sarah, "I don't
believe he would have larger holes in his stockings than you have,
Walter."

"Oh, well, I exercise a good deal," said Walter. "Ask father if I
don't."

"Walter will be more successful as a farmer than as a scholar," said Mr.
Nelson. "He helps me a good deal."

"Tom was a good scholar," said Sarah, "and he was always ready to work
too. Walter will never astonish or electrify the world by his learning."

"I don't want to," said her brother. "It isn't in my line."

"That's true enough."

"Don't tease Walter," said Mrs. Nelson. "He helps your father a good
deal, and he is not a dunce."

"Thank you, mother, for taking my part. Sarah is going to be a
strong-minded woman. I should not wonder if she came out as a lecturer
on 'Woman's Rights' some time. I think I see her, with a pair of
iron-bowed spectacles on her nose, and her back hair tied up in a big
knot, flinging her arms about, and--"

"That'll do, Walter," said Sarah. "It is an unusually powerful effort
for you. I have no desire to lecture on 'Woman's Rights,' though I think
they ought to have them all the same."

"I guess you'll get yours. You'll make your husband stand round, if you
ever get one."

Sarah laughed good-naturedly, and retorted, "I shall pity your wife, if
she has to darn your stockings."

The next day about dinner-time Squire Hudson walked up to the front
door, and knocked. His approach was witnessed, not without trepidation,
for he was not an easy creditor.

The squire looked about him searchingly as he entered. He suspected that
the interest was not ready, and the farmer's grave face confirmed his
suspicions. That he was glad of this of course Mark Nelson did not
dream, for he was not aware of his creditor's deep-laid plans.

"A fine day!" said the squire, with suavity. "I hope you are well, Mrs.
Nelson."

"Pretty well, thank you, sir."

"Have you heard from Tom lately?"

"Yes; he had just reached California."

"Then of course he could not say anything of his prospects?"

"It was too soon."

"You must miss him a good deal--all of you."

"I am thinking of him all the time," said Mrs. Nelson.

"To be sure, that is natural in a mother. But if the boy does well, that
will repay you hereafter."

"If I only felt sure he would do well."

"Oh, he is young and industrious. He will be sure to make his way. He'll
like it too. Why, my Sinclair envies him the chance of leaving home. He
wanted to go with him."

"Sinclair would not like to go in the same way as Tom, with the prospect
of having to work hard after he got there," said Mark Nelson.

"To be sure not, neighbor Nelson. My boy has never been brought up to
work. My circumstances--ahem!--have not made it necessary."

"Sinclair is fortunate in having a rich father," said the farmer.

"So I tell him," said the squire, complacently. "His fortune is already
made."

"What are you going to do with him, squire?"

"Oh, I shall make a professional man of him,--a lawyer, most likely,"
said the rich man, complacently. "I can give him a suitable income till
he gets into a paying practice."

"That will be a good many years," thought Sarah, "unless Sinclair works
harder than he has lately at school;" but the shrewd young lady kept
this thought to herself.

One by one wife and children left the room, for it was well understood
that the squire came on business, and would be likely to desire a
private interview with the farmer. They went into the kitchen, closing
the door behind them, and awaited anxiously the result of the
interview.

"I do hope Squire Hudson will be considerate," said Mrs. Nelson,
anxiously.

"I am afraid he won't be, mother," said Sarah. "He is a hard man."

"Sinclair puts on no end of airs," said Walter. "By the way he struts
round you would think he owned the whole town. You had better set your
cap for him, Sarah, for he will be rich some day."

"I would rather be an old maid than marry him," said Sarah, decidedly.

"Very likely your wish will be gratified," said her brother.

Mrs. Nelson did not smile at this sally, for her mind was too full of
anxiety.




CHAPTER XIX.

A MODERN SHYLOCK.


"I believe your interest falls due to-day, Mr. Nelson," said the squire,
when he found himself alone with his debtor.

"Yes," answered the farmer, slowly. It was not very likely to slip his
mind.

"I suppose you have the money ready," continued the squire, who supposed
no such thing.

"I have a part of it ready," said Mark Nelson, with an effort.

"A part," repeated his creditor, with a frown.

"Yes; I can give you thirty-six dollars to-day."

"_Only_ thirty-six dollars! The amount due is sixty-six."

"I know it, Squire Hudson; but this has been a bad year for the farmers,
as you probably know. Owing to the drought, my crops fell off at least
one quarter."

"I can't help that," said the squire, coldly.

"If you will be a little patient," said Mr. Nelson, uneasily.

"Neighbor Nelson," said his creditor, interrupting him, "I wish to ask
you one question. When I lent you money on mortgage was there a
stipulation that if there was a drought I was to wait for my just
interest?"

"No, Squire Hudson."

"To be sure not; I would not of course lend you money on any such terms.
It was understood that my interest was to be paid semi-annually,--was it
not so?"

"Yes, but--"

"Wait a moment. You must certainly agree that I am entitled to prompt
payment. A bargain is a bargain."

"I don't dispute it, Squire Hudson, and I have tried to be ready for
you; but in spite of all my efforts I am thirty dollars short."

"Do you expect me to be content with this explanation?"

"I think you are rather hard on me, squire. It isn't as if I had the
money and objected to pay. I am a poor man, but no one ever lost a
dollar by me; and I don't mean that any one shall, while I have my life
and strength."

"That's all very well, but it won't make up the thirty dollars in which
you are delinquent."

"What would you have me do? I cannot _make_ money."

"I wouldn't give much for an investment when the interest is delayed. It
is no longer worth its face. If any of my railroad bonds defer their
usual interest they at once drop in value."

"I know very little of railroad bonds, never having any money to invest
in them; but I think my farm will be full security for all the money I
owe you."

"Suppose I should foreclose--you would consider it an unkind thing and a
great hardship, wouldn't you?"

"It would take away my means of supporting my family. I don't think you
would go to extremes, for the sake of thirty dollars."

"It isn't the amount of money, neighbor Nelson, that is to be
considered. It is the principle that is involved."

This is a very common pretext with men who have made up their minds to
do a mean thing. Generally speaking it is false, and the money is the
first consideration.

"Will you give me two months to pay the balance of interest?" asked Mark
Nelson.

"What better prospect have you of being able to pay me then?"

"As soon as Tom has any money to send, he will remit to me. I think it
probable that I shall hear from him in the course of two months."

"If that is your reliance," said the squire, shrugging his shoulders, "I
am afraid you are leaning upon a broken reed. I know boys pretty well,
and I fancy Tom will find a use for all the money he earns."

"You don't know him, Squire Hudson. He is a very conscientious boy, and
understands very well the sacrifice I made in raising money to send him
to California. He is not very likely to forget that."

"It seems to me that the sacrifice was mine," said the squire, with a
half sneer. "If I remember rightly, I advanced the money which he took
away with him."

Mark Nelson flushed, and he answered warmly, "You did advance the money,
Squire Hudson, but I gave you security for it."

"And the very first interest that has come due you are not prepared to
meet. You can't blame me for feeling a little doubt as to the wisdom of
my advance."

"Are you very much in need of the thirty dollars?" asked Mr. Nelson,
nettled at the squire's tone.

"What do you mean, sir?"

"Is it subjecting you to any great inconvenience to wait a couple of
months for it? That is what I mean."

"My circumstances are not such," returned the squire, haughtily, "as to
make me feel even the loss of thirty dollars."

"I wish I could say the same, but I cannot. Since, then, it will
occasion you no inconvenience, I ask you as a favor that you will let
the balance rest for two months."

Squire Hudson saw that he was cornered; but none the less was he
disposed to yield the point. He even felt provoked with the farmer for
having forced from him an acknowledgment that he did not need the money
he so persistently demanded.

"I told you before," he said, "that it was not the amount of money, but
the principle, that I care for. You cannot have forgotten this."

"I don't see how any principle is involved, Squire Hudson."

"You look at the matter solely from a debtor's point of view. If you
held the mortgage, instead of myself, you would change your view very
quickly."

"I don't think I should," said the farmer, slowly. "I would be
considerate to a poor neighbor, even if it did inconvenience me a
little."

"The poor neighbor should not have borrowed money on which he was unable
to pay interest," said Squire Hudson, severely.

"How could I anticipate the drought that has diminished my crops?" said
Mark Nelson, with spirit.

"That is neither here nor there. You knew that the interest must be
paid, drought or no drought, crop or no crop."

"I cannot argue with you further, since you refuse to consider
circumstances over which I have had no control. You refuse to grant me
any delay?"

"I do."

"Since I have not the money to pay you, will you tell me what you
require?"

"How many cows do you keep?"

"Three."

"You can give me one of these, and I will consider it an equivalent for
the thirty dollars."

"Do you require this?" asked the farmer, uneasily.

"Yes; unless you have some other satisfactory arrangement to propose."

"I am afraid I have nothing else which you would regard as satisfactory.
The loss of a cow will diminish my income. Instead of three, I ought to
have four or five. I shouldn't like to be reduced to two."

"Very likely not; but an honest man is willing to make a sacrifice in
order to meet his just liabilities. Besides, you expect to have the
money, you say, in a couple of months. When it has come, you may have
your cow back, on paying two months' interest on the deferred payment.
That is only fair."

"Say no more, Squire Hudson," said the farmer. "I must, of course,
consent to this arrangement since you insist upon it. How soon do you
wish for the cow?"

"You had better let your son Walter drive it over this afternoon."

"He is losing no time," thought Mark Nelson, bitterly. "He does not even
appear to be willing that I should have the benefit of this night's
milking."

"You may send me Whiteface," continued Squire Hudson, who knew that this
was the most valuable of the three cows.

"That is my best cow," protested the farmer "That makes little
difference, as you expect to redeem it in two months."

Mark Nelson was silent. He felt indignant with Squire Hudson for his
cruel exaction; but he felt that he was in his power, and that he must
submit to his exactions.

"You will attend to this matter?" asked the squire, as he rose and
prepared to go.

"Yes," answered the farmer, coldly.

When his creditor was gone he went into the kitchen and acquainted the
family with what had passed. Great were the grief and indignation of the
children, and Walter expressed a desire that Squire Hudson might lose
all his property as a fitting reward for his meanness.

"Heaven help me if I can't meet the next interest!" said Mark Nelson,
later in the day, to his wife.

"Don't be too much troubled about the future, Mark," said his wife, who
was of a more hopeful temperament than her husband; "I am sure that you
will get some help from Tom before six months are over."

"I hope so," answered her husband; but for the rest of the day he was
very grave.

Walter drove over Whiteface, at his father's request; but he came near
crying, stout boy as he was, at the loss of the faithful animal which
his father had reared from a calf.




CHAPTER XX.

AT SACRAMENTO.


After his escape from the grizzly Tom had no further adventures of an
exciting character. One afternoon he and his companions arrived at
Sacramento. It was but a small settlement, but was more town-like than
any place they had yet seen in California. They drove to a two-story
frame building, which was the chief hotel in the town. Taking the
precaution to inquire the price of board and lodging, they were dismayed
by the extravagance of the charges. Tom saw that his reserve fund of
twenty dollars would scarcely last him forty-eight hours.

"I can't stay here, Mr. Ferguson," he said. "I will take my chances and
camp out, if necessary."

"I agree with you, lad; I'm not inclined to waste my substance on
luxurious living."

"There won't be much luxurious living, I guess," said Ebenezer Onthank,
who, with Yankee curiosity, had already visited the kitchen and obtained
some idea of the fare to be expected. "I kin get better board at Green
Mountain Mills for three dollars a week, and folks are darned glad to
accommodate you for that price. These chaps seem to think and act as if
we were made of money."

"I wish some of your Green Mountain Mills boarding-houses were here,"
said Tom. "I could save plenty of money then."

"Well, gentlemen, do you want to stay here?" inquired the landlord.

"We'd like to, squire, but not bein' millionaires I guess we'll have to
put it off till times are better."

"Just as you say," said the landlord, indifferently. "There's others
waiting for the only room I have empty." Then, noticing for the first
time the express wagon which Tom had left outside, he asked, in a tone
of interest, "Who owns that team?"

"It belongs to this boy and myself," answered Ferguson.

"Where did it come from?"

"The States."

"You don't want to sell, do you?"

Tom was about to reply in the affirmative, but the Scot, more shrewd,
answered indifferently, "We may sell it when we get to San Francisco."

"I need just such a team as that," said the landlord, eagerly. "I'll
give you a good price for it. You can go down the river to Frisco."

"I suppose we might," said Ferguson, slowly, "if it was worth our
while."

"What'll you take, cash down?" inquired the landlord, earnestly.

"Nay, my friend, I prefer to hear your views as to the price."

"I will give you eight hundred dollars for the wagon."

This was certainly an excellent profit, for but three hundred had been
paid for horse and wagon. Tom's heart beat fast with excitement, for he
remembered that one-third of the money would come to him. If it had
depended upon him he would have clinched the bargain at once, but he
wisely left the matter in the hands of his companion and partner.

"That seems a fair offer," said Ferguson; "but I think we may as well
wait till we reach San Francisco. Besides, we want to sell the horse,
too."

"I will give you a thousand dollars for the two," said the landlord.

A man with his pantaloons tucked in his boots, a coarse woolen shirt,
and a wide-brimmed sombrero, which overshadowed a face bearing a beard
of a week's growth, was leaning against the door-post.

"Landlord," said he, "I see your price, and I'll go two hundred better."

Tom stared at the speaker in surprise. He looked like a man who would
have found it hard to raise twelve dollars, yet he had made an offer of
twelve hundred. Our hero did not learn till afterwards that the man had
"struck it rich" at the mines, sold out his claim for ten thousand
dollars, and for the time being was the lucky possessor of a large bank
account.

"Now, Tom Scott," expostulated the landlord, "this ain't fair. I want
the wagon more'n you do, and you're a-raisin' the price on me."

"How do you know that?" drawled Scott. "I've got a pile, and I mean to
take it easy while it lasts. I'm going back to the mines like a
gentleman, with my own team, you bet, if I've got money enough to buy
one."

The landlord was satisfied that, if he wanted the team, he must outbid
his competitor, and advanced his offer to thirteen hundred dollars. But
Tom Scott was not terrified. His money had come easily, and he would not
let two or three hundred dollars stand in the way of his wishes.

"I'll go fifteen," he drawled.

The landlord shrugged his shoulders, and said, in a disappointed tone,
"You'll have to take it, Scott. You've gone ahead of my pile."

"Well, stranger, is it a bargain?" asked Scott.

The Scotchman, though inwardly elated as well as astonished at the
extraordinary offer he had received, answered quietly, "If my partner
agrees."

"I guess we'd better sell," said Tom, trying not to betray his inward
satisfaction.

"All right," said Scott, appearing to be well pleased. "You can have
your money when you want it. If you are going to Frisco, I'll give you
an order on my banker there."

"Tom Scott's a square man, and his order will fetch the money," said the
landlord, observing Ferguson's prudent hesitation.

"That is satisfactory," replied Ferguson.

In five minutes more the business was concluded, and Ferguson and Tom,
longing to congratulate each other on their good fortune, walked off
together.

"We're in luck, Mr. Ferguson," said Tom. "I don't know whether I stand
on my head or my heels. I never expected such a price."

"Twelve hundred dollars is a great profit," said Ferguson. "I almost
doubt whether we are justified in asking such an extortionate price of
the poor man."

"He is pleased with his bargain, and I don't think we need to trouble
ourselves about that," answered Tom. "Besides, you know we can't compare
prices with those at home."

"No doubt there is reason in what you say, my lad; but it's not easy at
first to make allowance for the difference."

"That's so, Mr. Ferguson. When shall we go to San Francisco?"

"We will go to-morrow, if we can. I suppose you will wish to send some
money to your father."

"Yes, I am in a hurry to send to him, for I am sure he needs it already.
I can hardly realize that I am worth five hundred dollars."

"Five hundred?"

"Yes, I had a third share in the team."

"That isn't my way of looking at it, Tom."

"Is it possible Mr. Ferguson would cheat me out of my fair share?"
thought Tom, but he only harbored the suspicion for an instant. He had
seen too much of his friend to believe such a thing, and he quietly
waited for an explanation.

"I'll tell you how I propose that we divide it, Tom. First we'll take
out the money each of us put in, one hundred for you and two hundred for
me, and then we'll divide the profit equally."

"But," protested Tom, "you are entitled to two-thirds."

"Then I won't take it," said Ferguson, decidedly. "I only want half of
the profit. That will give me eight hundred dollars, and that ought to
satisfy me."

"And I shall have seven hundred," said Tom, his eyes sparkling.

"Precisely."

"How kind you are, Mr. Ferguson!" exclaimed Tom, eagerly seizing the
Scotchman's hand.

"No, my lad; I am only just. I am glad to help a boy who is working for
his father and family."

"I shouldn't deserve to succeed if I didn't," said Tom, earnestly.

"Always bear that in mind, my lad, and God will smile on your efforts,
and raise you up friends."

In spite of the high price, Tom and his partner felt justified now in
stopping over night at the hotel where they had met with such a piece of
good luck, and the next day started down the river for San Francisco.




CHAPTER XXI.

TOM BUYS A BUSINESS.


It was an interesting moment for our two friends when they landed in San
Francisco. The future Western metropolis was only a town of scattered
wooden and adobe houses, with irregular streets and a general lack of
uniformity in its buildings; but everybody seemed on the alert. The
number of drones was wonderfully small; even the constitutionally lazy
could not resist the golden incentives to labor. Money was looked upon
with very different eyes there and at the East. No one took the trouble
to dispute prices; and a man who landed with an article rare or
desirable could often obtain twenty times its value. Within ten minutes
of his arrival Tom witnessed a case of this kind.

Just as he was entering Montgomery street he noticed a man--evidently a
new-comer--with a fine bunch of pineapples in his hand. He had just
arrived in the steamer Columbus, then anchored out in the stream.

"I shouldn't mind having one of those pineapples," said Tom to Ferguson.

"Doubtless they are high-priced, being a rarity," said the Scotchman.

Just then a passer-by, attracted like Tom, and feeling a similar
longing, stepped up to the new-comer.

"Are those pineapples for sale?" he asked.

"Yes, if you'll pay enough," was the half-jocular reply.

"Name your price."

"Ten dollars."

"Here is your money;" and he put a gold piece into the hand of the
astounded passenger, which represented ten times the sum he had paid for
the fruit at San Blas.

"That's a pretty steep price," said Tom, "for six pineapples."

"It is very wasteful to spend such a sight of money to pamper the
appetite," said the canny Scot. "Truly, a fool and his money are soon
parted."

He was destined to be still more surprised. The purchaser within five
minutes transferred half his purchase to another for fifteen dollars.

"Gold seems to be plenty here," said Tom.

"I hope all provisions are not as high," said Ferguson, "or we shall
soon have a chance to spend all we have."

"Where shall we go first?" asked Tom.

"We had better go to a public house, and secure a lodging," said
Ferguson.

"I wish I knew some one here to direct me."

Scarcely had Tom uttered these words than he cried out in surprise,
"Why, there's John Miles!"

They were passing a little, unpainted, wooden building, of one and a
half stories, used as a grocery. A German name was on the sign; but
behind the rough counter stood the familiar form of John Miles.

Tom dashed into the store, followed by his more dignified companion.

"How are you, John?" he exclaimed.

"Why, if it isn't Tom," returned Miles, his face showing the joy he
felt. "And here's Mr. Ferguson, too."

Then there ensued a hearty shaking of hands, followed by the question,
"When did you get here?"

"About twenty minutes ago."

"And you came straight to me. That's good."

"So it is; but it's an accident. We had no idea where you were. So you
are a grocer, John. Is the place yours?"

"If it is, then I've changed my name," said Miles, pointing to the sign
bearing the name:--

     JOHN SCHINKELWITZ.

"The first name's right, at any rate," said Tom, laughing. "I suppose
you are the clerk, then."

"Yes."

"How long have you been here?"

"Four weeks."

"Is it a good business?"

"Very good. My Dutch friend pays me five dollars a day, and I sleep
here."

"Among the groceries?"

"Yes; it saves me the expense of a bed outside, and that is a good deal.
I haven't saved quite enough to pay you yet, Tom, but I can soon."

"No hurry, John. I have been lucky since I saw you."

"I am glad to hear it, Tom. Did the claim prove more productive?"

"No; but I have been speculating. Guess how much money I have with me."

"A hundred and fifty dollars."

"More."

"Two hundred."

"More yet."

"Not three hundred, Tom?"

"I won't make you guess any more. I have seven hundred dollars. No
wonder you look surprised. I'll tell you how I made it;" and Tom
repeated the story of his purchase and its profitable sale.

"I am not so much surprised now," said Miles, "for in this country a man
will have what he takes a fancy to, no matter what it costs. I am glad
the good luck came to you and Mr. Ferguson. I shouldn't mind having that
amount of money myself."

"What would you do with it?"

"I would buy out my employer, and then I could make money fast."

"Does he want to sell?"

"Yes, he wants to go to the mines."

"Would he sell for such a small sum?"

"Yes; there isn't much of a stock, but we are constantly replenishing. I
tell you what, Tom, _you_ buy him out, and I'll manage the business."

"Are you in earnest, John?"

"Certainly I am."

"But I want to send some money home," objected Tom.

"How much?"

"A hundred dollars at least."

"I'll lend you the hundred, my lad," said Ferguson, "and fifty more, and
you can take your own money and buy the business. I don't favor acting
hastily, in general, but I have faith in our friend here, and I am led
to believe that the enterprise will be a profitable one."

"You'll be my partner, Tom, and I'll give you a third of the profits
without your doing a thing. If you work with me, you shall have as much
more as will be satisfactory."

"I would rather go back to the mines, John, and leave you to manage this
business by yourself. A quarter of the profits will satisfy me."

"No, it shall be a third. As you furnish the capital, that is only
fair."

"We may be counting our chickens too soon. Perhaps your Dutch friend,
whose name I can't pronounce, won't sell."

"Here he is to speak for himself."

A short German, with a ponderous frame, and a broad, good-humored face,
here entered the grocery, panting with the exertion of walking, and
looked inquiringly at Tom and the Scotchman.

"Herr Schinkelwitz, this is my friend, Tom Nelson," said Miles.

"Glad to see you, mine vriend," said the German, addressing Ferguson.

"No, that is Mr. Ferguson," said Miles, smiling. "I should have
introduced him first."

"Wie gehts, Herr Ferguson?" said the grocer. "You have one strange
name."

"Your name seems strange to me," said the Scotchman.

"Oh, no; Schinkelwitz is a very common name. Most peoples admire my
name."

Tom was considerably amused, but Herr Schinkelwitz did not observe the
smile which he could not repress.

"I have told my friends you would like to sell out the business," said
Miles.

"Oh, ja, it is a good business, but my health is not good. I think it
will be much better at the mines. You will do well to buy it yourself."

"I would if I had money enough."

"Ja, I must have the money, for I shall need it."

"My friend here has money, and may buy of you," said Miles, indicating
Tom.

"What, the boy?"

"Yes."

"Where did he get so much money?"

"At the mines."

"Oh, ja, that is a good place to get gold. Well, my young vriend, I will
sell cheap."

It will not be necessary to enter into a detailed account of the
negotiation. It is enough to say that for the sum of seven hundred
dollars Herr Schinkelwitz made over the business to Herr Tom, as he
called him, and our hero found himself penniless, but the owner of a
grocery. In half an hour it was all completed.

"Now, Tom, you are my boss," said Miles. "Shall I put your name
outside?"

"No, John, put your own. I am only a silent partner, you know."

"I congratulate you, Tom," said Ferguson. "Here are two hundred dollars,
for which you can give me your note."

"Two hundred?"

"Yes; you will need some yourself, besides what you send to your
father."

"Suppose I can't pay you back?"

"Then I will levy on the grocery, my lad," said Ferguson.




CHAPTER XXII.

A GAMBLING-HOUSE.


Having completed this important business arrangement, the two friends
went out to explore the town. The limits were narrow compared with those
of the flourishing city of the present day. Where the Palace and Grand
hotels now stand was a sand-hill, and the bay encroached upon the
business part of the city far more than now.

Scarcely a stone's throw from the grocery, on Montgomery street, between
California and Sacramento, was the office of Adams' Express, which
advertised to forward gold-dust and packages by every steamer.

"I will go in here, Mr. Ferguson," said Tom. "I shall not feel
comfortable till I have started this money homeward. I am sure it will
be wanted."

"Right, my lad. We will attend to it, by all means."

They entered the building,--a very humble one it would now be
considered,--but they found other customers before them, and had to wait
for their turn.

"What can I do for you?" asked the clerk, in a quick, business-like
tone.

"I want to send home a hundred dollars," said Tom.

"Give me the address."

This was done, the money paid over, and a receipt returned in two
minutes.

"How long before my father will receive the money?" asked Tom.

"The steamer starts in three days. About a month will be needed."

Then Tom moved aside, and the next man took his place.

"I am glad that is attended to," said Tom, relieved. "Now, Mr. Ferguson,
I will go wherever you wish."

"We had better secure a lodging," said the Scotchman. "When we are sure
of a bed we can walk about at our leisure."

Lodgings were to be had, but they were generally very dear. The first
room looked at was five dollars per day, without board,--a price our
friends were unwilling to pay. Finally they found a decent, though small
room, with rather a narrow bed, which could be had for three fifths of
that sum, and they engaged it.

"We will have to go back to the mines soon," said Tom. "San Francisco is
too expensive for us to live in."

"You can afford it better than I, Tom," said his friend.

"Why?"

"Because you have a business that brings you in an income."

"Oh, I forgot that," said our hero, smiling. "Things happen so fast here
that I haven't got used to my new position. Do you think I invested my
money wisely, Mr. Ferguson?"

"Yes, my lad, since your agent is a trustworthy, honest man."

"I am sure I can trust John Miles."

"If I were not confident of it, also, I would not have encouraged you to
take so important a step."

"I think I won't write to father about it," said Tom, after a pause. "He
might think I had acted foolishly, and become anxious. If I succeed,
then I shall be glad to surprise him. I think I shall make money; but I
don't want to count on it too much. I shall be ready to go back with you
to the mines whenever you say the word."

As they sauntered about, gazing curiously at the motley sights around
them, they heard strains of music. It appeared to proceed from a large
wooden building, with a jutting roof, under which, on benches, lounged a
number of persons, some of them Mexicans, in their native costumes,
smoking cigarettes. A large American flag was displayed over the door,
and a crowd was constantly passing in and out.

"Let us go in," said Tom.

His companion making no objection, they entered. The first sight of the
interior made clear the character of the place. There were numerous
tables, spread with games,--faro, monte, and roulette,--each surrounded
by an absorbed and interested group. "Easy come, easy go," was the rule
with the early California pioneers, and the gaming-table enlisted in its
service many men who would not have dreamed at home that they could ever
be brought to tolerate such an instrument of evil.

Tom was a country boy, and unsophisticated, but he could not help
understanding the nature of the business which brought so many to the
place.

"I suppose they are gambling," he said.

"Yes, poor, deluded creatures!" said the Scotchman, who had been brought
up to an abhorrence of games of chance. "They are wasting their time and
their substance, and foolishly laying up for themselves future misery."

Had this remark been heard it would have excited indignation, and
perhaps subjected the speaker to insult; but the players were too
intent upon their varying chances to pay any attention to the remarks of
by-standers.

"I hope, Tom, you will never yield to the seductive lures of the
gaming-table," continued Ferguson.

"I don't think there is much danger," said Tom. "I have always been
taught that gambling is wicked."

"May you long feel so, my lad!"

Tom did, however, watch the players with interest. He saw money lost and
won, without understanding exactly how it was decided. From the game his
attention was drawn to the gamesters. He was led to notice,
particularly, a young man of prepossessing countenance, who was
evidently profoundly excited. From time to time he drew out a roll of
gold pieces, which he placed on a card, and invariably lost. He must
have had a considerable sum; but, small or large, he was in ill-luck,
and constantly lost. As he neared the end of his resources the feverish
blush upon his handsome features was succeeded by a deep pallor, and
there was no mistaking the expression of deep anguish and despair which
announced that he had reached the end.

Tom became painfully interested in the young man, and silently drew the
attention of his companion to him. When the end came, and the victim,
thoroughly "cleaned out," turned to go out, Tom said, in a low voice,
"Let us follow him."

Ferguson acquiesced. He, too, had become interested, and the young man's
expression as he passed our two friends was so despairing that Ferguson
felt some alarm as to the effect of his disappointment upon his mind.

Once in the street, Ferguson and Tom followed the unfortunate young man
into an obscure street, keeping up with difficulty, for his pace was
rapid and excited. It proved to be a fortunate thing, for when he
supposed himself free from observation the young man drew a pistol, and,
with an incoherent exclamation, placed it in contact with his temple.

Tom sprang forward, and so did the Scotchman; but the boy was the
quicker and more agile, and dashed the pistol aside just in time to
prevent a suicide.

"Why did you do that?" asked the baffled would-be-suicide, gloomily,
turning his gaze upon Tom.

"I was afraid you were going to kill yourself."

"So I was."

"What could induce you to take such a rash step?" asked Ferguson.

"I have been a reckless fool. I have lost all my money at the accursed
gambling-table, and my life is not worth retaining."

"It appears to me," said the Scotchman, quietly, "that you set too high
a value upon money. You have certainly been very foolish to risk it at
the gaming-table, and the loss will no doubt inconvenience you; but was
your money all you had to live for?"

The young man regarded Ferguson with some surprise; but his excitement
was evidently abated. The quiet tone of the speaker had a favorable
effect upon him.

"I didn't think of it in that light," he admitted.

"Have you no relatives to whom your life is of value?"

"Yes," answered the young man. "I have a mother and sister."

"Would not your death affect them more than the loss of money?"

"Yes."

"It seems to me that to take your life would be to treat them cruelly."

The young man was evidently agitated by contending thoughts.

"I suppose you are right," he said, slowly; "but let me tell you all,
and you can judge me better: I arrived in California six months since.
My home is in Ohio, not far from Cincinnati. I was fortunate enough to
commence mining at a point on the western slope of the Sierra Nevada
Mountains where I was almost alone. I 'struck it rich,' and two days
since arrived in San Francisco with over two thousand dollars in
gold-dust."

"You were certainly in luck," said Ferguson, surprised.

"I turned it into money, and, in strolling about the city, was lured
into that accursed den. I looked on and was fascinated. I thought I
would try my luck. I began with a small stake, and kept on till I had
lost every dollar. In one hour the fruits of six months' labor are gone.
Do you wonder that I am reduced to despair?"




CHAPTER XXIII.

A NEW SCHEME.


"I see no cause for despair," replied Ferguson, in the same calm tone.

"I have not a penny left out of the two thousand dollars I had only an
hour since."

"I understand all that."

"I am a ruined man," said the young man, despondently.

"I don't admit that. How old are you?"

"Twenty-one."

"You are well and strong, are you not?"

"Oh, yes, I have nothing to complain of on that score."

"Then it appears to me that your loss is not serious. Your capital still
remains."

"My capital?" repeated the young man.

"Yes; your strong arms, your education, your capacity to labor."

"But I shall have to begin over again."

"Beginning over again at your age, when, possibly, fifty years of life
lie before you, is not such a serious matter. Were I in your
situation,--and I am twice as old as you,--I should not thing of
despairing. Don't you think it would be rather foolish for two thousand
dollars, which you have been only six months in accumulating, to throw
away fifty years, and all that you can make in that time, thereby
bringing a life-long grief to your mother and sister?"

The calm, logical tone of the Scotchman had its effect.

"I see that I was about to add to one piece of folly another far
greater," said the young man. "I don't know who you are, sir, but I
heartily thank you and your son for saving my life."

"This is not my son, but my young friend, Thomas Nelson," said Ferguson.
"I am not so fortunate as to have a son."

"Well, God bless you both, and good-night!"

"Excuse my persistency, but may I ask where you are going?"

"I am not going to repeat my folly of just now, if that is what you
mean."

"I did not suspect you of that; but are you sure of a bed anywhere?"

"No; I have no money to pay for one. I shall walk the streets, or
possibly lie down in some quiet place. I was accustomed to roughing it
at the mines, and can do it again if necessary."

"Tom and I have a room in which you are welcome to find a shelter. I am
sorry that our bed is too narrow to hold another."

"Thank you. That will be better than to sleep in the streets. But are
you not afraid to make me this offer?"

"Why should I be?"

"I might rob you during the night."

"You might, but you don't look like one who would so reward confidence."

"You are right. If you had fifty thousand dollars I would not touch a
dollar of it. I will accept your offer. How can I repay you for your
kindness?"

"There may be a way. We will talk of that this evening."

Nine o'clock found the three collected in the small room which had been
hired by Ferguson for himself and Tom.

"My friend," said Ferguson, "you told us that you found a favorable
place for mining up in the Sierras."

"Yes, I 'struck it rich.'"

"I take it for granted that you did not exhaust the wealth of the
place?"

"Far from it. I only dipped into it. There is abundance left."

"Is this place known to many?"

"To only one, so far as I know. He and I worked independently, but were
company for each other."

"But what induced you to leave so rich a claim?"

"I was tired of working, and wanted to come to the city for a change.
You know what a change I have experienced here."

"Why don't you go back and start anew in the place where you met with
your former good fortune?" asked Ferguson.

"Because I am penniless. I must find something to do here for a while.
When I have got together a little fund, sufficient for the purpose, I
will go back."

"Would you go back now, if you had the chance?"

"Would I? Certainly I would, for I could make money faster there than
here."

"Would you have any objection to let Tom and myself accompany you?"

"Not the least. I should be glad of your company. There is gold enough
for us all."

"Then we will start to-morrow, that is, if you and Tom are willing."

"I am ready," said Tom, promptly.

"But I have nothing. I don't like to be an expense to you," objected the
young man.

"We will pay your expenses. We shall be more than recompensed by the
richness of the mines. We might find something to do here, but both Tom
and myself prefer the freedom of the mining camp, and, if the spot is
as rich as you have led us to suspect, we shall make more money there."

"Agreed!" said the young man, promptly. "Name the hour of starting, and
rely upon me to be ready."

Ferguson was evidently well pleased with this response. He felt that his
new acquaintance would be so far away from the city, and would sooner
retrieve his fortunes at the mines. He hoped, too, to find opportunity
to strengthen his principles, and guard him against the temptations of
the city when he should again visit it. Again, he had reason to think
that the arrangement would benefit Tom and himself in a pecuniary way,
and the Scotchman was by no means indifferent to that consideration;
though, as we have seen, he did not unduly exalt the power or value of
money.

Tom, too, was pleased with the prospect. He was grateful and attached to
Ferguson, whom he felt to be a true friend, but he was glad to have
another companion nearer his own age. The young man was of a
prepossessing exterior, and when he had shaken off his present
disquietude looked as if he might be a cheerful and agreeable companion.

"Since we are to live together, for a time at least, and become
fellow-workers," said Ferguson, "we ought to know each other better. I
will introduce myself first."

Hereupon Ferguson gave a brief account of himself, which need not be
repeated, and then called upon Tom, who followed his example.

"Now it is my turn," said their new acquaintance. "You don't even know
my name yet, though you have done me such an important service. I have
already told you that I am from Ohio. My name is Richard Russell, though
my friends generally call me Dick. My father, whom I had the misfortune
to lose several years since, was at one time a member of Congress. He
left a small property, the income of which is barely sufficient to
provide my mother and sister with the comforts of life. I had a fair
education, including enough Latin and Greek to fit me for entering
college. My mother desired me to enter; but I knew that she could not
keep me there without practicing pinching economy, and I secured a place
with a small salary in a business house in Cincinnati. A year since,
when the papers were full of the gold discoveries on this coast, I was
seized, like so many others, with the golden fever, and arranged to
start overland. It would have proved a wise step had I not been so rash
a fool as to squander my earnings; for two thousand dollars in six
months compare very favorably with twelve dollars a week, which I was
earning at home. I might have gone home by the next steamer, and had
money enough to carry me through a course of legal study, had I desired.
I am out of patience with myself when I think of how I have thrown away
my good fortune."

"Don't think too much of the past, which cannot be recalled. Resolve not
to repeat your folly, and all may yet be well."

"I have fully resolved upon that," said Russell, earnestly.

"Do you think you shall study law, if you are again fortunate, Mr.
Russell?" asked Tom.

"If you please don't call me Mr. Russell, unless you want me to call you
Mr. Nelson. Call me Dick."

"I will," said Tom, smiling, "for I am not ready to be called Mr. Nelson
yet."

"Now, to answer your question: if I can get two thousand dollars
together again, I shall probably study law. Of course I don't mean to be
a miner all my life any more than you. Now, Tom, what are your plans?"

"I think I should like to be a lawyer, too, but I must earn more than
two thousand dollars first."

"Two thousand ought to be sufficient to educate you if you are
economical."

"It would be, but I want to pay off a mortgage on my father's farm
before I begin to lay up money for myself."

"You are a good fellow, Tom, and I wish you success."

"Thank you, Dick. I will succeed if hard work can bring success."

"Good-night to you both," said Ferguson. "I want to sleep well to
prepare myself for starting to-morrow."

In half an hour all three were sleeping soundly.




CHAPTER XXIV.

PREPARING FOR A NEW START.


When Tom opened his eyes he did not at first remember where he was, but
a glance at Dick Russell, his new acquaintance, stretched out on the
floor and still sleeping, quickly recalled the important events of the
day previous. Mr. Ferguson was already dressed.

"Well, Tom, are you rested?" he asked.

"Yes, Mr. Ferguson; I slept like a top. What time is it?"

"It is seven o'clock. Our new friend is still asleep."

"I suppose he was on his feet all day yesterday."

"I don't know whether I ought to hurry you away from San Francisco so
soon, Tom," said his Scotch friend. "We only arrived yesterday, and you
have not had time to see the place, and enjoy yourself after your hard
work at the mines."

"I don't care for that, Mr. Ferguson. I am anxious to be at work again.
I didn't come out here to enjoy myself, but to make money for my
father."

"You have succeeded pretty well thus far, Tom."

"Yes; but I have made more by the sale of the team than by work at the
mines."

"True; but that is a legitimate transaction. If our friend here has
reported correctly, we shall find mining more profitable in the place he
mentions than at River Bend."

"I have no objection to that, though I was satisfied with River Bend.
Wouldn't it be splendid, Mr. Ferguson, if we could do as well in the
next six months as he did?"

"Making two thousand dollars each?"

"Yes."

"We may accomplish it; but it is best not to calculate upon it."

"If I could only free the farm from that troublesome mortgage I should
be proud and happy. It has worn upon father, as I could see, and he has
been compelled to toil early and late to pay the interest, besides
supporting us all."

"How much is the mortgage, Tom?"

"Twenty-two hundred dollars."

"You have made a good beginning towards it already, Tom. You have seven
hundred dollars invested in business."

"But out of that I owe you a hundred and fifty, Mr. Ferguson."

"Don't trouble yourself about that, Tom. Unless I should stand in great
need of it, I will wait till you have paid off the mortgage before
asking to have it repaid."

"You are very kind, Mr. Ferguson," said Tom, gratefully. "A part of my
seven hundred dollars rightfully belongs to you, for you owned
two-thirds of the horse and wagon."

"I couldn't have bought them without your help, Tom. So you see that you
enabled me to make money. I am quite satisfied with an equal
partnership."

"And I am very well satisfied with my partner," said Tom, smiling.
"Shall we wake up Russell?"

"Yes, for we have much to do to-day."

"John Miles will be surprised at my leaving the city so quick."

"By the way, Tom, as he is to remain here, while you are out of the
reach of post-offices, it may be well to ask your father to direct
future letters to his care, and he can forward them as he has
opportunity."

"That is a good idea. I will write to-day so as to catch the next
steamer, and I will also speak to John."

Tom had to shake Dick Russell energetically before that young man opened
his eyes.

"What's the matter?" he ejaculated, drowsily.

"Don't you want some breakfast?" asked Tom.

"Oh, it's you, Tom! Yes, you have touched the right chord. I have a
first-class appetite--and no money," he added, his face clouding.

"Mr. Ferguson is treasurer," said Tom, lightly, wishing to divert
Russell from the thoughts of his heavy loss, and the folly to which he
owed it; "but we know very little of the city. Can you guide us to a
good restaurant?"

"To a good one, but not a cheap one. Everything is high here."

"Then it is fortunate we are going to leave so soon."

In a small restaurant, on Montgomery street, our three friends partook
of a hearty breakfast. It might not have attracted an epicure, but
neither of the three was fastidious; and, though the charge was five
dollars, Ferguson, economical as he was, paid the bill cheerfully. It
was the first "civilized" breakfast he had eaten for months, and it
might be months before he would be able to partake of another as good.

"I wish we could breakfast like this at the mines," said Tom.

"So say I," chimed in Dick Russell; "but you know that the gold-hunter
must sacrifice home comforts."

"I shan't complain of that, if I can do as well as you did," said Tom.

"I see no reason why you can't. There is plenty of gold there, and all
that is needed is work and perseverance."

"I am willing to contribute them," said Tom. "I mean to do my best to
succeed."

"None of us can do more, my lad," said Ferguson. "Let us hope that God
will prosper our undertakings."

"I say, I am glad I have met with you two," said Dick Russell. "You'll
keep me on the right track; and, in spite of my past folly, I hope in
time to win success."

"I am glad to hear you speak so sensibly, my young friend," said the
Scotchman, kindly. "It's a great deal better to put your back to the
wheel once more, than to take the life God gave you."

"Don't speak of that again, Mr. Ferguson," said Russell, shuddering. "I
don't like to think of it."

"He'll do," thought Ferguson, with satisfaction. "His mind is now in a
healthy condition, and I have great hopes of him."

The rest of the day was devoted to the purchase of supplies. Ferguson
also bought a mule, in behalf of the party, which was of service in
carrying a part of their burdens. It was not until afternoon that Tom
found an opportunity to call on John Miles, and acquaint him with his
almost immediate departure.

"I am sorry you are going away so soon, Tom," said Miles. "I thought you
would stay at least a week."

"So I would if I were not so anxious to be at work once more. You know
how my father is situated, John, for I have told you more than once."

"Yes, Tom; but I see no reason why you should feel uneasy. With the help
you are to send him, there will be no trouble about his paying his
interest regularly."

"I know that, John; but I shall feel uneasy until the mortgage is paid
off, and he is out of Squire Hudson's power."

"For how long a time has the farm your father owns been encumbered with
this mortgage?"

"For ten years, at least."

"Is the mortgage for any specified term of years?"

"I don't think so."

"It merely runs from year to year then?"

"I suppose so."

"In that case this Squire Hudson could foreclose at any time, could he
not?"

"Yes," answered Tom, soberly.

"Don't make yourself uneasy about it, however," said Miles, observing
that Tom seemed apprehensive. "As your father's farm is not particularly
valuable, there can be no danger of foreclosure. By the way, wouldn't
you like to have me remit your father something next month out of the
profits of the business?--I can charge it to your account."

"I am glad you mentioned it, John. You may send him fifty or
seventy-five dollars, if my share should amount to so much."

"I will."

"And I am going to have my home letters directed to your care. You can
forward them to me whenever you have an opportunity."

"I won't fail, Tom. If there is anything you need sent out to you, you
have only to write me, and I will attend to your commissions."

"It is very convenient to have an agent in the city," said John,
smiling. "I shall feel much more comfortable out at the mines."

"I wish you good luck, Tom; but remember, even if you don't succeed in
your search for gold, I shall be making money for you here."

"You make me feel quite like a capitalist, John."

"I hope you may be one some day. Good-by!"

They shook hands and parted. Before night-fall Tom had started on his
new journey in quest of gold.




CHAPTER XXV.

WHITEFACE.


Mark Nelson missed sorely the cow which he had been compelled to yield
to the squire on account of default of interest. Whiteface was his best
cow, and a great favorite with all the children. She gave nearly as much
milk as the other two, and had been one of the main dependences of the
family. It was worth considerably more than the thirty dollars for which
the squire took it; but he insisted upon that and no other, and
Whiteface had to go.

Six months had passed, and there seemed to be very little chance of
redeeming the lost cow. Squire Hudson had agreed to give her back on
payment of the balance due, with accrued interest; but neither he nor
Mark Nelson expected that such an offer would be made.

"I was passing Squire Hudson's to-day, and saw poor Whiteface," said
Walter, one evening. "I think she knew me, for when I called her she
lowed back."

"I wish we had her back," said Sarah. "It was heartless in the squire to
take her. He had a dozen cows of his own."

"He hasn't any heart," said Walter, "or, if he has, it must be pretty
small."

"We must not forget that he was entitled to some security for the
balance of interest I owe him," said the farmer.

"The cow was worth a good deal more than thirty dollars," said Sarah.

"Yes, she was; but I am not sure whether I could have got any more money
for her at a forced sale. Then you know the squire is pledged to give
her back whenever I can pay him the thirty dollars, with interest."

"I wish you could pay it now, father," said Walter.

"So do I, my boy; but I cannot, unless your brother sends me some
money."

"It is three weeks since we have heard from Tom," said Mrs. Nelson,
anxiously. "I am afraid he is sick."

"Don't worry yourself with imaginary fears, Mary," said her husband.
"Tom may be sick, of course; but he is strong and healthy, and we won't
fear such a thing without some ground. Probably a letter is on the way
from him now."

"I hope he is making money," said Walter. "I wish I were with him."

"I would never consent to have you go too," said Mrs. Nelson, hastily.

"I don't think Walter seriously thinks of asking leave," said Mr.
Nelson, smiling. "As he is only thirteen years old, I should be inclined
to object myself. I must have him at home to help me with the farm."

"I should be perfectly contented to stay at home if we had Whiteface
back," said Walter. "I've a great mind to steal her out of the squire's
yard. I bet she'd be glad to come."

"Don't speak in that way, Walter," said his father. "I dislike to have
you speak of stealing, even in fun."

At this moment there was a knock at the front door. Farmer Nelson's
house was an old-fashioned one, and not provided with a bell.

"Go to the door, Sarah," said her father.

Sarah obeyed.

"Good-evening, Nahum," she said to the village expressman.

"I've got a small package for your folks," said Nahum. "It's marked all
over. Guess it came from Californy."

"It must be from Tom," exclaimed Sarah, in delight.

"That's what I thought," said the expressman, who knew everybody in the
village, and could probably give a fairly correct list of their sisters,
cousins, and aunts, with a fair guess at their worldly circumstances.

"Is there anything to pay, Nahum?"

"Only fifty cents,--the expressage from Boston. Never mind about it now,
for I'm in a hurry. Your father can hand it to me next time he sees me."

"O father, here's a package from Tom," said Sarah, hurrying into the
room where they were all sitting.

"Open it quick," said Walter. "See if there's any money in it."

The cord was cut, and a small box was disclosed containing a hundred
dollars in gold pieces and a line from Tom, stating that he was doing
well, and that he hoped soon to send some more money.

"A hundred dollars! What a lot of money!" exclaimed Walter, gazing on
the little pile of coins as if fascinated.

"I am so glad the dear boy is doing well," said Mrs. Nelson.

"Now we can have Whiteface back, can't we, father?" asked Walter,
joyfully.

"Yes, Walter," said Mark Nelson, almost as excited as his son. "I will
go over the first thing in the morning."

"Can't we go over this evening?" asked Walter, impatiently.

"No, it is dark, and Whiteface is stalled for the night."

"You'll have seventy dollars left over, father, won't you?"

"Yes; and that will provide for my next interest. I feel grateful and
happy at Tom's success and his thoughtfulness."

Could Tom have seen the effect of his remittance it would have made his
heart glad, and he would have felt abundantly repaid for his labor and
self-denial.




CHAPTER XXVI.

SQUIRE HUDSON'S DISAPPOINTMENT.


If Whiteface was missed at her old home, she was scarcely less
appreciated by her new possessor. On the very morning succeeding the day
when Tom's remittance was received the squire remarked to his head
workman, "Whiteface is an excellent cow, Abner."

"Yes, squire, I calculate she's the best you've got."

"I don't know but she is, Abner," said the squire, complacently. "I
consider her worth at least fifty dollars."

"So she is, every cent of it."

"And she cost me only thirty," thought Squire Hudson, with a smile of
content.

He was a rich man, and abundantly able to pay his poor neighbor the full
value of the cow; but somehow it never occurred to him to do it. He was
not above taking an unfair advantage of a man who was unluckily in his
power. Of course the squire knew that Farmer Nelson had a right to
redeem the cow at the price agreed upon with interest; but he felt
pretty safe on this point. The farmer was not very likely to have thirty
dollars to spare, and as for a remittance from Tom the squire was pretty
sure none would be received.

"It'll be all the boy can do to take care of himself out there," he
reflected, "let alone sending money home. He may send ten dollars or so
some time; but it's very doubtful, very doubtful!"

Squire Hudson turned to go back to the house when he saw the man of whom
he had been thinking coming up the road. He stopped short, thinking the
farmer might wish to speak to him.

"Good-morning, Mr. Nelson," he said, pleasantly, for he was in
good-humor.

"Good-morning, squire."

"Your Whiteface has got to feel quite at home in my barn-yard."

"She is a good cow, Squire Hudson."

"Yes, tolerable, tolerable."

"She is worth more than the thirty dollars for which you took her."

"Well, I don't know about that. Cows are pretty cheap nowadays."

"I see how it is," thought the squire. "Nelson wants me to allow him
more for the cow; but a bargain is a bargain, and I shan't do it."

"I always valued her at a considerably higher price."

"No doubt, no doubt. You raised her yourself, didn't you?"

"Yes."

"That makes a difference, of course. You attach a sentimental value to
her; but that doesn't affect her real value. I really can't allow you
any more for her."

"I don't want you to, Squire Hudson."

The squire looked astonished.

"What is the man driving at?" he thought.

"She may not be worth any more to you, and so you won't mind my taking
her back."

"Taking her back!" ejaculated the squire.

"Certainly; it was agreed that I could redeem her at any time, by paying
you the thirty dollars and interest."

"Not after two months," said the squire, hastily.

"It is not two months. It was only six weeks yesterday. The fact is,
squire, I've come for Whiteface, and I've got the money for you."

"Have you heard from Tom?" asked the squire, with a blank look of
disappointment.

"Yes; I heard from him yesterday."

"And he sent you some money?"

"Yes; he reports that he is doing well."

"Did he send you thirty dollars?"

"Rather more than that," said Mark Nelson, not caring to gratify the
curiosity of his creditor.

"I think you had better keep your money, and leave Whiteface with me,"
said Squire Hudson, after a pause.

"I would rather not, squire. The fact is, Whiteface is a sort of pet at
home, and we all want her back."

Squire Hudson was disconcerted. He had not expected that Mr. Nelson
would be able to redeem the cow, and he was reluctant to give her up.
But there was no excuse for retaining her. His agreement stood in the
way.

"Neighbor Nelson," he said, after a pause, "I don't mind giving you five
dollars over and above what you owe me for Whiteface. Come, that's a
good offer."

Mark Nelson shook his head.

"She's worth more than that," he said. "But that's neither here nor
there. I raised the animal, and it was sorely against my will that I
parted with her six weeks ago. Now that I have the money to pay you I
want her back."

"I think you are standing in your own light, Mr. Nelson," said the
squire. "I have taken a fancy to the cow, and am willing to pay more for
her than she is worth. I will say ten dollars."

Mark Nelson shook his head.

"I'd rather have Whiteface than the money," he said.

"If she comes into my possession again," said Squire Hudson, "I shall
not be willing to grant you the privilege of redeeming her. It won't be
many months before another payment becomes due."

"I hope to be ready to meet it, squire," said the farmer, not appearing
at all anxious.

"He seems very independent," thought the squire, watching, moodily, the
cow driven away by her former owner. "He may sing another tune on
interest day. I wonder how much the boy sent home."

Had he known that Mr. Nelson had in his pocket enough money to pay the
whole of the next accruing interest, he would have felt more doubtful
about recovering the cow which he now coveted more than ever.

"Well, Abner, I've lost her," said the squire, hurrying to his
assistant; "but she'll be back here some day, mark my words!"

"I thought you bought her, squire," said Abner, in surprise.

"Well, not exactly. I took her for a debt; but Nelson had the right of
redeeming her, and he has done it. His boy sent him the money."

"That Tom Nelson is a smart boy," said Abner, who, though in the
squire's employ, was friendly to our hero.

"Well, so-so," remarked the squire, indifferently. "I helped him to go
to California; but I am not sure whether it was a wise step. I let my
feelings get the better of my judgment."

"Then it is the first time," was Abner's unspoken comment.

"It may turn out for the best," he said aloud.

"I doubt if I shall ever see my money again," said the squire; but he
did not seem to take it to heart, judging from his manner and tone.

"Didn't you have security for the loan?" asked Abner.

"Well, ye-es," answered the squire, slowly; "but not very good. The farm
was already mortgaged for its full value."

"The squire is getting benevolent," thought Abner, "or he wants me to
think so; but I'm inclined to think he has some object under it all.
What is it?"

A few weeks later Farmer Nelson's heart was gladdened by the receipt of
another remittance this time sent by John Miles, out of the profit of
the business in which Tom was his partner. The amount this time was
seventy-five dollars. It made him feel quite rich.

"Mary," he said, "we all need some new clothes, and I propose to use
this money for that purpose. Now I want you to consider how we can spend
it to the best advantage. To begin with, you must buy a new dress. You
have long needed one."

Mrs. Nelson demurred a little, but was forced to admit that the dress
was needed. So the purchases were made at once. It is wonderful how far
seventy-five dollars will go in an economical family of plain tastes. It
was soon apparent to the neighbors that the Nelsons were exhibiting
signs of prosperity.

"It must be Tom," they decided.

Efforts were made to ascertain just how much our hero had sent home; but
on this point the Nelsons would not speak definitely. They reported in
general terms that Tom was doing well.

Of course Squire Hudson was not ignorant of the apparent improvement in
the fortunes of his debtor. Strange to say, he seemed rather annoyed. He
was pleased, however, by the outlay for dress.

"They're getting extravagant, Abner," he said, cheerfully. "I thought
Mark Nelson was a man of more sense. Because his son has sent home a
little money, he must rig out the whole family in new clothes. 'A fool
and his money are soon parted.'"

"Mark Nelson is no fool," said Abner, stoutly.

"He is in this instance," said the squire, sharply. "However, I don't
object to it, if he likes to violate the rules of prudence. It strikes
me, however, that it would be well for him to pay up the money I
advanced for Tom's expenses, before buying new clothes wholesale."

Abner repeated this to Mr. Nelson.

The farmer answered quietly, "The squire is not wholly wrong. It is good
doctrine to pay your debts before you spend money for what you don't
need. In this case, however, we did need the clothes we bought. Now that
we are provided, I hope, before very long, if Tom is prospered, to pay
back the two hundred dollars the squire advanced for him."

"I hope you will, I'm sure," said Abner. "That's a smart boy of yours,
and I always said so."

"He is a good boy, and I am sure he will do what is right."

"He's a blamed sight better than the squire's boy. Sinclair is a
stuck-up jackanapes, and it would do me good to kick him."

"It might not do him any good."

"I am not sure about that; I think he needs it."




CHAPTER XXVII.

THE NEW DIGGINGS.


Meanwhile Tom and his party, pursuing their journey by easy stages, for
they sensibly determined not to overtask their strength, reached at last
the spot of which Russell had spoken. Ferguson and Tom soon found that
he had not exaggerated. The new diggings were certainly far richer than
those at River Bend. It was, in fact, the bed of a dead river upon which
Russell had stumbled without knowing it. My readers are probably aware
that in the beds of rivers or creeks the early miners found their first
harvest of gold, and, that, where practicable, these were mined by
turning the stream in the dry season, when the water was low. As it may
not be so well understood what is meant by a dead river, I quote a
passage from an article in the "Overland Monthly," as found in the pages
of the "Pacific Coast Mining Review," for the year 1878-79:--

"A dead river is one which formerly existed, but exists no longer. In
volcanic regions it sometimes happens that the liquid lava, seeking the
lowest ground, fills up the beds of the rivers which die and are
replaced by water-courses running in other channels and in different
directions. These dead streams are so few, and of so little importance
elsewhere, that, as yet, I believe, no class name has been given to
them; but in California they are among the chief source of its mineral
wealth, and among the most remarkable features of its geological
formation. They take us back to a remote era, before the time of Rome,
of Greece, or of Egypt; far back beyond the origin of history or
tradition, before our coast had taken its present shapes; before Shasta,
and Lassen, and Castle Peaks had poured out their lava floods; before
the Sacramento river had its birth; and while, if not before, the
mastodon, the elephant, the rhinoceros, the horse, the mammoth bull, the
tapir, and the bison lived in the land. They are indeed among the most
remarkable discoveries of the age, and among the greatest wonders of
geology. They deserve some common name, and we have to choose between
'extinct' and 'dead.' We speak of 'extinct volcanoes,' and of 'dead
languages,' and, as the latter is Saxon and short, we prefer it. They
have been called 'old channels;' but this name does not convey the
proper idea, since a channel is not necessarily a river, and an old
channel is not necessarily a dead one. A dead river is a channel
formerly occupied by a running stream, but now filled up with earthy or
rocky matter, and is not to be confounded with a channel that is open
and remains dry during the greater part of the year because of a lack of
water, or that has been abandoned by the stream for a deeper channel
elsewhere. A dry river-bed is not a dead river.

"The dead rivers of California, so far as are known, are on the western
slope of the Sierra Nevada, from five hundred to seven thousand feet
above the level of the sea. They are all gold-yielding, and therefore
they have been sought and examined. They have yielded probably _three
hundred millions_ in all; they now produce perhaps eight million dollars
annually. They are not less interesting to the miner than to the
geologist, not less important to the statesman than to the antiquarian."

At the risk of being considered tedious by some of my boy-readers, I
will transcribe the writer's explanation of the existence of these dead
rivers. For the reason we must go back to a remote geological epoch:
"The main cause must have been the subsequent rise of the Sierra Nevada.
Suppose that a range of mountains, seven thousand feet high, were
upheaved thirty miles east of the Mississippi; that the bed of that
stream were on the mountain side, three thousand feet above the sea, and
that thirty miles west the country maintained its present level; the
result would be that the present Mississippi would soon be a dead river;
it would be cut across by streams running down the mountain side, and
flowing into a new Mississippi, thirty miles or more west of the present
one. We know that the Sierra Nevada has been upheaved; that a large
stream ran on what is now the mountain side, and that it has been
succeeded by a new river farther west, and we must infer that the death
of the old and the birth of the new river were caused by the upheaval."

Reference is here made to the Big Blue Lead, the largest dead river
known in California, which has been traced for a distance of sixty-five
miles, from Little Grizzly, in Sierra County, to Forest Hill, in Placer
County. The original river, however, is thought to have run for many
hundreds of miles. Eventually traces of its existence may be found
elsewhere.

It is not to be supposed that Tom and his friends knew anything about
dead rivers, or troubled themselves as to how the rich deposits had been
made, or how long they had been waiting discovery. They were chiefly
engaged with more practical considerations. They found a rich harvest in
the ravines, and they went to work energetically.

The work was monotonous, and a detailed account of their progress would
be tiresome. What we chiefly care about is results, and these may be
gathered from a conversation which took place some five months later.

Under a tent, at night-fall, reclined the three friends. They looked
contented, and on good terms with the world; but, though prosperous,
they certainly did not look it. In fact, they were all three
exceedingly, almost disreputably, shabby. They looked more like tramps
than respectable gold-miners.

"Tom, you are looking very ragged," said Dick Russell, surveying our
hero critically.

"I know it, Dick. I feel as though I had just come out of a rag-bag. I
can't say that you look much better, nor Ferguson either."

"This rough work is hard on clothing," said Russell. "I wish there were
a ready-made clothing store near by."

"So do I. I would pay a high price for a good suit."

"If our friends at home could see us, what would they think, eh, Tom?"

"That we were candidates for the poor-house."

"That's so. I've been into several poor-houses in the course of my life,
but I never saw any of the inmates quite so poorly clad as we are."

"You are right," said Ferguson; "but there are generally compensations.
I was taking account of stock, and I estimate that I have from sixteen
to eighteen hundred dollars' worth of gold-dust."

"I have nearly as much," said Tom.

"My pile won't vary far from Tom's," said Russell.

"That is a pretty good showing for five months, my friend," said the
Scotchman.

"It will make up for the old clothes," said Tom.

"I have been thinking," said Ferguson, "that we need a vacation. What do
you say to starting next week for San Francisco?"

"I agree," said Russell, promptly.

"And I," said Tom. "I should like to see John Miles."

"Very well. We will continue our work about a week longer, and then
start."




CHAPTER XXVIII.

A RICH DEPOSIT.


About the middle of the next forenoon Tom suddenly stopped work.

"What's the matter, Tom? Are you tired?"

"No, but I feel like exploring a little. Who goes with me?"

"Not I," answered Ferguson. "Let well enough alone."

"I'll go with you," said Russell. "I should like a holiday. Besides, we
may discover something."

"'A rolling stone gathers no moss,'" said Ferguson.

"True, but there's another proverb: 'All work and no play makes Jack a
dull boy.' Tom and I will try a little play."

The two friends sauntered away in an idle mood; yet, combining business
with pleasure, they watched carefully the surface indications, ready to
avail themselves of any that were favorable.

"It's a strange life we are leading, Tom," said Russell. "It is free,
and independent, and healthful; but I shouldn't like to live so all my
life."

"Nor I," answered Tom. "No amount of gold would repay me."

"Because gold is only valuable for what it will bring. Here it brings
nothing."

"Except the hope of future ease and comfort," suggested Tom.

"Of course; that is what we are working for. We have made a good
beginning."

"Yes, Dick. I have almost accomplished what I have had in view ever
since I left home."

"I know. You mean paying off your father's mortgage."

"That's it. It amounts to twenty-two hundred dollars, and I have but a
few hundred dollars more to earn. I would stay here a month or two
longer, if my clothes would hold together; but I can't risk it."

"You need rest, at any rate, Tom, leaving clothes out of the question."

As he spoke, Tom, without special thought, drove his pick into the
ground. It was a lucky inspiration. Some shining particles attracted the
attention of Russell.

"Tom," he exclaimed, in excitement, "do you see that, and that? I
believe you've struck a bonanza."

Upon that both set to work in earnest. A further investigation showed
that Russell was right. Tom, by good luck, had chanced upon a deposit of
far greater richness than any they had yet encountered.

"If it holds out, our fortunes are made, Tom," said Russell. "Go and
call Ferguson, and I will remain on guard till you come back."

Tom stood not on the order of his going, but went at once.

"What's the matter, Tom?" asked the Scotchman, as, panting and
breathless, Tom stood before him. "Has anything happened to Russell?"

"No; it's good news--splendid news, Mr. Ferguson. We've found a place
ten times as rich as this. Come at once, and see."

Ferguson made preparations to accompany Tom with what seemed to our hero
to be provoking deliberation. In truth the Scotchman, with his national
caution, was rather skeptical as to Tom's news, and did not suffer
himself to become enthusiastic or excited. Tom had hard work to
accommodate his impatient steps to the measured pace of his more sedate
companion. When at length they reached the spot they found Russell no
less impatient.

"I thought you would never come," he said.

"Tom wanted to fly," said Ferguson; "but I am too old for that. Now,
what is it you have found?"

When he was shown what had been discovered he admitted that it was very
promising.

"If it holds out, we shall be lucky," he said.

"It _will_ hold out," said Russell, enthusiastically.

"It isn't well to be too confident," said Ferguson, cautiously.

"You are very cold-blooded, Mr. Ferguson," said Russell, impatiently.
"Won't anything excite you?"

"What good would it do to become excited?" returned the Scotchman. "I am
as ready to test the matter as you are, and I shall rejoice if your
sanguine expectations are realized. Do not expect too much, however, and
you will guard against possible disappointment."

But there was no disappointment awaiting them. They worked steadily for
two weeks, with marvelous results. In this time they unearthed six
thousand dollars' worth of gold, which by arrangement they divided
equally between them; and still the gold deposit was far from being
exhausted.

At the end of the fortnight they were visited by a party of capitalists
from San Francisco, who were out on an exploring expedition. They
recognized the richness of the new discoveries, and after some
negotiation offered the three friends ten thousand dollars for their
claims. One consideration decided them to accept. It was absolutely
necessary for them to go to the city for clothing and other articles, of
which they stood in imperative need. They closed the bargain and started
on their return.




CHAPTER XXIX.

BAD NEWS FROM HOME.


Arriving in the city late in the afternoon, Tom went at once to see John
Miles. When the latter caught sight of Tom, in his ragged attire, he
came to the natural conclusion that our hero had met with hard luck.

"Why, Tom, where did you spring from?" he exclaimed, grasping the hand
of his young partner.

"I am just in from the mines."

"I suppose you are in want of money," said Miles, his voice betraying
sympathy.

Tom laughed.

"How do you like my appearance, John?" he asked.

"Never mind that, Tom. I see you have had a rough time; but I have been
earning money for you."

"Did you send money regularly to father?"

"Yes; I have sent him three hundred dollars in all."

"That's good," said Tom, in a tone of satisfaction. "That has made him
easy. I suppose that took up about all I was entitled to?"

"No; I have as much more to your credit. I am ready to pay it to you at
once."

"I see, John, you think I have not been doing well."

"You don't look very prosperous, Tom, I must acknowledge."

"Well, John, appearances are deceitful. I have been wonderfully lucky."

"I am delighted to hear it, Tom," said Miles, cordially. "How much is it
now?"

"What do you say to a thousand dollars?"

"Excellent."

"Two thousand?"

"You don't mean it!"

"I won't keep you in suspense, John. I don't know exactly how much I've
got, but it's over six thousand dollars!"

John Miles stared at our hero in undisguised astonishment.

"Are you sure you're quite right _here_?" he said, touching his
forehead. "You haven't been sun-struck, have you?"

"No, John, it's all as I tell you. Let me explain how my luck came."

In a few sentences Tom made it clear to his partner that his luck was
real.

"As to the three hundred dollars due me from you, John," concluded Tom,
"I make you a present of it."

"But, Tom--" protested Miles.

"Let it be so, and for the future you shall pay me my share. Have you
any letters for me?"

"I have three."

"Give them to me, quick. I am hungry for news from home."

Tom sat down on a keg, and fairly devoured the letters, two of which
were from his father. One of these gave him much to think of. I will
transcribe the passages which gave Tom most concern:--

"Yesterday I paid Squire Hudson his regular semi-annual interest,
amounting to sixty-six dollars. Thanks to your liberal remittances, I
had no difficulty in making the payment. Indeed, I had two hundred
dollars left over. Imagine my dismay when the squire told me he had made
up his mind to call in the mortgage, having another use for the money.

"'But I can't pay it up,' said I.

"'You ought to be able to obtain the money somewhere,' he returned.

"'You are the only capitalist with whom I am acquainted,' said I.
'Since I have paid you the interest promptly, what more can you desire?'

"He insisted that he needed the money. I offered to pay him the two
hundred dollars which he had advanced for your journey. He seemed
surprised, but repeated that he must have the whole. The upshot of it
was that he gave me a formal notice of three months, as stipulated in
the mortgage. At the end of that time, unless I am ready to pay the
twenty-two hundred dollars, he will foreclose, and the old farm must be
sold. Of course it will be sold much below its real value. Probably the
squire will get it for the amount of the mortgage, and we shall be
thrown upon the world, without a home. It seems hard, Tom, and very
selfish; but might makes right, and Squire Hudson has the power on his
side."

In a postscript Mark Nelson added, "I understand that Squire Hudson has
a connection, his wife's brother, for whom he wants the farm. That
explains his resolute refusal to give me time to redeem it. Of course it
is too early to decide upon any plans. I must hire some tenement to move
into when I have to leave here. It will be hard upon us all to give up
the old farm. Walter, who has a taste for farming, and whom I look to be
my successor, feels very sad. Don't let this news depress you too much,
Tom. We shall not suffer. Thanks to you, I have some money ahead, and we
shall not lack for comfort."

Tom looked up when he had finished reading the letter.

"John," he said, quickly, "when does the next steamer start for New
York?"

"Day after to-morrow."

"Where can I engage passage?"

"Are you going home?"

"Yes, John, it is absolutely necessary. Squire Hudson is about to
foreclose the mortgage on my father's farm. I must be there to stop it."

"Have you money enough?"

"Three times over. He shall be defeated in his wicked purpose, or my
name isn't Tom Nelson."

Tom spoke in a quick, indignant tone, and his voice had a manly ring.

"Wait, John, let me read you the letter."

"The man's a mean rascal!" said Miles. "A rich man who will take
advantage of a poor man's necessity to deprive him of his home deserves
to be horsewhipped."

"I shan't attempt that," said Tom, smiling; "but I will disappoint him.
He little thinks I have it in my power to defeat his plans."

That very evening Tom engaged passage to New York, and two days later he
sailed out of the Golden Gate.

"I don't know how long I shall be gone, John," he said. "You need send
me no remittances, for I have money enough with me. You will hear from
me as soon as I have reached home, and transacted my business with
Squire Hudson."

"You will come out here again, Tom, won't you?"

"Yes, and before long. I have been so busily occupied making money that
I have seen almost nothing of San Francisco."

Tom did not journey alone. Ferguson, having thriven beyond his
expectations, decided to sail to New York, and thence to Scotland, on a
visit to his relatives, though he thought it probable he should come
back within a year. Dick Russell also was now in a position to study law
at home, and gave up the business of gold-mining forever.

"I owe all my present prosperity to you two," he said. "But for you I
should have blown my brains out five months since."

"We owe our prosperity to you also," said Tom. "You guided us to the
mines from which we gathered a golden harvest."

"We have worked together, and been mutual helpers," said Ferguson. "God
has favored us all, and to Him be the thanks!"




CHAPTER XXX.

THE NIGHT BEFORE THE AUCTION.


It was a sad household, that of Mark Nelson, on the day preceding the
departure from the farm. There was to be an auction the next day, at
which the farm-stock and farm-implements were to be sold. It was well
understood that Squire Hudson was to be the buyer of the farm, and as he
was not likely to have any competitor there was little hope that it
would fetch more than the amount of the mortgage.

During the afternoon Mr. Nelson called on Squire Hudson to make the best
terms he could at private sale.

"The farm is worth at least a thousand dollars more than the mortgage,
Squire Hudson," said the farmer.

"It is worth what it will fetch, Mr. Nelson," said the squire.

"Do you mean that an article always commands its full value at auction,
Squire Hudson?"

"Ahem! it brings its market value, Mr. Nelson."

"Which may be far below its intrinsic value. Suppose a diamond worth ten
thousand dollars were put up at auction in our village, do you consider
that it would bring a fair price?"

"Ahem! you are wandering from the subject. We are talking of farms, not
diamonds."

"As to the farm, then, you are likely to be the only bidder, unless you
allow the mortgage to remain."

"If I were inclined to do that I would not disturb you as long as you
paid the interest promptly."

"Then you decline to buy the farm at private sale?"

"I do."

"I don't think you will be any better off in the end, Squire Hudson, for
oppressing a poor man, and robbing him of his little all," said Mark
Nelson, bitterly.

"You don't look at the matter from a business point of view," said the
squire, coldly. "I am acting as any business man would under the
circumstances."

"I cannot believe you, sir. All business men are not so hard-hearted."

"I really don't think there is any use in prolonging this interview,"
said Squire Hudson, stiffly. "I have resolved upon my course, in which I
am perfectly justified, however you may choose to regard it."

This removed the farmer's last hope, and he had only to look about for
another home for his family. There was small choice of houses in the
little farming town. In fact there was but one house,--a shabby,
dilapidated building, a mile from the church and store. This, Mr.
Nelson, having no choice, engaged for a period of three months.

"It makes me homesick to think of going to live in that barn," said
Sarah, as they were sitting together after supper.

"It may not be so bad as you think for, Sarah," said her mother; but
she secretly sympathized with her daughter.

"I wish Squire Hudson had to live there himself," said Walter, in an
angry outburst.

Usually Walter was checked by his father when uttering such speeches;
but to-night Mark Nelson took no notice of his son's angry remark. He
felt that it would only be a righteous retribution upon the squire for
his cold selfishness.

While they were sitting in the plain room endeared to them by the
association of years, a sound of wheels was heard, and the village stage
stopped before the door.

"Who can it be?" said Sarah, wonderingly.

The whole family hurried to the window. What youthful, yet manly figure,
was that actively descending from his perch beside the driver?

"It's Tom!" exclaimed Mrs. Nelson. "Heaven be praised! It is my dear
boy."

Tom was almost suffocated by the embraces which he received on entering
the house.

"How you have grown, Tom!" said Sarah. "And how well you look!"

"Thank you for the compliment," said Tom, laughing. "But I don't feel
well."

"What is the matter?" asked his mother, with maternal solicitude.

"I am as hungry as a bear. Have you got anything to eat in the house?"

This hint was enough. Fresh tea was made, and the wanderer was soon
sitting before a bountiful supply of food, cooked in his mother's best
style.

"It seems good to be at home," said Tom, looking around him, his face
beaming with happiness.

"Did you get my letter, Tom, announcing the squire's intention to
foreclose the mortgage?" asked his father, gravely.

"Yes, father; is it really true?"

"Yes; he will listen to no persuasions."

"When does the sale take place?"

"To-morrow."

"I shall be present. Have you thought of any other house, father?"

"The old Belcher house is the only one I can hire."

"That is a poor place."

"It must do for lack of a better."

"I didn't think the squire would act so meanly. At any rate, father, I
will see that you don't any of you suffer for lack of money."

"Have you been doing well, Tom?" asked Walter.

"Ask me to-morrow, Walter. To-night I want to hear all the news, and
everything that has happened since I went away."




CHAPTER XXXI.

BIDDING FOR THE FARM.


"I apprehend," said the squire to his brother-in-law the next morning,
"that we shall get the farm at our own price."

"I hope we shall, squire," said the poor relative, deferentially. "I
suppose this man Nelson is sorry to part with it."

"Of course; he charges me with meanness, oppressing the poor, and so on;
but of course I don't mind that. It's a matter of business; as I told
him."

"To be sure."

"I am not to be moved by sentimental considerations. Business is
business; but he won't see it in that light."

"You consider the farm worth considerable more than the amount of the
mortgage, of course?"

"It is worth four thousand dollars, in my opinion," said the squire,
complacently.

"If you get it for twenty-two hundred, it will be an excellent bargain."

"Father," exclaimed Sinclair, entering the breakfast-room, rather
hurriedly, "Tom Nelson has got home."

"Where did you hear this, my son?" asked Squire Hudson, in surprise.

"At the store. He got home by coach last evening."

"Got discontented, I suppose," said the squire, in a tone of triumph. "I
thought that was how it would turn out. He can't expect me to advance
money to take him out there again."

"I wish you would let me go," said Sinclair.

"Some day I may take a trip out there with you, my son. Have you seen
Thomas?"

"No, he keeps mighty close. He hasn't even been round at the store."

"He is ashamed to show himself, I suppose. He will have to work on the
farm--on a farm again."

"I suppose that will be a hard pill for him to swallow," said Sinclair.

"No doubt. He is poor and proud, like his father before him. I am glad
of one thing,--that I am sure of getting back the two hundred dollars I
advanced for his journey. I wonder where he raised money to get back."

       *       *       *       *       *

Though there were not likely to be any competitors for the farm, a
considerable number gathered at the sale. There was a general feeling of
sympathy for the Nelsons, but no one was able to express that sympathy
in a tangible form, Squire Hudson cared little for the opinion of his
neighbors. Some of them were in debt to him, and he looked down upon
them with the arrogance of wealth.

Tom received many friendly greetings. He was plainly dressed, quiet in
his manner, and seemed to take matters very coolly.

At length the farm was put up, the auctioneer naturally turning towards
the squire, who responded pompously, "I bid twenty-two hundred dollars,
the amount of the mortgage I hold upon the property."

"Is there any other bid?" asked the auctioneer.

"I bid twenty-five hundred dollars," said a clear, boyish voice.

All were startled, and all eyes were turned upon Tom Nelson, who came
slightly forward.

"Twenty-five hundred!" repeated the auctioneer, hesitating whether he
should receive the bid.

"I protest against this outrage," exclaimed Squire Hudson, angrily. "The
bid is ridiculous."

"Why is my bid ridiculous, Squire Hudson?" asked Tom, calmly.

"Because you haven't got the money. It is a transparent attempt to run
up the price of the farm."

"You know nothing of my circumstances, Squire Hudson," said Tom,
independently. "I stand ready to pay the sum I bid, and, should you
outbid me, I am ready to prove to any committee you may appoint, that I
possess the money, or all my bids shall go for nothing, and you can have
the farm at your first offer."

"That is fair!" cried all.

"This is all nonsense," said the squire. "Those of you who choose may
believe this boy; I don't."

"Going at twenty-five hundred!" said the auctioneer.

"Twenty-five hundred and fifty!" said the squire, adding, "I make the
bid on the terms proposed by the boy."

"Twenty-eight hundred!" said Tom.

"And fifty!" bid the squire.

"Three thousand!" instantly came from Tom.

No one was more surprised than Tom's own family at this unexpected
scene. He had not dropped a hint as to his intentions, choosing to take
all by surprise. Mark Nelson was perplexed. Though he had great
confidence in Tom, he feared that he could not make good his bold bids.

At length the farm was knocked down to our hero at three thousand five
hundred dollars.

"Now," said the squire, angrily, "I demand that this farce come to an
end. I believe the bidding of this boy to be a premeditated swindle. If
so, I will do my best to have him punished."

"And I," said Tom, boldly, "have an equal right to demand that Squire
Hudson submit proof that he is responsible for the amount of his
offers."

"Curse your impudence!" exclaimed the squire, foaming with rage.

"But I waive that right," continued Tom, "and will ask Squire Hudson to
name two gentlemen present to examine the proofs which I have to offer
of my ability to back my bids."

"I name Mr. Jones and Mr. Howe," said the squire, quickly, "and request
them to act at once."

"That is my desire," said Tom.

In five minutes the committee reported that Tom had shown them
bank-books, of two Boston banks, certifying that he held two thousand
dollars on deposit in one, and four thousand in the other.

"Is that satisfactory?" asked Tom, coolly.

"No," shouted the squire; "I believe that the books are bogus."

But the rest of those present entertained no doubts, and our hero was at
once surrounded by admiring friends, who shook his hand till it fairly
ached.

"Squire Hudson, your mortgage shall be paid whenever you desire," said
Tom.

"Three cheers for Tom Nelson!" proposed some one, and the cheers were
given with a will. During the confusion the squire and his
brother-in-law slipped out of the house, thoroughly discomfited.




CHAPTER XXXII.

MANHOOD.


If Squire Hudson was surprised at Tom's suddenly revealed wealth, Mr.
Nelson was no less so. When Tom first commenced bidding his father
feared that he was only trying to annoy the squire, or, perhaps, seeking
to force him to pay a higher price for the farm. But when investigation
revealed the fact of Tom's riches, and he saw the mountain of debt
lifted from his little property, he was overjoyed and grateful.

"I can't understand it, Tom," he said; "how could you possibly get
possession of so much money?"

"I have worked hard, father; but that won't explain it. I have been very
lucky, and my good luck has enabled me to save the farm."

"I think you will be easier with me than the squire, Tom," said his
father, smiling. "I will make out a mortgage to you, since your money
has been used to redeem the farm."

"I shall have no claim on the farm," said Tom, "or if I have I give it
to you. I have money enough for myself, and hope to earn a good deal
more besides."

"If that is the case, Tom, I will gladly accept your gift. It will be a
great relief to think that I have no interest to pay. Now I shall be
able to get along easily. I have over two hundred dollars on hand."

"I want to make your life easier, hereafter, father. I think you need a
larger income than the farm will yield you, and I will therefore send
you a hundred dollars every quarter."

"You are very generous, Tom; but I fear you will soon get rid of all
your money at this rate."

"I will explain my circumstances, father, and then you will think
differently. I have a business in San Francisco which will yield me at
least a thousand dollars a year, without my personal attention, and
after paying the squire what is due him I shall have about four
thousand dollars left. This I mean to invest securely in Boston."

"I can hardly realize that you are so rich, Tom."

"I can scarcely realize it myself, father. When I think of the change
that fifteen months have made in my circumstances I consider myself the
luckiest boy in the world, and have great cause for gratitude."

It will be understood that, though Tom had bid thirty-five hundred
dollars for the farm, all he was required to pay was the amount of the
mortgage, the bid having been made in his father's interest. In a few
days the business was completed, and Mr. Nelson found himself the owner
of an unencumbered property.

Tom remained a week longer in the village, and then started once more
for California. His mother urged him to remain at home, now that he had
so much money; but Tom reminded her that he was partner in a business in
San Francisco, and that he needed to look after his interests there.
John Miles might be sick, or die, and in that case he might meet with
serious losses.

Returning to San Francisco Tom became an active instead of a silent
partner. The business was considerably enlarged, and became much more
profitable. At the end of two years Tom sold out to his partner for
several thousand dollars, and, entering an office, studied law, devoting
a portion of his time to general study. At a comparatively early age he
was admitted to the bar of his adopted city, and by degrees got into
lucrative practice. He had become so much attached to California that he
decided to make it his permanent home.

Up among the New Hampshire hills his father still tills his little farm,
but he no longer depends upon it for his entire living. Tom regularly
sends the allowance he promised, and in addition his brothers are often
the recipients of handsome gifts. Harry, developing a taste for study,
was sent to Exeter Academy, from which in due course he was transferred
to Harvard. He, too, was destined for the law, and when he had taken
his legal degree joined Tom in California, and is now his partner.

Other changes there are in the little village. Squire Hudson is dead,
and Sinclair, making haste to sell the homestead, removed to New York,
engaged in speculation, and lost everything. One day, shabbily dressed,
he entered Tom's office in San Francisco, and asked for the loan of
fifty dollars to enable him to reach the mines. Tom gave it, for old
acquaintance' sake. It was not the last request for money made by
Sinclair. Nothing has been heard of him for some years, and it is
probable that a life which was of no service to any one is finished. He
had the best start in life, but misused his advantages. Tom has worthily
employed the talents committed to his charge, and is happy, honored, and
prosperous.

THE YOUNG EXPLORER;

_or_,

AMONG THE SIERRAS,

will be the next volume.






End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Young Miner, by Horatio Alger, Jr.

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE YOUNG MINER ***

***** This file should be named 22669-8.txt or 22669-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/2/6/6/22669/

Produced by David Edwards, Marcia Brooks and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
file was produced from scans of public domain material
produced by Microsoft for their Live Search Books site.)


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg eBook, Theocritus, Bion and Moschus, by Theocritus,
et al, Translated by Andrew Lang


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org





Title: Theocritus, Bion and Moschus


Author: Theocritus



Release Date: August 6, 2014  [eBook #4775]
[This file was first posted on March 16, 2002]

Language: English

Character set encoding: UTF-8


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THEOCRITUS, BION AND MOSCHUS***


Transcribed from the 1889 Macmillan and Co. edition by David Price, email
ccx074@pglaf.org

                          [Picture: Book cover]





                             THEOCRITUS, BION
                                   AND
                                 MOSCHUS


                       RENDERED INTO ENGLISH PROSE
                                   WITH
                         _AN INTRODUCTORY ESSAY_

                                    BY
                            ANDREW LANG, M.A.

               _Lately Fellow of Merton College_, _Oxford_

                      [Picture: Decorative graphic]

                                  LONDON

                            MACMILLAN AND CO.
                               AND NEW YORK
                                   1889

                          _All rights reserved_

                                * * * * *

                                    TO

                               ERNEST MYERS

                           ’Εκ Μοισᾶν ξεινήιον




CONTENTS

                                            PAGE
THEOCRITUS AND HIS AGE                        xi
THEOCRITUS—
                  Idyl      I                  3
                     ,,     II                11
                     ,,     III               20
                     ,,     IV                23
                     ,,     V                 27
                     ,,     VI                35
                     ,,     VII               38
                     ,,     VIII              46
                     ,,     IX                52
                     ,,     X                 55
                     ,,     XI                59
                     ,,     XII               64
                     ,,     XIII              67
                     ,,     XIV               71
                     ,,     XV                76
                     ,,     XVI               85
                     ,,     XVII              91
                     ,,     XVIII             97
                     ,,     XIX              101
                     ,,     XX               102
                     ,,     XXI              105
                     ,,     XXII             110
                     ,,     XXIII            121
                     ,,     XXIV             125
                     ,,     XXV              132
                     ,,     XXVI             144
                     ,,     XXVII            147
                     ,,     XXVIII           152
                     ,,     XXIX             154
                     ,,     XXX              147
                  Epigrams                   159
BION—
                  Idyl      I                171
                     ,,     II               176
                     ,,     III              178
                     ,,     IV               179
                     ,,     V                179
                     ,,     VI               180
                  Fragments                  181
MOSCHUS—
                  Idyl      I                187
                     ,,     II               189
                     ,,     III              197
                     ,,     IV               203
                     ,,     V                208
                     ,,     VI               208
                     ,,     VII              209
                     ,,     VIII             209
                     ,,     IX               210




LIFE OF THEOCRITUS


                             (_From Suidas_)

THEOCRITUS, the Chian.  But there is another Theocritus, the son of
Praxagoras and Philinna (see Epigram XXIII), or as some say of Simichus.
(This is plainly derived from the assumed name Simichidas in Idyl VII.)
He was a Syracusan, or, as others say, a Coan settled in Syracuse.  He
wrote the so-called _Bucolics_ in the Dorian dialect.  Some attribute to
him the following works:—_The Proetidae_, _The Pleasures of Hope_
(Ἐλπίδες), _Hymns_, _The Heroines_, _Dirges_, _Ditties_, _Elegies_,
_Iambics_, _Epigrams_.  But it known that there are three Bucolic poets:
this Theocritus, Moschus of Sicily, and Bion of Smyrna, from a village
called Phlossa.




LIFE OF THEOCRITUS
ΘΕΟΚΡΙΤΟΥ ΓΕΝΟΣ


                    (_Usually prefixed to the Idyls_)

THEOCRITUS the Bucolic poet was a Syracusan by extraction, and the son of
Simichidas, as he says himself, _Simichidas_, _pray whither through the
noon dost thou dray thy feet_? (Idyl VII).  Some say that this was an
assumed name, for he seems to have been snub-nosed (σιμός), and that his
father was Praxagoras, and his mother Philinna.  He became the pupil of
Philetas and Asclepiades, of whom he speaks (Idyl VII), and flourished
about the time of Ptolemy Lagus.  He gained much fame for his skill in
bucolic poetry.  According to some his original name was Moschus, and
Theocritus was a name he later assumed.




THEOCRITUS AND HIS AGE


AT the beginning of the third century before Christ, in the years just
preceding those in which Theocritus wrote, the genius of Greece seemed to
have lost her productive force.  Nor would it have been strange if that
force had really been exhausted.  Greek poetry had hitherto enjoyed a
peculiarly free development, each form of art succeeding each without
break or pause, because each—epic, lyric, dithyramb, the drama—had
responded to some new need of the state and of religion.  Now in the
years that followed the fall of Athens and the conquests of Macedonia,
Greek religion and the Greek state had ceased to be themselves.  Religion
and the state had been the patrons of poetry; on their decline poetry
seemed dead.  There were no heroic kings, like those for whom epic
minstrels had chanted.  The cities could no longer welcome an Olympian
winner with Pindaric hymns.  There was no imperial Athens to fill the
theatres with a crowd of citizens and strangers eager to listen to new
tragic masterpieces.  There was no humorous democracy to laugh at all the
world, and at itself, with Aristophanes.  The very religion of Sophocles
and Aeschylus was debased.  A vulgar usurper had stripped the golden
ornaments from Athene of the Parthenon.  The ancient faith in the
protecting gods of Athens, of Sparta, and of Thebes, had become a lax
readiness to bow down in the temple of any Oriental Rimmon, of Serapis or
Adonis.  Greece had turned her face, with Alexander of Macedon, to the
East; Alexander had fallen, and Greece had become little better than the
western portion of a divided Oriental empire.  The centre of intellectual
life had been removed from Athens to Alexandria (_founded_ 332 B.C.)  The
new Greek cities of Egypt and Asia, and above all Alexandria, seemed no
cities at all to Greeks who retained the pure Hellenic traditions.
Alexandria was thirty times larger than the size assigned by Aristotle to
a well-balanced state.  Austere spectators saw in Alexandria an Eastern
capital and mart, a place of harems and bazaars, a home of tyrants,
slaves, dreamers, and pleasure-seekers.  Thus a Greek of the old school
must have despaired of Greek poetry.  There was nothing (he would have
said) to evoke it; no dawn of liberty could flush this silent Memnon into
song.  The collectors, critics, librarians of Alexandria could only
produce literary imitations of the epic and the hymn, or could at best
write epigrams or inscriptions for the statue of some alien and luxurious
god.  Their critical activity in every field of literature was immense,
their original genius sterile.  In them the intellect of the Hellenes
still faintly glowed, like embers on an altar that shed no light on the
way.  Yet over these embers the god poured once again the sacred oil, and
from the dull mass leaped, like a many-coloured frame, the genius of
THEOCRITUS.

To take delight in that genius, so human, so kindly, so musical in
expression, requires, it may be said, no long preparation.  The art of
Theocritus scarcely needs to be illustrated by any description of the
conditions among which it came to perfection.  It is always impossible to
analyse into its component parts the genius of a poet.  But it is not
impossible to detect some of the influences that worked on Theocritus.
We can study his early ‘environment’; the country scenes he knew, and the
songs of the neatherds which he elevated into art.  We can ascertain the
nature of the demand for poetry in the chief cities and in the literary
society of the time.  As a result, we can understand the broad twofold
division of the poems of Theocritus into rural and epic idyls, and with
this we must rest contented.

It is useless to attempt a regular biography of Theocritus.  Facts and
dates are alike wanting, the ancient accounts (p. ix) are clearly based
on his works, but it is by no means impossible to construct a ‘legend’ or
romance of his life, by aid of his own verses, and of hints and fragments
which reach us from the past and the present.  The genius of Theocritus
was so steeped in the colours of human life, he bore such true and full
witness as to the scenes and men he knew, that life (always essentially
the same) becomes in turn a witness to his veracity.  He was born in the
midst of nature that, through all the changes of things, has never lost
its sunny charm.  The existence he loved best to contemplate, that of
southern shepherds, fishermen, rural people, remains what it always has
been in Sicily and in the isles of Greece.  The habits and the passions
of his countryfolk have not altered, the echoes of their old love-songs
still sound among the pines, or by the sea-banks, where Theocritus
‘watched the visionary flocks.’

Theocritus was probably born in an early decade of the third century, or,
according to Couat, about 315 B.C., and was a native of Syracuse, ‘the
greatest of Greek cities, the fairest of all cities.’  So Cicero calls
it, describing the four quarters that were encircled by its walls,—each
quarter as large as a town,—the fountain Arethusa, the stately temples
with their doors of ivory and gold.  On the fortunate dwellers in
Syracuse, Cicero says, the sun shone every day, and there was never a
morning so tempestuous but the sunlight conquered at last, and broke
through the clouds.  That perennial sunlight still floods the poems of
Theocritus with its joyous glow.  His birthplace was the proper home of
an idyllic poet, of one who, with all his enjoyment of the city life of
Greece, had yet been ‘breathed on by the rural Pan,’ and best loved the
sights and sounds and fragrant air of the forests and the coast.  Thanks
to the mountainous regions of Sicily, to Etna, with her volcanic cliffs
and snow-fed streams, thanks also to the hills of the interior, the
populous island never lost the charm of nature.  Sicily was not like the
overcrowded and over-cultivated Attica; among the Sicilian heights and by
the coast were few enclosed estates and narrow farms.  The character of
the people, too, was attuned to poetry.  The Dorian settlers had kept
alive the magic of rivers, of pools where the Nereids dance, and uplands
haunted by Pan.  This popular poetry influenced the literary verse of
Sicily.  The songs of Stesichorus, a minstrel of the early period, and
the little rural ‘mimes’ or interludes of Sophron are lost, and we have
only fragments of Epicharmus.  But it seems certain that these poets,
predecessors of Theocritus, liked to mingle with their own composition
strains of rustic melody, _volks-lieder_, ballads, love-songs, ditties,
and dirges, such as are still chanted by the peasants of Greece and
Italy.  Thus in Syracuse and the other towns of the coast, Theocritus
would have always before his eyes the spectacle of refined and luxurious
manners, and always in his ears the babble of the Dorian women, while he
had only to pass the gates, and wander through the fens of Lysimeleia, by
the brackish mere, or ride into the hills, to find himself in the golden
world of pastoral.  Thinking of his early years, and of the education
that nature gives the poet, we can imagine him, like Callicles in Mr.
Arnold’s poem, singing at the banquet of a merchant or a general—

    ‘With his head full of wine, and his hair crown’d,
    Touching his harp as the whim came on him,
    And praised and spoil’d by master and by guests,
    Almost as much as the new dancing girl.’

We can recover the world that met his eyes and inspired his poems, though
the dates of the composition of these poems are unknown.  We can follow
him, in fancy, as he breaks from the revellers and wanders out into the
night.  Wherever he turned his feet, he could find such scenes as he has
painted in the idyls.  If the moon rode high in heaven, as he passed
through the outlying gardens he might catch a glimpse of some deserted
girl shredding the magical herbs into the burning brazier, and sending
upward to the ‘lady Selene’ the song which was to charm her lover home.
The magical image melted in the burning, the herbs smouldered, the tale
of love was told, and slowly the singer ‘drew the quiet night into her
blood.’  Her lay ended with a passage of softened melancholy—

    ‘Do thou farewell, and turn thy steeds to Ocean, lady, and my pain I
    will endure, even as I have declared.  Farewell, Selene beautiful;
    farewell, ye other stars that follow the wheels of Night.’

A grammarian says that Theocritus borrowed this second idyl, the story of
Simaetha, from a piece by Sophron.  But he had no need to borrow from
anything but the nature before his eyes.  Ideas change so little among
the Greek country people, and the hold of superstition is so strong, that
betrayed girls even now sing to the Moon their prayer for pity and help.
Theocritus himself could have added little passion to this incantation,
still chanted in the moonlit nights of Greece: {0a}

    ‘Bright golden Moon, that now art near to thy setting, go thou and
    salute my lover, he that stole my love, and that kissed me, and said,
    “Never will I leave thee.”  And, lo, he has left me, like a field
    reaped and gleaned, like a church where no man comes to pray, like a
    city desolate.  Therefore I would curse him, and yet again my heart
    fails me for tenderness, my heart is vexed within me, my spirit is
    moved with anguish.  Nay, even so I will lay my curse on him, and let
    God do even as He will, with my pain and with my crying, with my
    flame, and mine imprecations.’

It is thus that the women of the islands, like the girl of Syracuse two
thousand years ago, hope to lure back love or avenged love betrayed, and
thus they ‘win more ease from song than could be bought with gold.’

In whatever direction the path of the Syracusan wanderer lay, he would
find then, as he would find now in Sicily, some scene of the idyllic
life, framed between the distant Etna and the sea.  If he strayed in the
faint blue of the summer dawn, through the fens to the shore, he might
reach the wattled cabin of the two old fishermen in the twenty-first
idyl.  There is nothing in Wordsworth more real, more full of the
incommunicable sense of nature, rounding and softening the toilsome days
of the aged and the poor, than the Theocritean poem of the Fisherman’s
Dream.  It is as true to nature as the statue of the naked fisherman in
the Vatican.  One cannot read these verses but the vision returns to one,
of sandhills by the sea, of a low cabin roofed with grass, where
fishing-rods of reed are leaning against the door, while the
Mediterranean floats up her waves that fill the waste with sound.  This
nature, grey and still, seems in harmony with the wise content of old men
whose days are waning on the limit of life, as they have all been spent
by the desolate margin of the sea.

The twenty-first idyl is one of the rare poems of Theocritus that are not
filled with the sunlight of Sicily, or of Egypt.  The landscapes he
prefers are often seen under the noonday heat, when shade is most
pleasant to men.  His shepherds invite each other to the shelter of
oak-trees or of pines, where the dry fir-needles are strown, or where the
feathered ferns make a luxurious ‘couch more soft than sleep,’ or where
the flowers bloom whose musical names sing in the idyls.  Again,
Theocritus will sketch the bare beginnings of the hillside, as in the
third idyl, just where the olive-gardens cease, and where the short grass
of the heights alternates with rocks, and thorns, and aromatic plants.
None of his pictures seem complete without the presence of water.  It may
be but the wells that the maidenhair fringes, or the babbling runnel of
the fountain of the Nereids.  The shepherds may sing of Crathon, or
Sybaris, or Himeras, waters so sweet that they seem to flow with milk and
honey.  Again, Theocritus may encounter his rustics fluting in rivalry,
like Daphnis and Menalcas in the eighth idyl, ‘on the long ranges of the
hills.’  Their kine and sheep have fed upwards from the lower valleys to
the place where

    ‘The track winds down to the clear stream,
    To cross the sparkling shallows; there
    The cattle love to gather, on their way
    To the high mountain pastures and to stay,
    Till the rough cow-herds drive them past,
    Knee-deep in the cool ford; for ’tis the last
    Of all the woody, high, well-water’d dells
    On Etna, . . .
    . . . glade,
    And stream, and sward, and chestnut-trees,
    End here; Etna beyond, in the broad glare
    Of the hot noon, without a shade,
    Slope behind slope, up to the peak, lies bare;
    The peak, round which the white clouds play.’  {0b}

Theocritus never drives his flock so high, and rarely muses on such
thoughts as come to wanderers beyond the shade of trees and the sound of
water among the scorched rocks and the barren lava.  The day is always
cooled and soothed, in his idyls, with the ‘music of water that falleth
from the high face of the rock,’ or with the murmurs of the sea.  From
the cliffs and their seat among the bright red berries on the arbutus
shrubs, his shepherds flute to each other, as they watch the tunny
fishers cruising far below, while the echo floats upwards of the sailors’
song.  These shepherds have some touch in them of the satyr nature; we
might fancy that their ears are pointed like those of Hawthorne’s
Donatello, in ‘Transformation.’

It should be noticed, as a proof of the truthfulness of Theocritus, that
the songs of his shepherds and goatherds are all such as he might really
have heard on the shores of Sicily.  This is the real answer to the
criticism which calls him affected.  When mock pastorals flourished at
the court of France, when the long dispute as to the merits of the
ancients and moderns was raging, critics vowed that the hinds of
Theocritus were too sentimental and polite in their wooings.  Refinement
and sentiment were to be reserved for princely shepherds dancing, crook
in hand, in the court ballets.  Louis XIV sang of himself—

    ‘_A son labeur il passe tout d’un coup_,
    _Et n’ira pas dormir sur la fougere_,
    _Ny s’oublier aupres d’une Bergere_,
    _Jusques au point d’en oublier le Loup_.’ {0c}

Accustomed to royal goatherds in silk and lace, Fontenelle (a severe
critic of Theocritus) could not believe in the delicacy of a Sicilian who
wore a skin ‘stripped from the roughest of he-goats, with the smell of
the rennet clinging to it still.’  Thus Fontenelle cries, ‘Can any one
suppose that there ever was a shepherd who could say “Would I were the
humming bee, Amaryllis, to flit to thy cave, and dip beneath the
branches, and the ivy leaves that hide thee”?’ and then he quotes other
graceful passages from the love-verses of Theocritean swains.  Certainly
no such fancies were to be expected from the French peasants of
Fontenelle’s age, ‘creatures blackened with the sun, and bowed with
labour and hunger.’  The imaginative grace of Battus is quite as remote
from our own hinds.  But we have the best reason to suppose that the
peasants of Theocritus’s time expressed refined sentiment in language
adorned with colour and music, because the modern love-songs of Greek
shepherds sound like memories of Theocritus.  The lover of Amaryllis
might have sung this among his ditties—

    Χελιδονάκι θα γενω, σ’ τα χείλη σου να καττώ
    Να σε φιλήσω μια και δυό, και πάλε να πετάξω

    ‘To flit towards these lips of thine, I fain would be a swallow,
    To kiss thee once, to kiss thee twice, and then go flying homeward.’
    {0d}

In his despair, when Love ‘clung to him like a leech of the fen,’ he
might have murmured—

    ’Ηθελα να εΐμαι σ’ τα βουνα, μ’ αλάφια να κοιμοΰμαι
    Και το δικον σου το κορμι να μη το συλλογιοΰμαι

    ‘Would that I were on the high hills, and lay where lie the stags,
    and no more was troubled with the thought of thee.’

Here, again, is a love-complaint from modern Epirus, exactly in the tone
of Battus’s song in the tenth idyl—

    ‘White thou art not, thou art not golden haired,
    Thou art brown, and gracious, and meet for love.’

Here is a longer love-ditty—

    ‘I will begin by telling thee first of thy perfections: thy body is
    as fair as an angel’s; no painter could design it.  And if any man be
    sad, he has but to look on thee, and despite himself he takes
    courage, the hapless one, and his heart is joyous.  Upon thy brows
    are shining the constellated Pleiades, thy breast is full of the
    flowers of May, thy breasts are lilies.  Thou hast the eyes of a
    princess, the glance of a queen, and but one fault hast thou, that
    thou deignest not to speak to me.’

Battus might have cried thus, with a modern Greek singer, to the shade of
the dead Amaryllis (Idyl IV), the ‘gracious Amaryllis, unforgotten even
in death’—

    ‘Ah, light of mine eyes, what gift shall I send thee; what gift to
    the other world?  The apple rots, and the quince decayeth, and one by
    one they perish, the petals of the rose!  I send thee my tears bound
    in a napkin, and what though the napkin burns, if my tears reach thee
    at last!’

The difficulty is to stop choosing, where all the verses of the modern
Greek peasants are so rich in Theocritean memories, so ardent, so
delicate, so full of flowers and birds and the music of fountains.
Enough has been said, perhaps, to show what the popular poetry of Sicily
could lend to the genius of Theocritus.

From her shepherds he borrowed much,—their bucolic melody; their
love-complaints; their rural superstitions; their system of answering
couplets, in which each singer refines on the utterance of his rival.
But he did not borrow their ‘pastoral melancholy.’  There is little of
melancholy in Theocritus.  When Battus is chilled by the thought of the
death of Amaryllis, it is but as one is chilled when a thin cloud passes
over the sun, on a bright day of early spring.  And in an epigram the
dead girl is spoken of as the kid that the wolf has seized, while the
hounds bay all too late.  Grief will not bring her back.  The world must
go its way, and we need not darken its sunlight by long regret.  Yet
when, for once, Theocritus adopted the accent of pastoral lament, when he
raised the rural dirge for Daphnis into the realm of art, he composed a
masterpiece, and a model for all later poets, as for the authors of
_Lycidas_, _Thyrsis_, and _Adonais_.

Theocritus did more than borrow a note from the country people.  He
brought the gifts of his own spirit to the contemplation of the world.
He had the clearest vision, and he had the most ardent love of poetry,
‘of song may all my dwelling be full, for neither is sleep more sweet,
nor sudden spring, nor are flowers more delicious to the bees, so dear to
me are the Muses.’ . . .  ‘Never may we be sundered, the Muses of Pieria
and I.’  Again, he had perhaps in greater measure than any other poet the
gift of the undisturbed enjoyment of life.  The undertone of all his
idyls is joy in the sunshine and in existence.  His favourite word, the
word that opens the first idyl, and, as it were, strikes the keynote, is
αδύ, _sweet_.  He finds all things delectable in the rural life:

    ‘Sweet are the voices of the calves, and sweet the heifers’ lowing;
    sweet plays the shepherd on the shepherd’s pipe, and sweet is the
    echo.’

Even in courtly poems, and in the artificial hymns of which we are to
speak in their place, the memory of the joyful country life comes over
him.  He praises Hiero, because Hiero is to restore peace to Syracuse,
and when peace returns, then ‘thousands of sheep fattened in the meadows
will bleat along the plain, and the kine, as they flock in crowds to the
stalls, will make the belated traveller hasten on his way.’  The words
evoke a memory of a narrow country lane in the summer evening, when light
is dying out of the sky, and the fragrance of wild roses by the roadside
is mingled with the perfumed breath of cattle that hurry past on their
homeward road.  There was scarcely a form of the life he saw that did not
seem to him worthy of song, though it might be but the gossip of two rude
hinds, or the drinking bout of the Thessalian horse-jobber, and the false
girl Cynisca and her wild lover Æschines.  But it is the sweet country
that he loves best to behold and to remember.  In his youth Sicily and
Syracuse were disturbed by civil and foreign wars, wars of citizens
against citizens, of Greeks against Carthaginians, and against the fierce
‘men of Mars,’ the banded mercenaries who possessed themselves of
Messana.  But this was not matter for his joyous Muse—

    κείνος δ’ ού πολέμους, ού δάκρυα, Πανα δ’ έμελπε,
    και βούτασ έλίγαινε και άείδων ενόμευε

    ‘Not of wars, not of tears, but of Pan would he chant, and of the
    neatherds he sweetly sang, and singing he shepherded his flocks.’

This was the training that Sicily, her hills, her seas, her lovers, her
poet-shepherds, gave to Theocritus.  Sicily showed him subjects which he
imitated in truthful art.  Unluckily the later pastoral poets of northern
lands have imitated _him_, and so have gone far astray from northern
nature.  The pupil of nature had still to be taught the ‘rules’ of the
critics, to watch the temper and fashion of his time, and to try his
fortune among the courtly poets and grammarians of the capital of
civilisation.  Between the years of early youth in Sicily and the years
of waiting for court patronage at Alexandria, it seems probable that we
must place a period of education in the island of Cos.  The testimonies
of the Grammarians who handed on to us the scanty traditions about
Theocritus, agree in making him the pupil of Philetas of Cos.  This
Philetas was a critic, a commentator on Homer, and an elegiac poet whose
love-songs were greatly admired by the Romans of the Augustan age.  He is
said to have been the tutor of Ptolemy Philadelphus, who was himself
born, as Theocritus records, in the isle of Cos.  It has been conjectured
that Ptolemy and Theocritus were fellow pupils, and that the poet may
have hoped to obtain court favour at Alexandria from this early
connection.  About this point nothing is certainly known, nor can we
exactly understand the sort of education that was given in the school of
the poet Philetas.  The ideas of that artificial age make it not
improbable that Philetas professed to teach the art of poetry.  A French
critic and poet of our own time, M. Baudelaire, was willing to do as much
‘in thirty lessons.’  Possibly Philetas may have imparted technical rules
then in vogue, and the fashionable knack of introducing obscure
mythological allusions.  He was a logician as well as a poet, and is
fabled to have died of vexation because he could not unriddle one of the
metaphysical catches or puzzles of the sophists.  His varied activity
seems to have worn him to a shadow; the contemporary satirists bantered
him about his leanness, and it was alleged that he wore leaden soles to
his sandals lest the wind should blow him, as it blew the calves of
Daphnis (Idyl IX) over a cliff against the rocks, or into the sea. {0e}
Philetas seems a strange master for Theocritus, but, whatever the
qualities of the teacher, Cos, the home of the luxurious old age of
Meleager, was a beautiful school.  The island was one of the most ancient
colonies of the Dorians, and the Syracusan scholar found himself among a
people who spoke his own broad and liquid dialect.  The sides of the
limestone hills were clothed with vines, and with shadowy plane-trees
which still attain extraordinary size and age, while the wine-presses
where Demeter smiled, ‘with sheaves and poppies in her hands,’ yielded a
famous vintage.  The people had a soft industry of their own, they
fashioned the ‘Coan stuff,’ transparent robes for woman’s wear, like the
ύδάτινα βράκη, the thin undulating tissues which Theugenis was to weave
with the ivory distaff, the gift of Theocritus.  As a colony of
Epidaurus, Cos naturally cultivated the worship of Asclepius, the divine
physician, the child of Apollo.  In connection with his worship and with
the clan of the Asclepiadae (that widespread stock to which Aristotle
belonged, and in which the practice of leechcraft was hereditary), Cos
possessed a school of medicine.  In the temple of Asclepius patients hung
up as votive offerings representations of their diseased limbs, and thus
the temple became a museum of anatomical specimens.  Cos was therefore
resorted to by young students from all parts of the East, and Theocritus
cannot but have made many friends of his own age.  Among these he alludes
in various passages to Nicias, afterwards a physician at Miletus, to
Philinus, noted in later life as the head of a medical sect, and to
Aratus.  Theocritus has sung of Aratus’s love-affairs, and St. Paul has
quoted him as a witness to man’s instinctive consent in the doctrine of
the universal fatherhood of God.  These strangely various notices have
done more for the memory of Aratus than his own didactic poem on the
meteorological theories of his age.  He lives, with Philinus and the rest
of the Coan students, because Theocritus introduced them into the picture
of a happy summer’s day.  In the seventh idyl, that one day of Demeter’s
harvest-feast is immortal, and the sun never goes down on its delight.
We see Theocritus

    κουπω ταν μεσάταν όδον ανυμες, ουδε το σαμα
    άμιν το Βρασίλα κατεφαίνετο—

when he ‘had not yet reached the mid-point of the way, nor had the tomb
yet risen on his sight.’  He reveals himself as he was at the height of
morning, at the best moment of the journey, in midsummer of a genius
still unchecked by doubt, or disappointment, or neglect.  Life seems to
accost him with the glance of the goatherd Lycidas, ‘and still he smiled
as he spoke, with laughing eyes, and laughter dwelling on his lips.’  In
Cos, Theocritus found friendship, and met Myrto, ‘the girl he loved as
dearly as goats love the spring.’  Here he could express, without any
afterthought, an enthusiastic adoration for the disinterested joys, the
enchanted moments of human existence.  Before he entered the thronged
streets of Alexandria, and tuned his shepherd’s pipe to catch the ear of
princes, and to sing the epithalamium of a royal and incestuous love, he
rested with his friends in the happy island.  Deep in a cave, among the
ruins of ancient aqueducts, there still bubbles up, from the Coan
limestone, the well-spring of the Nymphs.  ‘There they reclined on beds
of fragrant rushes, lowly strown, and rejoicing they lay in new stript
leaves of the vine.  And high above their heads waved many a poplar, many
an elm-tree, while close at hand the sacred water from the nymph’s own
cave welled forth with murmurs musical’ (Idyl VII).

The old Dorian settlers in Syracuse pleased themselves with the fable
that their fountain, Arethusa, had been a Grecian nymph, who, like
themselves, had crossed the sea to Sicily.  The poetry of Theocritus,
read or sung in sultry Alexandria, must have seemed like a new welling up
of the waters of Arethusa in the sandy soil of Egypt.  We cannot
certainly say when the poet first came from Syracuse, or from Cos, to
Alexandria.  It is evident however from the allusions in the fifteenth
and seventeenth idyls that he was living there after Ptolemy Philadelphus
married his own sister, Arsinoë.  It is not impossible to form some idea
of the condition of Alexandrian society, art, religion, literature and
learning at the court of Ptolemy Philadelphus.  The vast city, founded
some sixty years before, was now completed.  The walls, many miles in
circuit, protected a population of about eight hundred thousand souls.
Into that changing crowd were gathered adventurers from all the known
world.  Merchantmen brought to Ptolemy the wares of India and the
porcelains of China.  Marauders from upper Egypt skulked about the native
quarters, and sallied forth at night to rob the wayfarer.  The king’s
guards were recruited with soldiers from turbulent Greece, from Asia,
from Italy.  Settlers were attracted from Syracuse by the prospect of
high wages and profitable labour.  The Jewish quarters were full of
Israelites who did not disdain Greek learning.  The city in which this
multitude found a home was beautifully constructed.  The Mediterranean
filled the northern haven, the southern walls were washed by the Mareotic
lake.  If the isle of Pharos shone dazzling white, and wearied the eyes,
there was shade beneath the long marble colonnades, and in the groves and
cool halls of the Museum and the Libraries.  The Etesian winds blew fresh
in summer from the north, across the sea, and refreshed the people in
their gardens.  No town seemed greater nor wealthier to the voyager, who
(like the hero of the Greek novel _Clitophon and Leucippe_) entered by
the gate of the Sun, and found that, after nightfall, the torches borne
by men and women hastening to some religious feast, filled the dusk with
a light like that of ‘the sun cut up into fragments.’  At the same time
no town was more in need of the memories of the country, which came to
her in well-watered gardens, in landscape-paintings, and in the verse of
Theocritus.

It is impossible to give a clearer idea of the opulence and luxury of
Alexandria and her kings, than will be conveyed by the description of the
coronation-feast of Ptolemy Philadelphus.  This great masquerade and
banquet was prepared by the elder Ptolemy on the occasion of his
admitting his son to share his throne.  The entertainment was described
(in a work now lost) by Callixenus of Rhodes, and the record has been
preserved by Atheneaus (v. 25).  The inner pavilion in which the guests
of Ptolemy reclined, contained one hundred and thirty-five couches.  Over
the roof was placed a scarlet awning, with a fringe of white, and there
were many other awnings, richly embroidered with mythological designs.
The pillars which sustained the roof were shaped in the likeness of
palm-trees, and of _thyrsi_, the weapons of the wine-god Dionysus.  Round
three outer sides ran arcades, draped with purple tissues, and with the
skins of strange beasts.  The fourth side, open to the air, was shady
with the foliage of myrtles and laurels.  Everywhere the ground was
carpeted with flowers, though the season was mid-winter, with roses and
white lilies and blossoms of the gardens.  By the columns round the whole
pavilion were arrayed a hundred effigies in marble, executed by the most
famous sculptors, and on the middle spaces were hung works by the
painters of Sicyon and tapestry woven with stories of the adventures of
the gods.  Above these, again, ran a frieze of gold and silver shields,
while in the higher niches were placed comic, tragic, and satiric
sculptured groups ‘dressed in real clothes,’ says the historian, much
admiring this realism.  It is impossible to number the tripods, and
flagons, and couches of gold, resting on golden figures of sphinxes, the
salvers, the bowls, the jewelled vases.  The masquerade of this winter
festival began with the procession of the Morning-star, Heosphoros, and
then followed a masque of kings and a revel of various gods, while the
company of Hesperus, the Evening-star followed, and ended all.  The revel
of Dionysus was introduced by men disguised as Sileni, wild woodland
beings in raiment of purple and scarlet.  Then came scores of satyrs with
gilded lamps in their hands.  Next appeared beautiful maidens, attired as
Victories, waving golden wings and swinging vessels of burning incense.
The altar of the God of the Vine was borne behind them, crowned and
covered with leaves of gold, and next boys in purple robes scattered
fragrant scents from golden salvers.  Then came a throng of gold-crowned
satyrs, their naked bodies stained with purple and vermilion, and among
them was a tall man who represented the year and carried a horn of
plenty.  He was followed by a beautiful woman in rich attire, carrying in
one hand branches of the palm-tree, in the other a rod of the peach-tree,
starred with its constellated flowers.  Then the masque of the Seasons
swept by, and Philiscus followed, Philiscus the Corcyraean, the priest of
Dionysus, and the favourite tragic poet of the court.  After the prizes
for the athletes had been borne past, Dionysus himself was charioted
along, a gigantic figure clad in purple, and pouring libations out of a
golden goblet.  Around him lay huge drinking-cups, and smoking censers of
gold, and a bower of vine leaves grew up, and shaded the head of the god.
Then hurried by a crowd of priests and priestesses, Maenads, Bacchantes,
Bassarids, women crowned with the vine, or with garlands of snakes, and
girls bearing the mystic _vannus Iacchi_.  And still the procession was
not ended.  A mechanical figure of Nysa passed, in a chariot drawn by
eighty men, among clusters of grapes formed of precious stones, and the
figure arose, and poured milk out of a golden horn.  The Satyrs and
Sileni followed close, and behind them six hundred men dragged on a wain,
a silver vessel that held six hundred measures of wine.  This was only
the first of countless symbolic vessels that were carried past, till last
came a multitude of sixteen hundred boys clad in white tunics, and
garlanded with ivy, who bore and handed to the guests golden and silver
vessels full of sweet wine.  All this was only part of one procession,
and the festival ended when Ptolemy and Berenice and Ptolemy Philadelphus
had been crowned with golden crowns from many subject cities and lands.

This festival was obviously arranged to please the taste of a prince with
late Greek ideas of pictorial display, and with barbaric wealth at his
command.  Theocritus himself enables us in the seventeenth idyl to
estimate the opulence and the dominion of Ptolemy.  He was not master of
fertile Aegypt alone, where the Nile breaks the rich dank soil, and where
myriad cities pour their taxes into his treasuries.  Ptolemy held lands
also in Phoenicia, and Arabia; he claimed Syria and Libya and Aethiopia;
he was lord of the distant Pamphylians, of the Cilicians, the Lycians and
the Carians, and the Cyclades owned his mastery.  Thus the wealth of the
richest part of the world flowed into Alexandria, attracting thither the
priests of strange religions, the possessors of Greek learning, the
painters and sculptors whose work has left its traces on the genius of
Theocritus.

Looking at this early Alexandrian age, three points become clear to us.
First, the fashion of the times was Oriental, Oriental in religion and in
society.  Nothing could be less Hellenic, than the popular cult of
Adonis.  The fifteenth idyl of Theocritus shows us Greek women
worshipping in their manner at an Assyrian shrine, the shrine of that
effeminate lover of Aphrodite, whom Heracles, according to the Greek
proverb, thought ‘no great divinity.’  The hymn of Bion, with its
luxurious lament, was probably meant to be chanted at just such a
festival as Theocritus describes, while a crowd of foreigners gossiped
among the flowers and embroideries, the strangely-shaped sacred cakes,
the ebony, the gold, and the ivory.  Not so much Oriental as barbarous
was the impulse which made Ptolemy Philadelphus choose his own sister,
Arsinoë, for wife, as if absolute dominion had already filled the mind of
the Macedonian royal race with the incestuous pride of the Incas, or of
Queen Hatasu, in an elder Egyptian dynasty.  This nascent barbarism has
touched a few of the Alexandrian poems even of Theocritus, and his
panegyric of Ptolemy, of his divine ancestors, and his sister-bride is
not much more Greek in sentiment than are those old native hymns of
Pentaur to ‘the strong Bull,’ or the ‘Risen Sun,’ to Rameses or Thothmes.

Again, the early Alexandrian was what we call a ‘literary’ age.
Literature was not an affair of religion and of the state, but ministered
to the pleasure of individuals, and at their pleasure was composed. {0f}
The temper of the time was crudely critical.  The Museum and the
Libraries, with their hundreds of thousands of volumes, were hot-houses
of grammarians and of learned poets.  Callimachus, the head librarian,
was also the most eminent man of letters.  Unable, himself, to compose a
poem of epic length and copiousness, he discouraged all long poems.  He
shone in epigrams, pedantic hymns, and didactic verses.  He toyed with
anagrams, and won court favour by discovering that the letters of
‘Arsinoë,’ the name of Ptolemy’s wife, made the words ίον Ηρας, the
violet of Hera.  In another masterpiece the genius of Callimachus
followed the stolen tress of Queen Berenice to the skies, where the locks
became a constellation.  A contemporary of Callimachus was Zenodotus, the
critic, who was for improving the Iliad and Odyssey by cutting out all
the epic commonplaces which seemed to him to be needless repetitions.  It
is pretty plain that, in literary society, Homer was thought out of date
and _rococo_.  The favourite topics of poets were now, not the tales of
Troy and Thebes, but the amorous adventures of the gods.  When Apollonius
Rhodius attempted to revive the epic, it is said that the influence of
Callimachus quite discomfited the young poet.  A war of epigrams began,
and while Apollonius called Callimachus a ‘blockhead’ (so finished was
his invective), the veteran compared his rival to the Ibis, the
scavenger-bird.  Other singers satirised each others’ legs, and one, the
Aretino of the time, mocked at king Ptolemy and scourged his failings in
verse.  The literary quarrels (to which Theocritus seems to allude in
Idyl VII, where Lycidas says he ‘hates the birds of the Muses that cackle
in vain rivalry with Homer’) were as stupid as such affairs usually are.
The taste for artificial epic was to return; although many people already
declared that Homer was the world’s poet, and that the world needed no
other.  This epic reaction brought into favour Apollonius Rhodius, author
of the _Argonautica_.  Theocritus has been supposed to aim at him as a
vain rival of Homer, but M. Couat points out that Theocritus was seventy
when Apollonius began to write.  The literary fashions of Alexandria are
only of moment to us so far as they directly affected Theocritus.  They
could not make him obscure, affected, tedious, but his nature probably
inclined him to obey fashion so far as only to write short poems.  His
rural poems are ειδύλλια, ‘little pictures.’  His fragments of epic, or
imitations of the epic hymns are not

    όσα πόντος άείδει

—not full and sonorous as the songs of Homer and the sea.  ‘Ce poète est
le moins naïf qui se puisse rencontrer, et il se dégage de son oeuvre un
parfum de naïveté rustique.’ {0g}  They are, what a German critic has
called them, _mythologischen genre-bilder_, cabinet pictures in the
manner called _genre_, full of pretty detail and domestic feeling.  And
this brings us to the third characteristic of the age,—its art was
elaborately pictorial.  Poetry seems to have sought inspiration from
painting, while painting, as we have said, inclined to _genre_, to
luxurious representations of the amours of the gods or the adventures of
heroes, with backgrounds of pastoral landscape.  Shepherds fluted while
Perseus slew Medusa.

The old order of things in Greece had been precisely the opposite of this
Alexandrian manner.  Homer and the later Homeric legends, with the
tragedians, inspired the sculptors, and even the artisans who decorated
vases.  When a new order of subjects became fashionable, and when every
rich Alexandrian had pictures or frescoes on his walls, it appears that
the painters took the lead, that the initiative in art was theirs.  The
Alexandrian pictures perished long ago, but the relics of Alexandrian
style which remain in the buried cities of Campania, in Pompeii
especially, bear testimony to the taste of the period. {0h}  Out of
nearly two thousand Pompeian pictures, it is calculated that some
fourteen hundred (roughly speaking) are mythological in subject.  The
loves of the gods are repeated in scores of designs, and these designs
closely correspond to the mythological poems of Theocritus and his
younger contemporaries Bion and Moschus.  Take as an example the
adventure of Europa: Lord Tennyson’s lines, in _The Palace of Art_ are
intended to describe _picture_—

    ‘Or sweet Europa’s mantle blew unclasp’d,
       From off her shoulder backward borne:
    From one hand droop’d a crocus: one hand grasp’d
          The mild bull’s golden horn.’

The words of Moschus also seem as if they might have derived their
inspiration from a painting, the touches are so minute, and so
picturesque—

    ‘Meanwhile Europa, riding on the back of the divine bull, with one
    hand clasped the beast’s great horn, and with the other caught up her
    garment’s purple fold, lest it might trail and be drenched in the
    hoar sea’s infinite spray.  And her deep robe was blown out in the
    wind, like the sail of a ship, and lightly ever it wafted the maiden
    onward.’

Now every single ‘motive’ of this description,—Europa with one hand
holding the bull’s horn, with the other lifting her dress, the wind
puffing out her shawl like a sail, is repeated in the Pompeian
wall-pictures, which themselves are believed to be derived from
Alexandrian originals.  There are more curious coincidences than this.
In the sixth idyl of Theocritus, Damoetas makes the Cyclops say that
Galatea ‘will send him many a messenger.’  The mere idea of describing
the monstrous cannibal Polyphemus in love, is artificial and Alexandrian.
But who were the ‘messengers’ of the sea-nymph Galatea?  A Pompeian
picture illustrates the point, by representing a little Love riding up to
the shore on the back of a dolphin, with a letter in his hand for
Polyphemus.  Greek art in Egypt suffered from an Egyptian plague of
Loves.  Loves flutter through the Pompeian pictures as they do through
the poems of Moschus and Bion.  They are carried about in cages, for
sale, like birds.  They are caught in bird-traps.  They don the lion-skin
of Heracles.  They flutter about baskets laden with roses; round rosy
Loves, like the cupids of Boucher.  They are not akin to ‘the grievous
Love,’ the mighty wrestler who threw Daphnis a fall, in the first idyl of
Theocritus.  They are ‘the children that flit overhead, the little Loves,
like the young nightingales upon the budding trees,’ which flit round the
dead Adonis in the fifteenth idyl.  They are the birds that shun the boy
fowler, in Bion’s poem, and perch uncalled (as in a bronze in the Uffizi)
on the grown man.  In one or other of the sixteen Pompeian pictures of
Venus and Adonis, the Loves are breaking their bows and arrows for grief,
as in the hymn of Bion.

Enough has perhaps been said about the social and artistic taste of
Alexandria to account for the remarkable differences in manner between
the rustic idyls of Theocritus and the epic idyls of himself and his
followers Moschus and Bion.  In the rural idyls, Theocritus was himself
and wrote to please himself.  In the epic idyls, as in the Hymn to the
Dioscuri, and in the two poems on Heracles, he was writing to please the
taste of Alexandria.  He had to choose epic topics, but he was warned by
the famous saying of Callimachus (‘a great book is a great evil’) not to
imitate the length of the epic. {0i}  He was also to shun close imitation
of what are so easily imitated, the regular recurring _formulae_, the
commonplace of Homer.  He was to add minute pictorial touches, as in the
description of Alcmena’s waking when the serpents attacked her child,—a
passage rich in domestic pathos and incident which contrast strongly with
Pindar’s bare narrative of the same events.  We have noted the same
pictorial quality in the _Europa_ of Moschus.  Our own age has often been
compared to the Alexandrian epoch, to that era of large cities, wealth,
refinement, criticism, and science; and the pictorial _Idylls of the
King_ very closely resemble the epico-idyllic manner of Alexandria.  We
have tried to examine the society in which Theocritus lived.  But our
impressions about the poet are more distinct.  In him we find the most
genial character; pious as Greece counted piety; tender as became the
poet of love; glad as the singer of a happy southern world should be;
gifted, above all, with humour, and with dramatic power.  ‘His lyre has
all the chords’; his is the last of all the perfect voices of Hellas;
after him no man saw life with eyes so steady and so mirthful.

About the lives of the three idyllic poets literary history says little.
About their deaths she only tells us through the dirge by Moschus, that
Bion was poisoned.  The lovers of Theocritus would willingly hope that he
returned from Alexandria to Sicily, about the time when he wrote the
sixteenth idyl, and that he lived in the enjoyment of the friendship and
the domestic happiness and honour which he sang so well, through the
golden age of Hiero (264 B.C.)  No happier fortune could befall him who
wrote the epigram of the lady of heavenly love, who worshipped with the
noble wife of Nicias under the green roof of Milesian Aphrodite, and who
prophesied of the return of peace and of song to Sicily and Syracuse.




THEOCRITUS


IDYL I


_The shepherd Thyrsis meets a goatherd_, _in a shady place beside a
spring_, _and at his invitation sings the Song of Daphnis_.  _This ideal
hero of Greek pastoral song had won for his bride the fairest of the
Nymphs_.  _Confident in the strength of his passion_, _he boasted that
Love could never subdue him to a new question_.  _Love avenged himself by
making Daphnis desire a strange maiden_, _but to this temptation he never
yielded_, _and so died a constant lover_.  _The song tells how the cattle
and the wild things of the wood bewailed him_, _how Hermes and Priapus
gave him counsel in vain_, _and how with his last breath he retorted the
taunts of the implacable Aphrodite_.

_The scene is in Sicily_.

                                * * * * *

_Thyrsis_.  Sweet, meseems, is the whispering sound of yonder pine tree,
goatherd, that murmureth by the wells of water; and sweet are thy
pipings.  After Pan the second prize shalt thou bear away, and if he take
the horned goat, the she-goat shalt thou win; but if he choose the
she-goat for his meed, the kid falls to thee, and dainty is the flesh of
kids e’er the age when thou milkest them.

_The Goatherd_.  Sweeter, O shepherd, is thy song than the music of
yonder water that is poured from the high face of the rock!  Yea, if the
Muses take the young ewe for their gift, a stall-fed lamb shalt thou
receive for thy meed; but if it please them to take the lamb, thou shalt
lead away the ewe for the second prize.

_Thyrsis_.  Wilt thou, goatherd, in the nymphs’ name, wilt thou sit thee
down here, among the tamarisks, on this sloping knoll, and pipe while in
this place I watch thy flocks?

_Goatherd_.  Nay, shepherd, it may not be; we may not pipe in the
noontide.  ’Tis Pan we dread, who truly at this hour rests weary from the
chase; and bitter of mood is he, the keen wrath sitting ever at his
nostrils.  But, Thyrsis, for that thou surely wert wont to sing _The
Affliction of Daphnis_, and hast most deeply meditated the pastoral muse,
come hither, and beneath yonder elm let us sit down, in face of Priapus
and the fountain fairies, where is that resting-place of the shepherds,
and where the oak trees are.  Ah! if thou wilt but sing as on that day
thou sangest in thy match with Chromis out of Libya, I will let thee
milk, ay, three times, a goat that is the mother of twins, and even when
she has suckled her kids her milk doth fill two pails.  A deep bowl of
ivy-wood, too, I will give thee, rubbed with sweet bees’-wax, a twy-eared
bowl newly wrought, smacking still of the knife of the graver.  Round its
upper edges goes the ivy winding, ivy besprent with golden flowers; and
about it is a tendril twisted that joys in its saffron fruit.  Within is
designed a maiden, as fair a thing as the gods could fashion, arrayed in
a sweeping robe, and a snood on her head.  Beside her two youths with
fair love-locks are contending from either side, with alternate speech,
but her heart thereby is all untouched.  And now on one she glances,
smiling, and anon she lightly flings the other a thought, while by reason
of the long vigils of love their eyes are heavy, but their labour is all
in vain.

Beyond these an ancient fisherman and a rock are fashioned, a rugged
rock, whereon with might and main the old man drags a great net for his
cast, as one that labours stoutly.  Thou wouldst say that he is fishing
with all the might of his limbs, so big the sinews swell all about his
neck, grey-haired though he be, but his strength is as the strength of
youth.  Now divided but a little space from the sea-worn old man is a
vineyard laden well with fire-red clusters, and on the rough wall a
little lad watches the vineyard, sitting there.  Round him two she-foxes
are skulking, and one goes along the vine-rows to devour the ripe grapes,
and the other brings all her cunning to bear against the scrip, and vows
she will never leave the lad, till she strand him bare and breakfastless.
But the boy is plaiting a pretty locust-cage with stalks of asphodel, and
fitting it with reeds, and less care of his scrip has he, and of the
vines, than delight in his plaiting.

All about the cup is spread the soft acanthus, a miracle of varied work,
{6} a thing for thee to marvel on.  For this bowl I paid to a Calydonian
ferryman a goat and a great white cream cheese.  Never has its lip
touched mine, but it still lies maiden for me.  Gladly with this cup
would I gain thee to my desire, if thou, my friend, wilt sing me that
delightful song.  Nay, I grudge it thee not at all.  Begin, my friend,
for be sure thou canst in no wise carry thy song with thee to Hades, that
puts all things out of mind!

                          _The Song of Thyrsis_.

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!  Thyrsis of Etna am
I, and this is the voice of Thyrsis.  Where, ah! where were ye when
Daphnis was languishing; ye Nymphs, where were ye?  By Peneus’s beautiful
dells, or by dells of Pindus? for surely ye dwelt not by the great stream
of the river Anapus, nor on the watch-tower of Etna, nor by the sacred
water of Acis.

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

For him the jackals, for him the wolves did cry; for him did even the
lion out of the forest lament.  Kine and bulls by his feet right many,
and heifers plenty, with the young calves bewailed him.

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

Came Hermes first from the hill, and said, ‘Daphnis, who is it that
torments thee; child, whom dost thou love with so great desire?’  The
neatherds came, and the shepherds; the goatherds came: all they asked
what ailed him.  Came also Priapus,—

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

And said: ‘Unhappy Daphnis, wherefore dost thou languish, while for thee
the maiden by all the fountains, through all the glades is fleeting, in
search of thee?  Ah! thou art too laggard a lover, and thou nothing
availest!  A neatherd wert thou named, and now thou art like the
goatherd:

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

‘For the goatherd, when he marks the young goats at their pastime, looks
on with yearning eyes, and fain would be even as they; and thou, when
thou beholdest the laughter of maidens, dost gaze with yearning eyes, for
that thou dost not join their dances.’

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

Yet these the herdsman answered not again, but he bare his bitter love to
the end, yea, to the fated end he bare it.

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

Ay, but she too came, the sweetly smiling Cypris, craftily smiling she
came, yet keeping her heavy anger; and she spake, saying: ‘Daphnis,
methinks thou didst boast that thou wouldst throw Love a fall, nay, is it
not thyself that hast been thrown by grievous Love?’

_Begin ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

But to her Daphnis answered again: ‘Implacable Cypris, Cypris terrible,
Cypris of mortals detested, already dost thou deem that my latest sun has
set; nay, Daphnis even in Hades shall prove great sorrow to Love.

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

‘Where it is told how the herdsman with Cypris—Get thee to Ida, get thee
to Anchises!  There are oak trees—here only galingale blows, here sweetly
hum the bees about the hives!

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

‘Thine Adonis, too, is in his bloom, for he herds the sheep and slays the
hares, and he chases all the wild beasts.  Nay, go and confront Diomedes
again, and say, “The herdsman Daphnis I conquered, do thou join battle
with me.”

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

‘Ye wolves, ye jackals, and ye bears in the mountain caves, farewell!
The herdsman Daphnis ye never shall see again, no more in the dells, no
more in the groves, no more in the woodlands.  Farewell Arethusa, ye
rivers, good-night, that pour down Thymbris your beautiful waters.

_Begin_, _ye Muses dear_, _begin the pastoral song_!

‘That Daphnis am I who here do herd the kine, Daphnis who water here the
bulls and calves.

‘O Pan, Pan! whether thou art on the high hills of Lycaeus, or rangest
mighty Maenalus, haste hither to the Sicilian isle!  Leave the tomb of
Helice, leave that high cairn of the son of Lycaon, which seems wondrous
fair, even in the eyes of the blessed. {9}

_Give o’er_, _ye Muses_, _come_, _give o’er the pastoral song_!

‘Come hither, my prince, and take this fair pipe, honey-breathed with
wax-stopped joints; and well it fits thy lip: for verily I, even I, by
Love am now haled to Hades.

_Give o’er_, _ye Muses_, _come_, _give o’er the pastoral song_!

‘Now violets bear, ye brambles, ye thorns bear violets; and let fair
narcissus bloom on the boughs of juniper!  Let all things with all be
confounded,—from pines let men gather pears, for Daphnis is dying!  Let
the stag drag down the hounds, let owls from the hills contend in song
with the nightingales.’

_Give o’er_, _ye Muses_, _come_, _give o’er the pastoral song_!

So Daphnis spake, and ended; but fain would Aphrodite have given him back
to life.  Nay, spun was all the thread that the Fates assigned, and
Daphnis went down the stream.  The whirling wave closed over the man the
Muses loved, the man not hated of the nymphs.

_Give o’er_, _ye Muses_, _come_, _give o’er the pastoral song_!

And thou, give me the bowl, and the she-goat, that I may milk her and
poor forth a libation to the Muses.  Farewell, oh, farewells manifold, ye
Muses, and I, some future day, will sing you yet a sweeter song.

_The Goatherd_.  Filled may thy fair mouth be with honey, Thyrsis, and
filled with the honeycomb; and the sweet dried fig mayst thou eat of
Aegilus, for thou vanquishest the cicala in song!  Lo here is thy cup,
see, my friend, of how pleasant a savour!  Thou wilt think it has been
dipped in the well-spring of the Hours.  Hither, hither, Cissaetha: do
thou milk her, Thyrsis.  And you young she-goats, wanton not so wildly
lest you bring up the he-goat against you.



IDYL II


_Simaetha_, _madly in love with Delphis_, _who has forsaken her_,
_endeavours to subdue him to her by magic_, _and by invoking the Moon_,
_in her character of Hecate_, _and of Selene_.  _She tells the tale of
the growth of her passion_, _and vows vengeance if her magic arts are
unsuccessful_.

_The scene is probably some garden beneath the moonlit shy_, _near the
town_, _and within sound of the sea_.  _The characters are Simaetha_,
_and Thestylis_, _her handmaid_.

                                * * * * *

WHERE are my laurel leaves? come, bring them, Thestylis; and where are
the love-charms?  Wreath the bowl with bright-red wool, that I may knit
the witch-knots against my grievous lover, {11} who for twelve days, oh
cruel, has never come hither, nor knows whether I am alive or dead, nor
has once knocked at my door, unkind that he is!  Hath Love flown off with
his light desires by some other path—Love and Aphrodite?  To-morrow I
will go to the wrestling school of Timagetus, to see my love and to
reproach him with all the wrong he is doing me.  But now I will bewitch
him with my enchantments!  Do thou, Selene, shine clear and fair, for
softly, Goddess, to thee will I sing, and to Hecate of hell.  The very
whelps shiver before her as she fares through black blood and across the
barrows of the dead.

Hail, awful Hecate! to the end be thou of our company, and make this
medicine of mine no weaker than the spells of Circe, or of Medea, or of
Perimede of the golden hair.

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Lo, how the barley grain first smoulders in the fire,—nay, toss on the
barley, Thestylis!  Miserable maid, where are thy wits wandering?  Even
to thee, wretched that I am, have I become a laughing-stock, even to
thee?  Scatter the grain, and cry thus the while, ‘’Tis the bones of
Delphis I am scattering!’

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Delphis troubled me, and I against Delphis am burning this laurel; and
even as it crackles loudly when it has caught the flame, and suddenly is
burned up, and we see not even the dust thereof, lo, even thus may the
flesh of Delphis waste in the burning!

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Even as I melt this wax, with the god to aid, so speedily may he by love
be molten, the Myndian Delphis!  And as whirls this brazen wheel, {13} so
restless, under Aphrodite’s spell, may he turn and turn about my doors.

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Now will I burn the husks, and thou, O Artemis, hast power to move hell’s
adamantine gates, and all else that is as stubborn.  Thestylis, hark,
’tis so; the hounds are baying up and down the town!  The Goddess stands
where the three ways meet!  Hasten, and clash the brazen cymbals.

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Lo, silent is the deep, and silent the winds, but never silent the
torment in my breast.  Nay, I am all on fire for him that made me,
miserable me, no wife but a shameful thing, a girl no more a maiden.

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Three times do I pour libation, and thrice, my Lady Moon, I speak this
spell:—Be it with a friend that he lingers, be it with a leman he lies,
may he as clean forget them as Theseus, of old, in Dia—so legends
tell—did utterly forget the fair-tressed Ariadne.

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Coltsfoot is an Arcadian weed that maddens, on the hills, the young
stallions and fleet-footed mares.  Ah! even as these may I see Delphis;
and to this house of mine, may he speed like a madman, leaving the bright
palaestra.

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

This fringe from his cloak Delphis lost; that now I shred and cast into
the cruel flame.  Ah, ah, thou torturing Love, why clingest thou to me
like a leech of the fen, and drainest all the black blood from my body?

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

Lo, I will crush an eft, and a venomous draught to-morrow I will bring
thee!

But now, Thestylis, take these magic herbs and secretly smear the juice
on the jambs of his gate (whereat, even now, my heart is captive, though
nothing he recks of me), and spit and whisper, ‘’Tis the bones of Delphis
that I smear.’

_My magic wheel_, _draw home to me the man I love_!

And now that I am alone, whence shall I begin to bewail my love?  Whence
shall I take up the tale: who brought on me this sorrow?  The
maiden-bearer of the mystic vessel came our way, Anaxo, daughter of
Eubulus, to the grove of Artemis; and behold, she had many other wild
beasts paraded for that time, in the sacred show, and among them a
lioness.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

And the Thracian servant of Theucharidas,—my nurse that is but lately
dead, and who then dwelt at our doors,—besought me and implored me to
come and see the show.  And I went with her, wretched woman that I am,
clad about in a fair and sweeping linen stole, over which I had thrown
the holiday dress of Clearista.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

Lo!  I was now come to the mid-point of the highway, near the dwelling of
Lycon, and there I saw Delphis and Eudamippus walking together.  Their
beards were more golden than the golden flower of the ivy; their breasts
(they coming fresh from the glorious wrestler’s toil) were brighter of
sheen than thyself Selene!

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

Even as I looked I loved, loved madly, and all my heart was wounded, woe
is me, and my beauty began to wane.  No more heed took I of that show,
and how I came home I know not; but some parching fever utterly overthrew
me, and I lay a-bed ten days and ten nights.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

And oftentimes my skin waxed wan as the colour of boxwood, and all my
hair was falling from my head, and what was left of me was but skin and
bones.  Was there a wizard to whom I did not seek, or a crone to whose
house I did not resort, of them that have art magical?  But this was no
light malady, and the time went fleeting on.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

Thus I told the true story to my maiden, and said, ‘Go, Thestylis, and
find me some remedy for this sore disease.  Ah me, the Myndian possesses
me, body and soul!  Nay, depart, and watch by the wrestling-ground of
Timagetus, for there is his resort, and there he loves to loiter.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

‘And when thou art sure he is alone, nod to him secretly, and say,
“Simaetha bids thee to come to her,” and lead him hither privily.’  So I
spoke; and she went and brought the bright-limbed Delphis to my house.
But I, when I beheld him just crossing the threshold of the door, with
his light step,—

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

Grew colder all than snow, and the sweat streamed from my brow like the
dank dews, and I had no strength to speak, nay, nor to utter as much as
children murmur in their slumber, calling to their mother dear: and all
my fair body turned stiff as a puppet of wax.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

Then when he had gazed on me, he that knows not love, he fixed his eyes
on the ground, and sat down on my bed, and spake as he sat him down:
‘Truly, Simaetha, thou didst by no more outrun mine own coming hither,
when thou badst me to thy roof, than of late I outran in the race the
beautiful Philinus:

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

‘For I should have come; yea, by sweet Love, I should have come, with
friends of mine, two or three, as soon as night drew on, bearing in my
breast the apples of Dionysus, and on my head silvery poplar leaves, the
holy boughs of Heracles, all twined with bands of purple.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

‘And if you had received me, they would have taken it well, for among all
the youths unwed I have a name for beauty and speed of foot.  With one
kiss of thy lovely mouth I had been content; but an if ye had thrust me
forth, and the door had been fastened with the bar, then truly should
torch and axe have broken in upon you.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

‘And now to Cypris first, methinks, my thanks are due, and after Cypris
it is thou that hast caught me, lady, from the burning, in that thou
badst me come to this thy house, half consumed as I am!  Yea, Love, ’tis
plain, lights oft a fiercer blaze than Hephaestus the God of Lipara.

_Bethink thee of my love_, _and whence it came_, _my Lady Moon_!

‘With his madness dire, he scares both the maiden from her bower and the
bride from the bridal bed, yet warm with the body of her lord!’

So he spake, and I, that was easy to win, took his hand, and drew him
down on the soft bed beside me.  And immediately body from body caught
fire, and our faces glowed as they had not done, and sweetly we murmured.
And now, dear Selene, to tell thee no long tale, the great rites were
accomplished, and we twain came to our desire.  Faultless was I in his
sight, till yesterday, and he, again, in mine.  But there came to me the
mother of Philista, my flute player, and the mother of Melixo, to-day,
when the horses of the Sun were climbing the sky, bearing Dawn of the
rosy arms from the ocean stream.  Many another thing she told me; and
chiefly this, that Delphis is a lover, and whom he loves she vowed she
knew not surely, but this only, that ever he filled up his cup with the
unmixed wine, to drink a toast to his dearest.  And at last he went off
hastily, saying that he would cover with garlands the dwelling of his
love.

This news my visitor told me, and she speaks the truth.  For indeed, at
other seasons, he would come to me thrice, or four times, in the day, and
often would leave with me his Dorian oil flask.  But now it is the
twelfth day since I have even looked on him!  Can it be that he has not
some other delight, and has forgotten me?  Now with magic rites I will
strive to bind him, {19} but if still he vexes me, he shall beat, by the
Fates I vow it, at the gate of Hell.  Such evil medicines I store against
him in a certain coffer, the use whereof, my lady, an Assyrian stranger
taught me.

But do thou farewell, and turn thy steeds to Ocean, Lady, and my pain I
will bear, as even till now I have endured it.  Farewell, Selene bright
and fair, farewell ye other stars, that follow the wheels of quiet Night.



IDYL III


_A goatherd_, _leaving his goats to feed on the hillside_, _in the charge
of Tityrus_, _approaches the cavern of Amaryllis_, _with its veil of
ferns and ivy_, _and attempts to win back the heart of the girl by song_.
_He mingles promises with harmless threats_, _and repeats_, _in exquisite
verses_, _the names of the famous lovers of old days_, _Milanion and
Endymion_.  _Failing to move Amaryllis_, _the goatherd threatens to die
where he has thrown himself down_, _beneath the trees_.

                                * * * * *

COURTING Amaryllis with song I go, while my she-goats feed on the hill,
and Tityrus herds them.  Ah, Tityrus, my dearly beloved, feed thou the
goats, and to the well-side lead them, Tityrus, and ’ware the yellow
Libyan he-goat, lest he butt thee with his horns.

Ah, lovely Amaryllis, why no more, as of old, dust thou glance through
this cavern after me, nor callest me, thy sweetheart, to thy side.  Can
it be that thou hatest me?  Do I seem snub-nosed, now thou hast seen me
near, maiden, and under-hung?  Thou wilt make me strangle myself!

Lo, ten apples I bring thee, plucked from that very place where thou
didst bid me pluck them, and others to-morrow I will bring thee.

Ah, regard my heart’s deep sorrow! ah, would I were that humming bee, and
to thy cave might come dipping beneath the fern that hides thee, and the
ivy leaves!

Now know I Love, and a cruel God is he.  Surely he sucked the lioness’s
dug, and in the wild wood his mother reared him, whose fire is scorching
me, and bites even to the bone.

Ah, lovely as thou art to look upon, ah heart of stone, ah dark-browed
maiden, embrace me, thy true goatherd, that I may kiss thee, and even in
empty kisses there is a sweet delight!

Soon wilt thou make me rend the wreath in pieces small, the wreath of
ivy, dear Amaryllis, that I keep for thee, with rose-buds twined, and
fragrant parsley.  Ah me, what anguish!  Wretched that I am, whither
shall I turn!  Thou dust not hear my prayer!

I will cast off my coat of skins, and into yonder waves I will spring,
where the fisher Olpis watches for the tunny shoals, and even if I die
not, surely thy pleasure will have been done.

I learned the truth of old, when, amid thoughts of thee, I asked, ‘Loves
she, loves she not?’ and the poppy petal clung not, and gave no crackling
sound, but withered on my smooth forearm, even so. {21}

And she too spoke sooth, even Agroeo, she that divineth with a sieve, and
of late was binding sheaves behind the reapers, who said that I had set
all my heart on thee, but that thou didst nothing regard me.

Truly I keep for thee the white goat with the twin kids that Mermnon’s
daughter too, the brown-skinned Erithacis, prays me to give her; and give
her them I will, since thou dost flout me.

My right eyelid throbs, is it a sign that I am to see her?  Here will I
lean me against this pine tree, and sing, and then perchance she will
regard me, for she is not all of adamant.

Lo, Hippomenes when he was eager to marry the famous maiden, took apples
in his hand, and so accomplished his course; and Atalanta saw, and madly
longed, and leaped into the deep waters of desire.  Melampus too, the
soothsayer, brought the herd of oxen from Othrys to Pylos, and thus in
the arms of Bias was laid the lovely mother of wise Alphesiboea.

And was it not thus that Adonis, as he pastured his sheep upon the hills,
led beautiful Cytherea to such heights of frenzy, that not even in his
death doth she unclasp him from her bosom?  Blessed, methinks is the lot
of him that sleeps, and tosses not, nor turns, even Endymion; and,
dearest maiden, blessed I call Iason, whom such things befell, as ye that
be profane shall never come to know.

My head aches, but thou carest not.  I will sing no more, but dead will I
lie where I fall, and here may the wolves devour me.

Sweet as honey in the mouth may my death be to thee.



IDYL IV


_Battus and Corydon_, _two rustic fellows_, _meeting in a glade_, _gossip
about their neighbour_, _Aegon_, _who has gone to try his fortune at the
Olympic games_.  _After some random banter_, _the talk turns on the death
of Amaryllis_, _and the grief of Battus is disturbed by the roaming of
his cattle_.  _Corydon removes a thorn that has run into his friend’s
foot_, _and the conversation comes back to matters of rural scandal_.

_The scene is in Southern Italy_.

                                * * * * *

_Battus_.  Tell me, Corydon, whose kine are these,—the cattle of
Philondas?

_Corydon_.  Nay, they are Aegon’s, he gave me them to pasture.

_Battus_.  Dost thou ever find a way to milk them all, on the sly, just
before evening?

_Corydon_.  No chance of that, for the old man puts the calves beneath
their dams, and keeps watch on me.

_Battus_.  But the neatherd himself,—to what land has he passed out of
sight?

_Corydon_.  Hast thou not heard?  Milon went and carried him off to the
Alpheus.

_Battus_.  And when, pray, did _he_ ever set eyes on the wrestlers’ oil?

_Corydon_.  They say he is a match for Heracles, in strength and
hardihood.

_Battus_.  And I, so mother says, am a better man than Polydeuces.

_Corydon_.  Well, off he has gone, with a shovel, and with twenty sheep
from his flock here. {24}

_Battus_.  Milo, thou’lt see, will soon be coaxing the wolves to rave!

_Corydon_.  But Aegon’s heifers here are lowing pitifully, and miss their
master.

_Battus_.  Yes, wretched beasts that they are, how false a neatherd was
theirs!

_Corydon_.  Wretched enough in truth, and they have no more care to
pasture.

_Battus_.  Nothing is left, now, of that heifer, look you, bones, that’s
all.  She does not live on dewdrops, does she, like the grasshopper?

_Corydon_.  No, by Earth, for sometimes I take her to graze by the banks
of Aesarus, fair handfuls of fresh grass I give her too, and otherwhiles
she wantons in the deep shade round Latymnus.

_Battus_.  How lean is the red bull too!  May the sons of Lampriades, the
burghers to wit, get such another for their sacrifice to Hera, for the
township is an ill neighbour.

_Corydon_.  And yet that bull is driven to the mere’s mouth, and to the
meadows of Physcus, and to the Neaethus, where all fair herbs bloom, red
goat-wort, and endive, and fragrant bees-wort.

_Battus_.  Ah, wretched Aegon, thy very kine will go to Hades, while thou
too art in love with a luckless victory, and thy pipe is flecked with
mildew, the pipe that once thou madest for thyself!

_Corydon_.  Not the pipe, by the nymphs, not so, for when he went to
Pisa, he left the same as a gift to me, and I am something of a player.
Well can I strike up the air of _Glaucé_ and well the strain of
_Pyrrhus_, and _the praise of Croton I sing_, and _Zacynthus is a goodly
town_, and _Lacinium that fronts the dawn_!  There Aegon the boxer,
unaided, devoured eighty cakes to his own share, and there he caught the
bull by the hoof, and brought him from the mountain, and gave him to
Amaryllis.  Thereon the women shrieked aloud, and the neatherd,—he burst
out laughing.

_Battus_.  Ah, gracious Amaryllis!  Thee alone even in death will we
ne’er forget.  Dear to me as my goats wert thou, and thou art dead!
Alas, too cruel a spirit hath my lot in his keeping.

_Corydon_.  Dear Battus, thou must needs be comforted.  The morrow
perchance will bring better fortune.  The living may hope, the dead alone
are hopeless.  Zeus now shows bright and clear, and anon he rains.

_Battus_.  Enough of thy comforting!  Drive the calves from the lower
ground, the cursed beasts are grazing on the olive-shoots.  Hie on, white
face.

_Corydon_.  Out, Cymaetha, get thee to the hill!  Dost thou not hear?  By
Pan, I will soon come and be the death of you, if you stay there!  Look,
here she is creeping back again!  Would I had my crook for hare killing:
how I would cudgel thee.

_Battus_.  In the name of Zeus, prithee look here, Corydon!  A thorn has
just run into my foot under the ankle.  How deep they grow, the
arrow-headed thorns.  An ill end befall the heifer; I was pricked when I
was gaping after her.  Prithee dost see it?

_Corydon_.  Yes, yes, and I have caught it in my nails, see, here it is.

_Battus_.  How tiny is the wound, and how tall a man it masters!

_Corydon_.  When thou goest to the hill, go not barefoot, Battus, for on
the hillside flourish thorns and brambles plenty.

_Battus_.  Come, tell me, Corydon, the old man now, does he still run
after that little black-browed darling whom he used to dote on?

_Corydon_.  He is after her still, my lad; but yesterday I came upon
them, by the very byre, and right loving were they.

_Battus_.  Well done, thou ancient lover!  Sure, thou art near akin to
the satyrs, or a rival of the slim-shanked Pans! {26}



IDYL V


_This Idyl begins with a ribald debate between two hirelings_, _who_, _at
last_, _compete with each other in a match of pastoral song_.  _No other
idyl of Theocritus is so frankly true to the rough side of rustic
manners_.  _The scene is in Southern Italy_.

                                * * * * *

_Comatas_.  Goats of mine, keep clear of that notorious shepherd of
Sibyrtas, that Lacon; he stole my goat-skin yesterday.

_Lacon_.  Will ye never leave the well-head?  Off, my lambs, see ye not
Comatas; him that lately stole my shepherd’s pipe?

_Comatas_.  What manner of pipe might that be, for when gat’st _thou_ a
pipe, thou slave of Sibyrtas?  Why does it no more suffice thee to keep a
flute of straw, and whistle with Corydon?

_Lacon_.  What pipe, free sir? why, the pipe that Lycon gave me.  And
what manner of goat-skin hadst thou, that Lacon made off with?  Tell me,
Comatas, for truly even thy master, Eumarides, had never a goat-skin to
sleep in.

_Comatas_.  ’Twas the skin that Crocylus gave me, the dappled one, when
he sacrificed the she-goat to the nymphs; but thou, wretch, even then
wert wasting with envy, and now, at last, thou hast stripped me bare!

_Lacon_.  Nay verily, so help me Pan of the seashore, it was not Lacon
the son of Calaethis that filched the coat of skin.  If I lie, sirrah,
may I leap frenzied down this rock into the Crathis!

_Comatas_.  Nay verily, my friend, so help me these nymphs of the mere
(and ever may they be favourable, as now, and kind to me), it was not
Comatas that pilfered thy pipe.

_Lacon_.  If I believe thee, may I suffer the afflictions of Daphnis!
But see, if thou carest to stake a kid—though indeed ’tis scarce worth my
while—then, go to, I will sing against thee, and cease not, till thou
dust cry ‘enough!’

_Comatas_.  _The sow defied Athene_!  See, there is staked the kid, go
to, do thou too put a fatted lamb against him, for thy stake.

_Lacon_.  Thou fox, and where would be our even betting then?  Who ever
chose hair to shear, in place of wool? and who prefers to milk a filthy
bitch, when he can have a she-goat, nursing her first kid?

_Comatas_.  Why, he that deems himself as sure of getting the better of
his neighbour as thou dost, a wasp that buzzes against the cicala.  But
as it is plain thou thinkst the kid no fair stake, lo, here is this
he-goat.  Begin the match!

_Lacon_.  No such haste, thou art not on fire!  More sweetly wilt thou
sing, if thou wilt sit down beneath the wild olive tree, and the groves
in this place.  Chill water falls there, drop by drop, here grows the
grass, and here a leafy bed is strown, and here the locusts prattle.

_Comatas_.  Nay, no whit am I in haste, but I am sorely vexed, that thou
shouldst dare to look me straight in the face, thou whom I used to teach
while thou wert still a child.  See where gratitude goes!  As well rear
wolf-whelps, breed hounds, that they may devour thee!

_Lacon_.  And what good thing have I to remember that I ever learned or
heard from thee, thou envious thing, thou mere hideous manikin!

                                . . . . .

But come this way, come, and thou shalt sing thy last of country song.

_Comatas_.  That way I will not go!  Here be oak trees, and here the
galingale, and sweetly here hum the bees about the hives.  There are two
wells of chill water, and on the tree the birds are warbling, and the
shadow is beyond compare with that where thou liest, and from on high the
pine tree pelts us with her cones.

_Lacon_.  Nay, but lambs’ wool, truly, and fleeces, shalt thou tread
here, if thou wilt but come,—fleeces more soft than sleep, but the
goat-skins beside thee stink—worse than thyself.  And I will set a great
bowl of white milk for the nymphs, and another will I offer of sweet
olive oil.

_Comatas_.  Nay, but an if thou wilt come, thou shalt tread here the soft
feathered fern, and flowering thyme, and beneath thee shall be strown the
skins of she-goats, four times more soft than the fleeces of thy lambs.
And I will set out eight bowls of milk for Pan, and eight bowls full of
the richest honeycombs.

_Lacon_.  Thence, where thou art, I pray thee, begin the match, and there
sing thy country song, tread thine own ground and keep thine oaks to
thyself.  But who, who shall judge between us?  Would that Lycopas, the
neatherd, might chance to come this way!

_Comatas_.  I want nothing with him, but that man, if thou wilt, that
woodcutter we will call, who is gathering those tufts of heather near
thee.  It is Morson.

_Lacon_.  Let us shout, then!

_Comatas_.  Call thou to him.

_Lacon_.  Ho, friend, come hither and listen for a little while, for we
two have a match to prove which is the better singer of country song.  So
Morson, my friend, neither judge me too kindly, no, nor show him favour.

_Comatas_.  Yes, dear Morson, for the nymphs’ sake neither lean in thy
judgment to Comatas, nor, prithee, favour _him_.  The flock of sheep thou
seest here belongs to Sibyrtas of Thurii, and the goats, friend, that
thou beholdest are the goats of Eumarides of Sybaris.

_Lacon_.  Now, in the name of Zeus did any one ask thee, thou
make-mischief, who owned the flock, I or Sibyrtas?  What a chatterer thou
art!

_Comatas_.  Best of men, I am for speaking the whole truth, and boasting
never, but thou art too fond of cutting speeches.

_Lacon_.  Come, say whatever thou hast to say, and let the stranger get
home to the city alive; oh, Paean, what a babbler thou art, Comatas!


THE SINGING MATCH.


_Comatas_.  The Muses love me better far than the minstrel Daphnis; but a
little while ago I sacrificed two young she-goats to the Muses.

_Lacon_.  Yea, and me too Apollo loves very dearly, and a noble ram I
rear for Apollo, for the feast of the Carnea, look you, is drawing nigh.

_Comatas_.  The she-goats that I milk have all borne twins save two.  The
maiden saw me, and ‘alas,’ she cried, ‘dost thou milk alone?’

_Lacon_.  Ah, ah, but Lacon here hath nigh twenty baskets full of cheese,
and Lacon lies with his darling in the flowers!

_Comatas_.  Clearista, too, pelts the goatherd with apples as he drives
past his she-goats, and a sweet word she murmurs.

_Lacon_.  And wild with love am I too, for my fair young darling, that
meets the shepherd, with the bright hair floating round the shapely neck.

_Comatas_.  Nay, ye may not liken dog-roses to the rose, or wind-flowers
to the roses of the garden; by the garden walls their beds are
blossoming.

_Lacon_.  Nay, nor wild apples to acorns, for acorns are bitter in the
oaken rind, but apples are sweet as honey.

_Comatas_.  Soon will I give my maiden a ring-dove for a gift; I will
take it from the juniper tree, for there it is brooding.

_Lacon_.  But I will give my darling a soft fleece to make a cloak, a
free gift, when I shear the black ewe.

_Comatas_.  Forth from the wild olive, my bleating she-goats, feed here
where the hillside slopes, and the tamarisks grove.

_Lacon_.  Conarus there, and Cynaetha, will you never leave the oak?
Graze here, where Phalarus feeds, where the hillside fronts the dawn.

_Comatas_.  Ay, and I have a vessel of cypress wood, and a mixing bowl,
the work of Praxiteles, and I hoard them for my maiden.

_Lacon_.  I too have a dog that loves the flock, the dog to strangle
wolves; him I am giving to my darling to chase all manner of wild beasts.

_Comatas_.  Ye locusts that overleap our fence, see that ye harm not our
vines, for our vines are young.

_Lacon_.  Ye cicalas, see how I make the goatherd chafe: even so,
methinks, do ye vex the reapers.

_Comatas_.  I hate the foxes, with their bushy brushes, that ever come at
evening, and eat the grapes of Micon.

_Lacon_.  And I hate the lady-birds that devour the figs of Philondas,
and flit down the wind.

_Comatas_.  Dost thou not remember how I cudgelled thee, and thou didst
grin and nimbly writhe, and catch hold of yonder oak?

_Lacon_.  That I have no memory of, but how Eumarides bound thee there,
upon a time, and flogged thee through and through, that I do very well
remember.

_Comatas_.  Already, Morson, some one is waxing bitter, dust thou see no
sign of it?  Go, go, and pluck, forthwith, the squills from some old
wife’s grave.

_Lacon_.  And I too, Morson, I make some one chafe, and thou dost
perceive it.  Be off now to the Hales stream, and dig cyclamen.

_Comatas_.  Let Himera flow with milk instead of water, and thou,
Crathis, run red with wine, and all thy reeds bear apples.

_Lacon_.  Would that the fount of Sybaris may flow with honey, and may
the maiden’s pail, at dawning, be dipped, not in water, but in the
honeycomb.

_Comatas_.  My goats eat cytisus, and goatswort, and tread the lentisk
shoots, and lie at ease among the arbutus.

_Lacon_.  But my ewes have honey-wort to feed on, and luxuriant creepers
flower around, as fair as roses.

_Comatas_.  I love not Alcippe, for yesterday she did not kiss me, and
take my face between her hands, when I gave her the dove.

_Lacon_.  But deeply I love my darling, for a kind kiss once I got, in
return for the gift of a shepherd’s pipe.

_Comatas_.  Lacon, it never was right that pyes should contend with the
nightingale, nor hoopoes with swans, but thou, unhappy swain, art ever
for contention.

_Morson’s Judgement_.  I bid the shepherd cease.  But to thee, Comatas,
Morson presents the lamb.  And thou, when thou hast sacrificed her to the
nymphs, send Morson, anon, a goodly portion of her flesh.

_Comatas_.  I will, by Pan.  Now leap, and snort, my he-goats, all the
herd of you, and see here how loud I ever will laugh, and exult over
Lacon, the shepherd, for that, at last, I have won the lamb.  See, I will
leap sky high with joy.  Take heart, my horned goats, to-morrow I will
dip you all in the fountain of Sybaris.  Thou white he-goat, I will beat
thee if thou dare to touch one of the herd before I sacrifice the lamb to
the nymphs.  There he is at it again!  Call me Melanthius, {34} not
Comatas, if I do not cudgel thee.



IDYL VI


_Daphnis and Damoetas_, _two herdsmen of the golden age_, _meet by a
well-side_, _and sing a match_, _their topic is the Cyclops_,
_Polyphemus_, _and his love for the sea-nymph_, _Galatea_.

_The scene is in Sicily_.

                                * * * * *

DAMOETAS, and Daphnis the herdsman, once on a time, Aratus, led the flock
together into one place.  Golden was the down on the chin of one, the
beard of the other was half-grown, and by a well-head the twain sat them
down, in the summer noon, and thus they sang.  ’Twas Daphnis that began
the singing, for the challenge had come from Daphnis.

                     _Daphnis’s Song of the Cyclops_.

Galatea is pelting thy flock with apples, Polyphemus, she says the
goatherd is a laggard lover!  And thou dost not glance at her, oh hard,
hard that thou art, but still thou sittest at thy sweet piping.  Ah see,
again, she is pelting thy dog, that follows thee to watch thy sheep.  He
barks, as he looks into the brine, and now the beautiful waves that
softly plash reveal him, {36} as he runs upon the shore.  Take heed that
he leap not on the maiden’s limbs as she rises from the salt water, see
that he rend not her lovely body!  Ah, thence again, see, she is
wantoning, light as dry thistle-down in the scorching summer weather.
She flies when thou art wooing her; when thou woo’st not she pursues
thee, she plays out all her game and leaves her king unguarded.  For
truly to Love, Polyphemus, many a time doth foul seem fair!

       _He ended and Damoetas touched a prelude to his sweet song_.

I saw her, by Pan, I saw her when she was pelting my flock.  Nay, she
escaped not me, escaped not my one dear eye,—wherewith I shall see to my
life’s end,—let Telemus the soothsayer, that prophesies hateful things,
hateful things take home, to keep them for his children!  But it is all
to torment her, that I, in my turn, give not back her glances, pretending
that I have another love.  To hear this makes her jealous of me, by
Paean, and she wastes with pain, and springs madly from the sea, gazing
at my caves and at my herds.  And I hiss on my dog to bark at her, for
when I loved Galatea he would whine with joy, and lay his muzzle on her
lap.  Perchance when she marks how I use her she will send me many a
messenger, but on her envoys I will shut my door till she promises that
herself will make a glorious bridal-bed on this island for me.  For in
truth, I am not so hideous as they say!  But lately I was looking into
the sea, when all was calm; beautiful seemed my beard, beautiful my one
eye—as I count beauty—and the sea reflected the gleam of my teeth whiter
than the Parian stone.  Then, all to shun the evil eye, did I spit thrice
in my breast; for this spell was taught me by the crone, Cottytaris, that
piped of yore to the reapers in Hippocoon’s field.

Then Damoetas kissed Daphnis, as he ended his song, and he gave Daphnis a
pipe, and Daphnis gave him a beautiful flute.  Damoetas fluted, and
Daphnis piped, the herdsman,—and anon the calves were dancing in the soft
green grass.  Neither won the victory, but both were invincible.



IDYL VII


_The poet making his way through the noonday heat_, _with two friends_,
_to a harvest feast_, _meets the goatherd_, _Lycidas_.  _To humour the
poet Lycidas sings a love song of his own_, _and the other replies with
verses about the passion of Aratus_, _the famous writer of didactic
verse_.  _After a courteous parting from Lycidas_, _the poet and his two
friends repair to the orchard_, _where Demeter is being gratified with
the first-fruits of harvest and vintaging_.

_In this idyl_, _Theocritus_, _speaking of himself by the name of
Simichidas_, _alludes to his teachers in poetry_, _and_, _perhaps_, _to
some of the literary quarrels of the time_.

_The scene is in the isle of Cos_.  _G. Hermann fancied that the scene
was in Lucania_, _and Mr. W. R. Paton thinks he can identify the places
named by the aid of inscriptions_ (Classical Review, ii. 8, 265).  _See
also Rayet_, Mémoire sur l’île de Cos, p. 18, _Paris_, 1876.

                                * * * * *

                           _The Harvest Feast_.

IT fell upon a time when Eucritus and I were walking from the city to the
Hales water, and Amyntas was the third in our company.  The harvest-feast
of Deo was then being held by Phrasidemus and Antigenes, two sons of
Lycopeus (if aught there be of noble and old descent), whose lineage
dates from Clytia, and Chalcon himself—Chalcon, beneath whose foot the
fountain sprang, the well of Buriné.  He set his knee stoutly against the
rock, and straightway by the spring poplars and elm trees showed a
shadowy glade, arched overhead they grew, and pleached with leaves of
green.  We had not yet reached the mid-point of the way, nor was the tomb
of Brasilas yet risen upon our sight, when,—thanks be to the Muses—we met
a certain wayfarer, the best of men, a Cydonian.  Lycidas was his name, a
goatherd was he, nor could any that saw him have taken him for other than
he was, for all about him bespoke the goatherd.  Stripped from the
roughest of he-goats was the tawny skin he wore on his shoulders, the
smell of rennet clinging to it still, and about his breast an old cloak
was buckled with a plaited belt, and in his right hand he carried a
crooked staff of wild olive: and quietly he accosted me, with a smile, a
twinkling eye, and a laugh still on his lips:—

‘Simichidas, whither, pray, through the noon dost thou trail thy feet,
when even the very lizard on the rough stone wall is sleeping, and the
crested larks no longer fare afield?  Art thou hastening to a feast, a
bidden guest, or art thou for treading a townsman’s wine-press?  For such
is thy speed that every stone upon the way spins singing from thy boots!’

‘Dear Lycidas,’ I answered him, ‘they all say that thou among herdsmen,
yea, and reapers art far the chiefest flute-player.  In sooth this
greatly rejoices our hearts, and yet, to my conceit, meseems I can vie
with thee.  But as to this journey, we are going to the harvest-feast,
for, look you some friends of ours are paying a festival to fair-robed
Demeter, out of the first-fruits of their increase, for verily in rich
measure has the goddess filled their threshing-floor with barley grain.
But come, for the way and the day are thine alike and mine, come, let us
vie in pastoral song, perchance each will make the other delight.  For I,
too, am a clear-voiced mouth of the Muses, and they all call me the best
of minstrels, but I am not so credulous; no, by Earth, for to my mind I
cannot as yet conquer in song that great Sicelidas—the Samian—nay, nor
yet Philetas.  ’Tis a match of frog against cicala!’

So I spoke, to win my end, and the goatherd with his sweet laugh, said,
‘I give thee this staff, because thou art a sapling of Zeus, and in thee
is no guile.  For as I hate your builders that try to raise a house as
high as the mountain summit of Oromedon, {40} so I hate all birds of the
Muses that vainly toil with their cackling notes against the Minstrel of
Chios!  But come, Simichidas, without more ado let us begin the pastoral
song.  And I—nay, see friend—if it please thee at all, this ditty that I
lately fashioned on the mountain side!’

                          _The Song of Lycidas_.

Fair voyaging befall Ageanax to Mytilene, both when the _Kids_ are
westering, and the south wind the wet waves chases, and when Orion holds
his feet above the Ocean!  Fair voyaging betide him, if he saves Lycidas
from the fire of Aphrodite, for hot is the love that consumes me.

The halcyons will lull the waves, and lull the deep, and the south wind,
and the east, that stirs the sea-weeds on the farthest shores, {41} the
halcyons that are dearest to the green-haired mermaids, of all the birds
that take their prey from the salt sea.  Let all things smile on Ageanax
to Mytilene sailing, and may he come to a friendly haven.  And I, on that
day, will go crowned with anise, or with a rosy wreath, or a garland of
white violets, and the fine wine of Ptelea I will dip from the bowl as I
lie by the fire, while one shall roast beans for me, in the embers.  And
elbow-deep shall the flowery bed be thickly strewn, with fragrant leaves
and with asphodel, and with curled parsley; and softly will I drink,
toasting Ageanax with lips clinging fast to the cup, and draining it even
to the lees.

Two shepherds shall be my flute-players, one from Acharnae, one from
Lycope, and hard by Tityrus shall sing, how the herdsman Daphnis once
loved a strange maiden, and how on the hill he wandered, and how the oak
trees sang his dirge—the oaks that grow by the banks of the river
Himeras—while he was wasting like any snow under high Haemus, or Athos,
or Rhodope, or Caucasus at the world’s end.

And he shall sing how, once upon a time, the great chest prisoned the
living goatherd, by his lord’s infatuate and evil will, and how the
blunt-faced bees, as they came up from the meadow to the fragrant cedar
chest, fed him with food of tender flowers, because the Muse still
dropped sweet nectar on his lips. {42}

O blessed Comatas, surely these joyful things befell thee, and thou wast
enclosed within the chest, and feeding on the honeycomb through the
springtime didst thou serve out thy bondage.  Ah, would that in my days
thou hadst been numbered with the living, how gladly on the hills would I
have herded thy pretty she-goats, and listened to thy voice, whilst thou,
under oaks or pine trees lying, didst sweetly sing, divine Comatas!

When he had chanted thus much he ceased, and I followed after him again,
with some such words as these:—

‘Dear Lycidas, many another song the Nymphs have taught me also, as I
followed my herds upon the hillside, bright songs that Rumour, perchance,
has brought even to the throne of Zeus.  But of them all this is far the
most excellent, wherewith I will begin to do thee honour: nay listen as
thou art dear to the Muses.’

                        _The Song of Simichidas_.

For Simichidas the Loves have sneezed, for truly the wretch loves Myrto
as dearly as goats love the spring. {43}  But Aratus, far the dearest of
my friends, deep, deep his heart he keeps Desire,—and Aratus’s love is
young!  Aristis knows it, an honourable man, nay of men the best, whom
even Phoebus would permit to stand and sing lyre in hand, by his tripods.
Aristis knows how deeply love is burning Aratus to the bone.  Ah, Pan,
thou lord of the beautiful plain of Homole, bring, I pray thee, the
darling of Aratus unbidden to his arms, whosoe’er it be that he loves.
If this thou dost, dear Pan, then never may the boys of Arcady flog thy
sides and shoulders with stinging herbs, when scanty meats are left them
on thine altar.  But if thou shouldst otherwise decree, then may all thy
skin be frayed and torn with thy nails, yea, and in nettles mayst thou
couch!  In the hills of the Edonians mayst thou dwell in mid-winter time,
by the river Hebrus, close neighbour to the Polar star!  But in summer
mayst thou range with the uttermost Æthiopians beneath the rock of the
Blemyes, whence Nile no more is seen.

And you, leave ye the sweet fountain of Hyetis and Byblis, and ye that
dwell in the steep home of golden Dione, ye Loves as rosy as red apples,
strike me with your arrows, the desired, the beloved; strike, for that
ill-starred one pities not my friend, my host!  And yet assuredly the
pear is over-ripe, and the maidens cry ‘alas, alas, thy fair bloom fades
away!’

Come, no more let us mount guard by these gates, Aratus, nor wear our
feet away with knocking there.  Nay, let the crowing of the morning cock
give others over to the bitter cold of dawn.  Let Molon alone, my friend,
bear the torment at that school of passion!  For us, let us secure a
quiet life, and some old crone to spit on us for luck, and so keep all
unlovely things away.

Thus I sang, and sweetly smiling, as before, he gave me the staff, a
pledge of brotherhood in the Muses.  Then he bent his way to the left,
and took the road to Pyxa, while I and Eucritus, with beautiful Amyntas,
turned to the farm of Phrasidemus.  There we reclined on deep beds of
fragrant lentisk, lowly strown, and rejoicing we lay in new stript leaves
of the vine.  And high above our heads waved many a poplar, many an elm
tree, while close at hand the sacred water from the nymphs’ own cave
welled forth with murmurs musical.  On shadowy boughs the burnt cicalas
kept their chattering toil, far off the little owl cried in the thick
thorn brake, the larks and finches were singing, the ring-dove moaned,
the yellow bees were flitting about the springs.  All breathed the scent
of the opulent summer, of the season of fruits; pears at our feet and
apples by our sides were rolling plentiful, the tender branches, with
wild plums laden, were earthward bowed, and the four-year-old pitch seal
was loosened from the mouth of the wine-jars.

Ye nymphs of Castaly that hold the steep of Parnassus, say, was it ever a
bowl like this that old Chiron set before Heracles in the rocky cave of
Pholus?  Was it nectar like this that beguiled the shepherd to dance and
foot it about his folds, the shepherd that dwelt by Anapus, on a time,
the strong Polyphemus who hurled at ships with mountains?  Had these ever
such a draught as ye nymphs bade flow for us by the altar of Demeter of
the threshing-floor?

Ah, once again may I plant the great fan on her corn-heap, while she
stands smiling by, with sheaves and poppies in her hands.



IDYL VIII


_The scene is among the high mountain pastures of Sicily_:—

   ‘_On the sward_, _at the cliff top_
   _Lie strewn the white flocks_;’

_and far below shines and murmurs the Sicilian sea_.  _Here Daphnis and
Menalcas_, _two herdsmen of the golden age_, _meet_, _while still in
their earliest youth_, _and contend for the prize of pastoral_.  _Their
songs_, _in elegiac measure_, _are variations on the themes of love and
friendship_ (_for Menalcas sings of Milon_, _Daphnis of Nais_), _and of
nature_.  _Daphnis is the winner_; _it is his earliest victory_, _and the
prelude to his great renown among nymphs and shepherds_.  _In this
version the strophes are arranged as in Fritzsche’s text_.  _Some critics
take the poem to be a patchwork by various hands_.

                                * * * * *

AS beautiful Daphnis was following his kine, and Menalcas shepherding his
flock, they met, as men tell, on the long ranges of the hills.  The
beards of both had still the first golden bloom, both were in their
earliest youth, both were pipe-players skilled, both skilled in song.
Then first Menalcas, looking at Daphnis, thus bespoke him.

‘Daphnis, thou herdsman of the lowing kine, art thou minded to sing a
match with me?  Methinks I shall vanquish thee, when I sing in turn, as
readily as I please.’

Then Daphnis answered him again in this wise, ‘Thou shepherd of the
fleecy sheep, Menalcas, the pipe-player, never wilt thou vanquish me in
song, not thou, if thou shouldst sing till some evil thing befall thee!’

_Menalcas_.  Dost thou care then, to try this and see, dost thou care to
risk a stake?

_Daphnis_.  I do care to try this and see, a stake I am ready to risk.

_Menalcas_.  But what shall we stake, what pledge shall we find equal and
sufficient?

_Daphnis_.  I will pledge a calf, and do thou put down a lamb, one that
has grown to his mother’s height.

_Menalcas_.  Nay, never will I stake a lamb, for stern is my father, and
stern my mother, and they number all the sheep at evening.

_Daphnis_.  But what, then, wilt thou lay, and where is to be the
victor’s gain?

_Menalcas_.  The pipe, the fair pipe with nine stops, that I made myself,
fitted with white wax, and smoothed evenly, above as below.  This would I
readily wager, but never will I stake aught that is my father’s.

_Daphnis_.  See then, I too, in truth, have a pipe with nine stops,
fitted with white wax, and smoothed evenly, above as below.  But lately I
put it together, and this finger still aches, where the reed split, and
cut it deeply.

_Menalcas_.  But who is to judge between us, who will listen to our
singing?

_Daphnis_.  That goatherd yonder, he will do, if we call him hither, the
man for whom that dog, a black hound with a white patch, is barking among
the kids.

Then the boys called aloud, and the goatherd gave ear, and came, and the
boys began to sing, and the goatherd was willing to be their umpire.  And
first Menalcas sang (for he drew the lot) the sweet-voiced Menalcas, and
Daphnis took up the answering strain of pastoral song—and ’twas thus
Menalcas began:

_Menalcas_.  Ye glades, ye rivers, issue of the Gods, if ever Menalcas
the flute-player sang a song ye loved, to please him, feed his lambs; and
if ever Daphnis come hither with his calves, nay he have no less a boon.

_Daphnis_.  Ye wells and pastures, sweet growth o’ the world, if Daphnis
sings like the nightingales, do ye fatten this herd of his, and if
Menalcas hither lead a flock, may he too have pasture ungrudging to his
full desire!

_Menalcas_.  There doth the ewe bear twins, and there the goats; there
the bees fill the hives, and there oaks grow loftier than common,
wheresoever beautiful Milon’s feet walk wandering; ah, if he depart, then
withered and lean is the shepherd, and lean the pastures

_Daphnis_.  Everywhere is spring, and pastures everywhere, and everywhere
the cows’ udders are swollen with milk, and the younglings are fostered,
wheresoever fair Nais roams; ah, if she depart, then parched are the
kine, and he that feeds them!

_Menalcas_.  O bearded goat, thou mate of the white herd, and O ye
blunt-faced kids, where are the manifold deeps of the forest, thither get
ye to the water, for thereby is Milon; go, thou hornless goat, and say to
him, ‘Milon, Proteus was a herdsman, and that of seals, though he was a
god.’

_Daphnis_. . . .

_Menalcas_.  Not mine be the land of Pelops, not mine to own talents of
gold, nay, nor mine to outrun the speed of the winds!  Nay, but beneath
this rock will I sing, with thee in mine arms, and watch our flocks
feeding together, and, before us, the Sicilian sea.

_Daphnis_ . . . .

_Menalcas_ . . . .

_Daphnis_.  Tempest is the dread pest of the trees, drought of the
waters, snares of the birds, and the hunter’s net of the wild beasts, but
ruinous to man is the love of a delicate maiden.  O father, O Zeus, I
have not been the only lover, thou too hast longed for a mortal woman.

Thus the boys sang in verses amoebaean, and thus Menalcas began the
crowning lay:

_Menalcas_.  Wolf, spare the kids, spare the mothers of my herd, and harm
not me, so young as I am to tend so great a flock.  Ah, Lampurus, my dog,
dost thou then sleep so soundly? a dog should not sleep so sound, that
helps a boyish shepherd.  Ewes of mine, spare ye not to take your fill of
the tender herb, ye shall not weary, ’ere all this grass grows again.
Hist, feed on, feed on, fill, all of you, your udders, that there may be
milk for the lambs, and somewhat for me to store away in the
cheese-crates.

Then Daphnis followed again, and sweetly preluded to his singing:

_Daphnis_.  Me, even me, from the cave, the girl with meeting eyebrows
spied yesterday as I was driving past my calves, and she cried, ‘How
fair, how fair he is!’  But I answered her never the word of railing, but
cast down my eyes, and plodded on my way.

Sweet is the voice of the heifer, sweet her breath, {50} sweet to lie
beneath the sky in summer, by running water.

Acorns are the pride of the oak, apples of the apple tree, the calf of
the heifer, and the neatherd glories in his kine.

So sang the lads; and the goatherd thus bespoke them, ‘Sweet is thy
mouth, O Daphnis, and delectable thy song!  Better is it to listen to thy
singing, than to taste the honeycomb.  Take thou the pipe, for thou hast
conquered in the singing match.  Ah, if thou wilt but teach some lay,
even to me, as I tend the goats beside thee, this blunt-horned she-goat
will I give thee, for the price of thy teaching, this she-goat that ever
fills the milking pail above the brim.’

Then was the boy as glad,—and leaped high, and clapped his hands over his
victory,—as a young fawn leaps about his mother.  But the heart of the
other was wasted with grief, and desolate, even as a maiden sorrows that
is newly wed.

From this time Daphnis became the foremost among the shepherds, and while
yet in his earliest youth, he wedded the nymph Nais.



IDYL IX


_Daphnis and Menalcas_, _at the bidding of the poet_, _sing the joys of
the neatherds and of the shepherds life_.  _Both receive the thanks of
the poet_, _and rustic prizes_—_a staff and a horn_, _made of a spiral
shell_.  _Doubts have been expressed as to the authenticity of the
prelude and concluding verses_.  _The latter breathe all Theocritus’s
enthusiastic love of song_.

                                * * * * *

SING, Daphnis, a pastoral lay, do thou first begin the song, the song
begin, O Daphnis; but let Menalcas join in the strain, when ye have mated
the heifers and their calves, the barren kine and the bulls.  Let them
all pasture together, let them wander in the coppice, but never leave the
herd.  Chant thou for me, first, and on the other side let Menalcas
reply.

_Daphnis_.  Ah, sweetly lows the calf, and sweetly the heifer, sweetly
sounds the neatherd with his pipe, and sweetly also I!  My bed of leaves
is strown by the cool water, and thereon are heaped fair skins from the
white calves that were all browsing upon the arbutus, on a time, when the
south-west wind dashed me them from the height.

And thus I heed no more the scorching summer, than a lover cares to heed
the words of father or of mother.

So Daphnis sang to me, and thus, in turn, did Menalcas sing.

_Menalcas_.  Aetna, mother mine, I too dwell in a beautiful cavern in the
chamber of the rock, and, lo, all the wealth have I that we behold in
dreams; ewes in plenty and she-goats abundant, their fleeces are strown
beneath my head and feet.  In the fire of oak-faggots puddings are
hissing-hot, and dry beech-nuts roast therein, in the wintry weather,
and, truly, for the winter season I care not even so much as a toothless
man does for walnuts, when rich pottage is beside him.

Then I clapped my hands in their honour, and instantly gave each a gift,
to Daphnis a staff that grew in my father’s close, self-shapen, yet so
straight, that perchance even a craftsman could have found no fault in
it.  To the other I gave a goodly spiral shell, the meat that filled it
once I had eaten after stalking the fish on the Icarian rocks (I cut it
into five shares for five of us),—and Menalcas blew a blast on the shell.

Ye pastoral Muses, farewell!  Bring ye into the light the song that I
sang there to these shepherds on that day!  Never let the pimple grow on
my tongue-tip. {53}

Cicala to cicala is dear, and ant to ant, and hawks to hawks, but to me
the Muse and song.  Of song may all my dwelling be full, for sleep is not
more sweet, nor sudden spring, nor flowers are more delicious to the
bees—so dear to me are the Muses. {54}  Whom they look on in happy hour,
Circe hath never harmed with her enchanted potion.



IDYL X
THE REAPERS


_This is an idyl of the same genre as Idyl IV_.  _The sturdy reaper_,
_Milon_, _as he levels the swathes of corn_, _derides his languid and
love-worn companion_, _Buttus_.  _The latter defends his gipsy love in
verses which have been the keynote of much later poetry_, _and which echo
in the fourth book of Lucretius_, _and in the Misanthrope of Molière_.
_Milon replies with the song of Lityerses_—_a string_, _apparently_, _of
popular rural couplets_, _such as Theocritus may have heard chanted in
the fields_.

                                * * * * *

_Milan_.  Thou toilsome clod; what ails thee now, thou wretched fellow?
Canst thou neither cut thy swathe straight, as thou wert wont to do, nor
keep time with thy neighbour in thy reaping, but thou must fall out, like
an ewe that is foot-pricked with a thorn and straggles from the herd?
What manner of man wilt thou prove after mid-noon, and at evening, thou
that dost not prosper with thy swathe when thou art fresh begun?

_Battus_.  Milon, thou that canst toil till late, thou chip of the
stubborn stone, has it never befallen thee to long for one that was not
with thee?

_Milan_.  Never!  What has a labouring man to do with hankering after
what he has not got?

_Battus_.  Then it never befell thee to lie awake for love?

_Milan_.  Forbid it; ’tis an ill thing to let the dog once taste of
pudding.

_Battus_.  But I, Milon, am in love for almost eleven days!

_Milan_.  ’Tis easily seen that thou drawest from a wine-cask, while even
vinegar is scarce with me.

_Battus_.  And for Love’s sake, the fields before my doors are untilled
since seed-time.

_Milan_.  But which of the girls afflicts thee so?

_Battus_.  The daughter of Polybotas, she that of late was wont to pipe
to the reapers on Hippocoon’s farm.

_Milan_.  God has found out the guilty!  Thou hast what thou’st long been
seeking, that grasshopper of a girl will lie by thee the night long!

_Battus_.  Thou art beginning thy mocks of me, but Plutus is not the only
blind god; he too is blind, the heedless Love!  Beware of talking big.

_Milan_.  Talk big I do not!  Only see that thou dust level the corn, and
strike up some love-ditty in the wench’s praise.  More pleasantly thus
wilt thou labour, and, indeed, of old thou wert a melodist.

_Battus_.  Ye Muses Pierian, sing ye with me the slender maiden, for
whatsoever ye do but touch, ye goddesses, ye make wholly fair.

They all call thee a _gipsy_, gracious Bombyca, and _lean_, and
_sunburnt_, ’tis only I that call thee _honey-pale_.

Yea, and the violet is swart, and swart the lettered hyacinth, but yet
these flowers are chosen the first in garlands.

The goat runs after cytisus, the wolf pursues the goat, the crane follows
the plough, but I am wild for love of thee.

Would it were mine, all the wealth whereof once Croesus was lord, as men
tell!  Then images of us twain, all in gold, should be dedicated to
Aphrodite, thou with thy flute, and a rose, yea, or an apple, and I in
fair attire, and new shoon of Amyclae on both my feet.

Ah gracious Bombyca, thy feet are fashioned like carven ivory, thy voice
is drowsy sweet, and thy ways, I cannot tell of them! {57}

_Milan_.  Verily our clown was a maker of lovely songs, and we knew it
not!  How well he meted out and shaped his harmony; woe is me for the
beard that I have grown, all in vain!  Come, mark thou too these lines of
godlike Lityerses


THE LITYERSES SONG.


_Demeter_, _rich in fruit_, _and rich in grain_, _may this corn be easy
to win_, _and fruitful exceedingly_!

_Bind_, _ye bandsters_, _the sheaves_, _lest the wayfarer __should cry_,
‘_Men of straw were the workers here_, _ay_, _and their hire was
wasted_!’

_See that the cut stubble faces the North wind_, _or the West_, _’tis
thus the grain waxes richest_.

_They that thresh corn should shun the noon-day steep_; _at noon the
chaff parts easiest from the straw_.

_As for the reapers_, _let them begin when the crested lark is waking_,
_and cease when he sleeps_, _but take holiday in the heat_.

_Lads_, _the frog has a jolly life_, _he is not cumbered about a butler
to his drink_, _for he has liquor by him unstinted_!

_Boil the lentils better_, _thou miserly steward_; _take heed lest thou
chop thy fingers_, _when thou’rt splitting cumin-seed_.

’Tis thus that men should sing who labour i’ the sun, but thy starveling
love, thou clod, ’twere fit to tell to thy mother when she stirs in bed
at dawning.



IDYL XI
THE CYCLOPS IN LOVE


_Nicias_, _the physician and poet_, _being in love_, _Theocritus reminds
him that in song lies the only remedy_.  _It was by song_, _he says_,
_that the Cyclops_, _Polyphemus_, _got him some ease_, _when he was in
love with Galatea_, _the sea-nymph_.

_The idyl displays_, _in the most graceful manner_, _the Alexandrian
taste for turning Greek mythology into love stories_.  _No creature could
be more remote from love than the original Polyphemus_, _the cannibal
giant of the Odyssey_.

                                * * * * *

THERE is none other medicine, Nicias, against Love, neither unguent,
methinks, nor salve to sprinkle,—none, save the Muses of Pieria!  Now a
delicate thing is their minstrelsy in man’s life, and a sweet, but hard
to procure.  Methinks thou know’st this well, who art thyself a leech,
and beyond all men art plainly dear to the Muses nine.

’Twas surely thus the Cyclops fleeted his life most easily, he that dwelt
among us,—Polyphemus of old time,—when the beard was yet young on his
cheek and chin; and he loved Galatea.  He loved, not with apples, not
roses, nor locks of hair, but with fatal frenzy, and all things else he
held but trifles by the way.  Many a time from the green pastures would
his ewes stray back, self-shepherded, to the fold.  But he was singing of
Galatea, and pining in his place he sat by the sea-weed of the beach,
from the dawn of day, with the direst hurt beneath his breast of mighty
Cypris’s sending,—the wound of her arrow in his heart!

Yet this remedy he found, and sitting on the crest of the tall cliff, and
looking to the deep, ’twas thus he would sing:—

                          _Song of the Cyclops_.

O milk-white Galatea, why cast off him that loves thee?  More white than
is pressed milk to look upon, more delicate than the lamb art thou, than
the young calf wantoner, more sleek than the unripened grape!  Here dust
thou resort, even so, when sweet sleep possesses me, and home straightway
dost thou depart when sweet sleep lets me go, fleeing me like an ewe that
has seen the grey wolf.

I fell in love with thee, maiden, I, on the day when first thou camest,
with my mother, and didst wish to pluck the hyacinths from the hill, and
I was thy guide on the way.  But to leave loving thee, when once I had
seen thee, neither afterward, nor now at all, have I the strength, even
from that hour.  But to thee all this is as nothing, by Zeus, nay,
nothing at all!

I know, thou gracious maiden, why it is that thou dust shun me.  It is
all for the shaggy brow that spans all my forehead, from this to the
other ear, one long unbroken eyebrow.  And but one eye is on my forehead,
and broad is the nose that overhangs my lip.  Yet I (even such as thou
seest me) feed a thousand cattle, and from these I draw and drink the
best milk in the world.  And cheese I never lack, in summer time or
autumn, nay, nor in the dead of winter, but my baskets are always
overladen.

Also I am skilled in piping, as none other of the Cyclopes here, and of
thee, my love, my sweet-apple, and of myself too I sing, many a time,
deep in the night.  And for thee I tend eleven fawns, all
crescent-browed, {61} and four young whelps of the bear.

Nay, come thou to me, and thou shalt lack nothing that now thou hast.
Leave the grey sea to roll against the land; more sweetly, in this
cavern, shalt thou fleet the night with me!  Thereby the laurels grow,
and there the slender cypresses, there is the ivy dun, and the sweet
clustered grapes; there is chill water, that for me deep-wooded Ætna
sends down from the white snow, a draught divine!  Ah who, in place of
these, would choose the sea to dwell in, or the waves of the sea?

But if thou dust refuse because my body seems shaggy and rough, well, I
have faggots of oakwood, and beneath the ashes is fire unwearied, and I
would endure to let thee burn my very soul, and this my one eye, the
dearest thing that is mine.

Ah me, that my mother bore me not a finny thing, so would I have gone
down to thee, and kissed thy hand, if thy lips thou would not suffer me
to kiss!  And I would have brought thee either white lilies, or the soft
poppy with its scarlet petals.  Nay, these are summer’s flowers, and
those are flowers of winter, so I could not have brought thee them all at
one time.

Now, verily, maiden, now and here will I learn to swim, if perchance some
stranger come hither, sailing with his ship, that I may see why it is so
dear to thee, to have thy dwelling in the deep.

Come forth, Galatea, and forget as thou comest, even as I that sit here
have forgotten, the homeward way!  Nay, choose with me to go shepherding,
with me to milk the flocks, and to pour the sharp rennet in, and to fix
the cheeses.

There is none that wrongs me but that mother of mine, and her do I blame.
Never, nay, never once has she spoken a kind word for me to thee, and
that though day by day she beholds me wasting.  I will tell her that my
head, and both my feet are throbbing, that she may somewhat suffer, since
I too am suffering.

O Cyclops, Cyclops, whither are thy wits wandering?  Ah that thou wouldst
go, and weave thy wicker-work, and gather broken boughs to carry to thy
lambs: in faith, if thou didst this, far wiser wouldst thou be!

Milk the ewe that thou hast, why pursue the thing that shuns thee?  Thou
wilt find, perchance, another, and a fairer Galatea.  Many be the girls
that bid me play with them through the night, and softly they all laugh,
if perchance I answer them.  On land it is plain that I too seem to be
somebody!

                                * * * * *

Lo, thus Polyphemus still shepherded his love with song, and lived
lighter than if he had given gold for ease.



IDYL XII
THE PASSIONATE FRIEND


_This is rather a lyric than an idyl_, _being an expression of that
singular passion which existed between men in historical Greece_.  _The
next idyl_, _like the Myrmidons of Aeschylus_, _attributes the same
manners to mythical and heroic Greece_.  _It should be unnecessary to say
that the affection between Homeric warriors_, _like Achilles and
Patroclus_, _was only that of companions in arms and was quite unlike the
later sentiment_.

                                * * * * *

HAST thou come, dear youth, with the third night and the dawning; hast
thou come? but men in longing grow old in a day!  As spring than the
winter is sweeter, as the apple than the sloe, as the ewe is deeper of
fleece than the lamb she bore; as a maiden surpasses a thrice-wedded
wife, as the fawn is nimbler than the calf; nay, by as much as sweetest
of all fowls sings the clear-voiced nightingale, so much has thy coming
gladdened me!  To thee have I hastened as the traveller hastens under the
burning sun to the shadow of the ilex tree.

Ah, would that equally the Loves may breathe upon us twain, may we become
a song in the ears of all men unborn.

‘Lo, a pair were these two friends among the folk of former time,’ the
one ‘the Knight’ (so the Amyclaeans call him), the other, again, ‘the
Page,’ so styled in speech of Thessaly.

‘An equal yoke of friendship they bore: ah, surely then there were golden
men of old, when friends gave love for love!’

And would, O father Cronides, and would, ye ageless immortals, that this
might be; and that when two hundred generations have sped, one might
bring these tidings to me by Acheron, the irremeable stream.

‘The loving-kindness that was between thee and thy gracious friend, is
even now in all men’s mouths, and chiefly on the lips of the young.’

Nay, verily, the gods of heaven will be masters of these things, to rule
them as they will, but when I praise thy graciousness no blotch that
punishes the perjurer shall spring upon the tip of my nose!  Nay, if ever
thou hast somewhat pained me, forthwith thou healest the hurt, giving a
double delight, and I depart with my cup full and running over!

Nisaean men of Megara, ye champions of the oars, happily may ye dwell,
for that ye honoured above all men the Athenian stranger, even Diodes,
the true lover.  Always about his tomb the children gather in their
companies, at the coming in of the spring, and contend for the prize of
kissing.  And whoso most sweetly touches lip to lip, laden with garlands
he returneth to his mother.  Happy is he that judges those kisses of the
children; surely he prays most earnestly to bright-faced Ganymedes, that
his lips may be as the Lydian touchstone wherewith the money-changers try
gold lest perchance base metal pass for true.



IDYL XIII
HYLAS AND HERACLES


_As in the eleventh Idyl_, _Nicias is again addressed_, _by way of
introduction to the story of Hylas_.  _This beautiful lad_, _a favourite
companion of Heracles_, _took part in the Quest of the Fleece of Gold_.
_As he went to draw water from a fountain_, _the water-nymphs dragged him
down to their home_, _and Heracles_, _after a long and vain search_, _was
compelled to follow the heroes of the Quest on foot to Phasis_.

                                * * * * *

NOT for us only, Nicias, as we were used to deem, was Love begotten, by
whomsoever of the Gods was the father of the child; not first to us
seemed beauty beautiful, to us that are mortal men and look not on the
morrow.  Nay, but the son of Amphitryon, that heart of bronze, who abode
the wild lion’s onset, loved a lad, beautiful Hylas—Hylas of the braided
locks, and he taught him all things as a father teaches his child, all
whereby himself became a mighty man, and renowned in minstrelsy.  Never
was he apart from Hylas, not when midnoon was high in heaven, not when
Dawn with her white horses speeds upwards to the dwelling of Zeus, not
when the twittering nestlings look towards the perch, while their mother
flaps her wings above the smoke-browned beam; and all this that the lad
might be fashioned to his mind, and might drive a straight furrow, and
come to the true measure of man.

But when Iason, Aeson’s son, was sailing after the fleece of gold (and
with him followed the champions, the first chosen out of all the cities,
they that were of most avail), to rich Iolcos too came the mighty man and
adventurous, the son of the woman of Midea, noble Alcmene.  With him went
down Hylas also, to Argo of the goodly benches, the ship that grazed not
on the clashing rocks Cyanean, but through she sped and ran into deep
Phasis, as an eagle over the mighty gulf of the sea.  And the clashing
rocks stand fixed, even from that hour!

Now at the rising of the Pleiades, when the upland fields begin to
pasture the young lambs, and when spring is already on the wane, then the
flower divine of Heroes bethought them of sea-faring.  On board the
hollow Argo they sat down to the oars, and to the Hellespont they came
when the south wind had been for three days blowing, and made their haven
within Propontis, where the oxen of the Cianes wear bright the
ploughshare, as they widen the furrows.  Then they went forth upon the
shore, and each couple busily got ready supper in the late evening, and
many as they were one bed they strewed lowly on the ground, for they
found a meadow lying, rich in couches of strown grass and leaves.  Thence
they cut them pointed flag-leaves, and deep marsh-galingale.  And Hylas
of the yellow hair, with a vessel of bronze in his hand, went to draw
water against suppertime, for Heracles himself, and the steadfast
Telamon, for these comrades twain supped ever at one table.  Soon was he
ware of a spring, in a hollow land, and the rushes grew thickly round it,
and dark swallow-wort, and green maiden-hair, and blooming parsley, and
deer-grass spreading through the marshy land.  In the midst of the water
the nymphs were arraying their dances, the sleepless nymphs, dread
goddesses of the country people, Eunice, and Malis, and Nycheia, with her
April eyes.  And now the boy was holding out the wide-mouthed pitcher to
the water, intent on dipping it, but the nymphs all clung to his hand,
for love of the Argive lad had fluttered the soft hearts of all of them.
Then down he sank into the black water, headlong all, as when a star
shoots flaming from the sky, plumb in the deep it falls, and a mate
shouts out to the seamen, ‘Up with the gear, my lads, the wind is fair
for sailing.’

Then the nymphs held the weeping boy on their laps, and with gentle words
were striving to comfort him.  But the son of Amphitryon was troubled
about the lad, and went forth, carrying his bended bow in Scythian
fashion, and the club that is ever grasped in his right hand.  Thrice he
shouted ‘Hylas!’ as loud as his deep throat could call, and thrice again
the boy heard him, and thin came his voice from the water, and, hard by
though he was, he seemed very far away.  And as when a bearded lion, a
ravening lion on the hills, hears the bleating of a fawn afar off, and
rushes forth from his lair to seize it, his readiest meal, even so the
mighty Heracles, in longing for the lad, sped through the trackless
briars, and ranged over much country.

Reckless are lovers: great toils did Heracles bear, in hills and thickets
wandering, and Iason’s quest was all postponed to this.  Now the ship
abode with her tackling aloft, and the company gathered there, {70} but
at midnight the young men were lowering the sails again, awaiting
Heracles.  But he wheresoever his feet might lead him went wandering in
his fury, for the cruel Goddess of love was rending his heart within him.

Thus loveliest Hylas is numbered with the Blessed, but for a runaway they
girded at Heracles, the heroes, because he roamed from Argo of the sixty
oarsmen.  But on foot he came to Colchis and inhospitable Phasis.



IDYL XIV


_This Idyl_, _like the next_, _is dramatic in form_.  _One Aeschines
tells Thyonichus the story of his quarrel with his mistress Cynisca_.
_He speaks of taking foreign service_, _and Thyonichus recommends that of
Ptolemy_.  _The idyl was probably written at Alexandria_, _as a
compliment to Ptolemy_, _and an inducement to Greeks to join his forces_.
_There is nothing_, _however_, _to fix the date_.

                                * * * * *

_Aeschines_.  All hail to the stout Thyonichus!

_Thyonichus_.  As much to you, Aeschines.

_Aeschines_.  How long it is since we met!

_Thyonichus_.  Is it so long?  But why, pray, this melancholy?

_Aeschines_.  I am not in the best of luck, Thyonichus.

_Thyonichus_.  ’Tis for that, then, you are so lean, and hence comes this
long moustache, and these love-locks all adust.  Just such a figure was a
Pythagorean that came here of late, barefoot and wan,—and said he was an
Athenian.  Marry, he too was in love, methinks, with a plate of pancakes.

_Aeschines_.  Friend, you will always have your jest,—but beautiful
Cynisca,—she flouts me!  I shall go mad some day, when no man looks for
it; I am but a hair’s-breadth on the hither side, even now.

_Thyonichus_.  You are ever like this, dear Aeschines, now mad, now sad,
and crying for all things at your whim.  Yet, tell me, what is your new
trouble?

_Aeschines_.  The Argive, and I, and the Thessalian rough rider, Apis,
and Cleunichus the free lance, were drinking together, at my farm.  I had
killed two chickens, and a sucking pig, and had opened the Bibline wine
for them,—nearly four years old,—but fragrant as when it left the
wine-press.  Truffles and shellfish had been brought out, it was a jolly
drinking match.  And when things were now getting forwarder, we
determined that each of us should toast whom he pleased, in unmixed wine,
only he must name his toast.  So we all drank, and called our toasts as
had been agreed.  Yet She said nothing, though I was there; how think you
I liked that?  ‘Won’t you call a toast?  You have seen the wolf!’ some
one said in jest, ‘as the proverb goes,’ {72} then she kindled; yes, you
could easily have lighted a lamp at her face.  There is one Wolf, one
Wolf there is, the son of Labes our neighbour,—he is tall,
smooth-skinned, many think him handsome.  His was that illustrious love
in which she was pining, yes, and a breath about the business once came
secretly to my ears, but I never looked into it, beshrew my beard!

Already, mark you, we four men were deep in our cups, when the Larissa
man out of mere mischief, struck up, ‘My Wolf,’ some Thessalian catch,
from the very beginning.  Then Cynisca suddenly broke out weeping more
bitterly than a six-year-old maid, that longs for her mother’s lap.  Then
I,—you know me, Thyonichus,—struck her on the cheek with clenched
fist,—one two!  She caught up her robes, and forth she rushed, quicker
than she came.  ‘Ah, my undoing’ (cried I), ‘I am not good enough for
you, then—you have a dearer playfellow? well, be off and cherish your
other lover, ’tis for him your tears run big as apples!’ {73}

And as the swallow flies swiftly back to gather a morsel, fresh food, for
her young ones under the eaves, still swifter sped she from her soft
chair, straight through the vestibule and folding-doors, wherever her
feet carried her.  So, sure, the old proverb says, ‘the bull has sought
the wild wood.’

Since then there are twenty days, and eight to these, and nine again,
then ten others, to-day is the eleventh, add two more, and it is two
months since we parted, and I have not shaved, not even in Thracian
fashion. {74a}

And now Wolf is everything with her.  Wolf finds the door open o’ nights,
and I am of no account, not in the reckoning, like the wretched men of
Megara, in the place dishonourable. {74b}

And if I could cease to love, the world would wag as well as may be.  But
now,—now,—as they say, Thyonichus, I am like the mouse that has tasted
pitch.  And what remedy there may be for a bootless love, I know not;
except that Simus, he who was in love with the daughter of Epicalchus,
went over seas, and came back heart-whole,—a man of my own age.  And I
too will cross the water, and prove not the first, maybe, nor the last,
perhaps, but a fair soldier as times go.

_Thyonichus_.  Would that things had gone to your mind, Aeschines.  But
if, in good earnest, you are thus set on going into exile, PTOLEMY is the
free man’s best paymaster!

_Aeschines_.  And in other respects, what kind of man?

_Thyonichus_.  The free man’s best paymaster!  Indulgent too, the Muses’
darling, a true lover, the top of good company, knows his friends, and
still better knows his enemies.  A great giver to many, refuses nothing
that he is asked which to give may beseem a king, but, Aeschines, we
should not always be asking.  Thus, if you are minded to pin up the top
corner of your cloak over the right shoulder, and if you have the heart
to stand steady on both feet, and bide the brunt of a hardy targeteer,
off instantly to Egypt!  From the temples downward we all wax grey, and
on to the chin creeps the rime of age, men must do somewhat while their
knees are yet nimble.



IDYL XV


_This famous idyl should rather_, _perhaps_, _be called a mimus_.  _It
describes the visit paid by two Syracusan women residing in Alexandria_,
_to the festival of the resurrection of Adonis_.  _The festival is given
by Arsinoë_, _wife and sister of Ptolemy Philadelphus_, _and the poem
cannot have been written earlier than his marriage_, _in_ 266 B.C. [?]
_Nothing can be more gay and natural than the chatter of the women_,
_which has changed no more in two thousand years than the song of birds_.
_Theocritus is believed to have had a model for this idyl in the
Isthmiazusae of Sophron_, _an older poet_.  _In the Isthmiazusae two
ladies described the spectacle of the Isthmian games_.

                                * * * * *

_Gorgo_.  Is Praxinoë at home?

_Praxinoë_.  Dear Gorgo, how long it is since you have been here!  She
_is_ at home.  The wonder is that you have got here at last!  Eunoë, see
that she has a chair.  Throw a cushion on it too.

_Gorgo_.  It does most charmingly as it is.

_Praxinoë_.  Do sit down.

_Gorgo_.  Oh, what a thing spirit is!  I have scarcely got to you alive,
Praxinoë!  What a huge crowd, what hosts of four-in-hands!  Everywhere
cavalry boots, everywhere men in uniform!  And the road is endless: yes,
you really live _too_ far away!

_Praxinoë_.  It is all the fault of that madman of mine.  Here he came to
the ends of the earth and took—a hole, not a house, and all that we might
not be neighbours.  The jealous wretch, always the same, ever for spite!

_Gorgo_.  Don’t talk of your husband, Dinon, like that, my dear girl,
before the little boy,—look how he is staring at you!  Never mind,
Zopyrion, sweet child, she is not speaking about papa.

_Praxinoë_.  Our Lady! the child takes notice. {77}

_Gorgo_.  Nice papa!

_Praxinoë_.  That papa of his the other day—we call every day ‘the other
day’—went to get soap and rouge at the shop, and back he came to me with
salt—the great big endless fellow!

_Gorgo_.  Mine has the same trick, too, a perfect spendthrift—Diocleides!
Yesterday he got what he meant for five fleeces, and paid seven shillings
a piece for—what do you suppose?—dogskins, shreds of old leather wallets,
mere trash—trouble on trouble.  But come, take your cloak and shawl.  Let
us be off to the palace of rich Ptolemy, the King, to see the Adonis; I
hear the Queen has provided something splendid!

_Praxinoë_.  Fine folks do everything finely.

_Gorgo_.  What a tale you will have to tell about the things you have
seen, to any one who has not seen them!  It seems nearly time to go.

_Praxinoë_.  Idlers have always holiday.  Eunoë, bring the water and put
it down in the middle of the room, lazy creature that you are.  Cats like
always to sleep soft! {78a}  Come, bustle, bring the water; quicker.  I
want water first, and how she carries it! give it me all the same; don’t
pour out so much, you extravagant thing.  Stupid girl!  Why are you
wetting my dress?  There, stop, I have washed my hands, as heaven would
have it.  Where is the key of the big chest?  Bring it here.

_Gorgo_.  Praxinoë, that full body becomes you wonderfully.  Tell me how
much did the stuff cost you just off the loom?

_Praxinoë_.  Don’t speak of it, Gorgo!  More than eight pounds in good
silver money,—and the work on it!  I nearly slaved my soul out over it!

_Gorgo_.  Well, it is _most_ successful; all you could wish. {78b}

_Praxinoë_.  Thanks for the pretty speech!  Bring my shawl, and set my
hat on my head, the fashionable way.  No, child, I don’t mean to take
you.  Boo!  Bogies!  There’s a horse that bites!  Cry as much as you
please, but I cannot have you lamed.  Let us be moving.  Phrygia take the
child, and keep him amused, call in the dog, and shut the street door.

                                               [_They go into the street_.

Ye gods, what a crowd!  How on earth are we ever to get through this
coil?  They are like ants that no one can measure or number.  Many a good
deed have you done, Ptolemy; since your father joined the immortals,
there’s never a malefactor to spoil the passer-by, creeping on him in
Egyptian fashion—oh! the tricks those perfect rascals used to play.
Birds of a feather, ill jesters, scoundrels all!  Dear Gorgo, what will
become of us?  Here come the King’s war-horses!  My dear man, don’t
trample on me.  Look, the bay’s rearing, see, what temper!  Eunoë, you
foolhardy girl, will you never keep out of the way?  The beast will kill
the man that’s leading him.  What a good thing it is for me that my brat
stays safe at home.

_Gorgo_.  Courage, Praxinoë.  We are safe behind them, now, and they have
gone to their station.

_Praxinoë_.  There!  I begin to be myself again.  Ever since I was a
child I have feared nothing so much as horses and the chilly snake.  Come
along, the huge mob is overflowing us.

_Gorgo_ (_to an old Woman_).  Are you from the Court, mother?

_Old Woman_.  I am, my child.

_Praxinoë_.  Is it easy to get there?

_Old Woman_.  The Achaeans got into Troy by trying, my prettiest of
ladies.  Trying will do everything in the long run.

_Gorgo_.  The old wife has spoken her oracles, and off she goes.

_Praxinoë_.  Women know everything, yes, and how Zeus married Hera!

_Gorgo_.  See Praxinoë, what a crowd there is about the doors.

_Praxinoë_.  Monstrous, Gorgo!  Give me your hand, and you, Eunoë, catch
hold of Eutychis; never lose hold of her, for fear lest you get lost.
Let us all go in together; Eunoë, clutch tight to me.  Oh, how tiresome,
Gorgo, my muslin veil is torn in two already!  For heaven’s sake, sir, if
you ever wish to be fortunate, take care of my shawl!

_Stranger_.  I can hardly help myself, but for all that I will be as
careful as I can.

_Praxinoë_.  How close-packed the mob is, they hustle like a herd of
swine.

_Stranger_.  Courage, lady, all is well with us now.

_Praxinoë_.  Both this year and for ever may all be well with you, my
dear sir, for your care of us.  A good kind man!  We’re letting Eunoë get
squeezed—come, wretched girl, push your way through.  That is the way.
We are all on the right side of the door, quoth the bridegroom, when he
had shut himself in with his bride.

_Gorgo_.  Do come here, Praxinoë.  Look first at these embroideries.  How
light and how lovely!  You will call them the garments of the gods.

_Praxinoë_.  Lady Athene, what spinning women wrought them, what painters
designed these drawings, so true they are?  How naturally they stand and
move, like living creatures, not patterns woven.  What a clever thing is
man!  Ah, and himself—Adonis—how beautiful to behold he lies on his
silver couch, with the first down on his cheeks, the thrice-beloved
Adonis,—Adonis beloved even among the dead.

_A Stranger_.  You weariful women, do cease your endless cooing talk!
They bore one to death with their eternal broad vowels!

_Gorgo_.  Indeed!  And where may this person come from?  What is it to
you if we _are_ chatterboxes!  Give orders to your own servants, sir.  Do
you pretend to command ladies of Syracuse?  If you must know, we are
Corinthians by descent, like Bellerophon himself, and we speak
Peloponnesian.  Dorian women may lawfully speak Doric, I presume?

_Praxinoë_.  Lady Persephone, never may we have more than one master.  I
am not afraid of _your_ putting me on short commons.

_Gorgo_.  Hush, hush, Praxinoë—the Argive woman’s daughter, the great
singer, is beginning the _Adonis_; she that won the prize last year for
dirge-singing. {82}  I am sure she will give us something lovely; see,
she is preluding with her airs and graces.

                          _The Psalm of Adonis_.

O Queen that lovest Golgi, and Idalium, and the steep of Eryx, O
Aphrodite, that playest with gold, lo, from the stream eternal of Acheron
they have brought back to thee Adonis—even in the twelfth month they have
brought him, the dainty-footed Hours.  Tardiest of the Immortals are the
beloved Hours, but dear and desired they come, for always, to all
mortals, they bring some gift with them.  O Cypris, daughter of Diônê,
from mortal to immortal, so men tell, thou hast changed Berenice,
dropping softly in the woman’s breast the stuff of immortality.

Therefore, for thy delight, O thou of many names and many temples, doth
the daughter of Berenice, even Arsinoë, lovely as Helen, cherish Adonis
with all things beautiful.

Before him lie all ripe fruits that the tall trees’ branches bear, and
the delicate gardens, arrayed in baskets of silver, and the golden
vessels are full of incense of Syria.  And all the dainty cakes that
women fashion in the kneading-tray, mingling blossoms manifold with the
white wheaten flour, all that is wrought of honey sweet, and in soft
olive oil, all cakes fashioned in the semblance of things that fly, and
of things that creep, lo, here they are set before him.

Here are built for him shadowy bowers of green, all laden with tender
anise, and children flit overhead—the little Loves—as the young
nightingales perched upon the trees fly forth and try their wings from
bough to bough.

O the ebony, O the gold, O the twin eagles of white ivory that carry to
Zeus the son of Cronos his darling, his cup-bearer!  O the purple
coverlet strewn above, more soft than sleep!  So Miletus will say, and
whoso feeds sheep in Samos.

Another bed is strewn for beautiful Adonis, one bed Cypris keeps, and one
the rosy-armed Adonis.  A bridegroom of eighteen or nineteen years is he,
his kisses are not rough, the golden down being yet upon his lips!  And
now, good-night to Cypris, in the arms of her lover!  But lo, in the
morning we will all of us gather with the dew, and carry him forth among
the waves that break upon the beach, and with locks unloosed, and ungirt
raiment falling to the ankles, and bosoms bare will we begin our shrill
sweet song.

Thou only, dear Adonis, so men tell, thou only of the demigods dost visit
both this world and the stream of Acheron.  For Agamemnon had no such
lot, nor Aias, that mighty lord of the terrible anger, nor Hector, the
eldest born of the twenty sons of Hecabe, nor Patroclus, nor Pyrrhus,
that returned out of Troyland, nor the heroes of yet more ancient days,
the Lapithae and Deucalion’s sons, nor the sons of Pelops, and the chiefs
of Pelasgian Argus.  Be gracious now, dear Adonis, and propitious even in
the coming year.  Dear to us has thine advent been, Adonis, and dear
shall it be when thou comest again.

_Gorgo_.  Praxinoë, the woman is cleverer than we fancied!  Happy woman
to know so much, thrice happy to have so sweet a voice.  Well, all the
same, it is time to be making for home.  Diocleides has not had his
dinner, and the man is all vinegar,—don’t venture near him when he is
kept waiting for dinner.  Farewell, beloved Adonis, may you find us glad
at your next coming!




IDYL XVI


_In_ 265 B.C. _Sicily was devastated by the Carthaginians_, _and by the
companies of disciplined free-lances who called themselves Mamertines_,
_or Mars’s men_.  _The hopes of the Greek inhabitants of the island were
centred in Hiero_, _son of Hierocles_, _who was about to besiege Messana_
(_then held by the Carthaginians_) _and who had revived the courage of
the Syracusans_.  _To him Theocritus addressed this idyl_, _in which he
complains of the sordid indifference of the rich_, _rehearses the merits
of song_, _dilates on the true nature of wealth_, _and of the happy
lift_, _and finally expresses his hope that Hiero will rid the isle of
the foreign foe_, _and will restore peace and pastoral joys_.  _The idyl
contains some allusions to Simonides_, _the old lyric poet_, _and to his
relations with the famous Hiero tyrant of Syracuse_.

                                * * * * *

EVER is this the care of the maidens of Zeus, ever the care of minstrels,
to sing the Immortals, to sing the praises of noble men.  The Muses, lo,
are Goddesses, of Gods the Goddesses sing, but we on earth are mortal
men; let us mortals sing of mortals.  Ah, who of all them that dwell
beneath the grey morning, will open his door and gladly receive our
Graces within his house? who is there that will not send them back again
without a gift?  And they with looks askance, and naked feet come
homewards, and sorely they upbraid me when they have gone on a vain
journey, and listless again in the bottom of their empty coffer, they
dwell with heads bowed over their chilly knees, where is their drear
abode, when gainless they return.

Where is there such an one, among men to-day?  Where is he that will
befriend him that speaks his praises?  I know not, for now no longer, as
of old, are men eager to win the renown of noble deeds, nay, they are the
slaves of gain!  Each man clasps his hands below the purse-fold of his
gown, and looks about to spy whence he may get him money: the very rust
is too precious to be rubbed off for a gift.  Nay, each has his ready
saw; _the shin is further than the knee_; _first let me get my own_!
_’Tis the Gods’ affair to honour minstrels_!  _Homer is enough for every
one_, _who wants to hear any other_?  _He is the best of bards who takes
nothing that is mine_.

O foolish men, in the store of gold uncounted, what gain have ye?  Not in
this do the wise find the true enjoyment of wealth, but in that they can
indulge their own desires, and something bestow on one of the minstrels,
and do good deeds to many of their kin, and to many another man; and
always give altar-rites to the Gods, nor ever play the churlish host, but
kindly entreat the guest at table, and speed him when he would be gone.
And this, above all, to honour the holy interpreters of the Muses, that
so thou mayest have a goodly fame, even when hidden in Hades, nor ever
moan without renown by the chill water of Acheron, like one whose palms
the spade has hardened, some landless man bewailing the poverty that is
all his heritage.

Many were the thralls that in the palace of Antiochus, and of king Aleuas
drew out their monthly dole, many the calves that were driven to the
penns of the Scopiadae, and lowed with the horned kine: countless on the
Crannonian plain did shepherds pasture beneath the sky the choicest sheep
of the hospitable Creondae, yet from all this they had no joy, when once
into the wide raft of hateful Acheron they had breathed sweet life away!
Yea, unremembered (though they had left all that rich store), for ages
long would they have lain among the dead forlorn, if a name among later
men the skilled Ceian minstrel had spared to bestow, singing his bright
songs to a harp of many strings.  Honour too was won by the swift steeds
that came home to them crowned from the sacred contests.

And who would ever have known the Lycian champions of time past, who
Priam’s long-haired sons, and Cycnus, white of skin as a maiden, if
minstrels had not chanted of the war cries of the old heroes?  Nor would
Odysseus have won his lasting glory, for all his ten years wandering
among all folks; and despite the visit he paid, he a living man, to
inmost Hades, and for all his escape from the murderous Cyclops’s
cave,—unheard too were the names of the swineherd Eumaeus, and of
Philoetius, busy with the kine of the herds; yea, and even of Laertes,
high of heart; if the songs of the Ionian man had not kept them in
renown.

From the Muses comes a goodly report to men, but the living heirs devour
the possessions of the dead.  But, lo, it is as light labour to count the
waves upon the beach, as many as wind and grey sea-tide roll upon the
shore, or in violet-hued water to cleanse away the stain from a potsherd,
as to win favour from a man that is smitten with the greed of gain.
Good-day to such an one, and countless be his coin, and ever may he be
possessed by a longing desire for more!  But I for my part would choose
honour and the loving-kindness of men, far before wealth in mules and
horses.

I am seeking to what mortal I may come, a welcome guest, with the help of
the Muses, for hard indeed do minstrels find the ways, who go
uncompanioned by the daughters of deep-counselling Zeus.  Not yet is the
heaven aweary of rolling the months onwards, and the years, and many a
horse shall yet whirl the chariot wheels, and the man shall yet be found,
who will take me for his minstrel; a man of deeds like those that great
Achilles wrought, or puissant Aias, in the plain of Simois, where is the
tomb of Phrygian Ilus.

Even now the Phoenicians that dwell beneath the setting sun on the spur
of Libya, shudder for dread, even now the Syracusans poise lances in
rest, and their arms are burdened by the linden shields.  Among them
Hiero, like the mighty men of old, girds himself for fight, and the
horse-hair crest is shadowing his helmet.  Ah, Zeus, our father renowned,
and ah, lady Athene, and O thou Maiden that with the Mother dost possess
the great burg of the rich Ephyreans, by the water of Lusimeleia, {89}
would that dire necessity may drive our foemen from the isle, along the
Sardinian wave, to tell the doom of their friends to children and to
wives—messengers easy to number out of so many warriors!  But as for our
cities may they again be held by their ancient masters,—all the cities
that hostile hands have utterly spoiled.  May our people till the
flowering fields, and may thousands of sheep unnumbered fatten ’mid the
herbage, and bleat along the plain, while the kine as they come in droves
to the stalls warn the belated traveller to hasten on his way.  May the
fallows be broken for the seed-time, while the cicala, watching the
shepherds as they toil in the sun, in the shade of the trees doth sing on
the topmost sprays.  May spiders weave their delicate webs over martial
gear, may none any more so much as name the cry of onset!

But the fame of Hiero may minstrels bear aloft, across the Scythian sea,
and where Semiramis reigned, that built the mighty wall, and made it fast
with slime for mortar.  I am but one of many that are loved by the
daughters of Zeus, and they all are fain to sing of Sicilian Arethusa,
with the people of the isle, and the warrior Hiero.  O Graces, ye
Goddesses, adored of Eteocles, ye that love Orchomenos of the Minyae, the
ancient enemy of Thebes, when no man bids me, let me abide at home, but
to the houses of such as bid me, boldly let me come with my Muses.  Nay,
neither the Muses nor you Graces will I leave behind, for without the
Graces what have men that is desirable? with the Graces of song may I
dwell for ever!




IDYL XVII


_The poet praises Ptolemy Philadelphus in a strain of almost religious
adoration_.  _Hauler_, _in his Life of Theocritus_, _dates the poem
about_ 259 B.C., _but it may have been many years earlier_.

                                * * * * *

FROM Zeus let us begin, and with Zeus make end, ye Muses, whensoever we
chant in songs the chiefest of immortals!  But of men, again, let Ptolemy
be named, among the foremost, and last, and in the midmost place, for of
men he hath the pre-eminence.  The heroes that in old days were begotten
of the demigods, wrought noble deeds, and chanced on minstrels skilled,
but I, with what skill I have in song, would fain make my hymn of
Ptolemy, and hymns are the glorious meed, yea, of the very immortals.

When the feller hath come up to wooded Ida, he glances around, so many
are the trees, to see whence he should begin his labour.  Where first
shall _I_ begin the tale, for there are countless things ready for the
telling, wherewith the Gods have graced the most excellent of kings?

Even by virtue of his sires, how mighty was he to accomplish some great
work,—Ptolemy son of Lagus,—when he had stored in his mind such a design,
as no other man was able even to devise!  Him hath the Father stablished
in the same honour as the blessed immortals, and for him a golden mansion
in the house of Zeus is builded; beside him is throned Alexander, that
dearly loves him, Alexander, a grievous god to the white-turbaned
Persians.

And over against them is set the throne of Heracles, the slayer of the
Bull, wrought of stubborn adamant.  There holds he festival with the rest
of the heavenly host, rejoicing exceedingly in his far-off children’s
children, for that the son of Cronos hath taken old age clean away from
their limbs, and they are called immortals, being his offspring.  For the
strong son of Heracles is ancestor of the twain, I and both are reckoned
to Heracles, on the utmost of the lineage.

Therefore when he hath now had his fill of fragrant nectar, and is going
from the feast to the bower of his bed-fellow dear, to one of his
children he gives his bow, and the quiver that swings beneath his elbow,
to the other his knotted mace of iron.  Then they to the ambrosial bower
of white-ankled Hera, convey the weapons and the bearded son of Zeus.

Again, how shone renowned Berenice among the wise of womankind, how great
a boon was she to them that begat her!  Yea, in her fragrant breast did
the Lady of Cyprus, the queenly daughter of Dione, lay her slender hands,
wherefore they say that never any woman brought man such delight as came
from the love borne to his wife by Ptolemy.  And verily he was loved
again with far greater love, and in such a wedlock a man may well trust
all his house to his children, whensoever he goes to the bed of one that
loves him as he loves her.  But the mind of a woman that loves not is set
ever on a stranger, and she hath children at her desire, but they are
never like the father.

O thou that amongst the Goddesses hast the prize of beauty, O Lady
Aphrodite, thy care was she, and by thy favour the lovely Berenice
crossed not Acheron, the river of mourning, but thou didst catch her
away, ere she came to the dark water, and to the still-detested ferryman
of souls outworn, and in thy temple didst thou instal her, and gavest her
a share of thy worship.  Kindly is she to all mortals, and she breathes
into them soft desires, and she lightens the cares of him that is in
longing.

O dark-browed lady of Argos, {93} in wedlock with Tydeus didst thou bear
slaying Diomede, a hero of Calydon, and, again, deep-bosomed Thetis to
Peleus, son of Aeacus, bare the spearman Achilles.  But thee, O warrior
Ptolemy, to Ptolemy the warrior bare the glorious Berenice!  And Cos did
foster thee, when thou wert still a child new-born, and received thee at
thy mother’s hand, when thou saw’st thy first dawning.  For there she
called aloud on Eilithyia, loosener of the girdle; she called, the
daughter of Antigone, when heavy on her came the pangs of childbirth.
And Eilithyia was present to help her, and so poured over all her limbs
release from pain.  Then the beloved child was born, his father’s very
counterpart.  And Cos brake forth into a cry, when she beheld it, and
touching the child with kind hands, she said:

‘Blessed, O child, mayst thou be, and me mayst thou honour even as
Phoebus Apollo honours Delos of the azure crown, yea, stablish in the
same renown the Triopean hill, and allot such glory to the Dorians
dwelling nigh, as that wherewithal Prince Apollo favours Rhenaea.’

Lo, thus spake the Isle, but far aloft under the clouds a great eagle
screamed thrice aloud, the ominous bird of Zeus.  This sign, methinks,
was of Zeus; Zeus, the son of Cronos, in his care hath awful kings, but
he is above all, whom Zeus loved from the first, even from his birth.
Great fortune goes with him, and much land he rules, and wide sea.

Countless are the lands, and tribes of men innumerable win increase of
the soil that waxeth under the rain of Zeus, but no land brings forth so
much as low-lying Egypt, when Nile wells up and breaks the sodden soil.
Nor is there any land that hath so many towns of men skilled in
handiwork; therein are three centuries of cities builded, and thousands
three, and to these three myriads, and cities twice three, and beside
these, three times nine, and over them all high-hearted Ptolemy is king.

Yea, and he taketh him a portion of Phoenicia, and of Arabia, and of
Syria, and of Libya, and the black Aethiopians.  And he is lord of all
the Pamphylians, and the Cilician warriors, and the Lycians, and the
Carians, that joy in battle, and lord of the isles of the Cyclades,—since
his are the best of ships that sail over the deep,—yea, all the sea, and
land and the sounding rivers are ruled by Ptolemy.  Many are his
horsemen, and many his targeteers that go clanging in harness of shining
bronze.  And in weight of wealth he surpasses all kings; such treasure
comes day by day from every side to his rich palace, while the people are
busy about their labours in peace.  For never hath a foeman marched up
the bank of teaming Nile, and raised the cry of war in villages not his
own, nor hath any cuirassed enemy leaped ashore from his swift ship, to
harry the kine of Egypt.  So mighty a hero hath his throne established in
the broad plains, even Ptolemy of the fair hair, a spearman skilled,
whose care is above all, as a good king’s should be, to keep all the
heritage of his fathers, and yet more he himself doth win.  Nay, nor
useless in _his_ wealthy house, is the gold, like piled stores of the
still toilsome ants, but the glorious temples of the gods have their rich
share, for constant first-fruits he renders, with many another due, and
much is lavished on mighty kings, much on cities, much on faithful
friends.  And never to the sacred contests of Dionysus comes any man that
is skilled to raise the shrill sweet song, but Ptolemy gives him a
guerdon worthy of his art.  And the interpreters of the Muses sing of
Ptolemy, in return for his favours.  Nay, what fairer thing might befall
a wealthy man, than to win a goodly renown among mortals?

This abides even by the sons of Atreus, but all those countless treasures
that they won, when they took the mighty house of Priam, are hidden away
in the mist, whence there is no returning.

Ptolemy alone presses his own feet in the footmarks, yet glowing in the
dust, of his fathers that were before him.  To his mother dear, and his
father he hath stablished fragrant temples; therein has he set their
images, splendid with gold and ivory, to succour all earthly men.  And
many fat thighs of kine doth he burn on the empurpled altars, as the
months roll by, he and his stately wife; no nobler lady did ever embrace
a bridegroom in the halls, who loves, with her whole heart, her brother,
her lord.  On this wise was the holy bridal of the Immortals, too,
accomplished, even of the pair that great Rhea bore, the rulers of
Olympus; and one bed for the slumber of Zeus and of Hera doth Iris strew,
with myrrh-anointed hands, the virgin Iris.

Prince Ptolemy, farewell, and of thee will I make mention, even as of the
other demigods; and a word methinks I will utter not to be rejected of
men yet unborn,—excellence, howbeit, thou shalt gain from Zeus.



IDYL XVIII


_This epithalamium may have been written for the wedding of a friend of
the poet’s_.  _The idea is said to have been borrowed from an old poem by
Stesichorus_.  _The epithalamium was chanted at night by a chorus of
girls_, _outside the bridal chamber_.  _Compare the conclusion of the
hymn of Adonis_, _in the fifteenth Idyl_.

                                * * * * *

IN Sparta, once, to the house of fair-haired Menelaus, came maidens with
the blooming hyacinth in their hair, and before the new painted chamber
arrayed their dance,—twelve maidens, the first in the city, the glory of
Laconian girls,—what time the younger Atrides had wooed and won Helen,
and closed the door of the bridal-bower on the beloved daughter of
Tyndarus.  Then sang they all in harmony, beating time with woven paces,
and the house rang round with the bridal song.

                              _The Chorus_.

Thus early art thou sleeping, dear bridegroom, say are thy limbs heavy
with slumber, or art thou all too fond of sleep, or hadst thou perchance
drunken over well, ere thou didst fling thee to thy rest?  Thou shouldst
have slept betimes, and alone, if thou wert so fain of sleep; thou
shouldst have left the maiden with maidens beside her mother dear, to
play till deep in the dawn, for to-morrow, and next day, and for all the
years, Menelaus, she is thy bride.

O happy bridegroom, some good spirit sneezed out on thee a blessing, as
thou wert approaching Sparta whither went the other princes, that so thou
mightst win thy desire!  Alone among the demigods shalt thou have Zeus
for father!  Yea, and the daughter of Zeus has come beneath one coverlet
with thee, so fair a lady, peerless among all Achaean women that walk the
earth.  Surely a wondrous child would she bear thee, if she bore one like
the mother!

For lo, we maidens are all of like age with her, and one course we were
wont to run, anointed in manly fashion, by the baths of Eurotas.  Four
times sixty girls were we, the maiden flower of the land, {98} but of us
all not one was faultless, when matched with Helen.

As the rising Dawn shows forth her fairer face than thine, O Night, or as
the bright Spring, when Winter relaxes his hold, even so amongst us still
she shone, the golden Helen.  Even as the crops spring up, the glory of
the rich plough land; or, as is the cypress in the garden; or, in a
chariot, a horse of Thessalian breed, even so is rose-red Helen the glory
of Lacedaemon.  No other in her basket of wool winds forth such goodly
work, and none cuts out, from between the mighty beams, a closer warp
than that her shuttle weaves in the carven loom.  Yea, and of a truth
none other smites the lyre, hymning Artemis and broad-breasted Athene,
with such skill as Helen, within whose eyes dwell all the Loves.

O fair, O gracious damsel, even now art thou a wedded wife; but we will
go forth right early to the course we ran, and to the grassy meadows, to
gather sweet-breathing coronals of flowers, thinking often upon thee,
Helen, even as youngling lambs that miss the teats of the mother-ewe.
For thee first will we twine a wreath of lotus flowers that lowly grow,
and hang it on a shadowy plane tree, for thee first will we take soft oil
from the silver phial, and drop it beneath a shadowy plane tree, and
letters will we grave on the bark, in Dorian wise, so that the wayfarer
may read:

                     WORSHIP ME, I AM THE TREE OF HELEN.

Good night, thou bride, good night, thou groom that hast won a mighty
sire!  May Leto, Leto, the nurse of noble offspring, give you the
blessing of children; and may Cypris, divine Cypris, grant you equal
love, to cherish each the other; and may Zeus, even Zeus the son of
Cronos, give you wealth imperishable, to be handed down from generation
to generation of the princes.

Sleep ye, breathing love and desire each into the other’s breast, but
forget not to wake in the dawning, and at dawn we too will come, when the
earliest cock shrills from his perch, and raises his feathered neck.

_Hymen_, _O Hymenae_, _rejoice thou in this bridal_.



IDYL XIX


_This little piece is but doubtfully ascribed to Theocritus_.  _The motif
is that of a well-known Anacreontic Ode_.  _The idyl has been translated
by Ronsard_.

                                * * * * *

THE thievish Love,—a cruel bee once stung him, as he was rifling honey
from the hives, and pricked his finger-tips all; then he was in pain, and
blew upon his hand, and leaped, and stamped the ground.  And then he
showed his hurt to Aphrodite, and made much complaint, how that the bee
is a tiny creature, and yet what wounds it deals!  And his mother laughed
out, and said, ‘Art thou not even such a creature as the bees, for tiny
art thou, but what wounds thou dealest!’



IDYL XX


_A herdsman_, _who had been contemptuously rejected by Eunica_, _a girl
of the town_, _protests that he is beautiful_, _and that Eunica is
prouder than Cybele_, _Selene_, _and Aphrodite_, _all of whom loved
mortal herdsmen_.  _For grammatical and other reasons_, _some critics
consider this idyl apocryphal_.

                                * * * * *

EUNICA laughed out at me when sweetly I would have kissed her, and
taunting me, thus she spoke: ‘Get thee gone from me!  Wouldst thou kiss
me, wretch; thou—a neatherd?  I never learned to kiss in country fashion,
but to press lips with city gentlefolks.  Never hope to kiss my lovely
mouth, nay, not even in a dream.  How thou dost look, what chatter is
thine, how countrified thy tricks are, how delicate thy talk, how easy
thy tattle!  And then thy beard—so soft! thy elegant hair!  Why, thy lips
are like some sick man’s, thy hands are black, and thou art of evil
savour.  Away with thee, lest thy presence soil me!’  These taunts she
mouthed, and thrice spat in the breast of her gown, and stared at me all
over from head to feet; shooting out her lips, and glancing with
half-shut eyes, writhing her beautiful body, and so sneered, and laughed
me to scorn.  And instantly my blood boiled, and I grew red under the
sting, as a rose with dew.  And she went off and left me, but I bear
angry pride deep in my heart, that I, the handsome shepherd, should have
been mocked by a wretched light-o’-love.

Shepherds, tell me the very truth; am I not beautiful?  Has some God
changed me suddenly to another man?  Surely a sweet grace ever blossomed
round me, till this hour, like ivy round a tree, and covered my chin, and
about my temples fell my locks, like curling parsley-leaves, and white
shone my forehead above my dark eyebrows.  Mine eyes were brighter far
than the glance of the grey-eyed Athene, my mouth than even pressed milk
was sweeter, and from my lips my voice flowed sweeter than honey from the
honeycomb.  Sweet too, is my music, whether I make melody on pipe, or
discourse on the flute, or reed, or flageolet.  And all the
mountain-maidens call me beautiful, and they would kiss me, all of them.
But the city girl did not kiss me, but ran past me, because I am a
neatherd, and she never heard how fair Dionysus in the dells doth drive
the calves, and knows not that Cypris was wild with love for a herdsman,
and drove afield in the mountains of Phrygia; ay, and Adonis himself,—in
the oakwood she kissed, in the oakwood she bewailed him.  And what was
Endymion? was he not a neatherd? whom nevertheless as he watched his
herds Selene saw and loved, and from Olympus descending she came to the
Latmian glade, and lay in one couch with the boy; and thou, Rhea, dust
weep for thy herdsman.

And didst not thou, too, Son of Cronos, take the shape of a wandering
bird, and all for a cowherd boy?

But Eunica alone would not kiss the herdsman; Eunica, she that is greater
than Cybele, and Cypris, and Selene!

Well, Cypris, never mayst thou, in city or on hillside, kiss thy darling,
{104} and lonely all the long night mayst thou sleep!



IDYL XXI


_After some verses addressed to Diophantus_, _a friend about whom nothing
is known_, _the poet describes the toilsome life of two old fishermen_.
_One of them has dreamed of catching a golden fish_, _and has sworn_, _in
his dream_, _never again to tempt the sea_.  _The other reminds him that
his oath is as empty as his vision_, _and that he must angle for common
fish_, _if he would not starve among his golden dreams_.  _The idyl is_,
_unfortunately_, _corrupt beyond hope of certain correction_.

                                * * * * *

’TIS Poverty alone, Diophantus, that awakens the arts; Poverty, the very
teacher of labour.  Nay, not even sleep is permitted, by weary cares, to
men that live by toil, and if, for a little while, one close his eyes
{105} in the night, cares throng about him, and suddenly disquiet his
slumber.

Two fishers, on a time, two old men, together lay and slept; they had
strown the dry sea-moss for a bed in their wattled cabin, and there they
lay against the leafy wall.  Beside them were strewn the instruments of
their toilsome hands, the fishing-creels, the rods of reed, the hooks,
the sails bedraggled with sea-spoil, {106a} the lines, the weds, the
lobster pots woven of rushes, the seines, two oars, {106b} and an old
coble upon props.  Beneath their heads was a scanty matting, their
clothes, their sailor’s caps.  Here was all their toil, here all their
wealth.  The threshold had never a door, nor a watch-dog; {106c} all
things, all, to them seemed superfluity, for Poverty was their sentinel.
They had no neighbour by them, but ever against their narrow cabin gently
floated up the sea.

The chariot of the moon had not yet reached the mid-point of her course,
but their familiar toil awakened the fishermen; from their eyelids they
cast out slumber, and roused their souls with speech. {106d}

_Asphalion_.  They lie all, my friend, who say that the nights wane short
in summer, when Zeus brings the long days.  Already have I seen ten
thousand dreams, and the dawn is not yet.  Am I wrong, what ails them,
the nights are surely long?

_The Friend_.  Asphalion, thou blamest the beautiful summer!  It is not
that the season hath wilfully passed his natural course, but care,
breaking thy sleep, makes night seem long to thee.

_Asphalion_.  Didst ever learn to interpret dreams? for good dreams have
I beheld.  I would not have thee to go without thy share in my vision;
even as we go shares in the fish we catch, so share all my dreams!  Sure,
thou art not to be surpassed in wisdom; and he is the best interpreter of
dreams that hath wisdom for his teacher.  Moreover, we have time to idle
in, for what could a man find to do, lying on a leafy bed beside the wave
and slumbering not?  Nay, the ass is among the thorns, the lantern in the
town hall, for, they say, it is always sleepless. {107}

_The Friend_.  Tell me, then, the vision of the night; nay, tell all to
thy friend.

_Asphalion_.  As I was sleeping late, amid the labours of the salt sea
(and truly not too full-fed, for we supped early if thou dost remember,
and did not overtax our bellies), I saw myself busy on a rock, and there
I sat and watched the fishes, and kept spinning the bait with the rods.
And one of the fish nibbled, a fat one, for in sleep dogs dream of bread,
and of fish dream I.  Well, he was tightly hooked, and the blood was
running, and the rod I grasped was bent with his struggle.  So with both
hands I strained, and had a sore tussle for the monster.  How was I ever
to land so big a fish with hooks all too slim?  Then just to remind him
he was hooked, I gently pricked him, {108a} pricked, and slackened, and,
as he did not run, I took in line.  My toil was ended with the sight of
my prize; I drew up a golden fish, lo you, a fish all plated thick with
gold!  Then fear took hold of me, lest he might be some fish beloved of
Posidon, or perchance some jewel of the sea-grey Amphitrite.  Gently I
unhooked him, lest ever the hooks should retain some of the gold of his
mouth.  Then I dragged him on shore with the ropes, {108b} and swore that
never again would I set foot on sea, but abide on land, and lord it over
the gold.

This was even what wakened me, but, for the rest, set thy mind to it, my
friend, for I am in dismay about the oath I swore.

_The Friend_.  Nay, never fear, thou art no more sworn than thou hast
found the golden fish of thy vision; dreams are but lies.  But if thou
wilt search these waters, wide awake, and not asleep, there is some hope
in thy slumbers; seek the fish of flesh, lest thou die of famine with all
thy dreams of gold!



IDYL XXII
THE DIOSCURI


_This is a hymn_, _in the Homeric manner_, _to Castor and Polydeuces_.
_Compare the life and truth of the descriptions of nature_, _and of the
boxing-match_, _with the frigid manner of Apollonius
Rhodius_.—Argonautica, II. I. _seq._

                                * * * * *

WE hymn the children twain of Leda, and of aegis-bearing Zeus,—Castor,
and Pollux, the boxer dread, when he hath harnessed his knuckles in
thongs of ox-hide.  Twice hymn we, and thrice the stalwart sons of the
daughter of Thestias, the two brethren of Lacedaemon.  Succourers are
they of men in the very thick of peril, and of horses maddened in the
bloody press of battle, and of ships that, defying the stars that set and
rise in heaven, have encountered the perilous breath of storms.  The
winds raise huge billows about their stern, yea, or from the prow, or
even as each wind wills, and cast them into the hold of the ship, and
shatter both bulwarks, while with the sail hangs all the gear confused
and broken, and the storm-rain falls from heaven as night creeps on, and
the wide sea rings, being lashed by the gusts, and by showers of iron
hail.

Yet even so do ye draw forth the ships from the abyss, with their sailors
that looked immediately to die; and instantly the winds are still, and
there is an oily calm along the sea, and the clouds flee apart, this way
and that, also the _Bears_ appear, and in the midst, dimly seen, the
_Asses’ manger_, declaring that all is smooth for sailing.

O ye twain that aid all mortals, O beloved pair, ye knights, ye harpers,
ye wrestlers, ye minstrels, of Castor, or of Polydeuces first shall I
begin to sing?  Of both of you will I make my hymn, but first will I sing
of Polydeuces.

Even already had Argo fled forth from the Clashing Rocks, and the dread
jaws of snowy Pontus, and was come to the land of the Bebryces, with her
crew, dear children of the gods.  There all the heroes disembarked, down
one ladder, from both sides of the ship of Iason.  When they had landed
on the deep seashore and a sea-bank sheltered from the wind, they strewed
their beds, and their hands were busy with firewood. {111}

Then Castor of the swift steeds, and swart Polydeuces, these twain went
wandering alone, apart from their fellows, and marvelling at all the
various wildwood on the mountain.  Beneath a smooth cliff they found an
ever-flowing spring filled with the purest water, and the pebbles below
shone like crystal or silver from the deep.  Tall fir trees grew thereby,
and white poplars, and planes, and cypresses with their lofty tufts of
leaves, and there bloomed all fragrant flowers that fill the meadows when
early summer is waning—dear work-steads of the hairy bees.  But there a
monstrous man was sitting in the sun, terrible of aspect; the bruisers’
hard fists had crushed his ears, and his mighty breast and his broad back
were domed with iron flesh, like some huge statue of hammered iron.  The
muscles on his brawny arms, close by the shoulder, stood out like rounded
rocks, that the winter torrent has rolled, and worn smooth, in the great
swirling stream, but about his back and neck was draped a lion’s skin,
hung by the claws.  Him first accosted the champion, Polydeuces.

_Polydeuces_.  Good luck to thee, stranger, whosoe’er thou art!  What men
are they that possess this land?

_Amycus_.  What sort of luck, when I see men that I never saw before?

_Polydeuces_.  Fear not!  Be sure that those thou look’st on are neither
evil, nor the children of evil men.

_Amycus_.  No fear have I, and it is not for thee to teach me that
lesson.

_Polydeuces_.  Art thou a savage, resenting all address, or some
vainglorious man?

_Amycus_.  I am that thou see’st, and on thy land, at least, I trespass
not.

_Polydeuces_.  Come, and with kindly gifts return homeward again!

_Amycus_.  Gift me no gifts, none such have I ready for thee.

_Polydeuces_.  Nay, wilt thou not even grant us leave to taste this
spring?

_Amycus_.  That shalt thou learn when thirst has parched thy shrivelled
lips.

_Polydeuces_.  Will silver buy the boon, or with what price, prithee, may
we gain thy leave?

_Amycus_.  Put up thy hands and stand in single combat, man to man.

_Polydeuces_.  A boxing-match, or is kicking fair, when we meet eye to
eye?

_Amycus_.  Do thy best with thy fists and spare not thy skill!

_Polydeuces_.  And who is the man on whom I am to lay my hands and
gloves?

_Amycus_.  Thou see’st him close enough, the boxer will not prove a
maiden!

_Polydeuces_.  And is the prize ready, for which we two must fight?

_Amycus_.  Thy man shall I be called (shouldst thou win), or thou mine,
if I be victor.

_Polydeuces_.  On such terms fight the red-crested birds of the game.

_Amycus_.  Well, be we like birds or lions, we shall fight for no other
stake.

So Amycus spoke, and seized and blew his hollow shell, and speedily the
long-haired Bebryces gathered beneath the shadowy planes, at the blowing
of the shell.  And in likewise did Castor, eminent in war, go forth and
summon all the heroes from the Magnesian ship.  And the champions, when
they had strengthened their fists with the stout ox-skin gloves, and
bound long leathern thongs about their arms, stepped into the ring,
breathing slaughter against each other.  Then had they much ado, in that
assault,—which should have the sun’s light at his back.  But by thy
skill, Polydeuces, thou didst outwit the giant, and the sun’s rays fell
full on the face of Amycus.  Then came he eagerly on in great wrath and
heat, making play with his fists, but the son of Tyndarus smote him on
the chin as he charged, maddening him even more, and the giant confused
the fighting, laying on with all his weight, and going in with his head
down.  The Bebryces cheered their man, and on the other side the heroes
still encouraged stout Polydeuces, for they feared lest the giant’s
weight, a match for Tityus, might crush their champion in the narrow
lists.  But the son of Zeus stood to him, shifting his ground again and
again, and kept smiting him, right and left, and somewhat checked the
rush of the son of Posidon, for all his monstrous strength.  Then he
stood reeling like a drunken man under the blows, and spat out the red
blood, while all the heroes together raised a cheer, as they marked the
woful bruises about his mouth and jaws, and how, as his face swelled up,
his eyes were half closed.  Next, the prince teased him, feinting on
every side but seeing now that the giant was all abroad, he planted his
fist just above the middle of the nose, beneath the eyebrows, and skinned
all the brow to the bone.  Thus smitten, Amycus lay stretched on his
back, among the flowers and grasses.  There was fierce fighting when he
arose again, and they bruised each other well, laying on with the hard
weighted gloves; but the champion of the Bebryces was always playing on
the chest, and outside the neck, while unconquered Polydeuces kept
smashing his foeman’s face with ugly blows.  The giant’s flesh was
melting away in his sweat, till from a huge mass he soon became small
enough, but the limbs of the other waxed always stronger, and his colour
better, as he warmed to his work.

How then, at last, did the son of Zeus lay low the glutton? say goddess,
for thou knowest, but I, who am but the interpreter of others, will speak
all that thou wilt, and in such wise as pleases thee.

Now behold the giant was keen to do some great feat, so with his left
hand he grasped the left of Polydeuces, stooping slantwise from his
onset, while with his other hand he made his effort, and drove a huge
fist up from his right haunch.  Had his blow come home, he would have
harmed the King of Amyclae, but he slipped his head out of the way, and
then with his strong hand struck Amycus on the left temple, putting his
shoulder into the blow.  Quick gushed the black blood from the gaping
temple, while Polydeuces smote the giant’s mouth with his left, and the
close-set teeth rattled.  And still he punished his face with
quick-repeated blows, till the cheeks were fairly pounded.  Then Amycus
lay stretched all on the ground, fainting, and held out both his hands,
to show that he declined the fight, for he was near to death.

There then, despite thy victory, didst thou work him no insensate wrong,
O boxer Polydeuces, but to thee he swore a mighty oath, calling his sire
Posidon from the deep, that assuredly never again would he be violent to
strangers.

Thee have I hymned, my prince; but thee now, Castor, will I sing, O son
of Tyndarus, O lord of the swift steeds, O wielder of the spear, thou
that wearest the corselet of bronze.

Now these twain, the sons of Zeus, had seized and were bearing away the
two daughters of Lycippus, and eagerly in sooth these two other brethren
were pursuing them, the sons of Aphareus, even they that should soon have
been the bridegrooms,—Lynceus and mighty Idas.  But when they were come
to the tomb of the dead Aphareus, then forth from their chariots they all
sprang together, and set upon each other, under the weight of their
spears and hollow shields.  But Lynceus again spake, and shouted loud
from under his vizor:—

‘Sirs, wherefore desire ye battle, and how are ye thus violent to win the
brides of others with naked swords in your hands.  To us, behold, did
Leucippus betroth these his daughters long before; to us this bridal is
by oath confirmed.  And ye did not well, in that to win the wives of
others ye perverted him with gifts of oxen, and mules, and other wealth,
and so won wedlock by bribes.  Lo many a time, in face of both of you, I
have spoken thus, I that am not a man of many words, saying,—“Not thus,
dear friends, does it become heroes to woo their wives, wives that
already have bridegrooms betrothed.  Lo Sparta is wide, and wide is Elis,
a land of chariots and horses, and Arcadia rich in sheep, and there are
the citadels of the Achaeans, and Messenia, and Argos, and all the
sea-coast of Sisyphus.  There be maidens by their parents nurtured,
maidens countless, that lack not aught in wisdom or in comeliness.  Of
these ye may easily win such as ye will, for many are willing to be the
fathers-in-law of noble youths, and ye are the very choice of heroes all,
as your fathers were, and all your father’s kin, and all your blood from
of old.  But, friends, let this our bridal find its due conclusion, and
for you let all of us seek out another marriage.”

‘Many such words I would speak, but the wind’s breath bare them away to
the wet wave of the sea, and no favour followed with my words.  For ye
twain are hard and ruthless,—nay, but even now do ye listen, for ye are
our cousins, and kin by the father’s side.  But if your heart yet lusts
for war, and with blood we must break up the kindred strife, and end the
feud, {118} then Idas and his cousin, mighty Polydeuces, shall hold their
hands and abstain from battle, but let us twain, Castor and I, the
younger born, try the ordeal of war!  Let us not leave the heaviest of
grief to our fathers!  Enough is one slain man from a house, but the
others will make festival for all their friends, and will be bridegrooms,
not slain men, and will wed these maidens.  Lo, it is fitting with light
loss to end a great dispute.’

So he spake, and these words the gods were not to make vain.  For the
elder pair laid down their harness from their shoulders on the ground,
but Lynceus stepped into the midst, swaying his mighty spear beneath the
outer rim of his shield, and even so did Castor sway his spear-points,
and the plumes were nodding above the crests of each.  With the sharp
spears long they laboured and tilted at each other, if perchance they
might anywhere spy a part of the flesh unarmed.  But ere either was
wounded the spear-points were broken, fast stuck in the linden shields.
Then both drew their swords from the sheaths, and again devised each the
other’s slaying, and there was no truce in the fight.  Many a time did
Castor smite on broad shield and horse-hair crest, and many a time the
keen-sighted Lynceus smote upon his shield, and his blade just shore the
scarlet plume.  Then, as he aimed the sharp sword at the left knee,
Castor drew back with his left foot, and hacked the fingers off the hand
of Lynceus.  Then he being smitten cast away his sword, and turned
swiftly to flee to the tomb of his father, where mighty Idas lay, and
watched this strife of kinsmen.  But the son of Tyndarus sped after him,
and drove the broad sword through bowels and navel, and instantly the
bronze cleft all in twain, and Lynceus bowed, and on his face he lay
fallen on the ground, and forthwith heavy sleep rushed down upon his
eyelids.

Nay, nor that other of her children did Laocoosa see, by the hearth of
his fathers, after he had fulfilled a happy marriage.  For lo, Messenian
Idas did swiftly break away the standing stone from the tomb of his
father Aphareus, and now he would have smitten the slayer of his brother,
but Zeus defended him and drave the polished stone from the hands of
Idas, and utterly consumed him with a flaming thunderbolt.

Thus it is no light labour to war with the sons of Tyndarus, for a mighty
pair are they, and mighty is he that begat them.

Farewell, ye children of Leda, and all goodly renown send ye ever to our
singing.  Dear are all minstrels to the sons of Tyndarus, and to Helen,
and to the other heroes that sacked Troy in aid of Menelaus.

For you, O princes, the bard of Chios wrought renown, when he sang the
city of Priam, and the ships of the Achaeans, and the Ilian war, and
Achilles, a tower of battle.  And to you, in my turn, the charms of the
clear-voiced Muses, even all that they can give, and all that my house
has in store, these do I bring.  The fairest meed of the gods is song.



IDYL XXIII
THE VENGEANCE OF LOVE


_A lover hangs himself at the gate of his obdurate darling who_, _in
turn_, _is slain by a statue of Love_.

_This poem is not attributed with much certainty to Theocritus_, _and is
found in but a small proportion of manuscripts_.

                                * * * * *

A LOVE-SICK youth pined for an unkind love, beautiful in form, but fair
no more in mood.  The beloved hated the lover, and had for him no
gentleness at all, and knew not Love, how mighty a God is he, and what a
bow his hands do wield, and what bitter arrows he dealeth at the young.
Yea, in all things ever, in speech and in all approaches, was the beloved
unyielding.  Never was there any assuagement of Love’s fires, never was
there a smile of the lips, nor a bright glance of the eyes, never a
blushing cheek, nor a word, nor a kiss that lightens the burden of
desire.  Nay, as a beast of the wild wood hath the hunters in watchful
dread, even so did the beloved in all things regard the man, with angered
lips, and eyes that had the dreadful glance of fate, and the whole face
was answerable to this wrath, the colour fled from it, sicklied o’er with
wrathful pride.  Yet even thus was the loved one beautiful, and the lover
was the more moved by this haughtiness.  At length he could no more
endure so fierce a flame of the Cytherean, but drew near and wept by the
hateful dwelling, and kissed the lintel of the door, and thus he lifted
up his voice:

‘O cruel child, and hateful, thou nursling of some fierce lioness, O
child all of stone unworthy of love; I have come with these my latest
gifts to thee, even this halter of mine; for, child, I would no longer
anger thee and work thee pain.  Nay, I am going where thou hast condemned
me to fare, where, as men say, is the path, and there the common remedy
of lovers, the River of Forgetfulness.  Nay, but were I to take and drain
with my lips all the waters thereof, not even so shall I quench my
yearning desire.  And now I bid my farewell to these gates of thine.

‘Behold I know the thing that is to be.

‘Yea, the rose is beautiful, and Time he withers it; and fair is the
violet in spring, and swiftly it waxes old; white is the lily, it fadeth
when it falleth; and snow is white, and melteth after it hath been
frozen.  And the beauty of youth is fair, but lives only for a little
season.

‘That time will come when thou too shalt love, when thy heart shall burn,
and thou shalt weep salt tears.

‘But, child, do me even this last favour; when thou comest forth, and
see’st me hanging in thy gateway,—pass me not careless by, thy hapless
lover, but stand, and weep a little while; and when thou hast made this
libation of thy tears, then loose me from the rope, and cast over me some
garment from thine own limbs, and so cover me from sight; but first kiss
me for that latest time of all, and grant the dead this grace of thy
lips.

‘Fear me not, I cannot live again, no, not though thou shouldst be
reconciled to me, and kiss me.  A tomb for me do thou hollow, to be the
hiding-place of my love, and if thou departest, cry thrice above me,—

                        _O friend_, _thou liest low_!

And if thou wilt, add this also,—

                      _Alas_, _my true friend is dead_!

‘And this legend do thou write, that I will scratch on thy walls,—

   _This man Love slew_!  _Wayfarer_, _pass not heedless by_,
   _But stand_, _and say_, “_he had a cruel darling_.”’

Therewith he seized a stone, and laid it against the wall, as high as the
middle of the doorposts, a dreadful stone, and from the lintel he
fastened the slender halter, and cast the noose about his neck, and
kicked away the support from under his foot, and there was he hanged
dead.

But the beloved opened the door, and saw the dead man hanging there in
the court, unmoved of heart, and tearless for the strange, woful death;
but on the dead man were all the garments of youth defiled.  Then forth
went the beloved to the contests of the wrestlers, and there was
heart-set on the delightful bathing-places, and even thereby encountered
the very God dishonoured, for Love stood on a pedestal of stone above the
waters. {124}  And lo, the statue leaped, and slew that cruel one, and
the water was red with blood, but the voice of the slain kept floating to
the brim.

_Rejoice_, _ye lovers_, _for he that hated is slain_.  _Love_, _all ye
beloved_, _for the God knoweth how to deal righteous judgment_.



IDYL XXIV
THE INFANT HERACLES


_This poem describes the earliest feat of Heracles_, _the slaying of the
snakes sent against him by Hera_, _and gives an account of the hero’s
training_.  _The vivacity and tenderness of the pictures of domestic
life_, _and the minute knowledge of expiatory ceremonies seem to stamp
this idyl as the work of Theocritus_.  _As the following poem also deals
with an adventure of Heracles_, _it seems not impossible that Theocritus
wrote_, _or contemplated writing_, _a Heraclean epic_, _in a series of
idyls_.

                                * * * * *

WHEN Heracles was but ten months old, the lady of Midea, even Alcmena,
took him, on a time, and Iphicles his brother, younger by one night, and
gave them both their bath, and their fill of milk, then laid them down in
the buckler of bronze, that goodly piece whereof Amphitryon had strippen
the fallen Pterelaus.  And then the lady stroked her children’s heads,
and spoke, saying:—

‘Sleep, my little ones, a light delicious sleep; sleep, soul of mine, two
brothers, babes unharmed; blessed be your sleep, and blessed may ye come
to the dawn.’

So speaking she rocked the huge shield, and in a moment sleep laid hold
on them.

But when the _Bear_ at midnight wheels westward over against _Orion_ that
shows his mighty shoulder, even then did crafty Hera send forth two
monstrous things, two snakes bristling up their coils of azure; against
the broad threshold, where are the hollow pillars of the house-door she
urged them; with intent that they should devour the young child Heracles.
Then these twain crawled forth, writhing their ravenous bellies along the
ground, and still from their eyes a baleful fire was shining as they
came, and they spat out their deadly venom.  But when with their
flickering tongues they were drawing near the children, then Alcmena’s
dear babes wakened, by the will of Zeus that knows all things, and there
was a bright light in the chamber.  Then truly one child, even Iphicles,
screamed out straightway, when he beheld the hideous monsters above the
hollow shield, and saw their pitiless fangs, and he kicked off the
woollen coverlet with his feet, in his eagerness to flee.  But Heracles
set his force against them, and grasped them with his hands, binding them
both in a grievous bond, having got them by the throat, wherein lies the
evil venom of baleful snakes, the venom detested even by the gods.  Then
the serpents, in their turn, wound with their coils about the young
child, the child unweaned, that wept never in his nursling days; but
again they relaxed their spines in stress, of pain, and strove to find
some issue from the grasp of iron.

Now Alcmena heard the cry, and wakened first,—

‘Arise, Amphitryon, for numbing fear lays hold of me: arise, nor stay to
put shoon beneath thy feet!  Hearest thou not how loud the younger child
is wailing?  Mark’st thou not that though it is the depth of the night,
the walls are all plain to see as in the clear dawn? {127}  There is some
strange thing I trow within the house, there is, my dearest lord!’

Thus she spake, and at his wife’s bidding he stepped down out of his bed,
and made for his richly dight sword that he kept always hanging on its
pin above his bed of cedar.  Verily he was reaching out for his new-woven
belt, lifting with the other hand the mighty sheath, a work of lotus
wood, when lo, the wide chamber was filled again with night.  Then he
cried aloud on his thralls, who were drawing the deep breath of sleep,—

‘Lights!  Bring lights as quick as may be from the hearth, my thralls,
and thrust back the strong bolts of the doors.  Arise, ye serving-men,
stout of heart, ’tis the master calls.’

Then quick the serving-men came speeding with torches burning, and the
house waxed full as each man hasted along.  Then truly when they saw the
young child Heracles clutching the snakes twain in his tender grasp, they
all cried out and smote their hands together.  But he kept showing the
creeping things to his father, Amphitryon, and leaped on high in his
childish glee, and laughing, at his father’s feet he laid them down, the
dread monsters fallen on the sleep of death.  Then Alcmena in her own
bosom took and laid Iphicles, dry-eyed and wan with fear; {128} but
Amphitryon, placing the other child beneath a lamb’s-wool coverlet,
betook himself again to his bed, and gat him to his rest.

The cocks were now but singing their third welcome to the earliest dawn,
when Alcmena called forth Tiresias, the seer that cannot lie, and told
him of the new portent, and bade him declare what things should come to
pass.

‘Nay, and even if the gods devise some mischief, conceal it not from me
in ruth and pity; and how that mortals may not escape the doom that Fate
speeds from her spindle, O soothsayer Euerides, I am teaching thee, that
thyself knowest it right well.’

Thus spake the Queen, and thus he answered her:

‘Be of good cheer, daughter of Perseus, woman that hast borne the noblest
of children [and lay up in thy heart the better of the things that are to
be].  For by the sweet light that long hath left mine eyes, I swear that
many Achaean women, as they card the soft wool about their knees, shall
sing at eventide, of Alcmena’s name, and thou shalt be honourable among
the women of Argos.  Such a man, even this thy son, shall mount to the
starry firmament, the hero broad of breast, the master of all wild
beasts, and of all mankind.  Twelve labours is he fated to accomplish,
and thereafter to dwell in the house of Zeus, but all his mortal part a
Trachinian pyre shall possess.

‘And the son of the Immortals, by virtue of his bride, shall he be
called, even of them that urged forth these snakes from their dens to
destroy the child.  Verily that day shall come when the ravening wolf,
beholding the fawn in his lair, will not seek to work him harm.

‘But lady, see that thou hast fire at hand, beneath the embers, and let
make ready dry fuel of gorse, or thorn, or bramble, or pear boughs dried
with the wind’s buffeting, and on the wild fire burn these serpents
twain, at midnight, even at the hour when they would have slain thy
child.  But at dawn let one of thy maidens gather the dust of the fire,
and bear and cast it all, every grain, over the river from the brow of
the broken cliff, {129} beyond the march of your land, and return again
without looking behind.  Then cleanse your house with the fire of unmixed
sulphur first, and then, as is ordained, with a filleted bough sprinkle
holy water over all, mingled with salt. {130}  And to Zeus supreme,
moreover, do ye sacrifice a young boar, that ye may ever have the mastery
over all your enemies.’

So spake he, and thrust back his ivory chair, and departed, even
Tiresias, despite the weight of all his many years.

But Heracles was reared under his mother’s care, like some young sapling
in a garden close, being called the son of Amphitryon of Argos.  And the
lad was taught his letters by the ancient Linus, Apollo’s son, a tutor
ever watchful.  And to draw the bow, and send the arrow to the mark did
Eurytus teach him, Eurytus rich in wide ancestral lands.  And Eumolpus,
son of Philammon, made the lad a minstrel, and formed his hands to the
boxwood lyre.  And all the tricks wherewith the nimble Argive
cross-buttockers give each other the fall, and all the wiles of boxers
skilled with the gloves, and all the art that the rough and tumble
fighters have sought out to aid their science, all these did Heracles
learn from Harpalacus of Phanes, the son of Hermes.  Him no man that
beheld, even from afar, would have confidently met as a wrestler in the
lists, so grim a brow overhung his dreadful face.  And to drive forth his
horses ’neath the chariot, and safely to guide them round the goals, with
the naves of the wheels unharmed, Amphitryon taught his son in his
loving-kindness, Amphitryon himself, for many a prize had he borne away
from the fleet races in Argos, pasture-land of steeds, and unbroken were
the chariots that he mounted, till time loosened their leathern thongs.

But to charge with spear in rest, against a foe, guarding, meanwhile, his
back with the shield, to bide the biting swords, to order a company, and
to measure, in his onslaught, the ambush of foemen, and to give horsemen
the word of command, he was taught by knightly Castor.  An outlaw came
Castor out of Argos, when Tydeus was holding all the land and all the
wide vineyards, having received Argos, a land of steeds, from the hand of
Adrastus.  No peer in war among the demigods had Castor, till age wore
down his youth.

Thus did his dear mother let train Heracles, and the child’s bed was made
hard by his father’s; a lion’s skin was the coverlet he loved; his dinner
was roast meat, and a great Dorian loaf in a basket, a meal to satisfy a
delving hind.  At the close of day he would take a meagre supper that
needed no fire to the cooking, and his plain kirtle fell no lower than
the middle of his shin.



IDYL XXV
HERACLES THE LION-SLAYER


_This is another idyl of the epic sort_.  _The poet’s interest in the
details of the rural life_, _and in the description of the herds of King
Augeas_, _seem to mark it as the work of Theocritus_.  _It has_,
_however_, _been attributed by learned conjecture to various writers of
an older age_.  _The idyl_, _or fragment_, _is incomplete_.  _Heracles
visits the herds of Augeas_ (_to clean their stalls was one of his
labours_), _and_, _after an encounter with a bull_, _describes to the
king’s son his battle with the lion of Nemea_.

. . . Him answered the old man, a husbandman that had the care of the
tillage, ceasing a moment from the work that lay betwixt his hands—‘Right
readily will I tell thee, stranger, concerning the things whereof thou
inquirest, for I revere the awful wrath of Hermes of the roadside.  Yea
he, they say, is of all the heavenly Gods the most in anger, if any deny
the wayfarer that asks eagerly for the way.

‘The fleecy flocks of the king Augeas feed not all on one pasture, nor in
one place, but some there be that graze by the river-banks round Elisus,
and some by the sacred stream of divine Alpheius, and some by Buprasium
rich in clusters of the vine, and some even in this place.  And behold,
the pens for each herd after its kind are builded apart.  Nay, but for
all the herds of Augeas, overflowing as they be, these pasture lands are
ever fresh and flowering, around the great marsh of Peneus, for with
herbage honey-sweet the dewy water-meadows are ever blossoming
abundantly, and this fodder it is that feeds the strength of horned kine.
And this their steading, on thy right hand stands all plain to view,
beyond the running river, there, where the plane-trees grow luxuriant,
and the green wild olive, a sacred grove, O stranger, of Apollo of the
pastures, a God most gracious unto prayer.  Next thereto are builded long
rows of huts for the country folk, even for us that do zealously guard
the great and marvellous wealth of the king; casting in season the seed
in fallow lands, thrice, ay, and four times broken by the plough.  As for
the marches, truly, the ditchers know them, men of many toils, who throng
to the wine-press at the coming of high summer tide.  For, behold, all
this plain is held by gracious Augeas, and the wheat-bearing plough-land,
and the orchards with their trees, as far as the upland farm of the
ridge, whence the fountains spring; over all which lands we go labouring,
the whole day long, as is the wont of thralls that live their lives among
the fields.

‘But, prithee, tell thou me, in thy turn (and for thine own gain it will
be), whom comest thou hither to seek; in quest, perchance, of Augeas, or
one of his servants?  Of all these things, behold, I have knowledge, and
could tell thee plainly, for methinks that thou, for thy part, comest of
no churlish stock, nay, nor hath thy shape aught of the churl, so
excellent in might shows thy form.  Lo, now, even such are the children
of the immortal Gods among mortal men.’  Then the mighty son of Zeus
answered him, saying—

‘Yea, old man, I fain would see Augeas, prince of the Epeans, for truly
’twas need of him that brought me hither.  If he abides at the town with
his citizens, caring for his people, and settling the pleas, do thou, old
man, bid one of the servants to guide me on the way, a head-man of the
more honourable sort in these fields, to whom I may both tell my desire,
and learn in turn what I would, for God has made all men dependent, each
on each.’

Then the old man, the worthy husbandman, answered him again—

‘By the guidance of some one of the immortals hast thou come hither,
stranger, for verily all that thou requirest hath quickly been fulfilled.
For hither hath come Augeas, the dear son of Helios, with his own son,
the strong and princely Phyleus.  But yesterday he came hither from the
city, to be overseeing after many days his substance, that he hath
uncounted in the fields.  Thus do even kings in their inmost hearts
believe that the eye of the master makes the house more prosperous.  Nay
come, let us hasten to him, and I will lead thee to our dwelling, where
methinks we shall find the king.’

So he spake, and began to lead the way, but in his mind, as he marked the
lion’s hide, and the club that filled the stranger’s fist, the old man
was deeply pondering as to whence he came, and ever he was eager to
inquire of him.  But back again he kept catching the word as it rose to
his lips, in fear lest he should speak somewhat out of season (his
companion being in haste) for hard it is to know another’s mood.

Now as they began to draw nigh, the dogs from afar were instantly aware
of them, both by the scent, and by the sound of footsteps, and, yelling
furiously, they charged from all sides against Heracles, son of
Amphitryon, while with faint yelping, on the other side, they greeted the
old man, and fawned around him.  But he just lifted stones from the
ground, {135} and scared them away, and, raising his voice, he right
roughly chid them all, and made them cease from their yelping, being glad
in his heart withal for that they guarded his dwelling, even when he was
afar.  Then thus he spake—

‘Lo, what a comrade for men have the Gods, the lords of all, made in this
creature, how mindful is he!  If he had but so much wit within him as to
know against whom he should rage, and with whom he should forbear, no
beast in the world could vie with his deserts.  But now he is something
over-fierce and blindly furious.’

So he spake, and they hastened, and came even to that dwelling whither
they were faring.

Now Helios had turned his steeds to the west, bringing the late day, and
the fatted sheep came up from the pastures to the pens and folds.  Next
thereafter the kine approaching, ten thousand upon ten thousand, showed
for multitude even like the watery clouds that roll forward in heaven
under the stress of the South Wind, or the Thracian North (and countless
are they, and ceaseless in their airy passage, for the wind’s might rolls
up the rear as numerous as the van, and hosts upon hosts again are moving
in infinite array), even so many did herds upon herds of kine move ever
forwards.  And, lo, the whole plain was filled, and all the ways, as the
cattle fared onwards, and the rich fields could not contain their lowing,
and the stalls were lightly filled with kine of trailing feet, and the
sheep were being penned in the folds.

There no man, for lack of labour, stood idle by the cattle, though
countless men were there, but one was fastening guards of wood, with
shapely thongs, about the feet of the kine, that he might draw near and
stand by, and milk them.  And another beneath their mothers kind was
placing the calves right eager to drink of the sweet milk.  Yet another
held a milking pail, while his fellow was fixing the rich cheese, and
another led in the bulls apart from the cows.  Meanwhile Augeas was going
round all the stalls, and marking the care his herdsmen bestowed upon all
that was his.  And the king’s son, and the mighty, deep-pondering
Heracles, went along with the king, as he passed through his great
possessions.  Then though he bore a stout spirit in his heart, and a mind
stablished always imperturbable, yet the son of Amphitryon still
marvelled out of measure, as he beheld these countless troops of cattle.
Yea none would have deemed or believed that the substance of one man
could be so vast, nay, nor ten men’s wealth, were they the richest in
sheep of all the kings in the world.  But Helios to his son gave this
gift pre-eminent, namely to abound in flocks far above all other men, and
Helios himself did ever and always give increase to the cattle, for upon
his herds came no disease, of them that always minish the herdman’s toil.
But always more in number waxed the horned kine, and goodlier, year by
year, for verily they all brought forth exceeding abundantly, and never
cast their young, and chiefly bare heifers.

With the kine went continually three hundred bulls, white-shanked, and
curved of horn,—and two hundred others, red cattle,—and all these already
were of an age to mate with the kine.  Other twelve bulls, again, besides
these, went together in a herd, being sacred to Helios.  They were white
as swans, and shone among all the herds of trailing gait.  And these
disdaining the herds grazed still on the rich herbage in the pastures,
and they were exceeding high of heart.  And whensoever the swift wild
beasts came down from the rough oakwood to the plain, to seek the wilder
cattle, afield went these bulls first to the fight, at the smell of the
savour of the beasts, bellowing fearfully, and glancing slaughter from
their brows.

Among these bulls was one pre-eminent for strength and might, and for
reckless pride, even the mighty Phaethon, that all the herdsmen still
likened to a star, because he always shone so bright when he went among
the other cattle, and was right easy to be discerned.  Now when this bull
beheld the dried skin of the fierce-faced lion, he rushed against the
keen-eyed Heracles himself, to dash his head and stalwart front against
the sides of the hero.  Even as he charged, the prince forthwith grasped
him with strong hand by the left horn, and bowed his neck down to the
ground, puissant as he was, and, with the weight of his shoulder, crushed
him backwards, while clear stood out the strained muscle over the sinews
on the hero’s upper arm.  Then marvelled the king himself, and his son,
the warlike Phyleus, and the herdsmen that were set over the horned
kine,—when they beheld the exceeding strength of the son of Amphitryon.

Now these twain, even Phyleus and mighty Heracles, left the fat fields
there, and were making for the city.  But just where they entered on the
highway, after quickly speeding over the narrow path that stretched
through the vineyard from the farmhouses, a dim path through the green
wood, thereby the dear son of Augeas bespake the child of supreme Zeus,
who was behind him, slightly turning his head over his right shoulder,

‘Stranger, long time ago I heard a tale, which, as of late I guess,
surely concerneth thee.  For there came hither, in his wayfaring out of
Argos, a certain young Achaean, from Helicé, by the seashore, who verily
told a tale and that among many Epeians here,—how, even in his presence,
a certain Argive slew a wild beast, a lion dread, a curse of evil omen to
the country folk.  The monster had its hollow lair by the grove of Nemean
Zeus, but as for him that slew it, I know not surely whether he was a man
of sacred Argos, there, or a dweller in Tiryns city, or in Mycenae, as he
that told the tale declared.  By birth, howbeit, he said (if rightly, I
recall it) that the hero was descended from Perseus.  Methinks that none
of the Aegialeis had the hardihood for this deed save thyself; nay, the
hide of the beast that covers thy sides doth clearly proclaim the mighty
deed of thy hands.  But come now, hero, tell thou me first, that truly I
may know, whether my foreboding be right or wrong,—if thou art that man
of whom the Achaean from Helicé spake in our hearing, and if I read thee
aright.  Tell me how single-handed thou didst slay this ruinous pest, and
how it came to the well-watered ground of Nemea, for not in Apis couldst
thou find,—not though thou soughtest after it,—so great a monster.  For
the country feeds no such large game, but bears, and boars, and the
pestilent race of wolves.  Wherefore all were in amaze that listened to
the story, and there were some who said that the traveller was lying, and
pleasing them that stood by with the words of an idle tongue.’

Thus Phyleus spake, and stepped out of the middle of the road, that there
might be space for both to walk abreast, and that so he might hear the
more easily the words of Heracles who now came abreast with him, and
spake thus,

‘O son of Augeas, concerning that whereof thou first didst ask me,
thyself most easily hast discerned it aright.  Nay then, about this
monster I will tell thee all, even how all was done,—since thou art eager
to hear,—save, indeed, as to whence he came, for, many as the Argives be,
not one can tell that clearly.  Only we guess that some one of the
Immortals, in wrath for sacrifice unoffered, sent this bane against the
children of Phoroneus.  For over all the men of Pisa the lion swept, like
a flood, and still ravaged insatiate, and chiefly spoiled the
Bembinaeans, that were his neighbours, and endured things intolerable.

‘Now this labour did Eurystheus enjoin on me to fulfil the first of all,
and bade me slay the dreadful monster.  So I took my supple bow, and
hollow quiver full of arrows, and set forth; and in my other hand I held
my stout club, well balanced, and wrought, with unstripped bark, from a
shady wild olive-tree, that I myself had found, under sacred Helicon, and
dragged up the whole tree, with the bushy roots.  But when I came to the
place whereby the lion abode, even then I grasped my bow and slipped the
string up to the curved tip, and straightway laid thereon the bitter
arrow.  Then I cast my eyes on every side, spying for the baneful
monster, if perchance I might see him, or ever he saw me.  It was now
midday, and nowhere might I discern the tracks of the monster, nor hear
his roaring.  Nay, nor was there one man to be seen with the cattle, and
the tillage through all the furrowed lea, of whom I might inquire, but
wan fear still held them all within the homesteads.  Yet I stayed not in
my going, as I quested through the deep-wooded hill, till I beheld him,
and instantly essayed my prowess.  Now early in the evening he was making
for his lair, full fed with blood and flesh, and all his bristling mane
was dashed with carnage, and his fierce face, and his breast, and still
with his tongue he kept licking his bearded chin.  Then instantly I hid
me in the dark undergrowth, on the wooded hill, awaiting his approach,
and as he came nearer I smote him on the left flank, but all in vain, for
naught did the sharp arrow pierce through his flesh, but leaped back, and
fell on the green grass.  Then quickly he raised his tawny head from the
ground, in amaze, glancing all around with his eyes, and with jaws
distent he showed his ravenous teeth.  Then I launched against him
another shaft from the string, in wrath that the former flew vainly from
my hand, and I smote him right in the middle of the breast, where the
lung is seated, yet not even so did the cruel arrow sink into his hide,
but fell before his feet, in vain, to no avail.  Then for the third time
was I making ready to draw my bow again, in great shame and wrath, but
the furious beast glanced his eyes around, and spied me.  With his long
tail he lashed his flanks, and straightway bethought him of battle.  His
neck was clothed with wrath, and his tawny hair bristled round his
lowering brow, and his spine was curved like a bow, his whole force being
gathered up from under towards his flanks and loins.  And as when a
wainwright, one skilled in many an art, doth bend the saplings of
seasoned fig-tree, having first tempered them in the fire, to make tires
for the axles of his chariot, and even then the fig-tree wood is like to
leap from his hands in the bending, and springs far away at a single
bound, even so the dread lion leaped on me from afar, huddled in a heap,
and keen to glut him with my flesh.  Then with one hand I thrust in front
of me my arrows, and the double folded cloak from my shoulder, and with
the other raised the seasoned club above my head, and drove at his crest,
and even on the shaggy scalp of the insatiate beast brake my grievous
cudgel of wild olive-tree.  Then or ever he reached me, he fell from his
flight, on to the ground, and stood on trembling feet, with wagging head,
for darkness gathered about both his eyes, his brain being shaken in his
skull with the violence of the blow.  Then when I marked how he was
distraught with the grievous torment, or ever he could turn and gain
breath again, I fell on him, and seized him by the column of his stubborn
neck.  To earth I cast my bow, and woven quiver, and strangled him with
all my force, gripping him with stubborn clasp from the rear, lest he
should rend my flesh with his claws, and I sprang on him and kept firmly
treading his hind feet into the soil with my heels, while I used his
sides to guard my thighs, till I had strained his shoulders utterly, then
lifted him up, all breathless,—and Hell took his monstrous life.

‘And then at last I took thought how I should strip the rough hide from
the dead beast’s limbs, a right hard labour, for it might not be cut with
steel, when I tried, nor stone, nor with aught else. {143}  Thereon one
of the Immortals put into my mind the thought to cleave the lion’s hide
with his own claws.  With these I speedily flayed it off, and cast it
about my limbs, for my defence against the brunt of wounding war.

‘Friend, lo even thus befel the slaying of the Nemean Lion, that
aforetime had brought many a bane on flocks and men.’



IDYL XXVI


_This idyl narrates the murder of Pentheus_, _who was torn to pieces_
(_after the Dionysiac Ritual_) _by his mother_, _Agave_, _and other
Theban women_, _for having watched the celebration of the mysteries of
Dionysus_.  _It is still dangerous for an Australian native to approach
the women of the tribe while they are celebrating their savage rites_.
_The conservatism of Greek religion is well illustrated by Theocritus’s
apology for the truly savage revenge commemorated in the old Theban
legend_.

                                * * * * *

INO, and Autonoe, and Agave of the apple cheeks,—three bands of Maenads
to the mountain-side they led, these ladies three.  They stripped the
wild leaves of a rugged oak, and fresh ivy, and asphodel of the upper
earth, and in an open meadow they built twelve altars; for Semele three,
and nine for Dionysus.  The mystic cakes {144} from the mystic chest they
had taken in their hands, and in silence had laid them on the altars of
new-stripped boughs; so Dionysus ever taught the rite, and herewith was
he wont to be well pleased.

Now Pentheus from a lofty cliff was watching all, deep hidden in an
ancient lentisk hush, a plant of that land.  Autonoe first beheld him,
and shrieked a dreadful yell, and, rushing suddenly, with her feet dashed
all confused the mystic things of Bacchus the wild.  For these are things
unbeholden of men profane.  Frenzied was she, and then forthwith the
others too were frenzied.  Then Pentheus fled in fear, and they pursued
after him, with raiment kirtled through the belt above the knee.

This much said Pentheus, ‘Women, what would ye?’ and thus answered
Autonoe, ‘That shalt thou straightway know, ere thou hast heard it.’

The mother seized her child’s head, and cried loud, as is the cry of a
lioness over her cubs, while Ino, for her part, set her heel on the body,
and brake asunder the broad shoulder, shoulder-blade and all, and in the
same strain wrought Autonoe.  The other women tore the remnants
piecemeal, and to Thebes they came, all bedabbled with blood, from the
mountains bearing not Pentheus but repentance. {145}

I care for none of these things, nay, nor let another take thought to
make himself the foe of Dionysus, not though one should suffer yet
greater torments than these,—being but a child of nine years old or
entering, perchance, on his tenth year.  For me, may I be pure and holy,
and find favour in the eyes of the pure!

From aegis-bearing Zeus hath this augury all honour, ‘to the children of
the godly the better fortune, but evil befall the offspring of the
ungodly.’

‘Hail to Dionysus, whom Zeus supreme brought forth in snowy Dracanus,
when he had unburdened his mighty thigh, and hail to beautiful Semele:
and to her sisters,—Cadmeian ladies honoured of all daughters of
heroes,—who did this deed at the behest of Dionysus, a deed not to be
blamed; let no man blame the actions of the gods.’



IDYL XXVII
THE WOOING OF DAPHNIS


_The authenticity of this idyl has been denied_, _partly because the
Daphnis of the poem is not identical in character with the Daphnis of the
first idyl_.  _But the piece is certainly worthy of a place beside the
work of Theocritus_.  _The dialogue is here arranged as in the text of
Fritzsche_.

                                * * * * *

_The Maiden_.  Helen the wise did Paris, another neatherd, ravish!

_Daphnis_.  ’Tis rather this Helen that kisses her shepherd, even me!
{147}

_The Maiden_.  Boast not, little satyr, for kisses they call an empty
favour.

_Daphnis_.  Nay, even in empty kisses there is a sweet delight.

_The Maiden_.  I wash my lips, I blow away from me thy kisses!

_Daphnis_.  Dost thou wash thy lips?  Then give me them again to kiss!

_The Maiden_.  ’Tis for thee to caress thy kine, not a maiden unwed.

_Daphnis_.  Boast not, for swiftly thy youth flits by thee, like a dream.

_The Maiden_.  The grapes turn to raisins, not wholly will the dry rose
perish.

_Daphnis_.  Come hither, beneath the wild olives, that I may tell thee a
tale.

_The Maiden_.  I will not come; ay, ere now with a sweet tale didst thou
beguile me.

_Daphnis_.  Come hither, beneath the elms, to listen to my pipe!

_The Maiden_.  Nay, please thyself, no woful tune delights me.

_Daphnis_.  Ah maiden, see that thou too shun the anger of the Paphian.

_The Maiden_.  Good-bye to the Paphian, let Artemis only be friendly!

_Daphnis_.  Say not so, lest she smite thee, and thou fall into a trap
whence there is no escape.

_The Maiden_.  Let her smite an she will; Artemis again would be my
defender.  Lay no hand on me; nay, if thou do more, and touch me with thy
lips, I will bite thee. {148}

_Daphnis_.  From Love thou dost not flee, whom never yet maiden fled.

_The Maiden_.  Escape him, by Pan, I do, but thou dost ever bear his
yoke.

_Daphnis_.  This is ever my fear lest he even give thee to a meaner man.

_The Maiden_.  Many have been my wooers, but none has won my heart.

_Daphnis_.  Yea I, out of many chosen, come here thy wooer.

_The Maiden_.  Dear love, what can I do?  Marriage has much annoy.

_Daphnis_.  Nor pain nor sorrow has marriage, but mirth and dancing.

_The Maiden_.  Ay, but they say that women dread their lords.

_Daphnis_.  Nay, rather they always rule them,—whom do women fear?

_The Maiden_.  Travail I dread, and sharp is the shaft of Eilithyia.

_Daphnis_.  But thy queen is Artemis, that lightens labour.

_The Maiden_.  But I fear childbirth, lest, perchance, I lose my beauty.

_Daphnis_.  Nay, if thou bearest dear children thou wilt see the light
revive in thy sons.

_The Maiden_.  And what wedding gift dost thou bring me if I consent?

_Daphnis_.  My whole flock, all my groves, and all my pasture land shall
be thine.

_The Maiden_.  Swear that thou wilt not win me, and then depart and leave
me forlorn.

_Daphnis_.  So help me Pan I would not leave thee, didst thou even choose
to banish me!

_The Maiden_.  Dost thou build me bowers, and a house, and folds for
flocks?

_Daphnis_.  Yea, bowers I build thee, the flocks I tend are fair.

_The Maiden_.  But to my grey old father, what tale, ah what, shall I
tell?

_Daphnis_.  He will approve thy wedlock when he has heard my name.

_The Maiden_.  Prithee, tell me that name of thine; in a name there is
often delight.

_Daphnis_.  Daphnis am I, Lycidas is my father, and Nomaea is my mother.

_The Maiden_.  Thou comest of men well-born, but there I am thy match.

_Daphnis_.  I know it, thou art of high degree, for thy father is
Menalcas. {150a}

_The Maiden_.  Show me thy grove, wherein is thy cattle-stall.

_Daphnis_.  See here, how they bloom, my slender cypress-trees.

_The Maiden_.  Graze on, my goats, I go to learn the herdsman’s labours.

_Daphnis_.  Feed fair, my bulls, while I show my woodlands to my lady!

_The Maiden_.  What dost thou, little satyr; why dost thou touch my
breast?

_Daphnis_.  I will show thee that these earliset apples are ripe. {150b}

_The Maiden_.  By Pan, I swoon; away, take back thy hand.

_Daphnis_.  Courage, dear girl, why fearest thou me, thou art over
fearful!

_The Maiden_.  Thou makest me lie down by the water-course, defiling my
fair raiment!

_Daphnis_.  Nay, see, ’neath thy raiment fair I am throwing this soft
fleece.

_The Maiden_.  Ah, ah, thou hast snatched my girdle too; why hast thou
loosed my girdle?

_Daphnis_.  These first-fruits I offer, a gift to the Paphian.

_The Maiden_.  Stay, wretch, hark; surely a stranger cometh; nay, I hear
a sound.

_Daphnis_.  The cypresses do but whisper to each other of thy wedding.

_The Maiden_.  Thou hast torn my mantle, and unclad am I.

_Daphnis_.  Another mantle I will give thee, and an ampler far than
thine.

_The Maiden_.  Thou dost promise all things, but soon thou wilt not give
me even a grain of salt.

_Daphnis_.  Ah, would that I could give thee my very life.

_The Maiden_.  Artemis, be not wrathful, thy votary breaks her vow.

_Daphnis_.  I will slay a calf for Love, and for Aphrodite herself a
heifer.

_The Maiden_.  A maiden I came hither, a woman shall I go homeward.

_Daphnis_.  Nay, a wife and a mother of children shalt thou be, no more a
maiden.

So, each to each, in the joy of their young fresh limbs they were
murmuring: it was the hour of secret love.  Then she arose, and stole to
herd her sheep; with shamefast eyes she went, but her heart was comforted
within her.  And he went to his herds of kine, rejoicing in his wedlock.



IDYL XXVIII


_This little piece of Aeolic verse accompanied the present of a distaff
which Theocritus brought from Syracuse to Theugenis_, _the wife of his
friend Nicias_, _the physician of Miletus_.  _On the margin of a
translation by Longepierre_ (_the famous book-collector_), _Louis XIV
wrote that this idyl is a model of honourable gallantry_.

                                * * * * *

O DISTAFF, thou friend of them that spin, gift of grey-eyed Athene to
dames whose hearts are set on housewifery; come, boldly come with me to
the bright city of Neleus, where the shrine of the Cyprian is green
’neath its roof of delicate rushes.  Thither I pray that we may win fair
voyage and favourable breeze from Zeus, that so I may gladden mine eyes
with the sight of Nicias my friend, and be greeted of him in turn;—a
sacred scion is he of the sweet-voiced Graces.  And thee, distaff, thou
child of fair carven ivory, I will give into the hands of the wife of
Nicias: with her shalt thou fashion many a thing, garments for men, and
much rippling raiment that women wear.  For the mothers of lambs in the
meadows might twice be shorn of their wool in the year, with her
goodwill, the dainty-ankled Theugenis, so notable is she, and cares for
all things that wise matrons love.

Nay, not to houses slatternly or idle would I have given thee, distaff,
seeing that thou art a countryman of mine.  For that is thy native city
which Archias out of Ephyre founded, long ago, the very marrow of the
isle of the three capes, a town of honourable men. {153}  But now shalt
thou abide in the house of a wise physician, who has learned all the
spells that ward off sore maladies from men, and thou shalt dwell in glad
Miletus with the Ionian people, to this end,—that of all the townsfolk
Theugenis may have the goodliest distaff and that thou mayst keep her
ever mindful of her friend, the lover of song.

This proverb will each man utter that looks on thee, ‘Surely great grace
goes with a little gift, and all the offerings of friends are precious.’



IDYL XXIX


_This poem_, _like the preceding one_, _is written in the Aeolic
dialect_.  _The first line is quoted from Alcaeus_.  _The idyl is
attributed to Theocritus on the evidence of the scholiast on the
Symposium of Plato_.

                                * * * * *

‘WINE and truth,’ dear child, says the proverb, and in wine are we, and
the truth we must tell.  Yes, I will say to thee all that lies in my
soul’s inmost chamber.  Thou dost not care to love me with thy whole
heart!  I know, for I live half my life in the sight of thy beauty, but
all the rest is ruined.  When thou art kind, my day is like the days of
the Blessed, but when thou art unkind, ’tis deep in darkness.  How can it
be right thus to torment thy friend?  Nay, if thou wilt listen at all,
child, to me, that am thine elder, happier thereby wilt thou be, and some
day thou wilt thank me.  Build one nest in one tree, where no fierce
snake can come; for now thou dost perch on one branch to-day, and on
another to-morrow, always seeking what is new.  And if a stranger see and
praise thy pretty face, instantly to him thou art more than a friend of
three years’ standing, while him that loved thee first thou holdest no
higher than a friend of three days.  Thou savourest, methinks, of the
love of some great one; nay, choose rather all thy life ever to keep the
love of one that is thy peer.  If this thou dost thou wilt be well spoken
of by thy townsmen, and Love will never be hard to thee, Love that
lightly vanquishes the minds of men, and has wrought to tenderness my
heart that was of steel.  Nay, by thy delicate mouth I approach and
beseech thee, remember that thou wert younger yesteryear, and that we wax
grey and wrinkled, or ever we can avert it; and none may recapture his
youth again, for the shoulders of youth are winged, and we are all too
slow to catch such flying pinions.

Mindful of this thou shouldst be gentler, and love me without guile as I
love thee, so that, when thou hast a manly beard, we may be such friends
as were Achilles and Patroclus!

But, if thou dost cast all I say to the winds to waft afar, and cry, in
anger, ‘Why, why, dost thou torment me?’ then I,—that now for thy sake
would go to fetch the golden apples, or to bring thee Cerberus, the
watcher of the dead,—would not go forth, didst thou stand at the
court-doors and call me.  I should have rest from my cruel love.


FRAGMENT OF THE BERENICE.


_Athenaeus_ (_vii._ 284 _A_) _quotes this fragment_, _which probably was
part of a panegyric on Berenice_, _the mother of Ptolemy Philadelphus_.

                                * * * * *

AND if any man that hath his livelihood from the salt sea, and whose nets
serve him for ploughs, prays for wealth, and luck in fishing, let him
sacrifice, at midnight, to this goddess, the sacred fish that they call
‘silver white,’ for that it is brightest of sheen of all,—then let the
fisher set his nets, and he shall draw them full from the sea.



IDYL XXX
THE DEAD ADONIS


_This idyl is usually printed with the poems of Theocritus_, _but almost
certainly is by another hand_.  _I have therefore ventured to imitate the
metre of the original_.

                                * * * * *

   WHEN Cypris saw Adonis,
   In death already lying
   With all his locks dishevelled,
   And cheeks turned wan and ghastly,
   She bade the Loves attendant
   To bring the boar before her.

   And lo, the winged ones, fleetly
   They scoured through all the wild wood;
   The wretched boar they tracked him,
   And bound and doubly bound him.
   One fixed on him a halter,
   And dragged him on, a captive,
   Another drave him onward,
   And smote him with his arrows.
   But terror-struck the beast came,
   For much he feared Cythere.
   To him spake Aphrodite,—
   ‘Of wild beasts all the vilest,
   This thigh, by thee was ’t wounded?
   Was ’t thou that smote my lover?’
   To her the beast made answer—
   ‘I swear to thee, Cythere,
   By thee, and by thy lover,
   Yea, and by these my fetters,
   And them that do pursue me,—
   Thy lord, thy lovely lover
   I never willed to wound him;
   I saw him, like a statue,
   And could not bide the burning,
   Nay, for his thigh was naked,
   And mad was I to kiss it,
   And thus my tusk it harmed him.
   Take these my tusks, O Cypris,
   And break them, and chastise them,
   For wherefore should I wear them,
   These passionate defences?
   If this doth not suffice thee,
   Then cut my lips out also,
   Why dared they try to kiss him?’

   Then Cypris had compassion;
   She bade the Loves attendant
   To loose the bonds that bound him.
   From that day her he follows,
   And flees not to the wild wood
   But joins the Loves, and always
   He bears Love’s flame unflinching.



EPIGRAMS


_The Epigrams of Theocritus are_, _for the most part_, _either
inscriptions for tombs or cenotaphs_, _or for the pedestals of statues_,
_or_ (_as the third epigram_) _are short occasional pieces_.  _Several of
them are but doubtfully ascribed to the poet of the Idyls_.  _The Greek
has little but brevity in common with the modern epigram_.


I
_For a rustic Altar_.


THESE dew-drenched roses and that tufted thyme are offered to the ladies
of Helicon.  And the dark-leaved laurels are thine, O Pythian Paean,
since the rock of Delphi bare this leafage to thine honour.  The altar
this white-horned goat shall stain with blood, this goat that browses on
the tips of the terebinth boughs.


II
_For a Herdsman’s Offering_.


DAPHNIS, the white-limbed Daphnis, that pipes on his fair flute the
pastoral strains offered to Pan these gifts,—his pierced reed-pipes, his
crook, a javelin keen, a fawn-skin, and the scrip wherein he was wont, on
a time, to carry the apples of Love.


III
_For a Picture_.


THOU sleepest on the leaf-strewn ground, O Daphnis, resting thy weary
limbs, and the stakes of thy nets are newly fastened on the hills.  But
Pan is on thy track, and Priapus, with the golden ivy wreath twined round
his winsome head,—both are leaping at one bound into thy cavern.  Nay,
flee them, flee, shake off thy slumber, shake off the heavy sleep that is
falling upon thee.


IV
_Priapus_.


WHEN thou hast turned yonder lane, goatherd, where the oak-trees are,
thou wilt find an image of fig-tree wood, newly carven; three-legged it
is, the bark still covers it, and it is earless withal, yet meet for the
arts of Cypris.  A right holy precinct runs round it, and a ceaseless
stream that falleth from the rocks on every side is green with laurels,
and myrtles, and fragrant cypress.  And all around the place that child
of the grape, the vine, doth flourish with its tendrils, and the merles
in spring with their sweet songs utter their wood-notes wild, and the
brown nightingales reply with their complaints, pouring from their bills
the honey-sweet song.  There, prithee, sit down and pray to gracious
Priapus, that I may be delivered from my love of Daphnis, and say that
instantly thereon I will sacrifice a fair kid.  But if he refuse, ah
then, should I win Daphnis’s love, I would fain sacrifice three
victims,—and offer a calf, a shaggy he-goat, and a lamb that I keep in
the stall, and oh that graciously the god may hear my prayer.


V
_The rural Concert_.


AH, in the Muses’ name, wilt thou play me some sweet air on the double
flute, and I will take up the harp, and touch a note, and the neatherd
Daphnis will charm us the while, breathing music into his wax-bound pipe.
And beside this rugged oak behind the cave will we stand, and rob the
goat-foot Pan of his repose.


VI
_The Dead are beyond hope_.


AH hapless Thyrsis, where is thy gain, shouldst thou lament till thy two
eyes are consumed with tears?  She has passed away,—the kid, the
youngling beautiful,—she has passed away to Hades.  Yea, the jaws of the
fierce wolf have closed on her, and now the hounds are baying, but what
avail they when nor bone nor cinder is left of her that is departed?


VII
_For a statue of Asclepius_.


EVEN to Miletus he hath come, the son of Paeon, to dwell with one that is
a healer of all sickness, with Nicias, who even approaches him day by day
with sacrifices, and hath let carve this statue out of fragrant
cedar-wood; and to Eetion he promised a high guerdon for his skill of
hand: on this work Eetion has put forth all his craft.


VIII
_Orthon’s Grave_.


STRANGER, the Syracusan Orthon lays this behest on thee; go never abroad
in thy cups on a night of storm.  For thus did I come by my end, and far
from my rich fatherland I lie, clothed on with alien soil.


IX
_The Death of Cleonicus_.


MAN, husband thy life, nor go voyaging out of season, for brief are the
days of men!  Unhappy Cleonicus, thou wert eager to win rich Thasus, from
Coelo-Syria sailing with thy merchandise,—with thy merchandise, O
Cleonicus, at the setting of the Pleiades didst thou cross the sea,—and
didst sink with the sinking Pleiades!


X
_A Group of the Muses_.


FOR your delight, all ye Goddesses Nine, did Xenocles offer this statue
of marble, Xenocles that hath music in his soul, as none will deny.  And
inasmuch as for his skill in this art he wins renown, he forgets not to
give their due to the Muses.


XI
_The Grave of Eusthenes_.


THIS is the memorial stone of Eusthenes, the sage; a physiognomist was
he, and skilled to read the very spirit in the eyes.  Nobly have his
friends buried him—a stranger in a strange land—and most dear was he,
yea, to the makers of song.  All his dues in death has the sage, and,
though he was no great one, ’tis plain he had friends to care for him.


XII
_The Offering of Demoteles_.


’TWAS Demoteles the choregus, O Dionysus, who dedicated this tripod, and
this statue of thee, the dearest of the blessed gods.  No great fame he
won when he gave a chorus of boys, but with a chorus of men he bore off
the victory, for he knew what was fair and what was seemly.


XIII
_For a statue of Aphrodite_.


THIS is Cypris,—not she of the people; nay, venerate the goddess by her
name—the Heavenly Aphrodite.  The statue is the offering of chaste
Chrysogone, even in the house of Amphicles, whose children and whose life
were hers!  And always year by year went well with them, who began each
year with thy worship, Lady, for mortals who care for the Immortals have
themselves thereby the better fortune.


XIV
_The Grave of Euryrnedon_.


AN infant son didst thou leave behind, and in the flower of thine own age
didst die, Eurymedon, and win this tomb.  For thee a throne is set among
men made perfect, but thy son the citizens will hold in honour,
remembering the excellence of his father.


XV
_The Grave of Eurymedon_.


WAYFARER, I shall know whether thou dost reverence the good, or whether
the coward is held by thee in the same esteem.  ‘Hail to this tomb,’ thou
wilt say, for light it lies above the holy head of Eurymedon.


XVI
_For a statue of Anacreon_.


MARK well this statue, stranger, and say, when thou hast returned to thy
home, ‘In Teos I beheld the statue of Anacreon, who surely excelled all
the singers of times past.’  And if thou dost add that he delighted in
the young, thou wilt truly paint all the man.


XVII
_For a statue of Epicharmus_.


DORIAN is the strain, and Dorian the man we sing; he that first devised
Comedy, even Epicharmus.  O Bacchus, here in bronze (as the man is now no
more) they have erected his statue, the colonists {165} that dwell in
Syracuse, to the honour of one that was their fellow-citizen.  Yea, for a
gift he gave, wherefore we should be mindful thereof and pay him what
wage we may, for many maxims he spoke that were serviceable to the life
of all men.  Great thanks be his.


XVIII
_The Grave of Cleita_.


THE little Medeus has raised this tomb by the wayside to the memory of
his Thracian nurse, and has added the inscription—

                              HERE LIES CLEITA.

THE woman will have this recompense for all her careful nurture of the
boy,—and why?—because she was serviceable even to the end.


XIX
_The statue of Archilochus_.


STAY, and behold Archilochus, him of old time, the maker of iambics,
whose myriad fame has passed westward, alike, and towards the dawning
day.  Surely the Muses loved him, yea, and the Delian Apollo, so
practised and so skilled he grew in forging song, and chanting to the
lyre.


XX
_The statue of Pisander_.


THIS man, behold, Pisander of Corinth, of all the ancient makers was the
first who wrote of the son of Zeus, the lion-slayer, the ready of hand,
and spake of all the adventures that with toil he achieved.  Know this
therefore, that the people set him here, a statue of bronze, when many
months had gone by and many years.


XXI
_The Grave of Hipponax_.


HERE lies the poet Hipponax!  If thou art a sinner draw not near this
tomb, but if thou art a true man, and the son of righteous sires, sit
boldly down here, yea, and sleep if thou wilt.


XXII
_For the Bank of Caicus_.


TO citizens and strangers alike this counter deals justice.  If thou hast
deposited aught, draw out thy money when the balance-sheet is cast up.
Let others make false excuse, but Caicus tells back money lent, ay, even
if one wish it after nightfall.


XXIII
_On his own Poems_. {167}


THE Chian is another man, but I, Theocritus, who wrote these songs, am a
Syracusan, a man of the people, being the son of Praxagoras and renowned
Philinna.  Never laid I claim to any Muse but mine own.




BION


    Πίδακος έξ ίερης ολίγη λιβας ακρον αωτον.—_Callimachus_.

BION was born at Smyrna, one of the towns which claimed the honour of
being Homer’s birthplace.  On the evidence of a detached verse (94) of
the dirge by Moschus, some have thought that Theocritus survived Bion.
In that case Theocritus must have been a preternaturally aged man.  The
same dirge tells us that Bion was poisoned by certain enemies, and that
while he left to others his wealth, to Moschus he left his minstrelsy.



I
THE LAMENT FOR ADONIS


_This poem was probably intended to be sung at one of the spring
celebrations of the festival of Adonis_, _like that described by
Theocritus in his fifteenth idyl_.

                                * * * * *

WOE, woe for Adonis, he hath perished, the beauteous Adonis, dead is the
beauteous Adonis, the Loves join in the lament.  No more in thy purple
raiment, Cypris, do thou sleep; arise, thou wretched one, sable-stoled,
and beat thy breasts, and say to all, ‘He hath perished, the lovely
Adonis!’

_Woe_, _woe for Adonis_, _the Loves join in the lament_!

Low on the hills is lying the lovely Adonis, and his thigh with the
boar’s tusk, his white thigh with the boar’s tusk is wounded, and sorrow
on Cypris he brings, as softly he breathes his life away.

His dark blood drips down his skin of snow, beneath his brows his eyes
wax heavy and dim, and the rose flees from his lip, and thereon the very
kiss is dying, the kiss that Cypris will never forego.

To Cypris his kiss is dear, though he lives no longer, but Adonis knew
not that she kissed him as he died.

_Woe_, _woe for Adonis_, _the Loves join in the lament_!

A cruel, cruel wound on his thigh hath Adonis, but a deeper wound in her
heart doth Cytherea bear.  About him his dear hounds are loudly baying,
and the nymphs of the wild wood wail him; but Aphrodite with unbound
locks through the glades goes wandering,—wretched, with hair unbraided,
with feet unsandaled, and the thorns as she passes wound her and pluck
the blossom of her sacred blood.  Shrill she wails as down the long
woodlands she is borne, lamenting her Assyrian lord, and again calling
him, and again.  But round his navel the dark blood leapt forth, with
blood from his thighs his chest was scarlet, and beneath Adonis’s breast,
the spaces that afore were snow-white, were purple with blood.

_Woe_, _woe for Cytherea_, _the Loves join in the lament_!

She hath lost her lovely lord, with him she hath lost her sacred beauty.
Fair was the form of Cypris, while Adonis was living, but her beauty has
died with Adonis!  _Woe_, _woe for Cypris_, the mountains all are saying,
and the oak-trees answer, _Woe for Adonis_.  And the rivers bewail the
sorrows of Aphrodite, and the wells are weeping Adonis on the mountains.
The flowers flush red for anguish, and Cytherea through all the
mountain-knees, through every dell doth shrill the piteous dirge.

_Woe_, _woe for Cytherea_, _he hath perished_, _the lovely Adonis_!

And Echo cried in answer, _He hath perished_, _the lovely Adonis_.  Nay,
who but would have lamented the grievous love of Cypris?  When she saw,
when she marked the unstaunched wound of Adonis, when she saw the bright
red blood about his languid thigh, she cast her arms abroad and moaned,
‘Abide with me, Adonis, hapless Adonis abide, that this last time of all
I may possess thee, that I may cast myself about thee, and lips with lips
may mingle.  Awake Adonis, for a little while, and kiss me yet again, the
latest kiss!  Nay kiss me but a moment, but the lifetime of a kiss, till
from thine inmost soul into my lips, into my heart, thy life-breath ebb,
and till I drain thy sweet love-philtre, and drink down all thy love.
This kiss will I treasure, even as thyself; Adonis, since, ah ill-fated,
thou art fleeing me, thou art fleeing far, Adonis, and art faring to
Acheron, to that hateful king and cruel, while wretched I yet live, being
a goddess, and may not follow thee!  Persephone, take thou my lover, my
lord, for thy self art stronger than I, and all lovely things drift down
to thee.  But I am all ill-fated, inconsolable is my anguish, and I
lament mine Adonis, dead to me, and I have no rest for sorrow.

‘Thou diest, O thrice-desired, and my desire hath flown away as a dream.
Nay, widowed is Cytherea, and idle are the Loves along the halls!  With
thee has the girdle of my beauty perished.  For why, ah overbold, didst
thou follow the chase, and being so fair, why wert thou thus overhardy to
fight with beasts?’

So Cypris bewailed her, the Loves join in the lament:

_Woe_, _woe for Cytherea_, _he hath perished the lovely Adonis_!

A tear the Paphian sheds for each blood-drop of Adonis, and tears and
blood on the earth are turned to flowers.  The blood brings forth the
rose, the tears, the wind-flower.

_Woe_, _woe for Adonis_, _he hath perished_; _the lovely Adonis_!

No more in the oak-woods, Cypris, lament thy lord.  It is no fair couch
for Adonis, the lonely bed of leaves!  Thine own bed, Cytherea, let him
now possess,—the dead Adonis.  Ah, even in death he is beautiful,
beautiful in death, as one that hath fallen on sleep.  Now lay him down
to sleep in his own soft coverlets, wherein with thee through the night
he shared the holy slumber in a couch all of gold, that yearns for
Adonis, though sad is he to look upon.  Cast on him garlands and
blossoms: all things have perished in his death, yea all the flowers are
faded.  Sprinkle him with ointments of Syria, sprinkle him with unguents
of myrrh.  Nay, perish all perfumes, for Adonis, who was thy perfume,
hath perished.

He reclines, the delicate Adonis, in his raiment of purple, and around
him the Loves are weeping, and groaning aloud, clipping their locks for
Adonis.  And one upon his shafts, another on his bow is treading, and one
hath loosed the sandal of Adonis, and another hath broken his own
feathered quiver, and one in a golden vessel bears water, and another
laves the wound, and another from behind him with his wings is fanning
Adonis.

_Woe_, _woe for Cytherea_, _the Loves join in the lament_!

Every torch on the lintels of the door has Hymenaeus quenched, and hath
torn to shreds the bridal crown, and _Hymen_ no more, _Hymen_ no more is
the song, but a new song is sung of wailing.

‘_Woe_, _woe for Adonis_,’ rather than the nuptial song the Graces are
shrilling, lamenting the son of Cinyras, and one to the other declaring,
_He hath perished_, _the lovely Adonis_.

And _woe_, _woe for Adonis_, shrilly cry the Muses, neglecting Paeon, and
they lament Adonis aloud, and songs they chant to him, but he does not
heed them, not that he is loth to hear, but that the Maiden of Hades doth
not let him go.

Cease, Cytherea, from thy lamentations, to-day refrain from thy dirges.
Thou must again bewail him, again must weep for him another year.



II
THE LOVE OF ACHILLES


_Lycidas sings to Myrson a fragment about the loves of Achilles and
Deidamia_.

                                * * * * *

_Myrson_.  Wilt thou be pleased now, Lycidas, to sing me sweetly some
sweet Sicilian song, some wistful strain delectable, some lay of love,
such as the Cyclops Polyphemus sang on the sea-banks to Galatea?

_Lycidas_.  Yes, Myrson, and I too fain would pipe, but what shall I
sing?

_Myrson_.  A song of Scyra, Lycidas, is my desire,—a sweet
love-story,—the stolen kisses of the son of Peleus, the stolen bed of
love how he, that was a boy, did on the weeds of women, and how he belied
his form, and how among the heedless daughters of Lycomedes, Deidamia
cherished Achilles in her bower. {176}

_Lycidas_.  The herdsman bore off Helen, upon a time, and carried her to
Ida, sore sorrow to Œnone.  And Lacedaemon waxed wroth, and gathered
together all the Achaean folk; there was never a Hellene, not one of the
Mycenaeans, nor any man of Elis, nor of the Laconians, that tarried in
his house, and shunned the cruel Ares.

But Achilles alone lay hid among the daughters of Lycomedes, and was
trained to work in wools, in place of arms, and in his white hand held
the bough of maidenhood, in semblance a maiden.  For he put on women’s
ways, like them, and a bloom like theirs blushed on his cheek of snow,
and he walked with maiden gait, and covered his locks with the snood.
But the heart of a man had he, and the love of a man.  From dawn to dark
he would sit by Deidamia, and anon would kiss her hand, and oft would
lift the beautiful warp of her loom and praise the sweet threads, having
no such joy in any other girl of her company.  Yea, all things he
essayed, and all for one end, that they twain might share an undivided
sleep.

Now he once even spake to her, saying—

‘With one another other sisters sleep, but I lie alone, and alone,
maiden, dost thou lie, both being girls unwedded of like age, both fair,
and single both in bed do we sleep.  The wicked Nysa, the crafty nurse it
is that cruelly severs me from thee.  For not of thee have I . . . ’



III
THE SEASONS


_Cleodamus and Myrson discuss the charms of the seasons_, _and give the
palm to a southern spring_.

                                * * * * *

_Cleodamus_.  Which is sweetest, to thee, Myrson, spring, or winter or
the late autumn or the summer; of which dost thou most desire the coming?
Summer, when all are ended, the toils whereat we labour, or the sweet
autumn, when hunger weighs lightest on men, or even idle winter, for even
in winter many sit warm by the fire, and are lulled in rest and
indolence.  Or has beautiful spring more delight for thee?  Say, which
does thy heart choose?  For our leisure lends us time to gossip.

_Myrson_.  It beseems not mortals to judge the works of God; for sacred
are all these things, and all are sweet, yet for thy sake I will speak
out, Cleodamus, and declare what is sweeter to me than the rest.  I would
not have summer here, for then the sun doth scorch me, and autumn I would
not choose, for the ripe fruits breed disease.  The ruinous winter,
bearing snow and frost, I dread.  But spring, the thrice desirable, be
with me the whole year through, when there is neither frost, nor is the
sun so heavy upon us.  In springtime all is fruitful, all sweet things
blossom in spring, and night and dawn are evenly meted to men.



IV
THE BOY AND LOVE


A fowler, while yet a boy, was hunting birds in a woodland glade, and
there he saw the winged Love, perched on a box-tree bough.  And when he
beheld him, he rejoiced, so big the bird seemed to him, and he put
together all his rods at once, and lay in wait for Love, that kept
hopping, now here, now there.  And the boy, being angered that his toil
was endless, cast down his fowling gear, and went to the old husbandman,
that had taught him his art, and told him all, and showed him Love on his
perch.  But the old man, smiling, shook his head, and answered the lad,
‘Pursue this chase no longer, and go not after this bird.  Nay, flee far
from him.  ’Tis an evil creature.  Thou wilt be happy, so long as thou
dost not catch him, but if thou comest to the measure of manhood, this
bird that flees thee now, and hops away, will come uncalled, and of a
sudden, and settle on thy head.’



V
THE TUTOR OF LOVE


Great Cypris stood beside me, while still I slumbered, and with her
beautiful hand she led the child Love, whose head was earthward bowed.
This word she spake to me, ‘Dear herdsman, prithee, take Love, and teach
him to sing.’  So said she, and departed, and I—my store of pastoral song
I taught to Love, in my innocence, as if he had been fain to learn.  I
taught him how the cross-flute was invented by Pan, and the flute by
Athene, and by Hermes the tortoise-shell lyre, and the harp by sweet
Apollo.  All these things I taught him as best I might; but he, not
heeding my words, himself would sing me ditties of love, and taught me
the desires of mortals and immortals, and all the deeds of his mother.
And I clean forgot the lore I was teaching to Love, but what Love taught
me, and his love ditties, I learned them all.



VI
LOVE AND THE MUSES


The Muses do not fear the wild Love, but heartily they cherish, and
fleetly follow him.  Yea, and if any man sing that hath a loveless heart,
him do they flee, and do not choose to teach him.  But if the mind of any
be swayed by Love, and sweetly he sings, to him the Muses all run
eagerly.  A witness hereto am I, that this saying is wholly true, for if
I sing of any other, mortal or immortal, then falters my tongue, and
sings no longer as of old, but if again to Love, and Lycidas I sing, then
gladly from my lips flows forth the voice of song.



FRAGMENTS


VII


I know not the way, nor is it fitting to labour at what we have not
learned.


VIII


If my ditties be fair, lo these alone will win me glory, these that the
Muse aforetime gave to me.  And if these be not sweet, what gain is it to
me to labour longer?


IX


Ah, if a double term of life were given us by Zeus, the son of Cronos, or
by changeful Fate, ah, could we spend one life in joy and merriment, and
one in labour, then perchance a man might toil, and in some later time
might win his reward.  But if the gods have willed that man enters into
life but once (and that life brief, and too short to hold all we desire),
then, wretched men and weary that we are, how sorely we toil, how greatly
we cast our souls away on gain, and laborious arts, continually coveting
yet more wealth!  Surely we have all forgotten that we are men condemned
to die, and how short in the hour, that to us is allotted by Fate. {181}


X


Happy are they that love, when with equal love they are rewarded.  Happy
was Theseus, when Pirithous was by his side, yea, though he went down to
the house of implacable Hades.  Happy among hard men and inhospitable was
Orestes, for that Pylades chose to share his wanderings.  And _he_ was
happy, Achilles Æacides, while his darling lived,—happy was he in his
death, because he avenged the dread fate of Patroclus.


XI


Hesperus, golden lamp of the lovely daughter of the foam, dear Hesperus,
sacred jewel of the deep blue night, dimmer as much than the moon, as
thou art among the stars pre-eminent, hail, friend, and as I lead the
revel to the shepherd’s hut, in place of the moonlight lend me thine, for
to-day the moon began her course, and too early she sank.  I go not
free-booting, nor to lie in wait for the benighted traveller, but a lover
am I, and ’tis well to favour lovers.


XII


Mild goddess, in Cyprus born,—thou child, not of the sea, but of
Zeus,—why art thou thus vexed with mortals and immortals?  Nay, my word
is too weak, why wert thou thus bitterly wroth, yea, even with thyself,
as to bring forth Love, so mighty a bane to all,—cruel and heartless
Love, whose spirit is all unlike his beauty?  And wherefore didst thou
furnish him with wings, and give him skill to shoot so far, that, child
as he is, we never may escape the bitterness of Love.


XIII


Mute was Phoebus in this grievous anguish.  All herbs he sought, and
strove to win some wise healing art, and he anointed all the wound with
nectar and ambrosia, but remedeless are all the wounds of Fate.


XIV


But I will go my way to yon sloping hill; by the sand and the sea-banks
murmuring my song, and praying to the cruel Galatea.  But of my sweet
hope never will I leave hold, till I reach the uttermost limit of old
age.


XV


It is not well, my friend, to run to the craftsman, whatever may befall,
nor in every matter to need another’s aid, nay, fashion a pipe thyself,
and to thee the task is easy.


XVI


May Love call to him the Muses, may the Muses bring with them Love.  Ever
may the Muses give song to me that yearn for it,—sweet song,—than song
there is no sweeter charm.


XVII


The constant dropping of water, says the proverb, it wears a hole in a
stone.


XVIII


Nay, leave me not unrewarded, for even Phoebus sang for his reward.  And
the meed of honour betters everything.


XIX


Beauty is the glory of womankind, and strength of men.


XX


All things, god-willing, all things may be achieved by mortals.  From the
hands of the blessed come tasks most easy, and that find their
accomplishment.




MOSCHUS


OUR only certain information about Moschus is contained in his own Dirge
for Bion.  He speaks of his verse as ‘Ausonian song,’ and of himself as
Mion’s pupil and successor.  It is plain that he was acquainted with the
poems of Theocritus.



IDYL I
LOVE THE RUNAWAY


CYPRIS was raising the hue and cry for Love, her child,—‘Who, where the
three ways meet, has seen Love wandering?  He is my runaway, whosoever
has aught to tell of him shall win his reward.  His prize is the kiss of
Cypris, but if thou bringest him, not the bare kiss, O stranger, but yet
more shalt thou win.  The child is most notable, thou couldst tell him
among twenty together, his skin is not white, but flame coloured, his
eyes are keen and burning, an evil heart and a sweet tongue has he, for
his speech and his mind are at variance.  Like honey is his voice, but
his heart of gall, all tameless is he, and deceitful, the truth is not in
him, a wily brat, and cruel in his pastime.  The locks of his hair are
lovely, but his brow is impudent, and tiny are his little hands, yet far
he shoots his arrows, shoots even to Acheron, and to the King of Hades.

‘The body of Love is naked, but well is his spirit hidden, and winged
like a bird he flits and descends, now here, now there, upon men and
women, and nestles in their inmost hearts.  He hath a little bow, and an
arrow always on the string, tiny is the shaft, but it carries as high as
heaven.  A golden quiver on his back he bears, and within it his bitter
arrows, wherewith full many a time he wounds even me.

‘Cruel are all these instruments of his, but more cruel by far the little
torch, his very own, wherewith he lights up the sun himself.

‘And if thou catch Love, bind him, and bring him, and have no pity, and
if thou see him weeping, take heed lest he give thee the slip; and if he
laugh, hale him along.

‘Yea, and if he wish to kiss thee, beware, for evil is his kiss, and his
lips enchanted.

‘And should he say, “Take these, I give thee in free gift all my
armoury,” touch not at all his treacherous gifts, for they all are dipped
in fire.’



IDYL II
EUROPA AND THE BULL


TO Europa, once on a time, a sweet dream was sent by Cypris, when the
third watch of the night sets in, and near is the dawning; when sleep
more sweet than honey rests on the eyelids, limb-loosening sleep, that
binds the eyes with his soft bond, when the flock of truthful dreams
fares wandering.

At that hour she was sleeping, beneath the roof-tree of her home, Europa,
the daughter of Phoenix, being still a maid unwed.  Then she beheld two
Continents at strife for her sake, Asia, and the farther shore, both in
the shape of women.  Of these one had the guise of a stranger, the other
of a lady of that land, and closer still she clung about her maiden, and
kept saying how ‘she was her mother, and herself had nursed Europa.’  But
that other with mighty hands, and forcefully, kept haling the maiden,
nothing loth; declaring that, by the will of Ægis-bearing Zeus, Europa
was destined to be her prize.

But Europa leaped forth from her strown bed in terror, with beating
heart, in such clear vision had she beheld the dream.  Then she sat upon
her bed, and long was silent, still beholding the two women, albeit with
waking eyes; and at last the maiden raised her timorous voice

‘Who of the gods of heaven has sent forth to me these phantoms?  What
manner of dreams have scared me when right sweetly slumbering on my
strown bed, within my bower?  Ah, and who was the alien woman that I
beheld in my sleep?  How strange a longing for her seized my heart, yea,
and how graciously she herself did welcome me, and regard me as it had
been her own child.

‘Ye blessed gods, I pray you, prosper the fulfilment of the dream.’

Therewith she arose, and began to seek the dear maidens of her company,
girls of like age with herself, born in the same year, beloved of her
heart, the daughters of noble sires, with whom she was always wont to
sport, when she was arrayed for the dance, or when she would bathe her
bright body at the mouths of the rivers, or would gather fragrant lilies
on the leas.

And soon she found them, each bearing in her hand a basket to fill with
flowers, and to the meadows near the salt sea they set forth, where
always they were wont to gather in their company, delighting in the
roses, and the sound of the waves.  But Europa herself bore a basket of
gold, a marvel well worth gazing on, a choice work of Hephaestus.  He
gave it to Libya, for a bridal-gift, when she approached the bed of the
Shaker of the Earth, and Libya gave it to beautiful Telephassa, who was
of her own blood; and to Europa, still an unwedded maid, her mother,
Telephassa, gave the splendid gift.

Many bright and cunning things were wrought in the basket: therein was
Io, daughter of Inachus, fashioned in gold; still in the shape of a
heifer she was, and had not her woman’s shape, and wildly wandering she
fared upon the salt sea-ways, like one in act to swim; and the sea was
wrought in blue steel.  And aloft upon the double brow of the shore, two
men were standing together and watching the heifer’s sea-faring.  There
too was Zeus, son of Cronos, lightly touching with his divine hand the
cow of the line of Inachus, and her, by Nile of the seven streams, he was
changing again, from a horned heifer to a woman.  Silver was the stream
of Nile, and the heifer of bronze and Zeus himself was fashioned in gold.
And all about, beneath the rim of the rounded basket, was the story of
Hermes graven, and near him lay stretched out Argus, notable for his
sleepless eyes.  And from the red blood of Argus was springing a bird
that rejoiced in the flower-bright colour of his feathers, and spreading
abroad his tail, even as some swift ship on the sea doth spread all
canvas, was covering with his plumes the lips of the golden vessel.  Even
thus was wrought the basket of the lovely Europa.

Now the girls, so soon as they were come to the flowering meadows, took
great delight in various sorts of flowers, whereof one would pluck
sweet-breathed narcissus, another the hyacinth, another the violet, a
fourth the creeping thyme, and on the ground there fell many petals of
the meadows rich with spring.  Others again were emulously gathering the
fragrant tresses of the yellow crocus; but in the midst of them all the
princess culled with her hand the splendour of the crimson rose, and
shone pre-eminent among them all like the foam-born goddess among the
Graces.  Verily she was not for long to set her heart’s delight upon the
flowers, nay, nor long to keep untouched her maiden girdle.  For of a
truth, the son of Cronos, so soon as he beheld her, was troubled, and his
heart was subdued by the sudden shafts of Cypris, who alone can conquer
even Zeus.  Therefore, both to avoid the wrath of jealous Hera, and being
eager to beguile the maiden’s tender heart, he concealed his godhead, and
changed his shape, and became a bull.  Not such an one as feeds in the
stall nor such as cleaves the furrow, and drags the curved plough, nor
such as grazes on the grass, nor such a bull as is subdued beneath the
yoke, and draws the burdened wain.  Nay, but while all the rest of his
body was bright chestnut, a silver circle shone between his brows, and
his eyes gleamed softly, and ever sent forth lightning of desire.  From
his brow branched horns of even length, like the crescent of the horned
moon, when her disk is cloven in twain.  He came into the meadow, and his
coming terrified not the maidens, nay, within them all wakened desire to
draw nigh the lovely bull, and to touch him, and his heavenly fragrance
was scattered afar, exceeding even the sweet perfume of the meadows.  And
he stood before the feet of fair Europa, and kept licking her neck, and
cast his spell over the maiden.  And she still caressed him, and gently
with her hands she wiped away the deep foam from his lips, and kissed the
bull.  Then he lowed so gently, ye would think ye heard the Mygdonian
flute uttering a dulcet sound.

He bowed himself before her feet, and, bending back his neck, he gazed on
Europa, and showed her his broad back.  Then she spake among her
deep-tressed maidens, saying—

‘Come, dear playmates, maidens of like age with me, let us mount the bull
here and take our pastime, for truly, he will bear us on his back, and
carry all of us; and how mild he is, and dear, and gentle to behold, and
no whit like other bulls.  A mind as honest as a man’s possesses him, and
he lacks nothing but speech.’

So she spake, and smiling, she sat down on the back of the bull, and the
others were about to follow her.  But the bull leaped up immediately, now
he had gotten her that he desired, and swiftly he sped to the deep.  The
maiden turned, and called again and again to her dear playmates,
stretching out her hands, but they could not reach her.  The strand he
gained, and forward he sped like a dolphin, faring with unwetted hooves
over the wide waves.  And the sea, as he came, grew smooth, and the
sea-monsters gambolled around, before the feet of Zeus, and the dolphin
rejoiced, and rising from the deeps, he tumbled on the swell of the sea.
The Nereids arose out of the salt water, and all of them came on in
orderly array, riding on the backs of sea-beasts.  And himself, the
thund’rous Shaker of the World, appeared above the sea, and made smooth
the wave, and guided his brother on the salt sea path; and round him were
gathered the Tritons, these hoarse trumpeters of the deep, blowing from
their long conches a bridal melody.

Meanwhile Europa, riding on the back of the divine bull, with one hand
clasped the beast’s great horn, and with the other caught up the purple
fold of her garment, lest it might trail and be wet in the hoar sea’s
infinite spray.  And her deep robe was swelled out by the winds, like the
sail of a ship, and lightly still did waft the maiden onward.  But when
she was now far off from her own country, and neither sea-beat headland
nor steep hill could now be seen, but above, the air, and beneath, the
limitless deep, timidly she looked around, and uttered her voice, saying—

‘Whither bearest thou me, bull-god?  What art thou? how dost thou fare on
thy feet through the path of the sea-beasts, nor fearest the sea?  The
sea is a path meet for swift ships that traverse the brine, but bulls
dread the salt sea-ways.  What drink is sweet to thee, what food shalt
thou find from the deep?  Nay, art thou then some god, for godlike are
these deeds of thine?  Lo, neither do dolphins of the brine fare on land,
nor bulls on the deep, but dreadless dost thou rush o’er land and sea
alike, thy hooves serving thee for oars.

‘Nay, perchance thou wilt rise above the grey air, and flee on high, like
the swift birds.  Alas for me, and alas again, for mine exceeding evil
fortune, alas for me that have left my father’s house, and following this
bull, on a strange sea-faring I go, and wander lonely.  But I pray thee
that rulest the grey salt sea, thou Shaker of the Earth, propitious meet
me, and methinks I see thee smoothing this path of mine before me.  For
surely it is not without a god to aid, that I pass through these paths of
the waters!’

So spake she, and the horned bull made answer to her again—

‘Take courage, maiden, and dread not the swell of the deep.  Behold I am
Zeus, even I, though, closely beheld, I wear the form of a bull, for I
can put on the semblance of what thing I will.  But ’tis love of thee
that has compelled me to measure out so great a space of the salt sea, in
a bull’s shape.  Lo, Crete shall presently receive thee, Crete that was
mine own foster-mother, where thy bridal chamber shall be.  Yea, and from
me shalt thou bear glorious sons, to be sceptre-swaying kings over
earthly men.

So spake he, and all he spake was fulfilled.  And verily Crete appeared,
and Zeus took his own shape again, and he loosed her girdle, and the
Hours arrayed their bridal bed.  She that before was a maiden straightway
became the bride of Zeus, and she bare children to Zeus, yea, anon she
was a mother.



IDYL III
THE LAMENT FOR BION


WAIL, let me hear you wail, ye woodland glades, and thou Dorian water;
and weep ye rivers, for Bion, the well beloved!  Now all ye green things
mourn, and now ye groves lament him, ye flowers now in sad clusters
breathe yourselves away.  Now redden ye roses in your sorrow, and now wax
red ye wind-flowers, now thou hyacinth, whisper the letters on thee
graven, and add a deeper _ai ai_ to thy petals; he is dead, the beautiful
singer.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Ye nightingales that lament among the thick leaves of the trees, tell ye
to the Sicilian waters of Arethusa the tidings that Bion the herdsman is
dead, and that with Bion song too has died, and perished hath the Dorian
minstrelsy.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Ye Strymonian swans, sadly wail ye by the waters, and chant with
melancholy notes the dolorous song, even such a song as in his time with
voice like yours he was wont to sing.  And tell again to the Œagrian
maidens, tell to all the Nymphs Bistonian, how that he hath perished, the
Dorian Orpheus.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

No more to his herds he sings, that beloved herdsman, no more ’neath the
lonely oaks he sits and sings, nay, but by Pluteus’s side he chants a
refrain of oblivion.  The mountains too are voiceless: and the heifers
that wander by the bulls lament and refuse their pasture.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Thy sudden doom, O Bion, Apollo himself lamented, and the Satyrs mourned
thee, and the Priapi in sable raiment, and the Panes sorrow for thy song,
and the fountain fairies in the wood made moan, and their tears turned to
rivers of waters.  And Echo in the rocks laments that thou art silent,
and no more she mimics thy voice.  And in sorrow for thy fall the trees
cast down their fruit, and all the flowers have faded.  From the ewes
hath flowed no fair milk, nor honey from the hives, nay, it hath perished
for mere sorrow in the wax, for now hath thy honey perished, and no more
it behoves men to gather the honey of the bees.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Not so much did the dolphin mourn beside the sea-banks, nor ever sang so
sweet the nightingale on the cliffs, nor so much lamented the swallow on
the long ranges of the hills, nor shrilled so loud the halcyon o’er his
sorrows;

(_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.)

Nor so much, by the grey sea-waves, did ever the sea-bird sing, nor so
much in the dells of dawn did the bird of Memnon bewail the son of the
Morning, fluttering around his tomb, as they lamented for Bion dead.

Nightingales, and all the swallows that once he was wont to delight, that
he would teach to speak, they sat over against each other on the boughs
and kept moaning, and the birds sang in answer, ‘Wail, ye wretched ones,
even ye!’

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Who, ah who will ever make music on thy pipe, O thrice desired Bion, and
who will put his mouth to the reeds of thine instrument? who is so bold?

For still thy lips and still thy breath survive, and Echo, among the
reeds, doth still feed upon thy songs.  To Pan shall I bear the pipe?
Nay, perchance even he would fear to set his mouth to it, lest, after
thee, he should win but the second prize.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Yea, and Galatea laments thy song, she whom once thou wouldst delight, as
with thee she sat by the sea-banks.  For not like the Cyclops didst thou
sing—him fair Galatea ever fled, but on thee she still looked more kindly
than on the salt water.  And now hath she forgotten the wave, and sits on
the lonely sands, but still she keeps thy kine.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

All the gifts of the Muses, herdsman, have died with thee, the delightful
kisses of maidens, the lips of boys; and woful round thy tomb the loves
are weeping.  But Cypris loves thee far more than the kiss wherewith she
kissed the dying Adonis.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

This, O most musical of rivers, is thy second sorrow, this, Meles, thy
new woe.  Of old didst thou lose Homer, that sweet mouth of Calliope, and
men say thou didst bewail thy goodly son with streams of many tears, and
didst fill all the salt sea with the voice of thy lamentation—now again
another son thou weepest, and in a new sorrow art thou wasting away.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Both were beloved of the fountains, and one ever drank of the Pegasean
fount, but the other would drain a draught of Arethusa.  And the one sang
the fair daughter of Tyndarus, and the mighty son of Thetis, and Menelaus
Atreus’s son, but that other,—not of wars, not of tears, but of Pan,
would he sing, and of herdsmen would he chant, and so singing, he tended
the herds.  And pipes he would fashion, and would milk the sweet heifer,
and taught lads how to kiss, and Love he cherished in his bosom and woke
the passion of Aphrodite.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Every famous city laments thee, Bion, and all the towns.  Ascra laments
thee far more than her Hesiod, and Pindar is less regretted by the
forests of Boeotia.  Nor so much did pleasant Lesbos mourn for Alcaeus,
nor did the Teian town so greatly bewail her poet, while for thee more
than for Archilochus doth Paros yearn, and not for Sappho, but still for
thee doth Mytilene wail her musical lament;

                     [_Here seven verses are lost_.]

And in Syracuse Theocritus; but I sing thee the dirge of an Ausonian
sorrow, I that am no stranger to the pastoral song, but heir of the Doric
Muse which thou didst teach thy pupils.  This was thy gift to me; to
others didst thou leave thy wealth, to me thy minstrelsy.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Ah me, when the mallows wither in the garden, and the green parsley, and
the curled tendrils of the anise, on a later day they live again, and
spring in another year; but we men, we, the great and mighty, or wise,
when once we have died, in hollow earth we sleep, gone down into silence;
a right long, and endless, and unawakening sleep.  And thou too, in the
earth wilt be lapped in silence, but the nymphs have thought good that
the frog should eternally sing.  Nay, him I would not envy, for ’tis no
sweet song he singeth.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

Poison came, Bion, to thy mouth, thou didst know poison.  To such lips as
thine did it come, and was not sweetened?  What mortal was so cruel that
could mix poison for thee, or who could give thee the venom that heard
thy voice? surely he had no music in his soul.

_Begin_, _ye Sicilian Muses_, _begin the dirge_.

But justice hath overtaken them all.  Still for this sorrow I weep, and
bewail thy ruin.  But ah, if I might have gone down like Orpheus to
Tartarus, or as once Odysseus, or Alcides of yore, I too would speedily
have come to the house of Pluteus, that thee perchance I might behold,
and if thou singest to Pluteus, that I might hear what is thy song.  Nay,
sing to the Maiden some strain of Sicily, sing some sweet pastoral lay.

And she too is Sicilian, and on the shores by Aetna she was wont to play,
and she knew the Dorian strain.  Not unrewarded will the singing be; and
as once to Orpheus’s sweet minstrelsy she gave Eurydice to return with
him, even so will she send thee too, Bion, to the hills.  But if I, even
I, and my piping had aught availed, before Pluteus I too would have sung.



IDYL IV


_A sad dialogue between Megara the wife and Alcmena the mother of the
wandering Heracles_.  _Megara had seen her own children slain by her
lord_, _in his frenzy_, _while Alcmena was constantly disquieted by
ominous dreams_.

                                * * * * *

MY mother, wherefore art thou thus smitten in thy soul with exceeding
sorrow, and the rose is no longer firm in thy cheeks as of yore? why,
tell me, art thou thus disquieted?  Is it because thy glorious son is
suffering pains unnumbered in bondage to a man of naught, as it were a
lion in bondage to a fawn?  Woe is me, why, ah why have the immortal gods
thus brought on me so great dishonour, and wherefore did my parents get
me for so ill a doom?  Wretched woman that I am, who came to the bed of a
man without reproach and ever held him honourable and dear as mine own
eyes,—ay and still worship and hold him sacred in my heart—yet none other
of men living hath had more evil hap or tasted in his soul so many
griefs.  In madness once, with the bow Apollo’s self had given him—dread
weapon of some Fury or spirit of Death—he struck down his own children,
and took their dear life away, as his frenzy raged through the house till
it swam in blood.  With mine own eyes, I saw them smitten, woe is me, by
their father’s arrows—a thing none else hath suffered even in dreams.
Nor could I aid them as they cried ever on their mother; the evil that
was upon them was past help.  As a bird mourneth for her perishing little
ones, devoured in the thicket by some terrible serpent while as yet they
are fledglings, and the kind mother flutters round them making most
shrill lament, but cannot help her nestlings, yea, and herself hath great
fear to approach the cruel monster; so I unhappy mother, wailing for my
brood, with frenzied feet went wandering through the house.  Would that
by my children’s side I had died myself, and were lying with the
envenomed arrow through my heart.  Would that this had been, O Artemis,
thou that art queen chief of power to womankind.  Then would our parents
have embraced and wept for us and with ample obsequies have laid us on
one common pyre, and have gathered the bones of all of us into one golden
urn, and buried them in the place where first we came to be.  But now
they dwell in Thebes, fair nurse of youth, ploughing the deep soil of the
Aonian plain, while I in Tiryns, rocky city of Hera, am ever thus wounded
at heart with many sorrows, nor is any respite to me from tears.  My
husband I behold but a little time in our house, for he hath many labours
at his hand, whereat he laboureth in wanderings by land and sea, with his
soul strong as rock or steel within his breast.  But thy grief is as the
running waters, as thou lamentest through the nights and all the days of
Zeus.

Nor is there any one of my kinsfolk nigh at hand to cheer me: for it is
not the house wall that severs them, but they all dwell far beyond the
pine-clad Isthmus, nor is there any to whom, as a woman all hapless, I
may look up and refresh my heart, save only my sister Pyrrha; nay, but
she herself grieves yet more for her husband Iphicles thy son: for
methinks ’tis thou that hast borne the most luckless children of all, to
a God, and a mortal man. {205}

Thus spake she, and ever warmer the tears were pouring from her eyes into
her sweet bosom, as she bethought her of her children and next of her own
parents.  And in like manner Alcmena bedewed her pale cheeks with tears,
and deeply sighing from her very heart she thus bespoke her dear daughter
with thick-coming words:

‘Dear child, what is this that hath come into the thoughts of thy heart?
How art thou fain to disquiet us both with the tale of griefs that cannot
be forgotten?  Not for the first time are these woes wept for now.  Are
they not enough, the woes that possess us from our birth continually to
our day of death?  In love with sorrow surely would he be that should
have the heart to count up our woes; such destiny have we received from
God.  Thyself, dear child, I behold vext by endless pains, and thy grief
I can pardon, yea, for even of joy there is satiety.  And exceedingly do
I mourn over and pity thee, for that thou hast partaken of our cruel lot,
the burden whereof is hung above our heads.  For so witness Persephone
and fair-robed Demeter (by whom the enemy that wilfully forswears
himself, lies to his own hurt), that I love thee no less in my heart than
if thou hadst been born of my womb, and wert the maiden darling of my
house: nay, and methinks that thou knowest this well.  Therefore say
never, my flower, that I heed thee not, not even though I wail more
ceaselessly than Niobe of the lovely locks.  No shame it is for a mother
to make moan for the affliction of her son: for ten months I went
heavily, even before I saw him, while I bare him under my girdle, and he
brought me near the gates of the warden of Hell; so fierce the pangs I
endured in my sore travail of him.  And now my son is gone from me in a
strange land to accomplish some new labour; nor know I in my sorrow
whether I shall again receive him returning here or no.  Moreover in
sweet sleep a dreadful dream hath fluttered me; and I exceedingly fear
for the ill-omened vision that I have seen, lest something that I would
not be coming on my children.

It seemed to me that my son, the might of Heracles, held in both hands a
well-wrought spade, wherewith, as one labouring for hire, he was digging
a ditch at the edge of a fruitful field, stripped of his cloak and belted
tunic.  And when he had come to the end of all his work and his labours
at the stout defence of the vine-filled close, he was about to lean his
shovel against the upstanding mound and don the clothes he had worn.  But
suddenly blazed up above the deep trench a quenchless fire, and a
marvellous great flame encompassed him.  But he kept ever giving back
with hurried feet, striving to flee the deadly bolt of Hephaestus; and
ever before his body he kept his spade as it were a shield; and this way
and that he glared around him with his eyes, lest the angry fire should
consume him.  Then brave Iphicles, eager, methought, to help him,
stumbled and fell to earth ere he might reach him, nor could he stand
upright again, but lay helpless, like a weak old man, whom joyless age
constrains to fall when he would not; so he lieth on the ground as he
fell, till one passing by lift him up by the hand, regarding the ancient
reverence for his hoary beard.  Thus lay on the earth Iphicles, wielder
of the shield.  But I kept wailing as I beheld my sons in their sore
plight, until deep sleep quite fled from my eyes, and straightway came
bright morn.  Such dreams, beloved, flitted through my mind all night;
may they all turn against Eurystheus nor come nigh our dwelling, and to
his hurt be my soul prophetic, nor may fate bring aught otherwise to
pass.



IDYL V


WHEN the wind on the grey salt sea blows softly, then my weary spirits
rise, and the land no longer pleases me, and far more doth the calm
allure me. {208}  But when the hoary deep is roaring, and the sea is
broken up in foam, and the waves rage high, then lift I mine eyes unto
the earth and trees, and fly the sea, and the land is welcome, and the
shady wood well pleasing in my sight, where even if the wind blow high
the pine-tree sings her song.  Surely an evil life lives the fisherman,
whose home is his ship, and his labours are in the sea, and fishes
thereof are his wandering spoil.  Nay, sweet to me is sleep beneath the
broad-leaved plane-tree; let me love to listen to the murmur of the brook
hard by, soothing, not troubling the husbandman with its sound.



IDYL VI


   PAN loved his neighbour Echo; Echo loved
   A gamesome Satyr; he, by her unmoved,
   Loved only Lyde; thus through Echo, Pan,
   Lyde, and Satyr, Love his circle ran.
   Thus all, while their true lovers’ hearts they grieved,
   Were scorned in turn, and what they gave received.
   O all Love’s scorners, learn this lesson true;
   Be kind to Love, that he be kind to you.



IDYL VII


ALPHEUS, when he leaves Pisa and makes his way through beneath the deep,
travels on to Arethusa with his waters that the wild olives drank,
bearing her bridal gifts, fair leaves and flowers and sacred soil.  Deep
in the waves he plunges, and runs beneath the sea, and the salt water
mingles not with the sweet.  Nought knows the sea as the river journeys
through.  Thus hath the knavish boy, the maker of mischief, the teacher
of strange ways—thus hath Love by his spell taught even a river to dive.



IDYL VIII


   LEAVING his torch and his arrows, a wallet strung on his back,
   One day came the mischievous Love-god to follow the plough-share’s
   track:
   And he chose him a staff for his driving, and yoked him a sturdy
   steer,
   And sowed in the furrows the grain to the Mother of Earth most dear.
   Then he said, looking up to the sky: ‘Father Zeus, to my harvest be
   good,
   Lest I yoke that bull to my plough that Europa once rode through the
   flood!’



IDYL IX


   WOULD that my father had taught me the craft of a keeper of sheep,
   For so in the shade of the elm-tree, or under the rocks on the steep,
   Piping on reeds I had sat, and had lulled my sorrow to sleep. {210}




FOOTNOTES


{0a}  This fragment is from the collection of M. Fauriel; _Chants
Populaires de le Grèce_.

{0b}  _Empedocles on Etna_.

{0c}  Ballet des Arts, dansé par sa Majesté; le 8 janvier, 1663.  A
Paris, par Robert Ballard, MDCLXIII.

{0d}  These and the following ditties are from the modern Greek ballads
collected by MM. Fauriel and Legrand.

{0e}  See Couat, _La Poesie Alexandrine_, p. 68 _et seq._, Paris 1882.

{0f}  See Couat, _op. cit._ p. 395.

{0g}  Couat, p. 434.

{0h}  See Helbig, _Campenische Wandmalerie_, and Brunn, _Die griechischen
Bukoliker und die Bildende Kunst_.

{0i}  The _Hecale_ of Callimachus, or Theseus and the Marathonian Bull,
seems to have been rather a heroic idyl than an epic.

{6}  Or reading Αίολικόν=Aeolian, cf. Thucyd. iii. 102.

{9}  These are places famous in the oldest legends of Arcadia.

{11}  Reading, καταδήσομαι.  Cf.  Fritzsche’s note and Harpocration, s.v.

{13}  On the word ραμβος, see Lobeck, _Aglaoph._ p. 700; and ‘The Bull
Roarer,’ in the translator’s _Custom and Myth_.

{19}  Reading καταδήσομαι.  Cf. line 3, and note.

{21}  He refers to a piece of folk-lore.

{24}  The shovel was used for tossing the sand of the lists; the sheep
were food for Aegon’s great appetite.

{26}  Reading έρίσδεις.

{34}  Melanthius was the treacherous goatherd put to a cruel death by
Odysseus.

{36}  Ameis and Fritzsche take νιν (as here) to be the dog, not Galatea.
The sex of the Cyclops’s sheep-dog makes the meaning obscure.

{40}  Or, δόμον Ώρομέδοντος.  Hermann renders this _domum Oromedonteam_ a
gigantic house.’  Oromedon or Eurymedon was the king of the Gigantes,
mentioned in Odyssey vii. 58.

{41}  έσχατα.  This is taken by some to mean _algam infimam_, ‘the bottom
weeds of the deepest seas’, by others, the sea-weed highest on the shore,
at high watermark.

{42}  Comatas was a goatherd who devoutly served the Muses, and
sacrificed to them his masters goats.  His master therefore shut him up
in a cedar chest, opening which at the year’s end he found Comatas alive,
by miracle, the bees having fed him with honey.  Thus, in a mediaeval
legend, the Blessed Virgin took the place, for a year, of the frail nun
who had devoutly served her.

{43}  Sneezing in Sicily, as in most countries, was a happy omen.

{50}  A superfluous and apocryphal line is here omitted.

{53}  An allusion to the common superstition (cf. Idyl xii. 24) that
perjurers and liars were punished by pimples and blotches.  The old Irish
held that blotches showed themselves on the faces of Brehons who gave
unjust judgments.

{54}  Spring in the south, like Night in the tropics, comes ‘at one
stride’; but Wordsworth finds the rendering distasteful ‘neque sic
redditum valde placet.’

{57}  ‘Quant à ta manière, je ne puis la rendre.’—SAINTE-BEUVE.

{61}  Reading μηνοφόρως.

{70}  Cf. Wordsworth’s proposed conjecture—

    μετάρσι’, έτων παρεόντων.

Meineke observes ‘tota haec carminis pars luxata et foedissime depravata
est’.  There seems to be a rude early pun in lines 73, 74.

{72}  The reading—

ού φθεγξη; λύκον εΐδες; επαιξέ τις, ως σοφός, εΐπε,—makes good sense.  ως
σοφός is put in the mouth of the girl, and would mean ‘a good guess’!
The allusion of a guest to the superstition that the wolf struck people
dumb is taken by Cynisca for a reference to young Wolf, her secret lover.

{73}  Or, as Wordsworth suggests, reading δάκρυσι, ‘for him your cheeks
are wet with tears.’

{74a}  Shaving in the bronze, and still more, of course, in the stone
age, was an uncomfortable and difficult process.  The backward and
barbarous Thracians were therefore trimmed in the roughest way, like
Aeschines, with his long gnawed moustache.

{74b}  The Megarians having inquired of the Delphic oracle as to their
rank among Greek cities, were told that they were absolute last, and not
in the reckoning at all.

{77}  Our Lady, here, is Persephone.  The ejaculation served for the old
as well as for the new religion of Sicily.  The dialogue is here arranged
as in Fritzsche’s text, and in line 8 his punctuation is followed.

{78a}  If cats are meant, the proverb is probably Alexandrian.  Common as
cats were in Egypt, they were late comers in Greece.

{78b}  Most of the dialogue has been distributed as in the text of
Fritzsche.

{82}  Reading πέρυσιν.

{89}  _I.e._ Syracuse, a colony of the Ephyraeans or Corinthians.  The
Maiden is Persephone, the Mother Demeter.

{93}  Deipyle, daughter of Adrastus.

{98}  Reading—πιείρα ατε λαον ανέδραμε κόσμος αρούρα.  See also
Wordsworth’s note on line 26.

{104}  For αδέα Wordsworth and Hermann conjecture Ἄρεα.  The sense would
be that Eunica, who thinks herself another Cypris, or Aphrodite is, in
turn, to be rejected by her Ares, her soldier-lover, as she has rejected
the herdsman.

{105}  Reading επιμύσσησι.

{106a}  Reading τα φυκιοέντα τε λαίφη.

{106b}  κώπα.

{106c}  ουδος δ’ ουχι θύραν εΐχ’, and in the next line ά γαρ πενία σφας
ετήρει.

{106d}  αυδάν.

{107}  Reading, with Fritzsche—

    αλλ’ όνος εν ράμνω, το τε λύχνιον εν πρυτανείω

    φαντι γαρ αγρυπνίαν τόδ’ εχειν

The lines seem to contain two popular saws, of which it is difficult to
guess the meaning.  The first saw appears to express helplessness; the
second, to hint that such comforts as lamps lit all night long exist in
towns, but are out of the reach of poor fishermen.

{108a}  Reading ηρέμ’ ενυξα και νύξας εχάλαξα.  Asphalion first hooked
his fish, which ran gamely, and nearly doubled up the rod.  Then the fish
sulked, and the angler half despaired of landing him.  To stir the sullen
fish, he reminded him of his wound, probably, as we do now, by keeping a
tight line, and tapping the butt of the rod.  Then he slackened, giving
the fish line in case of a sudden rush; but as there was no such rush, he
took in line, or perhaps only showed his fish the butt (for it is not
probable that Asphalion had a reel), and so landed him.  The
Mediterranean fishers generally toss the fish to land with no display of
science, but Asphalion’s imaginary capture was a monster.

{108b}  It is difficult to understand this proceeding.  Perhaps Asphalion
had some small net fastened with strings to his boat, in which he towed
fish to shore, that the contact with the water might keep them fresher
than they were likely to be in the bottom of the coble.  On the other
hand, Asphalion was fishing from a rock.  His dream may have been
confused.

{111}  πυρεΐα appear to have been ‘fire sticks,’ by rubbing which
together the heroes struck a light.

{118}  Or εγχεα λοΰσαι, ‘wash the spears,’ as in the Zulu idiom.

{124}  In line 57 for τηλε read Wordsworth’s conjecture τηδε = ενταΰθα.

{127}  Odyssey. xix. 36 seq.  (Reading απερ not ατερ.)  ‘Father, surely a
great marvel is this that I behold with mine eyes meseems, at least, that
the walls of the hall . . . are bright as it were with flaming fire’ . . .
‘Lo! this is the wont of the gods that hold Olympus.’

{128}  ξηρον, _prae timore non lacrymantem_ (Paley).

{129}  Reading, after Fritzsche, ρωγάδος εκ πέτρας.  We should have
expected the accursed ashes (like those of Wyclif) to be thrown _into_
the river; cf. Virgil, Ecl. viii. 101, ‘Fer cineres, Amarylli, foras,
rivoque fluenti transque caput lace nec respexeris.’  Virgil’s knowledge
of these observances was not inferior to that of Theocritus.

{130}  Reading εστεμμένω.  If εστεμμνον is read, the phrase will mean
‘pure brimming water.’

{135}  Reading οσσον.

{143}  Reading αλλη, as in Wordsworth’s conjecture, instead of υλη.

{144}  Reading ποπανεύματα.

{145}  Πένθημα και ου πενθηα, a play on words difficult to retain in
English.  Compare Idyl xiii. line 74.

{147}  The conjecture εμα δ’ gives a good sense, _mea vero Helena me
potius ultra petit_.

{148}  Reading, as in Wordsworth’s conjecture, μη ’πιβάλης ταν χεΐρα, και
ει γ’ ετι χεΐλος, αμύξω.

{150a}  Reading οΐδ’, ακρατιμίη εσσι, with Fritzsche.  Compare the
conjecture of Wordsworth, Ὀύδ’ ακρα τι μη εσσι.

{150b}  See Wordsworth’s explanation.

{153}  Syracuse.

{165}  Reading, πεδοικισται (that is, the Corinthian founders of
Syracuse), and following Wordsworth’s other conjectures.

{167}  This epigram may have been added by the first editor of
Theocritus, Artemidorus the Grammarian.

{176}  This conjecture of Meineke’s offers, at least, a meaning.

{181}  _Les hommes sont tous condamnés à mort_, _avec des sursis
indéfinis_.—VICTOR HUGO.

{205}  Alcmena bore Iphicles to Amphictyon, Hercules to Zeus.

{208}  Reading, with Weise, ποτάγει δε πολυ πλεον αμμε γαλάνα.

{210}  For the translations into verse I have to thank Mr. Ernest Myers.




***END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THEOCRITUS, BION AND MOSCHUS***


******* This file should be named 4775-0.txt or 4775-0.zip *******


This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
http://www.gutenberg.org/dirs/4/7/7/4775



Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
  www.gutenberg.org/license.


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at 809
North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887.  Email
contact links and up to date contact information can be found at the
Foundation's web site and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit:  www.gutenberg.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For forty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg EBook of "De Bello Gallico" and Other Commentaries
by Caius Julius Caesar

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: "De Bello Gallico" and Other Commentaries

Author: Caius Julius Caesar

Release Date: January 9, 2004 [EBook #10657]
[Date last updated: January 23, 2006]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DE BELLO GALLICO ***




Produced by Stan Goodman, Ted Garvin, Carol David and PG Distributed
Proofreaders





[Transcriber's Note:

Typographical errors in the original have been corrected and noted
using the notation ** .

Macrons, breves, umlauts etc have been removed from the body of the text
since they were very obtrusive and made reading difficult. However, they
are retained in the Index for reference.

The convention used for these marks is:
Macron (straight line over letter)  [=x]
Umlaut (2 dots over letter)         [:x]
Grave accent                        [`x]
Acute accent                        ['x]
Circumflex                          [^x]
Breve (u-shaped symbol over letter) [)x]
Cedilla                             [,x]
]

       *       *       *       *       *




EVERYMAN'S LIBRARY

EDITED BY ERNEST RHYS


CLASSICAL



CAESAR'S COMMENTARIES

TRANSLATED BY W. A. MACDEVITT

WITH AN INTRODUCTION BY

THOMAS DE QUINCEY


THIS IS NO. 702 OF _EVERYMAN'S LIBRARY_. THE PUBLISHERS WILL BE PLEASED
TO SEND FREELY TO ALL APPLICANTS A LIST OF THE PUBLISHED AND PROJECTED
VOLUMES ARRANGED UNDER THE FOLLOWING SECTIONS:

       *       *       *       *       *

TRAVEL--SCIENCE--FICTION

THEOLOGY & PHILOSOPHY

HISTORY--CLASSICAL

FOR YOUNG PEOPLE

ESSAYS--ORATORY

POETRY & DRAMA

BIOGRAPHY

REFERENCE

ROMANCE

       *       *       *       *       *

THE ORDINARY EDITION IS BOUND IN CLOTH WITH GILT DESIGN AND COLOURED
TOP. THERE IS ALSO A LIBRARY EDITION IN REINFORCED CLOTH




THE SAGES OF OLD LIVE AGAIN IN US

GLANVILL





"DE BELLO GALLICO" & OTHER COMMENTARIES:
OF CAIUS JULIUS CAESAR


FIRST PUBLISHED IN THIS EDITION, 1915
REPRINTED 1923, 1929



INTRODUCTION

BY THOMAS DE QUINCEY

The character of the First Caesar has perhaps never been worse
appreciated than by him who in one sense described it best; that is,
with most force and eloquence wherever he really _did_ comprehend it.
This was Lucan, who has nowhere exhibited more brilliant rhetoric, nor
wandered more from the truth, than in the contrasted portraits of Caesar
and Pompey. The famous line, _"Nil actum reputans si quid superesset
agendum,"_ is a fine feature of the real character, finely expressed.
But, if it had been Lucan's purpose (as possibly, with a view to
Pompey's benefit, in some respects it was) utterly and extravagantly to
falsify the character of the great Dictator, by no single trait could he
more effectually have fulfilled that purpose, nor in fewer words, than
by this expressive passage, _"Gaudensque viam fecisse ruina."_ Such a
trait would be almost extravagant applied even to Marius, who (though in
many respects a perfect model of Roman grandeur, massy, columnar,
imperturbable, and more perhaps than any one man recorded in History
capable of justifying the bold illustration of that character in Horace,
"_Si fractus illabatur orbis, impavidum ferient ruinae_") had, however,
a ferocity in his character, and a touch of the devil in him, very
rarely united with the same tranquil intrepidity. But, for Caesar, the
all-accomplished statesman, the splendid orator, the man of elegant
habits and polished taste, the patron of the fine arts in a degree
transcending all example of his own or the previous age, and as a man of
general literature so much beyond his contemporaries, except Cicero,
that he looked down even upon the brilliant Sylla as an illiterate
person--to class such a man with the race of furious destroyers exulting
in the desolations they spread is to err not by an individual trait, but
by the whole genus. The Attilas and the Tamerlanes, who rejoice in
avowing themselves the scourges of God, and the special instruments of
his wrath, have no one feature of affinity to the polished and humane
Caesar, and would as little have comprehended his character as he could
have respected theirs. Even Cato, the unworthy hero of Lucan, might have
suggested to him a little more truth in this instance, by a celebrated
remark which he made on the characteristic distinction of Caesar, in
comparison with other revolutionary disturbers; for, said he, whereas
others had attempted the overthrow of the state in a continued paroxysm
of fury, and in a state of mind resembling the lunacy of intoxication,
Caesar, on the contrary, among that whole class of civil disturbers, was
the only one who had come to the task in a temper of sobriety and
moderation _(unum accessisse sobrium ad rempublicam delendam)_....

Great as Caesar was by the benefit of his original nature, there can be
no doubt that he, like others, owed something to circumstances; and
perhaps amongst those which were most favourable to the premature
development of great self-dependence we must reckon the early death of
his father. It is, or it is not, according to the nature of men, an
advantage to be orphaned at as early age. Perhaps utter orphanage is
rarely or never such: but to lose a father betimes may, under
appropriate circumstances, profit a strong mind greatly. To Caesar it
was a prodigious benefit that he lost his father when not much more than
fifteen. Perhaps it was an advantage also to his father that he died
thus early. Had he stayed a year longer, he might have seen himself
despised, baffled, and made ridiculous. For where, let us ask, in any
age, was the father capable of adequately sustaining that relation to
the unique Caius Julius--to him, in the appropriate language of
Shakespeare

  "The foremost man of all this world?"

And, in this fine and Caesarean line, "this world" is to be understood
not of the order of co-existences merely,` but also of the order of
successions; he was the foremost man not only of his contemporaries, but
also, within his own intellectual class, of men generally--of all that
ever should come after him, or should sit on thrones under the
denominations of Czars, Kesars, or Caesars of the Bosphorus and the
Danube; of all in every age that should inherit his supremacy of mind,
or should subject to themselves the generations of ordinary men by
qualities analogous to his. Of this infinite superiority some part must
be ascribed to his early emancipation from paternal control. There are
very many cases in which, simply from considerations of sex, a female
cannot stand forward as the head of a family, or as its suitable
representative. If they are even ladies paramount, and in situations of
command, they are also women. The staff of authority does not annihilate
their sex; and scruples of female delicacy interfere for ever to unnerve
and emasculate in their hands the sceptre however otherwise potent.
Hence we see, in noble families, the merest boys put forward to
represent the family dignity, as fitter supporters of that burden than
their mature mothers. And of Caesar's mother, though little is recorded,
and that little incidentally, this much at least we learn--that, if she
looked down upon him with maternal pride and delight, she looked up to
him with female ambition as the re-edifier of her husband's honours,--
looked with reverence as to a column of the Roman grandeur and with fear
and feminine anxieties as to one whose aspiring spirit carried him but
too prematurely into the fields of adventurous strife. One slight and
evanescent sketch of the relations which subsisted between Caesar and
his mother, caught from the wrecks of time, is preserved both by
Plutarch and Suetonius. We see in the early dawn the young patrician
standing upon the steps of his patrimonial portico, his mother with her
arms wreathed about his neck, looking up to his noble countenance,
sometimes drawing auguries of hope from features so fitted for command,
sometimes boding an early blight to promises so dangerously magnificent.
That she had something of her son's aspiring character, or that he
presumed so much in a mother of his, we learn from the few words which
survive of their conversation. He addressed to her no language that
could tranquillise her fears. On the contrary, to any but a Roman mother
his valedictory words, taken in connexion with the known determination
of his character, were of a nature to consummate her depression, as they
tended to confirm the very worst of her fears. He was then going to
stand his chance in a popular electioneering contest for an office of
the highest dignity, and to launch himself upon the storms of the Campus
Martius. At that period, besides other and more ordinary dangers, the
bands of gladiators, kept in the pay of the more ambitious or turbulent
amongst the Roman nobles, gave a popular tone of ferocity and of
personal risk to the course of such contests; and, either to forestall
the victory of an antagonist, or to avenge their own defeat, it was not
at all impossible that a body of incensed competitors might intercept
his final triumph by assassination. For this danger, however, he had no
leisure in his thoughts of consolation; the sole danger which _he_
contemplated, or supposed his mother to contemplate, was the danger of
defeat, and for that he reserved his consolations. He bade her fear
nothing; for that his determination was to return with victory, and with
the ensigns of the dignity he sought, or to return a corpse.

Early indeed did Caesar's trials commence; and it is probable, that, had
not the death of his father, by throwing him prematurely upon his own
resources, prematurely developed the masculine features of his
character, forcing him whilst yet a boy under the discipline of civil
conflict and the yoke of practical life, even _his_ energies might have
been insufficient to sustain them. His age is not exactly ascertained;
but it is past a doubt that he had not reached his twentieth year when
he had the hardihood to engage in a struggle with Sylla, then Dictator,
and exercising the immoderate powers of that office with the licence and
the severity which History has made so memorable. He had neither any
distinct grounds of hope, nor any eminent example at that time, to
countenance him in this struggle--which yet he pushed on in the most
uncompromising style, and to the utmost verge of defiance. The subject
of the contest gives it a further interest. It was the youthful wife of
the youthful Caesar who stood under the shadow of the great Dictator's
displeasure; not personally, but politically, on account of her
connexions: and her it was, Cornelia, the daughter of a man who had been
four times consul, that Caesar was required to divorce: but he spurned
the haughty mandate, and carried his determination to a triumphant
issue, notwithstanding his life was at stake, and at one time saved only
by shifting his place of concealment every night; and this young lady it
was who afterwards became the mother of his only daughter. Both mother
and daughter, it is remarkable, perished prematurely, and at critical
periods of Caesar's life; for it is probable enough that these
irreparable wounds to Caesar's domestic affections threw him with more
exclusiveness of devotion upon the fascinations of glory and ambition
than might have happened under a happier condition of his private life.
That Caesar should have escaped destruction in this unequal contest with
an enemy then wielding the whole thunders of the state, is somewhat
surprising; and historians have sought their solution of the mystery in
the powerful intercessions of the vestal virgins, and several others of
high rank amongst the connexions of his great house. These may have done
something; but it is due to Sylla, who had a sympathy with everything
truly noble, to suppose him struck with powerful admiration for the
audacity of the young patrician, standing out in such severe solitude
among so many examples of timid concession; and that to this magnanimous
feeling in the Dictator much of the indulgence which he showed may have
been really due. In fact, according to some accounts, it was not Sylla,
but the creatures of Sylla (_adjutores_), who pursued Caesar. We know,
at all events, that Sylla formed a right estimate of Caesar's character,
and that, from the complexion of his conduct in this one instance, he
drew that famous prophecy of his future destiny; bidding his friends
beware of that slipshod boy, "for that in him lay couchant many a
Marius." A grander testimony to the awe which Caesar inspired, or from
one who knew better the qualities of that Cyclopean man by whose scale
he measured the patrician boy, cannot be imagined.

It is not our intention, or consistent with our plan, to pursue this
great man through the whole circumstances of his romantic career; though
it is certain that many parts of his life require investigation much
keener than has ever been applied to them, and that many might be placed
in a new light. Indeed, the whole of this most momentous section of
ancient history ought to be recomposed with the critical scepticism of a
Niebuhr, and the same comprehensive collation, resting, if possible, on
the felicitous interpretation of authorities. In reality it is the hinge
upon which turned the future destiny of the whole earth, and, having
therefore a common relation to all modern nations whatsoever, should
naturally have been cultivated with the zeal which belongs to a personal
concern. In general, the anecdotes which express most vividly the
grandeur of character in the first Caesar are those which illustrate his
defiance of danger in extremity: the prodigious energy and rapidity of
his decisions and motions in the field (looking to which it was that
Cicero called him [Greek: teras] or portentous revelation); the skill
with which he penetrated the designs of his enemies, and the electric
speed with which he met disasters with remedy and reparation, or, where
that was impossible, with relief; the extraordinary presence of mind
which he showed in turning adverse omens to his own advantage, as when,
upon stumbling in coming on shore (which was esteemed a capital omen of
evil), he transfigured as it were in one instant its whole meaning by
exclaiming, "Thus, and by this contact with the earth, do I take
possession of thee, O Africa!" in that way giving to an accident the
semblance of a symbolic purpose. Equally conspicuous was the grandeur of
fortitude with which he faced the whole extent of a calamity when
palliation could do no good, "non negando, minuendove, sed insuper
amplificando, _ementiendoque_"; as when, upon finding his soldiery
alarmed at the approach of Juba, with forces really great, but
exaggerated by their terrors, he addressed them in a military harangue
to the following effect:--"Know that within a few days the king will
come up with us, bringing with him sixty thousand legionaries, thirty
thousand cavalry, one hundred thousand light troops, besides three
hundred elephants. Such being the case, let me hear no more of
conjectures and opinions, for you have now my warrant for the fact,
whose information is past doubting. Therefore, be satisfied; otherwise,
I will put every man of you on board some crazy old fleet, and whistle
you down the tide--no matter under what winds, no matter towards what
shore." Finally, we might seek for _characteristic_ anecdotes of Caesar
in his unexampled liberalities and contempt of money.

Upon this last topic it is the just remark of Casaubon that some
instances of Caesar's munificence have been thought apocryphal, or to
rest upon false readings, simply from ignorance of the heroic scale upon
which the Roman splendours of that age proceeded. A forum which Caesar
built out of the products of his last campaign, by way of a present to
the Roman people, cost him--for the ground merely on which it stood--
nearly eight hundred thousand pounds. To the citizens of Rome he
presented, in one _congiary_, about two guineas and a half a head. To
his army, in one _donation_, upon the termination of the Civil War, he
gave a sum which allowed about two hundred pounds a man to the infantry,
and four hundred to the cavalry. It is true that the legionary troops
were then much reduced by the sword of the enemy, and by the tremendous
hardships of their last campaigns. In this, however, he did perhaps no
more than repay a debt. For it is an instance of military attachment,
beyond all that Wallenstein or any commander, the most beloved amongst
his troops, has ever experienced, that, on the breaking out of the Civil
War, not only did the centurions of every legion severally maintain a
horse soldier, but even the privates volunteered to serve without pay,
and (what might seem impossible) without their daily rations. This was
accomplished by subscriptions amongst themselves, the more opulent
undertaking for the maintenance of the needy. Their disinterested love
for Caesar appeared in another and more difficult illustration: it was a
traditionary anecdote in Rome that the majority of those amongst
Caesar's troops who had the misfortune to fall into the enemy's hands
refused to accept their lives under the condition of serving against
_him_.

In connexion with this subject of his extraordinary munificence, there
is one aspect of Caesar's life which has suffered much from the
misrepresentations of historians, and that is--the vast pecuniary
embarrassments under which he laboured, until the profits of war had
turned the scale even more prodigiously in his favour. At one time of
his life, when appointed to a foreign office, so numerous and so
clamorous were his creditors that he could not have left Rome on his
public duties had not Crassus come forward with assistance in money, or
by guarantees, to the amount of nearly two hundred thousand pounds. And
at another he was accustomed to amuse himself with computing how much
money it would require to make him worth exactly nothing (_i.e._ simply
to clear him of debts); this, by one account, amounted to upwards of two
millions sterling. Now, the error of historians has been to represent
these debts as the original ground of his ambition and his revolutionary
projects, as though the desperate condition of his private affairs had
suggested a civil war to his calculations as the best or only mode of
redressing it. Such a policy would have resembled the last desperate
resource of an unprincipled gambler, who, on seeing his final game at
chess, and the accumulated stakes depending upon it, all on the brink of
irretrievable sacrifice, dexterously upsets the chess-board, or
extinguishes the lights. But Julius, the one sole patriot of Rome, could
find no advantage to his plans in darkness or in confusion. Honestly
supported, he would have crushed the oligarchies of Rome by crushing in
its lairs that venal and hunger-bitten democracy which made oligarchy
and its machineries resistless. Caesar's debts, far from being
stimulants and exciting causes of his political ambition, stood in an
inverse relation to the ambition; they were its results, and represented
its natural costs, being contracted from first to last in the service of
his political intrigues, for raising and maintaining a powerful body of
partisans, both in Rome and elsewhere. Whosoever indeed will take the
trouble to investigate the progress of Caesar's ambition, from such
materials as even yet remain, may satisfy himself that the scheme of
revolutionizing the Republic, and placing himself at its head, was no
growth of accident or circumstances; above all, that it did not arise
upon any so petty and indirect a suggestion as that of his debts; but
that his debts were in their very first origin purely ministerial to his
wise, indispensable, and patriotic ambition; and that his revolutionary
plans were at all periods of his life a direct and foremost object, but
in no case bottomed upon casual impulses. In this there was not only
patriotism, but in fact the one sole mode of patriotism which could have
prospered, or could have found a field of action.

Chatter not, sublime reader, commonplaces of scoundrel moralists against
ambition. In some cases ambition is a hopeful virtue; in others (as in
the Rome of our resplendent Julius) ambition was the virtue by which any
other could flourish. It had become evident to everybody that Rome,
under its present constitution, must fall; and the sole question was--by
whom? Even Pompey, not by nature of an aspiring turn, and prompted to
his ambitious course undoubtedly by circumstances and, the friends who
besieged him, was in the habit of saying, "Sylla potuit: ego non
potero?" _Sylla found it possible: shall I find it not so?_ Possible to
do what? To overthrow the political system of the Republic. This had
silently collapsed into an order of things so vicious, growing also so
hopelessly worse, that all honest patriots invoked a purifying
revolution, even though bought at the heavy price of a tyranny, rather
than face the chaos of murderous distractions to which the tide of feuds
and frenzies was violently tending.

Such a revolution at such a price was not less Pompey's object than
Caesar's. In a case, therefore, where no benefit of choice was allowed
to Rome as respected the thing, but only as respected the person, Caesar
had the same right to enter the arena in the character of combatant as
could belong to any one of his rivals. And that he _did_ enter that
arena constructively, and by secret design, from his very earliest
manhood, may be gathered from this--that he suffered no openings towards
a revolution, provided they had any hope in them, to escape his
participation. It is familiarly known that he was engaged pretty deeply
in the conspiracy of Catiline, and that he incurred considerable risk on
that occasion; but it is less known that he was a party to at least two
other conspiracies. There was even a fourth, meditated by Crassus, which
Caesar so far encouraged as to undertake a journey to Rome from a very
distant quarter merely with a view to such chances as it might offer to
him; but, as it did not, upon examination, seem to him a very promising
scheme, he judged it best to look coldly upon it, or not to embark in it
by any personal co-operation. Upon these and other facts we build our
inference--that the scheme of a revolution was the one great purpose of
Caesar from his first entrance upon public life. Nor does it appear that
he cared much by whom it was undertaken, provided only there seemed to
be any sufficient resources for carrying it through, and for sustaining
the first collision with the regular forces of the existing oligarchies,
taking or _not_ taking the shape of triumvirates. He relied, it seems,
on his own personal superiority for raising him to the head of affairs
eventually, let who would take the nominal lead at first.

To the same result, it will be found, tended the vast stream of Caesar's
liberalities. From the senator downwards to the lowest _faex Romuli_, he
had a hired body of dependents, both in and out of Rome, equal in
numbers to a nation. In the provinces, and in distant kingdoms, he
pursued the same schemes. Everywhere he had a body of mercenary
partisans; kings even are known to have taken his pay. And it is
remarkable that even in his character of commander-in-chief, where the
number of legions allowed to him for the accomplishment of his Gaulish
mission raised him for a number of years above all fear of coercion or
control, he persevered steadily in the same plan of providing for the
distant day when he might need assistance, not _from_ the state, but
_against_ the state. For, amongst the private anecdotes which came to
light under the researches made into his history after his death, was
this--that, soon after his first entrance upon his government in Gaul,
he had raised, equipped, disciplined, and maintained, from his own
private funds, a legion amounting, possibly, to six or seven thousand
men, who were bound to no sacrament of military obedience to the state,
nor owed fealty to any auspices except those of Caesar. This legion,
from the fashion of their crested helmets, which resembled the heads of
a small aspiring bird, received the popular name of the _Alauda_ (or
Lark) legion. And very singular it was that Cato, or Marcellus, or some
amongst those enemies of Caesar who watched his conduct during the
period of his Gaulish command with the vigilance of rancorous malice,
should not have come to the knowledge of this fact; in which case we may
be sure that it would have been denounced to the Senate.

Such, then, for its purpose and its uniform motive, was the sagacious
munificence of Caesar. Apart from this motive, and considered in and for
itself, and simply with a reference to the splendid forms which it often
assumed, this munificence would furnish the materials for a volume. The
public entertainments of Caesar, his spectacles and shows, his
naumachiae, and the pomps of his unrivalled triumphs (the closing
triumphs of the Republic), were severally the finest of their kind which
had then been brought forward. Sea-fights were exhibited upon the
grandest scale, according to every known variety of nautical equipment
and mode of conflict, upon a vast lake formed artificially for that
express purpose. Mimic land-fights were conducted, in which all the
circumstances of real war were so faithfully rehearsed that even
elephants "indorsed with towers," twenty on each side, took part in the
combat. Dramas were represented in every known language (_per omnium
linguarum histriones_). And hence (that is, from the conciliatory
feeling thus expressed towards the various tribes of foreigners resident
in Rome) some have derived an explanation of what is else a mysterious
circumstance amongst the ceremonial observances at Caesar's funeral--
that all people of foreign nations then residing at Rome distinguished
themselves by the conspicuous share which they took in the public
mourning; and that, beyond all other foreigners, the Jews for night
after night kept watch and ward about the Emperor's grave. Never before,
according to traditions which lasted through several generations in
Rome, had there been so vast a conflux of the human race congregated to
any one centre, on any one attraction of business or of pleasure, as to
Rome on occasion of these triumphal spectacles exhibited by Caesar.

In our days, the greatest occasional gatherings of the human race are in
India, especially at the great fair of the _Hurdwar_ on the Ganges in
northern Hindustan: a confluence of some millions is sometimes seen at
that spot, brought together under the mixed influences of devotion and
commercial business, but very soon dispersed as rapidly as they had been
convoked. Some such spectacle of nations crowding upon nations, and some
such Babylonian confusion of dresses, complexions, languages, and
jargons, was then witnessed at Rome. Accommodations within doors, and
under roofs of houses, or roofs of temples, was altogether impossible.
Myriads encamped along the streets, and along the high-roads, fields, or
gardens. Myriads lay stretched on the ground, without even the slight
protection of tents, in a vast circuit about the city. Multitudes of
men, even senators, and others of the highest rank, were trampled to
death in the crowds. And the whole family of man might seem at that time
to be converged at the bidding of the dead Dictator. But these, or any
other themes connected with the public life of Caesar, we notice only in
those circumstances which have been overlooked, or partially
represented, by historians. Let us now, in conclusion, bring forward,
from the obscurity in which they have hitherto lurked, the anecdotes
which describe the habits of his private life, his tastes, and personal
peculiarities.

In person, he was tall, fair, gracile, and of limbs distinguished for
their elegant proportions. His eyes were black and piercing. These
circumstances continued to be long remembered, and no doubt were
constantly recalled to the eyes of all persons in the imperial palaces
by pictures, busts, and statues; for we find the same description of his
personal appearance three centuries afterwards in a work of the Emperor
Julian's. He was a most accomplished horseman, and a master
(_peritissimus_) in the use of arms. But, notwithstanding his skill and
horsemanship, it seems that, when he accompanied his army on marches, he
walked oftener than he rode; no doubt, with a view to the benefit of his
example, and to express that sympathy with his soldiers which gained him
their hearts so entirely. On other occasions, when travelling apart from
his army, he seems more frequently to have ridden in a carriage than on
horseback. His purpose, in this preference, must have been with a view
to the transport of luggage. The carriage which he generally used was a
_rheda_, a sort of gig, or rather curricle; for it was a _four_-wheeled
carriage, and adapted (as we find from the imperial regulations for the
public carriages, etc.) to the conveyance of about half a ton. The mere
personal baggage which Caesar carried with him was probably
considerable; for he was a man of elegant habits, and in all parts of
his life sedulously attentive to elegance of personal appearance. The
length of journeys which he accomplished within a given time appears
even to us at this day, and might well therefore appear to his
contemporaries, truly astonishing. A distance of one hundred miles was
no extraordinary day's journey for him in a _rheda_, such as we have
described it. So refined were his habits, and so constant his demand for
the luxurious accommodations of polished life as it then existed in
Rome, that he is said to have carried with him, as indispensable parts
of his personal baggage, the little ivory lozenges, squares and circles
or ovals, with other costly materials, wanted for the tessellated
flooring of his tent. Habits such as these will easily account for his
travelling in a carriage rather than on horseback.

The courtesy and obliging disposition of Caesar were notorious; and both
were illustrated in some anecdotes which survived for generations in
Rome. Dining on one occasion, as an invited guest, at a table where the
servants had inadvertently, for salad-oil, furnished some sort of coarse
lamp-oil, Caesar would not allow the rest of the company to point out
the mistake to their host, for fear of shocking him too much by exposing
what might have been construed into inhospitality. At another time,
whilst halting at a little _cabaret_, when one of his retinue was
suddenly taken ill, Caesar resigned to his use the sole bed which the
house afforded. Incidents as trifling as these express the urbanity of
Caesar's nature; and hence one is the more surprised to find the
alienation of the Senate charged, in no trifling degree, upon a gross
and most culpable failure in point of courtesy. Caesar, it is alleged--
but might we presume to call upon antiquity for its authority?--
neglected to rise from his seat, on their approaching him with an
address of congratulation. It is said, and we can believe it, that he
gave deeper offence by this one defect in a matter of ceremonial
observance than by all his substantial attacks upon their privileges.
What we find it difficult to believe is not that result from that
offence--this is no more than we should all anticipate--not _that_, but
the possibility of the offence itself, from one so little arrogant as
Caesar, and so entirely a man of the world. He was told of the disgust
which he had given; and we are bound to believe his apology, in which he
charged it upon sickness, that would not at the moment allow him to
maintain a standing attitude. Certainly the whole tenor of his life was
not courteous only, but kind, and to his enemies merciful in a degree
which implied so much more magnanimity than men in general could
understand that by many it was put down to the account of weakness.

Weakness, however, there was none in Caius Caesar; and, that there might
be none, it was fortunate that conspiracy should have cut him off in the
full vigour of his faculties, in the very meridian of his glory, and on
the brink of completing a series of gigantic achievements. Amongst these
are numbered:--a digest of the entire body of laws, even then become
unwieldy and oppressive; the establishment of vast and comprehensive
public libraries, Greek as well as Latin; the chastisement of Dacia
(that needed a cow-hiding for insolence as much as Affghanistan from us
in 1840); the conquest of Parthia; and the cutting a ship canal through
the Isthmus of Corinth. The reformation of the Calendar he had already
accomplished. And of all his projects it may be said that they were
equally patriotic in their purpose and colossal in their proportions.

As an orator, Caesar's merit was so eminent that, according to the
general belief, had he found time to cultivate this department of civil
exertion, the received supremacy of Cicero would have been made
questionable, or the honour would have been divided. Cicero himself was
of that opinion, and on different occasions applied the epithet
_splendidus_ to Caesar, as though in some exclusive sense, or with some
peculiar emphasis, due to him. His taste was much simpler, chaster, and
less inclined to the _florid_ and Asiatic, than that of Cicero. So far
he would, in that condition of the Roman culture and feeling, have been
less acceptable to the public; but, on the other hand, he would have
compensated this disadvantage by much more of natural and Demosthenic
fervour.

In literature, the merits of Caesar are familiar to most readers. Under
the modest title of _Commentaries_, he meant to offer the records of his
Gallic and British campaigns, simply as notes, or memoranda, afterwards
to be worked up by regular historians; but, as Cicero observes, their
merit was such in the eyes of the discerning that all judicious writers
shrank from the attempt to alter them. In another instance of his
literary labours he showed a very just sense of true dignity. Rightly
conceiving that everything patriotic was dignified, and that to
illustrate or polish his native language was a service of real and
paramount patriotism, he composed a work on the grammar and orthoepy of
the Latin language. Cicero and himself were the only Romans of
distinction in that age who applied themselves with true patriotism to
the task of purifying and ennobling their mother tongue. Both were aware
of a transcendent value in the Grecian literature as it then stood; but
that splendour did not depress their hopes of raising their own to
something of the same level. As respected the natural wealth of the two
languages, it was the private opinion of Cicero that the Latin had the
advantage; and, if Caesar did not accompany him to that length--which,
perhaps, under some limitations he ought to have done--he yet felt that
it was but the more necessary to draw forth any special or exceptional
advantage which it really had.

Was Caesar, upon the whole, the greatest of men? We restrict the
question, of course, to the classes of men great in _action_: great by
the extent of their influence over their social contemporaries; great by
throwing open avenues to extended powers that previously had been
closed; great by making obstacles once vast to become trivial, or prizes
that once were trivial to be glorified by expansion. I (said Augustus
Caesar) found Rome built of brick; but I left it built of marble. Well,
my man, we reply, for a wondrously little chap, you did what in
Westmoreland they call a good _darroch_ (day's work); and, if _navvies_
had been wanted in those days, you should have had our vote to a
certainty. But Caius Julius, even under such a limitation of the
comparison, did a thing as much transcending this as it was greater to
project Rome across the Alps and the Pyrenees,--expanding the grand
Republic into crowning provinces of i. France (_Gallia_), 2. Belgium, 3.
Holland (_Batavia_), 4. England (_Britannia_), 5. Savoy (_Allobroges_),
6. Switzerland (_Helvetia_), 7. Spain (_Hispania_),--than to decorate a
street or to found an amphitheatre. Dr. Beattie once observed that, if
that question as to the greatest man in action upon the rolls of History
were left to be collected from the suffrages already expressed in books
and scattered throughout the literature of all nations, the scale would
be found to have turned prodigiously in Caesar's favour as against any
single competitor; and there is no doubt whatsoever that even amongst
his own countrymen, and his own contemporaries, the same verdict would
have been returned, had it been collected upon the famous principle of
Themistocles, that he should be reputed the first whom the greatest
number of rival voices had pronounced to be the second.

BIBLIOGRAPHY

_Works_: Latin folio, Rome, 1469; Venice, 1471; Florence, 1514; London,
1585. De Bello Gallico, Esslingen (?), 1473. Translations by John
Tiptoft, Earl of Worcester (John Rastell), of Julius Caesar's
Commentaries-"newly translated into Englyshe ... as much as concerneth
thys realme of England"--1530 folio; by Arthur Goldinge, The Eyght
Bookes of C. Julius Caesar, London, 1563, 1565, 1578, 1590; by Chapman,
London, 1604 folio; by Clem. Edmonds, London, 1609; the same, with
Hirtius, 1655, 1670, 1695 folio with commendatory verses by Camden,
Daniel, and Ben Johnson (_sic_). Works: Translated by W. Duncan, 1753,
1755; by M. Bladen, 8th ed., 1770; MacDevitt, Bohn's Library, 1848. De
Bello Gallico, translated by R. Mongan, Dublin, 1850; by J.B. Owgan and
C.W. Bateman, 1882. Caesar's Commentaries on the Gallic War, translated
by T. Rice Holmes, London, 1908 (see also Holmes' Caesar's Conquest of
Gaul, 1911). Caesar's Gallic War, translated by Rev. F.P. Long, Oxford,
1911; Books IV. and V. translated by C.H. Prichard, Cambridge, 1912. For
Latin text of De Bello Gallico see Bell's Illustrated Classical Series;
Dent's Temple Series of Classical Texts, 1902; Macmillan and Co., 1905;
and Blackie's Latin Texts, 1905-7.


       *       *       *       *       *


CONTENTS


THE WAR IN GAUL

THE CIVIL WAR





THE COMMENTARIES OF
CAIUS JULIUS CAESAR


THE WAR IN GAUL

BOOK I

I.--All Gaul is divided into three parts, one of which the Belgae
inhabit, the Aquitani another, those who in their own language are
called Celts, in ours Gauls, the third. All these differ from each other
in language, customs and laws. The river Garonne separates the Gauls
from the Aquitani; the Marne and the Seine separate them from the
Belgae. Of all these, the Belgae are the bravest, because they are
farthest from the civilisation and refinement of [our] Province, and
merchants least frequently resort to them and import those things which
tend to effeminate the mind; and they are the nearest to the Germans,
who dwell beyond the Rhine, with whom they are continually waging war;
for which reason the Helvetii also surpass the rest of the Gauls in
valour, as they contend with the Germans in almost daily battles, when
they either repel them from their own territories, or themselves wage
war on their frontiers. One part of these, which it has been said that
the Gauls occupy, takes its beginning at the river Rhone: it is bounded
by the river Garonne, the ocean, and the territories of the Belgae: it
borders, too, on the side of the Sequani and the Helvetii, upon the
river Rhine, and stretches towards the north. The Belgae rise from the
extreme frontier of Gaul, extend to the lower part of the river Rhine;
and look towards the north and the rising sun. Aquitania extends from
the river Garonne to the Pyrenaean mountains and to that part of the
ocean which is near Spain: it looks between the setting of the sun and
the north star.

II.--Among the Helvetii, Orgetorix was by far the most distinguished and
wealthy. He, when Marcus Messala and Marcus Piso were consuls, incited
by lust of sovereignty, formed a conspiracy among the nobility, and
persuaded the people to go forth from their territories with all their
possessions, [saying] that it would be very easy, since they excelled
all in valour, to acquire the supremacy of the whole of Gaul. To this he
the more easily persuaded them, because the Helvetii are confined on
every side by the nature of their situation; on one side by the Rhine, a
very broad and deep river, which separates the Helvetian territory from
the Germans; on a second side by the Jura, a very high mountain which is
[situated] between the Sequani and the Helvetii; on a third by the Lake
of Geneva, and by the river Rhone, which separates our Province from the
Helvetii. From these circumstances it resulted that they could range
less widely, and could less easily make war upon their neighbours; for
which reason men fond of war [as they were] were affected with great
regret. They thought, that considering the extent of their population,
and their renown for warfare and bravery, they had but narrow limits,
although they extended in length 240, and in breadth 180 [Roman] miles.

III.--Induced by these considerations, and influenced by the authority
of Orgetorix, they determined to provide such things as were necessary
for their expedition--to buy up as great a number as possible of beasts
of burden and waggons--to make their sowings as large as possible, so
that on their march plenty of corn might be in store--and to establish
peace and friendship with the neighbouring states. They reckoned that a
term of two years would be sufficient for them to execute their designs;
they fix by decree their departure for the third year. Orgetorix is
chosen to complete these arrangements. He took upon himself the office
of ambassador to the states: on this journey he persuades Casticus, the
son of Catamantaledes (one of the Sequani, whose father had possessed
the sovereignty among the people for many years, and had been styled
"_friend_" by the senate of the Roman people), to seize upon the
sovereignty in his own state, which his father had held before him, and
he likewise persuades Dumnorix, an Aeduan, the brother of Divitiacus,
who at that time possessed the chief authority in the state, and was
exceedingly beloved by the people, to attempt the same, and gives him
his daughter in marriage. He proves to them that to accomplish their
attempts was a thing very easy to be done, because he himself would
obtain the government of his own state; that there was no doubt that the
Helvetii were the most powerful of the whole of Gaul; he assures them
that he will, with his own forces and his own army, acquire the
sovereignty for them. Incited by this speech, they give a pledge and
oath to one another, and hope that, when they have seized the
sovereignty, they will, by means of the three most powerful and valiant
nations, be enabled to obtain possession of the whole of Gaul.

IV.--When this scheme was disclosed to the Helvetii by informers, they,
according to their custom, compelled Orgetorix to plead his cause in
chains; it was the law that the penalty of being burned by fire should
await him if condemned. On the day appointed for the pleading of his
cause, Orgetorix drew together from all quarters to the court all his
vassals to the number of ten thousand persons; and led together to the
same place, and all his dependants and debtor-bondsmen, of whom he had a
great number; by means of these he rescued himself from [the necessity
of] pleading his cause. While the state, incensed at this act, was
endeavouring to assert its right by arms, and the magistrates were
mustering a large body of men from the country, Orgetorix died; and
there is not wanting a suspicion, as the Helvetii think, of his having
committed suicide.

V.--After his death, the Helvetii nevertheless attempt to do that which
they had resolved on, namely, to go forth from their territories. When
they thought that they were at length prepared for this undertaking,
they set fire to all their towns, in number about twelve--to their
villages about four hundred--and to the private dwellings that remained;
they burn up all the corn, except what they intend to carry with them;
that after destroying the hope of a return home, they might be the more
ready for undergoing all dangers. They order every one to carry forth
from home for himself provisions for three months, ready ground. They
persuade the Rauraci, and the Tulingi, and the Latobrigi, their
neighbours, to adopt the same plan, and after burning down their towns
and villages, to set out with them: and they admit to their party and
unite to themselves as confederates the Boii, who had dwelt on the other
side of the Rhine, and had crossed over into the Norican territory, and
assaulted Noreia.

VI.--There were in all two routes by which they could go forth from
their country--one through the Sequani, narrow and difficult, between
Mount Jura and the river Rhone (by which scarcely one waggon at a time
could be led; there was, moreover, a very high mountain overhanging, so
that a very few might easily intercept them); the other, through our
Province, much easier and freer from obstacles, because the Rhone flows
between the boundaries of the Helvetii and those of the Allobroges, who
had lately been subdued, and is in some places crossed by a ford. The
furthest town of the Allobroges, and the nearest to the territories of
the Helvetii, is Geneva. From this town a bridge extends to the
Helvetii. They thought that they should either persuade the Allobroges,
because they did not seem as yet well-affected towards the Roman people,
or compel them by force to allow them to pass through their territories.
Having provided everything for the expedition, they appoint a day on
which they should all meet on the bank of the Rhone. This day was the
fifth before the kalends of April [_i.e._ the 28th of March], in the
consulship of Lucius Piso and Aulus Gabinius [B.C. 58].

VII.--When it was reported to Caesar that they were attempting to make
their route through our Province, he hastens to set out from the city,
and, by as great marches as he can, proceeds to Further Gaul, and
arrives at Geneva. He orders the whole Province [to furnish] as great a
number of soldiers as possible, as there was in all only one legion in
Further Gaul: he orders the bridge at Geneva to be broken down. When the
Helvetii are apprised of his arrival, they send to him, as ambassadors,
the most illustrious men of their state (in which embassy Numeius and
Verudoctius held the chief place), to say "that it was their intention
to march through the Province without doing any harm, because they had"
[according to their own representations] "no other route:--that they
requested they might be allowed to do so with his consent." Caesar,
inasmuch as he kept in remembrance that Lucius Cassius, the consul, had
been slain, and his army routed and made to pass under the yoke by the
Helvetii, did not think that [their request] ought to be granted; nor
was he of opinion that men of hostile disposition, if an opportunity of
marching through the Province were given them, would abstain from
outrage and mischief. Yet, in order that a period might intervene, until
the soldiers whom he had ordered [to be furnished] should assemble, he
replied to the ambassadors, that he would take time to deliberate; if
they wanted anything, they might return on the day before the ides of
April [on April 12th].

VIII.--Meanwhile, with the legion which he had with him and the soldiers
who had assembled from the Province, he carries along for nineteen
[Roman, not quite eighteen English] miles a wall, to the height of
sixteen feet, and a trench, from the lake of Geneva, which flows into
the river Rhone, to Mount Jura, which separates the territories of the
Sequani from those of the Helvetii. When that work was finished, he
distributes garrisons, and closely fortifies redoubts, in order that he
may the more easily intercept them, if they should attempt to cross over
against his will. When the day which he had appointed with the
ambassadors came, and they returned to him, he says that he cannot,
consistently with the custom and precedent of the Roman people, grant
any one a passage through the Province; and he gives them to understand
that, if they should attempt to use violence, he would oppose them. The
Helvetii, disappointed in this hope, tried if they could force a passage
(some by means of a bridge of boats and numerous rafts constructed for
the purpose; others, by the fords of the Rhone, where the depth of the
river was least, sometimes by day, but more frequently by night), but
being kept at bay by the strength of our works, and by the concourse of
the soldiers, and by the missiles, they desisted from this attempt.

IX.--There was left one way, [namely] through the Sequani, by which, on
account of its narrowness, they could not pass without the consent of
the Sequani. As they could not of themselves prevail on them, they send
ambassadors to Dumnorix the Aeduan, that through his intercession they
might obtain their request from the Sequani. Dumnorix, by his popularity
and liberality, had great influence among the Sequani, and was friendly
to the Helvetii, because out of that state he had married the daughter
of Orgetorix; and, incited by lust of sovereignty, was anxious for a
revolution, and wished to have as many states as possible attached to
him by his kindness towards them. He, therefore, undertakes the affair,
and prevails upon the Sequani to allow the Helvetii to march through
their territories, and arranges that they should give hostages to each
other--the Sequani not to obstruct the Helvetii in their march--the
Helvetii, to pass without mischief and outrage.

X.--It-is again told Caesar that the Helvetii intend to march through
the country of the Sequani and the Aedui into the territories of the
Santones, which are not far distant from those boundaries of the
Tolosates, which [viz. Tolosa, Toulouse] is a state in the Province. If
this took place, he saw that it would be attended with great danger to
the Province to have warlike men, enemies of the Roman people, bordering
upon an open and very fertile tract of country. For these reasons he
appointed Titus Labienus, his lieutenant, to the command of the
fortification which he had made. He himself proceeds to Italy by forced
marches, and there levies two legions, and leads out from winter-quarters
three which were wintering around Aquileia, and with these five
legions marches rapidly by the nearest route across the Alps into
Further Gaul. Here the Centrones and the Graioceli and the Caturiges,
having taken possession of the higher parts, attempt to obstruct the
army in their march. After having routed these in several battles, he
arrives in the territories of the Vocontii in the Further Province on
the seventh day from Ocelum, which is the most remote town of the Hither
Province; thence he leads his army into the country of the Allobroges,
and from the Allobroges to the Segusiani. These people are the first
beyond the Province on the opposite side of the Rhone.

XI.--The Helvetii had by this time led their forces over through the
narrow defile and the territories of the Sequani, and had arrived at the
territories of the Aedui, and were ravaging their lands. The Aedui, as
they could not defend themselves and their possessions against them,
send ambassadors to Caesar to ask assistance, [pleading] that they had
at all times so well deserved of the Roman people, that their fields
ought not to have been laid waste--their children carried off into
slavery--their towns stormed, almost within sight of our army. At the
same time the Ambarri, the friends and kinsmen of the Aedui, apprise
Caesar that it was not easy for them, now that their fields had been
devastated, to ward off the violence of the enemy from their towns: the
Allobroges likewise, who had villages and possessions on the other side
of the Rhone, betake themselves in flight to Caesar and assure him that
they had nothing remaining, except the soil of their land. Caesar,
induced by these circumstances, decides that he ought not to wait until
the Helvetii, after destroying all the property of his allies, should
arrive among the Santones.

XII.--There is a river [called] the Saone, which flows through the
territories of the Aedui and Sequani into the Rhone with such incredible
slowness, that it cannot be determined by the eye in which direction it
flows. This the Helvetii were crossing by rafts and boats joined
together. When Caesar was informed by spies that the Helvetii had
already conveyed three parts of their forces across that river, but that
the fourth part was left behind on this side of the Saone, he set out
from the camp with three legions during the third watch, and came up
with that division which had not yet crossed the river. Attacking them,
encumbered with baggage, and not expecting him, he cut to pieces a great
part of them; the rest betook themselves to flight, and concealed
themselves in the nearest woods. That canton [which was cut down] was
called the Tigurine; for the whole Helvetian state is divided into four
cantons. This single canton having left their country, within the
recollection of our fathers, had slain Lucius Cassius the consul, and
had made his army pass under the yoke [B.C. 107]. Thus, whether by
chance, or by the design of the immortal gods, that part of the
Helvetian state which had brought a signal calamity upon the Roman
people was the first to pay the penalty. In this Caesar avenged not only
the public, but also his own personal wrongs, because the Tigurini had
slain Lucius Piso the lieutenant [of Cassius], the grandfather of Lucius
Calpurnius Piso, his [Caesar's] father-in-law, in the same battle as
Cassius himself.

XIII.--This battle ended, that he might be able to come up with the
remaining forces of the Helvetii, he procures a bridge to be made across
the Saone, and thus leads his army over. The Helvetii, confused by his
sudden arrival, when they found that he had effected in one day what
they themselves had with the utmost difficulty accomplished in twenty,
namely, the crossing of the river, send ambassadors to him; at the head
of which embassy was Divico, who had been commander of the Helvetii in
the war against Cassius. He thus treats with Caesar:--that, "if the
Roman people would make peace with the Helvetii they would go to that
part and there remain, where Caesar might appoint and desire them to be;
but if he should persist in persecuting them with war, that he ought to
remember both the ancient disgrace of the Roman people and the
characteristic valour of the Helvetii. As to his having attacked one
canton by surprise, [at a time] when those who had crossed the river
could not bring assistance to their friends, that he ought not on that
account to ascribe very much to his own valour, or despise them; that
they had so learned from their sires and ancestors, as to rely more on
valour than on artifice or stratagem. Wherefore let him not bring it to
pass that the place, where they were standing, should acquire a name,
from the disaster of the Roman people and the destruction of their army
or transmit the remembrance [of such an event to posterity]."

XIV.--To these words Caesar thus replied:--that "on that very account he
felt less hesitation, because he kept in remembrance those circumstances
which the Helvetian ambassadors had mentioned, and that he felt the more
indignant at them, in proportion as they had happened undeservedly to
the Roman people: for if they had been conscious of having done any
wrong it would not have been difficult to be on their guard, but for
that very reason had they been deceived, because neither were they aware
that any offence had been given by them, on account of which they should
be afraid, nor did they think that they ought to be afraid without
cause. But even if he were willing to forget their former outrage, could
he also lay aside the remembrance of the late wrongs, in that they had
against his will attempted a route through the Province by force, in
that they had molested the Aedui, the Ambarri, and the Allobroges? That
as to their so insolently boasting of their victory, and as to their
being astonished that they had so long committed their outrages with
impunity, [both these things] tended to the same point; for the immortal
gods are wont to allow those persons whom they wish to punish for their
guilt sometimes a greater prosperity and longer impunity, in order that
they may suffer the more severely from a reverse of circumstances.
Although these things are so, yet, if hostages were to be given him by
them in order that he may be assured they will do what they promise, and
provided they will give satisfaction to the Aedui for the outrages which
they had committed against them and their allies, and likewise to the
Allobroges, he [Caesar] will make peace with them." Divico replied, that
"the Helvetii had been so trained by their ancestors that they were
accustomed to receive, not to give, hostages; of that fact the Roman
people were witness." Having given this reply, he withdrew.

XV.--On the following day they move their camp from that place; Caesar
does the same, and sends forward all his cavalry, to the number of four
thousand (which he had drawn together from all parts of the Province and
from the Aedui and their allies), to observe towards what parts the
enemy are directing their march. These, having too eagerly pursued the
enemy's rear, come to a battle with the cavalry of the Helvetii in a
disadvantageous place, and a few of our men fall. The Helvetii, elated
with this battle because they had with five hundred horse repulsed so
large a body of horse, began to face us more boldly, sometimes too from
their rear to provoke our men by an attack. Caesar [however] restrained
his men from battle, deeming it sufficient for the present to prevent
the enemy from rapine, forage, and depredation. They marched for about
fifteen days in such a manner that there was not more than five or six
miles between the enemy's rear and our van.

XVI.--Meanwhile, Caesar kept daily importuning the Aedui for the corn
which they had promised in the name of their state; for, in consequence
of the coldness (Gaul being, as before said, situated towards the
north), not only was the corn in the fields not ripe, but there was not
in store a sufficiently large quantity even of fodder: besides he was
unable to use the corn which he had conveyed in ships up the river
Saone, because the Helvetii, from whom he was unwilling to retire, had
diverted their march from the Saone. The Aedui kept deferring from day
to day, and saying that it was being "collected--brought in--on the
road." When he saw that he was put off too long, and that the day was
close at hand on which he ought to serve out the corn to his soldiers,--
having called together their chiefs, of whom he had a great number in
his camp, among them Divitiacus, and Liscus who was invested with the
chief magistracy (whom the Aedui style the Vergobretus, and who is
elected annually, and has power of life and death over his countrymen),
he severely reprimands them, because he is not assisted by them on so
urgent an occasion, when the enemy were so close at hand, and when
[corn] could neither be bought nor taken from the fields, particularly
as, in a great measure urged by their prayers, he had undertaken the
war; much more bitterly, therefore, does he complain of his being
forsaken.

XVII.--Then at length Liscus, moved by Caesar's speech, discloses what
he had hitherto kept secret:--that "there are some whose influence with
the people is very great, who, though private men, have more power than
the magistrates themselves: that these by seditious and violent language
are deterring the populace from contributing the corn which they ought
to supply; [by telling them] that, if they cannot any longer retain the
supremacy of Gaul, it were better to submit to the government of Gauls
than of Romans, nor ought they to doubt that, if the Romans should
overpower the Helvetii, they would wrest their freedom from the Aedui
together with the remainder of Gaul. By these very men [said he] are our
plans, and whatever is done in the camp, disclosed to the enemy; that
they could not be restrained by _him_: nay more, he was well aware that,
though compelled by necessity, he had disclosed the matter to Caesar, at
how great a risk he had done it; and for that reason, he had been silent
as long as he could."

XVIII.--Caesar perceived that, by this speech of Liscus, Dumnorix, the
brother of Divitiacus, was indicated; but, as he was unwilling that
these matters should be discussed while so many were present, he
speedily dismisses the council, but detains Liscus: he inquires from him
when alone, about those things which he had said in the meeting. He
[Liscus] speaks more unreservedly and boldly. He [Caesar] makes
inquiries on the same points privately of others, and discovers that it
is all true; that "Dumnorix is the person, a man of the highest daring,
in great favour with the people on account of his liberality, a man
eager for a revolution: that for a great many years he has been in the
habit of contracting for the customs and all the other taxes of the
Aedui at a small cost, because when _he_ bids, no one dares to bid
against him. By these means he has both increased his own private
property and amassed great means for giving largesses; that he maintains
constantly at his own expense and keeps about his own person a great
number of cavalry, and that not only at home, but even among the
neighbouring states, he has great influence, and for the sake of
strengthening this influence has given his mother in marriage among the
Bituriges to a man the most noble and most influential there; that he
has himself taken a wife from among the Helvetii, and has given his
sister by the mother's side and his female relations in marriage into
other states; that he favours and wishes well to the Helvetii on account
of this connection; and that he hates Caesar and the Romans, on his own
account, because by their arrival his power was weakened, and his
brother, Divitiacus, restored to his former position of influence and
dignity: that, if anything should happen to the Romans, he entertains
the highest hope of gaining the sovereignty by means of the Helvetii,
but that under the government of the Roman people he despairs not only
of royalty but even of that influence which he already has." Caesar
discovered too, on inquiring into the unsuccessful cavalry engagement
which had taken place a few days before, that the commencement of that
flight had been made by Dumnorix and his cavalry (for Dumnorix was in
command of the cavalry which the Aedui had sent for aid to Caesar); that
by their flight the rest of the cavalry was dismayed.

XIX.--After learning these circumstances, since to these suspicions the
most unequivocal facts were added, viz., that he had led the Helvetii
through the territories of the Sequani; that he had provided that
hostages should be mutually given; that he had done all these things,
not only without any orders of his [Caesar's] and of his own state's,
but even without their [the Aedui] knowing anything of it themselves;
that he [Dumnorix] was reprimanded by the [chief] magistrate of the
Aedui; he [Caesar] considered that there was sufficient reason why he
should either punish him himself, or order the state to do so. One thing
[however] stood in the way of all this--that he had learned by
experience his brother Divitiacus's very high regard for the Roman
people, his great affection towards him, his distinguished faithfulness,
justice, and moderation; for he was afraid lest by the punishment of
this man, he should hurt the feelings of Divitiacus. Therefore, before
he attempted anything, he orders Divitiacus to be summoned to him, and
when the ordinary interpreters had been withdrawn, converses with him
through Caius Valerius Procillus, chief of the province of Gaul, an
intimate friend of his, in whom he reposed the highest confidence in
everything; at the same time he reminds him of what was said about
Dumnorix in the council of the Gauls, when he himself was present, and
shows what each had said of him privately in his [Caesar's] own
presence; he begs and exhorts him, that, without offence to his
feelings, he may either himself pass judgment on him [Dumnorix] after
trying the case, or else order the [Aeduan] state to do so.

XX.-Divitiacus, embracing Caesar, begins to implore him, with many
tears, that "he would not pass any very severe sentence upon his
brother; saying, that he knows that those [charges] are true, and that
nobody suffered more pain on that account than he himself did; for when
he himself could effect a very great deal by his influence at home and
in the rest of Gaul, and he [Dumnorix] very little on account of his
youth, the latter had become powerful through his means, which power and
strength he used not only to the lessening of his [Divitiacus]
popularity, but almost to his ruin; that he, however, was influenced
both by fraternal affection and by public opinion. But if anything very
severe from Caesar should befall him [Dumnorix], no one would think that
it had been done without his consent, since he himself held such a place
in Caesar's friendship; from which circumstance it would arise that the
affections of the whole of Gaul would be estranged from him." As he was
with tears begging these things of Caesar in many words, Caesar takes
his right hand, and, comforting him, begs him to make an end of
entreating, and assures him that his regard for him is so great that he
forgives both the injuries of the republic and his private wrongs, at
his desire and prayers. He summons Dumnorix to him; he brings in his
brother; he points out what he censures in him; he lays before him what
he of himself perceives, and what the state complains of; he warns him
for the future to avoid all grounds of suspicion; he says that he
pardons the past, for the sake of his brother, Divitiacus. He sets spies
over Dumnorix that he may be able to know what he does, and with whom he
communicates.

XXI.--Being on the same day informed by his scouts that the enemy had
encamped at the foot of a mountain eight miles from his own camp, he
sent persons to ascertain what the nature of the mountain was, and of
what kind the ascent on every side. Word was brought back that it was
easy. During the third watch he orders Titus Labienus, his lieutenant
with praetorian powers, to ascend to the highest ridge of the mountain
with two legions, and with those as guides who had examined the road; he
explains what his plan is. He himself during the fourth watch, hastens
to them by the same route by which the enemy had gone, and sends on all
the cavalry before him. Publius Considius, who was reputed to be very
experienced in military affairs, and had been in the army of Lucius
Sulla, and afterwards in that of Marcus Crassus, is sent forward with
the scouts.

XXII.--At day-break, when the summit of the mountain was in the
possession of Titus Labienus, and he himself was not further off than a
mile and half from the enemy's camp, nor, as he afterwards ascertained
from the captives, had either his arrival or that of Labienus been
discovered; Considius, with his horse at full gallop, comes up to him--
says that the mountain which he [Caesar] wished should be seized by
Labienus, is in possession of the enemy; that he has discovered this by
the Gallic arms and ensigns. Caesar leads off his forces to the next
hill: [and] draws them up in battle-order. Labienus, as he had been
ordered by Caesar not to come to an engagement unless [Caesar's] own
forces were seen near the enemy's camp, that the attack upon the enemy
might be made on every side at the same time, was, after having taken
possession of the mountain, waiting for our men, and refraining from
battle. When, at length, the day was far advanced, Caesar learned
through spies that the mountain was in possession of his own men, and
that the Helvetii had moved their camp, and that Considius, struck with
fear, had reported to him, as seen, that which he had not seen. On that
day he follows the enemy at his usual distance, and pitches his camp
three miles from theirs.

XXIII.--The next day (as there remained in all only two days' space [to
the time] when he must serve out the corn to his army, and as he was not
more than eighteen miles from Bibracte, by far the largest and best-stored
town of the Aedui) he thought that he ought to provide for a
supply of corn; and diverted his march from the Helvetii, and advanced
rapidly to Bibracte. This circumstance is reported to the enemy by some
deserters from Lucius Aemilius, a captain of the Gallic horse. The
Helvetii, either because they thought that the Romans, struck with
terror, were retreating from them, the more so, as the day before,
though they had seized on the higher grounds, they had not joined
battle; or because they flattered themselves that they might be cut off
from the provisions, altering their plan and changing their route, began
to pursue and to annoy our men in the rear.

XXIV.--Caesar, when he observes this, draws off his forces to the next
hill, and sent the cavalry to sustain the attack of the enemy. He
himself, meanwhile, drew up on the middle of the hill a triple line of
his four veteran legions in such a manner that he placed above him on
the very summit the two legions which he had lately levied in Hither
Gaul, and all the auxiliaries; and he ordered that the whole mountain
should be covered with men, and that meanwhile the baggage should be
brought together into one place, and the position be protected by those
who were posted in the upper line. The Helvetii, having followed with
all their waggons, collected their baggage into one place: they
themselves, after having repulsed our cavalry and formed a phalanx,
advanced up to our front line in very close order.

XXV.--Caesar, having removed out of sight first his own horse, then
those of all, that he might make the danger of all equal, and do away
with the hope of flight, after encouraging his men, joined battle. His
soldiers, hurling their javelins from the higher ground, easily broke
the enemy's phalanx. That being dispersed, they made a charge on them
with drawn swords. It was a great hindrance to the Gauls in fighting,
that, when several of their bucklers had been by one stroke of the
(Roman) javelins pierced through and pinned fast together, as the point
of the iron had bent itself, they could neither pluck it out, nor, with
their left hand entangled, fight with sufficient ease; so that many,
after having long tossed their arm about, chose rather to cast away the
buckler from their hand, and to fight with their person unprotected. At
length, worn out with wounds, they began to give way, and as there was
in the neighbourhood a mountain about a mile off, to betake themselves
thither. When the mountain had been gained, and our men were advancing
up, the Boii and Tulingi, who with about 15,000 men closed the enemy's
line of march and served as a guard to their rear, having assailed our
men on the exposed flank as they advanced [prepared] to surround them;
upon seeing which, the Helvetii, who had betaken themselves to the
mountain, began to press on again and renew the battle. The Romans
having faced about, advanced to the attack in two divisions; the first
and second line to withstand those who had been defeated and driven off
the field; the third to receive those who were just arriving.

XXVI.--Thus was the contest long and vigorously carried on with doubtful
success. When they could no longer withstand the attacks of our men, the
one division, as they had begun to do, betook themselves to the
mountain; the other repaired to their baggage and waggons. For during
the whole of this battle, although the fight lasted from the seventh
hour [_i.e._ 12 (noon)--1 P.M.] to eventide, no one could see an enemy
with his back turned. The fight was carried on also at the baggage till
late in the night, for they had set waggons in the way as a rampart, and
from the higher ground kept throwing weapons upon our men, as they came
on, and some from between the waggons and the wheels kept darting their
lances and javelins from beneath, and wounding our men. After the fight
had lasted some time, our men gained possession of their baggage and
camp. There the daughter and one of the sons of Orgetorix were taken.
After that battle about 130,000 men [of the enemy] remained alive, who
marched incessantly during the whole of that night; and after a march
discontinued for no part of the night, arrived in the territories of the
Lingones on the fourth day, whilst our men, having stopped for three
days, both on account of the wounds of the soldiers and the burial of
the slain, had not been able to follow them. Caesar sent letters and
messengers to the Lingones [with orders] that they should not assist
them with corn or with anything else; for that if they should assist
them, he would regard them in the same light as the Helvetii. After the
three days' interval he began to follow them himself with all his
forces.

XXVII.--The Helvetii, compelled by the want of everything, sent
ambassadors to him about a surrender. When these had met him in the way
and had thrown themselves at his feet, and speaking in suppliant tone
had with tears sued for peace, and [when] he had ordered them to await
his arrival, in the place where they then were, they obeyed his
commands. When Caesar arrived at that place, he demanded hostages, their
arms, and the slaves who had deserted to them. Whilst those things are
being sought for and got together, after a night's interval, about 6000
men of that canton which is called the Verbigene, whether terrified by
fear, lest, after delivering up their arms, they should suffer
punishment, or else induced by the hope of safety, because they supposed
that, amid so vast a multitude of those who had surrendered themselves,
_their_ flight might either be concealed or entirely overlooked, having
at night-fall departed out of the camp of the Helvetii, hastened to the
Rhine and the territories of the Germans.

XXVIII.--But when Caesar discovered this, he commanded those through
whose territories they had gone, to seek them, out and to bring them
back again, if they meant to be acquitted before him; and considered
them, when brought back, in the light of enemies; he admitted all the
rest to a surrender, upon their delivering up the hostages, arms, and
deserters. He ordered the Helvetii, the Tulingi, and the Latobrigi to
return to their territories from which they had come, and as there was
at home nothing whereby they might support their hunger, all the
productions of the earth having been destroyed, he commanded the
Allobroges to let them have a plentiful supply of corn; and ordered them
to rebuild the towns and villages which they had burnt. This he did,
chiefly on this account, because he was unwilling that the country, from
which the Helvetii had departed, should be untenanted, lest the Germans,
who dwell on the other side of the Rhine, should, on account of the
excellence of the lands, cross over from their own territories into
those of the Helvetii, and become borderers upon the province of Gaul
and the Allobroges. He granted the petition of the Aedui, that they
might settle the Boii, in their own (_i.e._ in the Aeduan) territories,
as these were known to be of distinguished valour to whom they gave
lands, and whom they afterwards admitted to the same state of rights and
freedom as themselves.

XXIX.--In the camp of the Helvetii, lists were found, drawn up in Greek
characters, and were brought to Caesar, in which an estimate had been
drawn up, name by name, of the number which had gone forth from their
country of those who were able to bear arms; and likewise the boys, the
old men, and the women, separately. Of all which items the total was:-

Of the _Helvetii_ [lit. of the heads of the Helvetii] 263,000
Of the _Tulingi_                                       36,000
Of the _Latobrigi_                                     14,000
Of the _Rauraci_                                       23,000
Of the _Boii_                                          32,000
                                                      -------
The sum of all amounted to                            368,000

Out of these, such as could bear arms [amounted] to about 92,000. When
the _census_ of those who returned home was taken, as Caesar had
commanded, the number was found to be 110,000.

XXX.--When the war with the Helvetii was concluded, ambassadors from
almost all parts of Gaul, the chiefs of states, assembled to
congratulate Caesar, [saying] that they were well aware, that, although
he had taken vengeance on the Helvetii in war, for the old wrongs done
by them to the Roman people, yet that circumstance had happened no less
to the benefit of the land of Gaul than of the Roman people, because the
Helvetii, while their affairs were most flourishing, had quitted their
country with the design of making war upon the whole of Gaul, and
seizing the government of it, and selecting, out of a great abundance,
that spot for an abode which they should judge to be the most convenient
and most productive of all Gaul, and hold the rest of the states as
tributaries. They requested that they might be allowed to proclaim an
assembly of the whole of Gaul for a particular day, and to do that with
Caesar's permission, [stating] that they had some things which, with the
general consent, they wished to ask of him. This request having been
granted, they appointed a day for the assembly, and ordained by an oath
with each other, that no one should disclose [their deliberations]
except those to whom this [office] should be assigned by the general
assembly.

XXXI.--When that assembly was dismissed, the same chiefs of states, who
had before been to Caesar, returned, and asked that they might be
allowed to treat with him privately (in secret) concerning the safety of
themselves and of all. That request having been obtained, they all threw
themselves in tears at Caesar's feet, [saying] that they no less begged
and earnestly desired that what they might say should not be disclosed
than that they might obtain those things which they wished for; inasmuch
as they saw that, if a disclosure were made, they should be put to the
greatest tortures. For these Divitiacus the Aeduan spoke and told him:--
"That there were two parties in the whole of Gaul: that the Aedui stood
at the head of one of these, the Arverni of the other. After these had
been violently struggling with one another for the superiority for many
years, it came to pass that the Germans were called in for hire by the
Arverni and the Sequani. That about 15,000 of them [_i.e._ of the
Germans] had at first crossed the Rhine: but after that these wild and
savage men had become enamoured of the lands and the refinement and the
abundance of the Gauls, more were brought over, that there were now as
many as 120,000 of them in Gaul: that with these the Aedui and their
dependants had repeatedly struggled in arms, that they had been routed
and had sustained a great calamity--had lost all their nobility, all
their senate, all their cavalry. And that broken by such engagements and
calamities, although they had formerly been very powerful in Gaul, both
from their own valour and from the Roman people's hospitality and
friendship, they were now compelled to give the chief nobles of their
state as hostages to the Sequani, and to bind their state by an oath,
that they would neither demand hostages in return, nor supplicate aid
from the Roman people, nor refuse to be for ever under their sway and
empire. That he was the only one out of all the state of the Aedui who
could not be prevailed upon to take the oath or to give his children as
hostages. On that account he had fled from his state and had gone to the
senate at Rome to beseech aid, as he alone was bound neither by oath nor
hostages. But a worse thing had befallen the victorious Sequani than the
vanquished Aedui, for Ariovistus, the king of the Germans, had settled
in their territories, and had seized upon a third of their land, which
was the best in the whole of Gaul, and was now ordering them to depart
from another third part, because a few months previously 24,000 men of
the Harudes had come to him, for whom room and settlements must be
provided. The consequence would be, that in a few years they would all
be driven from the territories of Gaul, and all the Germans would cross
the Rhine; for neither must the land of Gaul be compared with the land
of the Germans, nor must the habit of living of the latter be put on a
level with that of the former. Moreover, [as for] Ariovistus, no sooner
did he defeat the forces of the Gauls in a battle, which took place at
Magetobria, than [he began] to lord it haughtily and cruelly, to demand
as hostages the children of all the principal nobles, and wreak on them
every kind of cruelty, if everything was not done at his nod or
pleasure; that he was a savage, passionate, and reckless man, and that
his commands could no longer be borne. Unless there was some aid in
Caesar and the Roman people, the Gauls must all do the same thing that
the Helvetii had done, [viz.] emigrate from their country, and seek
another dwelling place, other settlements remote from the Germans, and
try whatever fortune may fall to their lot. If these things were to be
disclosed to Ariovistus, [Divitiacus adds] that he doubts not that he
would inflict the most severe punishment on all the hostages who are in
his possession, [and says] that Caesar could, either by his own
influence and by that of his army, or by his late victory, or by name of
the Roman people, intimidate him, so as to prevent a greater number of
Germans being brought over the Rhine, and could protect all Gaul from
the outrages of Ariovistus."

XXXII.--When this speech had been delivered by Divitiacus, all who were
present began with loud lamentation to entreat assistance of Caesar.
Caesar noticed that the Sequani were the only people of all who did none
of those things which the others did, but, with their heads bowed down,
gazed on the earth in sadness. Wondering what was the reason of this
conduct, he inquired of themselves. No reply did the Sequani make, but
silently continued in the same sadness. When he had repeatedly
inquired of them and could not elicit any answer at all, the same
Divitiacus the Aeduan answered, that--"the lot of the Sequani was more
wretched and grievous than that of the rest, on this account, because
they alone durst not even in secret complain or supplicate aid; and
shuddered at the cruelty of Ariovistus [even when] absent, just as if he
were present; for, to the rest, despite of everything, there was an
opportunity of flight given; but all tortures must be endured by the
Sequani, who had admitted Ariovistus within their territories, and whose
towns were all in his power."

XXXIII.--Caesar, on being informed of these things, cheered the minds of
the Gauls with his words, and promised that this affair should be an
object of his concern, [saying] that he had great hopes that Ariovistus,
induced both by his kindness and his power, would put an end to his
oppression. After delivering this speech, he dismissed the assembly;
and, besides those statements, many circumstances induced him to think
that this affair ought to be considered and taken up by him; especially
as he saw that the Aedui, styled [as they had been] repeatedly by the
senate "brethren" and "kinsmen," were held in the thraldom and dominion
of the Germans, and understood that their hostages were with Ariovistus
and the Sequani, which in so mighty an empire [as that] of the Roman
people he considered very disgraceful to himself and the republic. That,
moreover, the Germans should by degrees become accustomed to cross the
Rhine, and that a great body of them should come into Gaul, he saw
[would be] dangerous to the Roman people, and judged that wild and
savage men would not be likely to restrain themselves, after they had
possessed themselves of all Gaul, from going forth into the province and
thence marching into Italy (as the Cimbri and Teutones had done before
them), particularly as the Rhone [was the sole barrier that] separated
the Sequani from our province. Against which events he thought he ought
to provide as speedily as possible. Moreover, Ariovistus, for his part,
had assumed to himself such pride and arrogance that he was felt to be
quite insufferable.

XXXIV.--He therefore determined to send ambassadors to Ariovistus to
demand of him to name some intermediate spot for a conference between
the two, [saying] that he wished to treat with him on state-business and
matters of the highest importance to both of them. To this embassy
Ariovistus replied, that if he himself had had need of anything from
Caesar, he would have gone to him; and that if Caesar wanted anything
from him he ought to come to him. That, besides, neither dare he go
without an army into those parts of Gaul which Caesar had possession of,
nor could he, without great expense and trouble, draw his army together
to one place; that to him, moreover, it appeared strange what business
either Caesar or the Roman people at all had in his own Gaul, which he
had conquered in war.

XXXV.--When these answers were reported to Caesar, he sends ambassadors
to him a second time with this message "Since, after having been treated
with so much kindness by himself and the Roman people (as he had in his
consulship [B.C. 59] been styled 'king and friend' by the senate), he
makes this recompense to [Caesar] himself and the Roman people, [viz.]
that when invited to a conference he demurs, and does not think that it
concerns him to advise and inform himself about an object of mutual
interest, these are the things which he requires of him; first, that he
do not any more bring over any body of men across the Rhine into Gaul;
in the next place, that he restore the hostages which he has from the
Aedui, and grant the Sequani permission to restore to them with his
consent those hostages which they have, and that he neither provoke the
Aedui by outrage nor make war upon them or their allies; if he would
accordingly do this," [Caesar says] that "he himself and the Roman
people will entertain a perpetual feeling of favour and friendship
towards him; but that if he [Caesar] does not obtain [his desires], that
he (forasmuch as in the consulship of Marcus Messala and Marcus Piso
[B.C. 61] the senate had decreed that, whoever should have the
administration of the province of Gaul should, as far as he could do so
consistently with the interests of the republic, protect the Aedui and
the other friends of the Roman people) will not overlook the wrongs of
the Aedui."

XXXVI.--To this Ariovistus replied, that "the right of war was, that
they who had conquered should govern those whom they had conquered, in
what manner they pleased; that in that way the Roman people were wont to
govern the nations which they had conquered, not according to the
dictation of any other, but according to their own discretion. If he for
his part did not dictate to the Roman people as to the manner in which
they were to exercise their right, he ought not to be obstructed by the
Roman people in his right; that the Aedui, inasmuch as they had tried
the fortune of war and had engaged in arms and been conquered, had
become tributaries to him; that Caesar was doing a great injustice, in
that by his arrival he was making his revenues less valuable to him;
that he should not restore their hostages to the Aedui, but should not
make war wrongfully either upon them or their allies, if they abided by
that which had been agreed on, and paid their tribute annually: if they
did _not_ continue to do that, the Roman people's name of 'brothers'
would avail them nought. As to Caesar's threatening him that be would
not overlook the wrongs of the Aedui, [he said] that no one had ever
entered into a contest with _him_ [Ariovistus] without utter ruin to
himself. That Caesar might enter the lists when he chose; he would feel
what the invincible Germans, well-trained [as they were] beyond all
others to arms, who for fourteen years had not been beneath a roof,
could achieve by their valour."

XXXVII.--At the same time that this message was delivered to Caesar,
ambassadors came from the Aedui and the Treviri; from the Aedui to
complain that the Harudes, who had lately been brought over into Gaul,
were ravaging their territories; that they had not been able to purchase
peace from Ariovistus, even by giving hostages: and from the Treviri,
[to state] that a hundred cantons of the Suevi had encamped on the banks
of the Rhine, and were attempting to cross it; that the brothers, Nasuas
and Cimberius, headed them. Being greatly alarmed at these things,
Caesar thought that he ought to use all despatch, lest, if thus new band
of Suevi should unite with the old troops of Ariovistus, he [Ariovistus]
might be less easily withstood. Having, therefore, as quickly as he
could, provided a supply of corn, he hastened to Ariovistus by forced
marches.

XXXVIII.--When he had proceeded three days' journey, word was brought to
him that Ariovistus was hastening with all his forces to seize on
Vesontio, which is the largest town of the Sequani, and had advanced
three days' journey from his territories. Caesar thought that he ought
to take the greatest precautions lest this should happen, for there was
in that town a most ample supply of everything which was serviceable for
war; and so fortified was it by the nature of the ground as to afford a
great facility for protracting the war, inasmuch as the river Doubs
almost surrounds the whole town, as though it were traced round it with
a pair of compasses. A mountain of great height shuts in the remaining
space, which is not more than 600 feet, where the river leaves a gap, in
such a manner that the roots of that mountain extend to the river's bank
on either side. A wall thrown around it makes a citadel of this
[mountain], and connects it with the town. Hither Caesar hastens by
forced marches by night and day, and, after having seized the town,
stations a garrison there.

XXXIX.--Whilst he is tarrying a few days at Vesontio, on account of corn
and provisions; from the inquiries of our men and the reports of the
Gauls and traders (who asserted that the Germans were men of huge
stature, of incredible valour and practice in arms, that ofttimes they,
on encountering them, could not bear even their countenance, and the
fierceness of their eyes)--so great a panic on a sudden seized the whole
army, as to discompose the minds and spirits of all in no slight degree.
This first arose from the tribunes of the soldiers, the prefects and the
rest, who, having followed Caesar from the city [Rome] from motives of
friendship, had no great experience in military affairs. And alleging,
some of them one reason, some another, which they said made it necessary
for them to depart, they requested that by his consent they might be
allowed to withdraw; some, influenced by shame, stayed behind in order
that they might avoid the suspicion of cowardice. These could neither
compose their countenance, nor even sometimes check their tears: but
hidden in their tents, either bewailed their fate, or deplored with
their comrades the general danger. Wills were sealed universally
throughout the whole camp. By the expressions and cowardice of these
men, even those who possessed great experience in the camp, both
soldiers and centurions, and those [the decurions] who were in command
of the cavalry, were gradually disconcerted. Such of them as wished to
be considered less alarmed, said that they did not dread the enemy, but
feared the narrowness of the roads and the vastness of the forests which
lay between them and Ariovistus, or else that the supplies could not be
brought up readily enough. Some even declared to Caesar that when he
gave orders for the camp to be moved and the troops to advance, the
soldiers would not be obedient to the command, nor advance in
consequence of their fear.

XL.--When Caesar observed these things, having called a council, and
summoned to it the centurions of all the companies, he severely
reprimanded them, "particularly for supposing that it belonged to them
to inquire or conjecture, either in what direction they were marching,
or with what object. That Ariovistus, during his [Caesar's] consulship,
had most anxiously sought after the friendship of the Roman people; why
should any one judge that he would so rashly depart from his duty? He
for his part was persuaded that, when his demands were known and the
fairness of the terms considered, he would reject neither his nor the
Roman people's favour. But even if, driven on by rage and madness, he
should make war upon them, what after all were they afraid of?--or why
should they despair either of their own valour or of his zeal? Of that
enemy a trial had been made within our fathers' recollection, when, on
the defeat of the Cimbri and Teutones by Caius Marius, the army was
regarded as having deserved no less praise than their commander himself.
It had been made lately, too, in Italy; during the rebellion of the
slaves, whom, however, the experience and training which they had
received from us, assisted in some respect. From which a judgment might
be formed of the advantages which resolution carries with it,--inasmuch
as those whom for some time they had groundlessly dreaded when unarmed,
they had afterwards vanquished, when well armed and flushed with
success. In short, that these were the same men whom the Helvetii, in
frequent encounters, not only in their own territories, but also in
theirs [the German], have generally vanquished, and yet cannot have been
a match for our army. If the unsuccessful battle and flight of the Gauls
disquieted any, these, if they made inquiries, might discover that, when
the Gauls had been tired out by the long duration of the war,
Ariovistus, after he had many months kept himself in his camp and in the
marshes, and had given no opportunity for an engagement, fell suddenly
upon them, by this time despairing of a battle and scattered in all
directions, and was victorious more through stratagem and cunning than
valour. But though there had been room for such stratagem against savage
and unskilled men, not even [Ariovistus] himself expected that thereby
our armies could be entrapped. That those who ascribed their fear to a
pretence about the [deficiency of] supplies and the narrowness of the
roads, acted presumptuously, as they seemed either to distrust their
general's discharge of his duty, or to dictate to him. That these things
were his concern; that the Sequani, the Leuci, and the Lingones were to
furnish the corn; and that it was already ripe in the fields; that as to
the road they would soon be able to judge for themselves. As to its
being reported that the soldiers would not be obedient to command, or
advance, he was not at all disturbed at that; for he knew that in the
case of all those whose army had not been obedient to command, either
upon some mismanagement of an affair, fortune had deserted them, or,
that upon some crime being discovered, covetousness had been clearly
proved [against them]. His integrity had been seen throughout his whole
life, his good fortune in the war with the Helvetii. That he would
therefore instantly set about what he had intended to put off till a
more distant day, and would break up his camp the next night, in the
fourth watch, that he might ascertain, as soon as possible, whether a
sense of honour and duty, or whether fear had more influence with them.
But that, if no one else should follow, yet he would go with only the
tenth legion, of which he had no misgivings, and it should be his
praetorian cohort."--This legion Caesar had both greatly favoured, and
in it, on account of its valour, placed the greatest confidence.

XLI.-Upon the delivery of this speech, the minds of all were changed in
a surprising, manner, and the highest ardour and eagerness for
prosecuting the war were engendered; and the tenth legion was the first
to return thanks to him, through their military tribunes, for his having
expressed this most favourable opinion of them; and assured him that
they were quite ready to prosecute the war. Then, the other legions
endeavoured, through their military tribunes and the centurions of the
principal companies, to excuse themselves to Caesar, [saying] that they
had never either doubted or feared, or supposed that the determination
of the conduct of the war was theirs and not their general's. Having
accepted their excuse, and having had the road carefully reconnoitred by
Divitiacus, because in him of all others he had the greatest faith, [he
found] that by a circuitous route of more than fifty miles he might lead
his army through open parts; he then set out in the fourth watch, as he
had said [he would]. On the seventh day, as he did not discontinue his
march, he was informed by scouts that the forces of Ariovistus were only
four and twenty miles distant from ours.

XLII.--Upon being apprised of Caesar's arrival, Ariovistus sends
ambassadors to him, [saying] that what he had before requested as to a
conference, might now, as far as his permission went, take place, since
he [Caesar] had approached nearer, and he considered that he might now
do it without danger. Caesar did not reject the proposal and began to
think that he was now returning to a rational state of mind, as he
spontaneously proffered that which he had previously refused to him when
requesting it; and was in great hopes that, in consideration of his own
and the Roman people's great favours towards him, the issue would be
that he would desist from his obstinacy upon his demands being made
known. The fifth day after that was appointed as the day of conference.
Meanwhile, as ambassadors were being often sent to and fro between them,
Ariovistus demanded that Caesar should not bring any foot-soldier with
him to the conference, [saying] that "he was afraid of being ensnared by
him through treachery; that both should come accompanied by cavalry;
that he would not come on any other condition." Caesar, as he neither
wished that the conference should, by an excuse thrown in the way, be
set aside, nor durst trust his life to the cavalry of the Gauls, decided
that it would be most expedient to take away from the Gallic cavalry all
their horses, and thereon to mount the legionary soldiers of the tenth
legion, in which he placed the greatest confidence; in order that he
might have a body-guard as trustworthy as possible, should there be any
need for action. And when this was done, one of the soldiers of the
tenth legion said, not without a touch of humour, "that Caesar did more
for them than he had promised; he had promised to have the tenth legion
in place of his praetorian cohort; but he now converted them into
horse."

XLIII.--There was a large plain, and in it a mound of earth of
considerable size. This spot was at nearly an equal distance from both
camps. Thither, as had been appointed, they came for the conference.
Caesar stationed the legion, which he had brought [with him] on
horseback, 200 paces from this mound. The cavalry of Ariovistus also
took their stand at an equal distance. Ariovistus then demanded that
they should confer on horseback, and that, besides themselves, they
should bring with them ten men each to the conference. When they were
come to the place, Caesar, in the opening of his speech, detailed his
own and the senate's favours towards him [Ariovistus], "in that he had
been styled king, in that [he had been styled] friend, by the senate--
in that very considerable presents had been sent him; which circumstance
he informed him had both fallen to the lot of few, and had usually been
bestowed in consideration of important personal services; that he,
although he had neither an introduction, nor a just ground for the
request, had obtained these honours through the kindness and munificence
of himself [Caesar] and the senate. He informed him too, how old and how
just were the grounds of connexion that existed between themselves [the
Romans] and the Aedui, what decrees of the senate had been passed in
their favour, and how frequent and how honourable; how from time
immemorial the Aedui had held the supremacy of the whole of Gaul; even
[said Caesar] before they had sought our friendship; that it was the
custom of the Roman people to desire not only that its allies and
friends should lose none of their property, but be advanced in
influence, dignity, and honour: who then could endure that what they had
brought with them to the friendship of the Roman people, should be torn
from them?" He then made the same demands which he had commissioned the
ambassadors to make, that [Ariovistus] should not make war either upon
the Aedui or their allies, that he should restore the hostages; that, if
he could not send back to their country any part of the Germans, he
should at all events suffer none of them any more to cross the Rhine.

XLIV.--Ariovistus replied briefly to the demands of Caesar; but
expatiated largely on his own virtues, "that he had crossed the Rhine
not of his own accord, but on being invited and sent for by the Gauls;
that he had not left home and kindred without great expectations and
great rewards; that he had settlements in Gaul, granted by the Gauls
themselves; that the hostages had been given by their own good-will;
that he took by right of war the tribute which conquerors are accustomed
to impose on the conquered; that he had not made war upon the Gauls, but
the Gauls upon him; that all the states of Gaul came to attack him, and
had encamped against him; that all their forces had been routed and
beaten by him in a single battle; that if they chose to make a second
trial, he was ready to encounter them again; but if they chose to enjoy
peace, it was unfair to refuse the tribute, which of their own free-will
they had paid up to that time. That the friendship of the Roman people
ought to prove to him an ornament and a safeguard, not a detriment; and
that he sought it with that expectation. But if through the Roman people
the tribute was to be discontinued, and those who surrendered to be
seduced from him, he would renounce the friendship of the Roman people
no less heartily than he had sought it. As to his leading over a host of
Germans into Gaul, that he was doing this with a view of securing
himself, not of assaulting Gaul: that there was evidence of this, in
that he did not come without being invited, and in that he did not make
war, but merely warded it off. That he had come into Gaul before the
Roman people. That never before this time did a Roman army go beyond the
frontiers of the province of Gaul. What [said he] does [Caesar] desire?
--why come into his [Ariovistus's] domains?--that this was his province
of Gaul, just as that is ours. As it ought not to be pardoned in him, if
he were to make an attack upon our territories; so, likewise, that we
were unjust to obstruct him in his prerogative. As for Caesar's saying
that the Aedui had been styled 'brethren' by the senate, he was not so
uncivilized nor so ignorant of affairs, as not to know that the Aedui in
the very last war with the Allobroges had neither rendered assistance to
the Romans, nor received any from the Roman people in the struggles
which the Aedui had been maintaining with him and with the Sequani. He
must feel suspicious that Caesar, though feigning friendship as the
reason for his keeping an army in Gaul; was keeping it with the view of
crushing him. And that unless he depart, and withdraw his army from
these parts, he shall regard him not as a friend, but as a foe; and
that, even if he should put him to death, he should do what would please
many of the nobles and leading men of the Roman people; he had assurance
of that from themselves through their messengers, and could purchase the
favour and the friendship of them all by his [Caesar's] death. But if he
would depart and resign to him the free possession of Gaul, he would
recompense him with a great reward, and would bring to a close whatever
wars he wished to be carried on, without any trouble or risk to him."

XLV.--Many things were stated by Caesar to the effect [to show]: "why he
could not waive the business, and that neither his nor the Roman
people's practice would suffer him to abandon most meritorious allies,
nor did he deem that Gaul belonged to Ariovistus rather than to the
Roman people; that the Arverni and the Ruteni had been subdued in war by
Quintus Fabius Maximus, and that the Roman people had pardoned them and
had not reduced them into a province or imposed a tribute upon them. And
if the most ancient period was to be regarded--then was the sovereignty
of the Roman people in Gaul most just: if the decree of the senate was
to be observed, then ought Gaul to be free, which they [the Romans] had
conquered in war, and had permitted to enjoy its own laws."

XLVI.--While these things are being transacted in the conference, it was
announced to Caesar that the cavalry of Ariovistus were approaching
nearer the mound, and were riding up to our men, and casting stones and
weapons at them. Caesar made an end of his speech and betook himself to
his men; and commanded them that they should by no means return a weapon
upon the enemy. For though he saw that an engagement with the cavalry
would be without any danger to his chosen legion, yet he did not think
proper to engage, lest, after the enemy were routed, it might be said
that they had been ensnared by him under the sanction of a conference.
When it was spread abroad among the common soldiery with what
haughtiness Ariovistus had behaved at the conference, and how he had
ordered the Romans to quit Gaul, and how his cavalry had made an attack
upon our men, and how this had broken off the conference, a much greater
alacrity and eagerness for battle was infused into our army.

XLVII.--Two days after, Ariovistus sends ambassadors to Caesar, to state
"that he wished to treat with him about those things which had been
begun to be treated of between them, but had not been concluded"; [and
to beg] that "he would either again appoint a day for a conference; or,
if he were not willing to do that, that he would send one of his
[officers] as an ambassador to him." There did not appear to Caesar any
good reason for holding a conference; and the more so as the day before
the Germans could not be restrained from casting weapons at our men. He
thought he should not without great danger send to him as ambassador one
of his [Roman] officers, and should expose him to savage men. It seemed
[therefore] most proper to send to him C. Valerius Procillus, the son of
C. Valerius Caburus, a young man of the highest courage and
accomplishments (whose father had been presented with the freedom of the
city by C. Valerius Flaccus), both on account of his fidelity and on
account of his knowledge of the Gallic language, which Ariovistus, by
long practice, now spoke fluently; and because in his case the Germans
would have no motive for committing violence; and [as his colleague] M.
Mettius, who had shared the hospitality of Ariovistus. He commissioned
them to learn what Ariovistus had to say, and to report to him. But when
Ariovistus saw them before him in his camp, he cried out in the presence
of his army, "Why were they come to him? was it for the purpose of
acting as spies?" He stopped them when attempting to speak, and cast
them into chains.

XLVIII.--The same day he moved his camp forward and pitched under a hill
six miles from Caesar's camp. The day following he led his forces past
Caesar's camp, and encamped two miles beyond him; with this design--that
he might cut off Caesar from, the corn and provisions which might be
conveyed to him from the Sequani and the Aedui. For five successive days
from that day, Caesar drew out his forces before the camp, and put them
in battle order, that, if Ariovistus should be willing to engage in
battle, an opportunity might not be wanting to him. Ariovistus all this
time kept his army in camp: but engaged daily in cavalry skirmishes. The
method of battle in which the Germans had practised themselves was this.
There were 6000 horse, and as many very active and courageous foot, one
of whom each of the horse selected out of the whole army for his own
protection. By these [foot] they were constantly accompanied in their
engagements; to these the horse retired; these on any emergency rushed
forward; if any one, upon receiving a very severe wound, had fallen from
his horse, they stood around him: if it was necessary to advance
farther: than usual, or to retreat more rapidly, so great, from
practice, was their swiftness, that, supported by the manes of the
horses, they could keep pace with their speed.

XLIX.--Perceiving that Ariovistus kept himself in camp, Caesar, that he
might not any longer be cut off from provisions, chose a convenient
position for a camp beyond that place in which the Germans had encamped,
at about 600 paces from them, and having drawn up his army in three
lines, marched to that place. He ordered the first and second lines to
be under arms; the third to fortify the camp. This place was distant
from the enemy about 600 paces, as has been stated. Thither Ariovistus
sent light troops, about 16,000 men in number, with all his cavalry;
which forces were to intimidate our men, and hinder them in their
fortification. Caesar nevertheless, as he had before arranged, ordered
two lines to drive off the enemy: the third to execute the work. The
camp being fortified, he left there two legions and a portion of the
auxiliaries; and led back the other four legions into the larger camp.

L.--The next day, according to his custom, Caesar led out his forces
from both camps, and having advanced a little from the larger one, drew
up his line of battle, and gave the enemy an opportunity of fighting.
When he found that they did not even then come out [from their
entrenchments], he led back his army into camp about noon. Then at last
Ariovistus sent part of his forces to attack the lesser camp. The battle
was vigorously maintained on both sides till the evening. At sunset,
after many wounds had been inflicted and received, Ariovistus led back
his forces into camp. When Caesar inquired of his prisoners, wherefore
Ariovistus did not come to an engagement, he discovered this to be the
reason--that among the Germans it was the custom for their matrons to
pronounce from lots and divination whether it were expedient that the
battle should be engaged in or not; that they had said, "that it was not
the will of heaven that the Germans should conquer, if they engaged in
battle before the new moon."

LI.--The day following, Caesar left what seemed sufficient as a guard
for both camps; [and then] drew up all the auxiliaries in sight of the
enemy, before the lesser camp, because he was not very powerful in the
number of legionary soldiers, considering the number of the enemy; that
[thereby] he might make use of his auxiliaries for appearance. He
himself, having drawn up his army in three lines, advanced to the camp
of the enemy. Then at last of necessity the Germans drew their forces
out of camp, and disposed them canton by canton, at equal distances, the
Harudes, Marcomanni, Tribocci, Vangiones, Nemetes, Sedusii, Suevi; and
surrounded their whole army with their chariots and waggons, that no
hope might be left in flight. On these they placed their women, who,
with dishevelled hair and in tears, entreated the soldiers, as they went
forward to battle, not to deliver them into slavery to the Romans.

LII.--Caesar appointed over each legion a lieutenant and a questor, that
every one might have them as witnesses of his valour. He himself began
the battle at the head of the right wing, because he had observed that
part of the enemy to be the least strong. Accordingly our men, upon the
signal being given, vigorously made an attack upon the enemy, and the
enemy so suddenly and rapidly rushed forward, that there was no time for
casting the javelins at them. Throwing aside [therefore] their javelins,
they fought with swords hand to hand. But the Germans, according to
their custom, rapidly forming a phalanx, sustained the attack of our
swords. There were found very many of our soldiers who leaped upon the
phalanx, and with their hands tore away the shields, and wounded the
enemy from above. Although the army of the enemy was routed on the left
wing and put to flight, they [still] pressed heavily on our men from the
right wing, by the great number of their troops. On observing which, P.
Crassus, a young man, who commanded the cavalry--as he was more
disengaged than those who were employed in the fight--sent the third
line as a relief to our men who were in distress.

LIII.--Thereupon the engagement was renewed, and all the enemy turned
their backs, nor did they cease to flee until they arrived at the river
Rhine, about fifty miles from that place. There some few, either relying
on their strength, endeavoured to swim over, or, finding boats, procured
their safety. Among the latter was Ariovistus, who meeting with a small
vessel tied to the bank, escaped in it: our horse pursued and slew all
the rest of them. Ariovistus had two wives, one a Suevan by nation, whom
he had brought with him from home; the other a Norican, the sister of
king Vocion, whom he had married in Gaul, she having been sent [thither
for that purpose] by her brother. Both perished in that flight. Of their
two daughters, one was slain, the other captured. C. Valerius Procillus,
as he was being dragged by his guards in the flight, bound with a triple
chain, fell into the hands of Caesar himself, as he was pursuing the
enemy with his cavalry. This circumstance indeed afforded Caesar no less
pleasure than the victory itself; because he saw a man of the first rank
in the province of Gaul, his intimate acquaintance and friend, rescued
from the hand of the enemy, and restored to him, and that fortune had
not diminished aught of the joy and exultation [of that day] by his
destruction. He [Procillus] said that in his own presence the lots had
been thrice consulted respecting him, whether he should immediately be
put to death by fire, or be reserved for another time: that by the
favour of the lots he was uninjured. M. Mettius, also, was found and
brought back to him [Caesar].

LIV.--This battle having been reported beyond the Rhine, the Suevi, who
had come to the banks of that river, began to return home, when the
Ubii, who dwelt nearest to the Rhine, pursuing them, while much alarmed,
slew a great number of them. Caesar having concluded two very important
wars in one campaign, conducted his army into winter quarters among the
Sequani, a little earlier than the season of the year required. He
appointed Labienus over the winter quarters, and set out in person for
Hither Gaul to hold the assizes.



BOOK II

I.--While Caesar was in winter quarters in Hither Gaul, as we have shown
above, frequent reports were brought to him, and he was also informed by
letters from Labienus, that all the Belgae, who we have said are a third
part of Gaul, were entering into a confederacy against the Roman people,
and giving hostages to one another; that the reasons of the confederacy
were these--first, because they feared that, after all [Celtic] Gaul was
subdued, our army would be led against them; secondly, because they were
instigated by several of the Gauls; some of whom as [on the one hand]
they had been unwilling that the Germans should remain any longer in
Gaul, so [on the other] they were dissatisfied that the army of the
Roman people should pass the winter in it, and settle there; and others
of them, from a natural instability and fickleness of disposition, were
anxious for a revolution; [the Belgae were instigated] by several, also,
because the government in Gaul was generally seized upon by the more
powerful persons and by those who had the means of hiring troops, and
they could less easily effect this object under our dominion.

II.--Alarmed by these tidings and letters, Caesar levied two new legions
in Hither Gaul, and, at the beginning of summer, sent Q. Pedius, his
lieutenant, to conduct them further into Gaul. He himself, as soon as
there began to be plenty of forage, came to the army. He gives a
commission to the Senones and the other Gauls who were neighbours of the
Belgae, to learn what is going on amongst them [_i.e._ the Belgae], and
inform him of these matters. These all uniformly reported that troops
were being raised, and that an army was being collected in one place.
Then, indeed, he thought that he ought not to hesitate about proceeding
towards them, and having provided supplies, moves his camp, and in about
fifteen days arrives at the territories of the Belgae.

III.--As he arrived there unexpectedly and sooner than any one
anticipated, the Remi, who are the nearest of the Belgae to [Celtic]
Gaul, sent to him Iccius and Antebrogius, [two of] the principal persons
of the state, as their ambassadors: to tell hum that they surrendered
themselves and all their possessions to the protection and disposal of
the Roman people: and that they had neither combined with the rest of
the Belgae, nor entered into any confederacy against the Roman people:
and were prepared to give hostages, to obey his commands, to receive him
into their towns, and to aid him with corn and other things; that all
the rest of the Belgae were in arms; and that the Germans, who dwell on
this side the Rhine, had joined themselves to them; and that so great
was the infatuation of them all that they could not restrain even the
Suessiones, their own brethren and kinsmen, who enjoy the same rights,
and the same laws, and who have one government and one magistracy [in
common] with themselves, from uniting with them.

IV.--When Caesar inquired of them what states were in arms, how powerful
they were, and what they could do in war, he received the following
information: that the greater part of the Belgae were sprung from the
Germans, and that having crossed the Rhine at an early period, they had
settled there, on account of the fertility of the country, and had
driven out the Gauls who inhabited those regions; and that they were the
only people who, in the memory of our fathers, when all Gaul was
overrun, had prevented the Teutones and the Cimbri from entering their
territories; the effect of which was that, from the recollection of
those events, they assumed to themselves great authority and haughtiness
in military matters. The Remi said that they had known accurately
everything respecting their number, because, being united to them by
neighbourhood and by alliances, they had learnt what number each state
had in the general council of the Belgae promised for that war. That the
Bellovaci were the most powerful amongst them in valour, influence, and
number of men; that these could muster 100,000 armed men, [and had]
promised 60,000 picked men out of that number, and demanded for
themselves the command of the whole war. That the Suessiones were their
nearest neighbours and possessed a very extensive and fertile country;
that among them, even in our own memory, Divitiacus, the most powerful
man of all Gaul, had been king; who had held the government of a great
part of these regions, as well as of Britain; that their king at present
was Galba; that the direction of the whole war was conferred by the
consent of all upon him, on account of his integrity and prudence; that
they had twelve towns; that they had promised 50,000 armed men; and that
the Nervii, who are reckoned the most warlike among them, and are
situated at a very great distance, [had promised] as many; the
Atrebates, 15,000; the Ambiani, 10,000; the Morini, 25,000; the Menapu,
9000; the Caleti, 10,000; the Velocasses and the Veromandui as many; the
Aduatuci, 19,000; that the Condrusi, the Eburones, the Caeraesi, the
Paemani, who are called by the common name of Germans, [had promised],
they thought, to the number of 40,000.

V.--Caesar, having encouraged the Remi, and addressed them courteously,
ordered the whole senate to assemble before him, and the children of
their chief men to be brought to him as hostages; all which commands
they punctually performed by the day [appointed]. He, addressing himself
to Divitiacus the Aeduan, with great earnestness, points out how much it
concerns the republic and their common security, that the forces of the
enemy should be divided, so that it might not be necessary to engage
with so large a number at one time. [He asserts] that this might be
effected if the Aedui would lead their forces into the territories of
the Bellovaci, and begin to lay waste their country. With these
instructions he dismissed him from his presence. After he perceived that
all the forces of the Belgae, which had been collected in one place,
were approaching towards him, and learnt from the scouts whom he had
sent out, and [also] from the Remi, that they were not then far distant,
he hastened to lead his army over the Aisne, which is on the borders of
the Remi, and there pitched his camp. This position fortified one side
of his camp by the banks of the river, rendered the country which lay in
his rear secure from the enemy, and furthermore ensured that provisions
might without danger be brought to him by the Remi and the rest of the
states. Over that river was a bridge: there he places a guard; and on
the other side of the river he leaves Q. Titurus Sabinus, his
lieutenant, with six cohorts. He orders him to fortify a camp with a
rampart twelve feet in height, and a trench eighteen feet in breadth.

VI.--There was a town of the Remi, by name Bibrax, eight miles distant
from this camp. This the Belgae on their march began to attack with
great vigour. [The assault] was with difficulty sustained for that day.
The Gauls' mode of besieging is the same as that of the Belgae: when
after having drawn a large number of men around the whole of the
fortifications, stones have begun to be cast against the wall on all
sides, and the wall has been stript of its defenders, [then], forming a
testudo, they advance to the gates and undermine the wall: which was
easily effected on this occasion; for while so large a number were
casting stones and darts, no one was able to maintain his position upon
the wall. When night had put an end to the assault, Iccius, who was then
in command of the town, one of the Remi, a man of the highest rank and
influence amongst his people, and one of those who had come to Caesar as
ambassador [to sue] for a peace, sends messengers to him, [to report]
"That, unless assistance were sent to him, he could not hold out any
longer."

VII.--Thither immediately after midnight, Caesar, using as guides the
same persons who had come to him as messengers from Iccius, sends some
Numidian and Cretan archers, and some Balearian slingers as a relief to
the townspeople, by whose arrival both a desire to resist together with
the hope of [making good their] defence was infused into the Remi, and,
for the same reason, the hope of gaining the town abandoned the enemy.
Therefore, after staying a short time before the town, and laying waste
the country of the Remi, when all the villages and buildings which they
could approach had been burnt, they hastened with all their forces to
the camp of Caesar, and encamped within less than two miles [of it]; and
their camp, as was indicated by the smoke and fires, extended more than
eight miles in breadth.

VIII.--Caesar at first determined to decline a battle, as well on
account of the great number of the enemy as their distinguished
reputation for valour: daily, however, in cavalry actions, he strove to
ascertain by frequent trials what the enemy could effect by their
prowess and what our men would dare. When he perceived that our men were
not inferior, as the place before the camp was naturally convenient and
suitable for marshalling an army (since the hill where the camp was
pitched, rising gradually from the plain, extended forward in breadth as
far as the space which the marshalled army could occupy, and had steep
declines of its side in either direction, and gently sloping in front
gradually sank to the plain), on either side of that hill he drew a
cross trench of about four hundred paces, and at the extremities of that
trench built forts, and placed there his military engines, lest, after
he had marshalled his army, the enemy, since they were so powerful in
point of number, should be able to surround his men in the flank, while
fighting. After doing this, and leaving in the camp the two legions
which he had last raised, that, if there should be any occasion, they
might be brought as a reserve, he formed the other six legions in order
of battle before the camp. The enemy, likewise, had drawn up their
forces which they had brought out of the camp.

IX.--There was a marsh of no great extent between our army and that of
the enemy. The latter were waiting to see if our men would pass this;
our men, also, were ready in arms to attack them while disordered, if
the first attempt to pass should be made by them. In the meantime battle
was commenced between the two armies by a cavalry action. When neither
army began to pass the marsh, Caesar, upon the skirmishes of the horse
[proving] favourable to our men, led back his forces into the camp. The
enemy immediately hastened from that place to the river Aisne, which it
has been stated was behind our camp. Finding a ford there, they
endeavoured to lead a part of their forces over it; with the design,
that, if they could, they might carry by storm the fort which Q.
Titurius, Caesar's lieutenant, commanded, and might cut off the bridge;
but, if they could not do that, they should lay waste the lands of the
Remi, which were of great use to us in carrying on the war, and might
hinder our men from foraging.

X.--Caesar, being apprised of this by Titurius, leads all his cavalry
and light-armed Numidians, slingers and archers, over the bridge, and
hastens towards them. There was a severe struggle in that place. Our
men, attacking in the river the disordered enemy, slew a great part of
them. By the immense number of their missiles they drove back the rest,
who in a most courageous manner were attempting to pass over their
bodies, and surrounded with their cavalry, and cut to pieces those who
had first crossed the river. The enemy, when they perceived that their
hopes had deceived them both with regard to their taking the town by
storm and also their passing the river, and did not see our men advance
to a more disadvantageous place for the purpose of fighting, and when
provisions began to fail them, having called a council, determined that
it was best for each to return to his country, and resolved to assemble
from all quarters to defend those into whose territories the Romans
should first march an army; that they might contend in their own rather
than in a foreign country, and might enjoy the stores of provisions
which they possessed at home. Together with other causes, this
consideration also led them to that resolution, viz.: that they had
learnt that Divitiacus and the Aedui were approaching the territories of
the Bellovaci. And it was impossible to persuade the latter to stay any
longer, or to deter them from conveying succour to their own people.

XI.--That matter being determined on, marching out of their camp at the
second watch, with great noise and confusion, in no fixed order, nor
under any command, since each sought for himself the foremost place in
the journey, and hastened to reach home, they made their departure
appear very like a flight. Caesar, immediately learning this through his
scouts, [but] fearing an ambuscade, because he had not yet discovered
for what reason they were departing, kept his army and cavalry within
the camp. At daybreak, the intelligence having been confirmed by the
scouts, he sent forward his cavalry to harass their rear; and gave the
command of it to two of his lieutenants, Q. Pedius, and L. Aurunculeius
Cotta. He ordered T. Labienus, another of his lieutenants, to follow
them closely with three legions. These, attacking their rear, and
pursuing them for many miles, slew a great number of them as they were
fleeing; while those in the rear with whom they had come up, halted, and
bravely sustained the attack of our soldiers; the van, because they
appeared to be removed from danger, and were not restrained by any
necessity or command, as soon as the noise was heard, broke their ranks,
and, to a man, rested their safety in flight. Thus without any risk [to
themselves] our men killed as great a number of them as the length of
the day allowed; and at sunset desisted from the pursuit, and betook
themselves into the camp, as they had been commanded.

XII.--On the day following, before the enemy could recover from their
terror and flight, Caesar led his army into the territories of the
Suessiones, which are next to the Remi, and having accomplished a long
march, hastens to the town named Noviodunum. Having attempted to take it
by storm on his march, because he heard that it was destitute of
[sufficient] defenders, he was not able to carry it by assault, on
account of the breadth of the ditch and the height of the wall, though
few were defending it. Therefore, having fortified the camp, he began to
bring up the vineae, and to provide whatever things were necessary for
the storm. In the meantime, the whole body of the Suessiones, after
their flight, came the next night into the town. The vineae having been
quickly brought up against the town, a mound thrown up, and towers
built, the Gauls, amazed by the greatness of the works, such as they had
neither seen nor heard of before, and struck, also, by the despatch of
the Romans, send ambassadors to Caesar respecting a surrender, and
succeed in consequence of the Remi requesting that they [the Suessiones]
might be spared.

XIII.--Caesar, having received as hostages the first men of the state,
and even the two sons of king Galba himself; and all the arms in the
town having been delivered up, admitted the Suessiones to a surrender,
and led his army against the Bellovaci. Who, when they had conveyed
themselves and all their possessions into the town called Bratuspantium,
and Caesar with his army was about five miles distant from that town,
all the old men, going out of the town, began to stretch out their hands
to Caesar, and to intimate by their voice that they would throw
themselves on his protection and power, nor would contend in arms
against the Roman people. In like manner, when he had come up to the
town, and there pitched his camp, the boys and the women from the wall,
with outstretched hands, after their custom, begged peace from the
Romans.

XIV.--For these Divitiacus pleads (for after the departure of the
Belgae, having dismissed the troops of the Aedui, he had returned to
Caesar). "The Bellovaci had at all times been in the alliance and
friendship of the Aeduan state; that they had revolted from the Aedui
and made war upon the Roman people, being urged thereto by their nobles,
who said that the Aedui, reduced to slavery by Caesar, were suffering
every indignity and insult. That they who had been the leaders of that
plot, because they perceived how great a calamity they had brought upon
the state, had fled into Britain. That not only the Bellovaci, but also
the Aedui, entreated him to use his [accustomed] clemency and lenity
towards them [the Bellovaci]: which if he did, he would increase the
influence of the Aedui among all the Belgae, by whose succour and
resources they had been accustomed to support themselves whenever any
wars occurred."

XV.--Caesar said that on account of his respect for Divitiacus and the
Aeduans, he would receive them into his protection, and would spare
them; but, because the state was of great influence among the Belgae,
and pre-eminent in the number of its population, he demanded 600
hostages. When these were delivered, and all the arms in the town
collected, he went from that place into the territories of the Ambiani,
who, without delay, surrendered themselves and all their possessions.
Upon their territories bordered the Nervii, concerning whose character
and customs when Caesar inquired he received the following information:
--That "there was no access for merchants to them; that they suffered no
wine and other things tending to luxury to be imported; because they
thought that by their use the mind is enervated and the courage
impaired: that they were a savage people and of great bravery: that they
upbraided and condemned the rest of the Belgae who had surrendered
themselves to the Roman people and thrown aside their national courage:
that they openly declared they would neither send ambassadors, nor
accept any condition of peace."

XVI.--After he had made three days' march through their territories, he
discovered from some prisoners, that the river Sambre was not more than
ten miles from his camp: that all the Nervii had stationed themselves on
the other side of that river, and together with the Atrebates and the
Veromandui, their neighbours, were there awaiting the arrival of the
Romans; for they had persuaded both these nations to try the same
fortune of war [as themselves]: that the forces of the Aduatuci were
also expected by them, and were on their march; that they had put their
women, and those who through age appeared useless for war, in a place to
which there was no approach for an army, on account of the marshes.

XVII.--Having learnt these things, he sends forward scouts and
centurions to choose a convenient place for the camp. And as a great
many of the surrounding Belgae and other Gauls, following Caesar,
marched with him; some of these, as was afterwards learnt from the
prisoners, having accurately observed, during those days, the army's
method of marching, went by night to the Nervii, and informed them that
a great number of baggage-trains passed between the several legions, and
that there would be no difficulty, when the first legion had come into
the camp, and the other legions were at a great distance, to attack that
legion while under baggage, which being routed, and the baggage-train
seized, it would come to pass that the other legions would not dare to
stand their ground. It added weight also to the advice of those who
reported that circumstance, that the Nervii, from early times, because
they were weak in cavalry (for not even at this time do they attend to
it, but accomplish by their infantry whatever they can), in order that
they might the more easily obstruct the cavalry of their neighbours if
they came upon them for the purpose of plundering, having cut young
trees, and bent them, by means of their numerous branches [extending] on
to the sides, and the quick-briars and thorns springing up between them,
had made these hedges present a fortification like a wall, through which
it was not only impossible to enter, but even to penetrate with the eye.
Since [therefore] the march of our army would be obstructed by these
things, the Nervii thought that the advice ought not to be neglected by
them.

XVIII.--The nature of the ground which our men had chosen for the camp
was this: A hill, declining evenly from the top, extended to the river
Sambre, which we have mentioned above: from this river there arose a
[second] hill of like ascent, on the other side and opposite to the
former, and open from about 200 paces at the lowest part; but in the
upper part, woody, (so much so) that it was not easy to see through it
into the interior. Within those woods the enemy kept themselves in
concealment; a few troops of horse-soldiers appeared on the open ground,
along the river. The depth of the river was about three feet.

XIX.--Caesar, having sent his cavalry on before, followed close after
them with all his forces; but the plan and order of the march was
different from that which the Belgae had reported to the Nervii. For as
he was approaching the enemy Caesar, according to his custom, led on [as
the van] six legions unencumbered by baggage; behind them he had placed
the baggage-trains of the whole army; then the two legions which had
been last raised closed the rear, and were a guard for the baggage-train.
Our horse, with the slingers and archers, having passed the river,
commenced action with the cavalry of the enemy. While they from
time to time betook themselves into the woods to their companions, and
again made an assault out of the wood upon our men, who did not dare to
follow them in their retreat further than the limit to which the plain
and open parts extended, in the meantime the six legions which had
arrived first, having measured out the work, began to fortify the camp.
When the first part of the baggage-train of our army was seen by those
who lay hid in the woods, which had been agreed on among them as the
time for commencing action, as soon as they had arranged their line of
battle and formed their ranks within the woods, and had encouraged one
another, they rushed out suddenly with all their forces and made an
attack upon our horse. The latter being easily routed and thrown into
confusion, the Nervii ran down to the river with such incredible speed
that they seemed to be in the woods, the river, and close upon us almost
at the same time. And with the same speed they hastened up the hill to
our camp and to those who were employed in the works.

XX.--Caesar had everything to do at one time: the standard to be
displayed, which was the sign when it was necessary to run to arms; the
signal to be given by the trumpet; the soldiers to be called off from
the works; those who had proceeded some distance for the purpose of
seeking materials for the rampart, to be summoned; the order of battle
to be formed; the soldiers to be encouraged; the watchword to be given.
A great part of these arrangements was prevented by the shortness of
time and the sudden approach and charge of the enemy. Under these
difficulties two things proved of advantage; [first] the skill and
experience of the soldiers, because, having been trained by former
engagements, they could suggest to themselves what ought to be done, as
conveniently as receive information from others; and [secondly] that
Caesar had forbidden his several lieutenants to depart from the works
and their respective legions, before the camp was fortified. These, on
account of the near approach and the speed of the enemy, did not then
wait for any command from Caesar, but of themselves executed whatever
appeared proper.

XXI.--Caesar, having given the necessary orders, hastened to and fro
into whatever quarter fortune carried him to animate the troops, and
came to the tenth legion. Having encouraged the soldiers with no further
speech than that "they should keep up the remembrance of their wonted
valour, and not be confused in mind, but valiantly sustain the assault
of the enemy"; as the latter were not farther from them than the
distance to which a dart could be cast, he gave the signal for
commencing battle. And having gone to another quarter for the purpose of
encouraging [the soldiers], he finds them fighting. Such was the
shortness of the time, and so determined was the mind of the enemy on
fighting, that time was wanting not only for affixing the military
insignia, but even for putting on the helmets and drawing off the covers
from the shields. To whatever part any one by chance came from the works
(in which he had been employed), and whatever standards he saw first, at
these he stood, lest in seeking his own company he should lose the time
for fighting.

XXII.--The army having been marshalled, rather as the nature of the
ground and the declivity of the hill and the exigency of the time, than
as the method and order of military matters required; whilst the legions
in the different places were withstanding the enemy, some in one
quarter, some in another, and the view was obstructed by the very thick
hedges intervening, as we have before remarked, neither could proper
reserves be posted, nor could the necessary measures be taken in each
part, nor could all the commands be issued by one person. Therefore, in
such an unfavourable state of affairs, various events of fortune
followed.

XXIII.--The soldiers of the ninth and tenth legions, as they had been
stationed on the left part of the army, casting their weapons, speedily
drove the Atrebates (for that division had been opposed to them), who
were breathless with running and fatigue, and worn out with wounds, from
the higher ground into the river; and following them as they were
endeavouring to pass it, slew with their swords a great part of them
while impeded (therein). They themselves did not hesitate to pass the
river; and having advanced to a disadvantageous place, when the battle
was renewed, they [nevertheless] again put to flight the enemy, who had
returned and were opposing them. In like manner, in another quarter two
different legions, the eleventh and the eighth, having routed the
Veromandui, with whom they had engaged, were fighting from the higher
ground upon the very banks of the river. But, almost the whole camp on
the front and on the left side being then exposed, since the twelfth
legion was posted in the right wing, and the seventh at no great
distance from it, all the Nervii, in a very close body, with
Boduognatus, who held the chief command, as their leader, hastened
towards that place; and part of them began to surround the legions on
their unprotected flank, part to make for the highest point of the
encampment.

XXIV.--At the same time our horsemen, and light-armed infantry, who had
been with those who, as I have related, were routed by the first assault
of the enemy, as they were betaking themselves into the camp, met the
enemy face to face, and again sought flight into another quarter; and
the camp-followers who from the Decuman Gate and from the highest ridge
of the hill had seen our men pass the river as victors, when, after
going out for the purposes of plundering, they looked back and saw the
enemy parading in our camp, committed themselves precipitately to
flight; at the same time there arose the cry and shout of those who came
with the baggage-train; and they (affrighted) were carried some one way,
some another. By all these circumstances the cavalry of the Treviri were
much alarmed (whose reputation for courage is extraordinary among the
Gauls, and who had come to Caesar, being sent by their state as
auxiliaries), and, when they saw our camp filled with a large number of
the enemy, the legions hard pressed and almost held surrounded, the
camp-retainers, horsemen, slingers, and Numidians fleeing on all sides
divided and scattered, they, despairing of our affairs, hastened home,
and related to their state that the Romans were routed and conquered,
[and] that the enemy were in possession of their camp and baggage-train.

XXV.--Caesar proceeded, after encouraging the tenth legion, to the right
wing; where he perceived that his men were hard pressed, and that in
consequence of the standards of the twelfth legion being collected
together in one place, the crowded soldiers were a hindrance to
themselves in the fight; that all the centurions of the fourth cohort
were slain, and the standard-bearer killed, the standard itself lost,
almost all the centurions of the other cohorts either wounded or slain,
and among them the chief centurion of the legion, P. Sextius Baculus, a
very valiant man, who was so exhausted by many and severe wounds, that
he was already unable to support himself; he likewise perceived that the
rest were slackening their efforts, and that some, deserted by those in
the rear, were retiring from the battle and avoiding the weapons; that
the enemy [on the other hand], though advancing from the lower ground,
were not relaxing in front, and were [at the same time] pressing hard on
both flanks; he also perceived that the affair was at a crisis, and that
there was not any reserve which could be brought up; having therefore
snatched a shield from one of the soldiers in the rear (for he himself
had come without a shield), he advanced to the front of the line, and
addressing the centurions by name, and encouraging the rest of the
soldiers, he ordered them to carry forward the standards, and extend the
companies, that they might the more easily use their swords. On his
arrival, as hope was brought to the soldiers and their courage restored,
whilst every one for his own part, in the sight of his general, desired
to exert his utmost energy, the impetuosity of the enemy was a little
checked.

XXVI.--Caesar, when he perceived that the seventh legion, which stood
close by him, was also hard pressed by the enemy, directed the tribunes
of the soldiers to effect a junction of the legions gradually, and make
their charge upon the enemy with a double front; which having been done,
since they brought assistance the one to the other, nor feared lest
their rear should be surrounded by the enemy, they began to stand their
ground more boldly, and to fight more courageously. In the meantime, the
soldiers of the two legions which had been in the rear of the army, as a
guard for the baggage-train, upon the battle being reported to them,
quickened their pace, and were seen by the enemy on the top of the hill;
and Titus Labienus, having gained possession of the camp of the enemy,
and observed from the higher ground what was going on in our camp, sent
the tenth legion as a relief to our men, who, when they had learnt from
the flight of the horse and the sutlers in what position the affair was,
and in how great danger the camp and the legion and the commander were
involved, left undone nothing [which tended] to despatch.

XXVI.--By their arrival, so great a change of matters was made, that our
men, even those who had fallen down exhausted with wounds, leant on
their shields, and renewed the fight: then the camp-retainers, though
unarmed, seeing the enemy completely dismayed, attacked [them though]
armed; the horsemen too, that they might by their valour blot out the
disgrace of their flight, thrust themselves before the legionary
soldiers in all parts of the battle. But the enemy, even in the last
hope of safety, displayed such great courage that when the foremost of
them had fallen, the next stood upon them prostrate, and fought from
their bodies; when these were overthrown, and their corpses heaped up
together, those who survived cast their weapons against our men
[thence], as from a mound, and returned our darts which had fallen
between [the armies]; so that it ought not to be concluded, that men of
such great courage had injudiciously dared to pass a very broad river,
ascend very high banks, and come up to a very disadvantageous place;
since their greatness of spirit had rendered these actions easy,
although in themselves very difficult.

XXVIII.--This battle being ended, and the nation and name of the Nervii
being almost reduced to annihilation, their old men, whom together with
the boys and women we have stated to have been collected together in the
fenny places and marshes, on this battle having been reported to them,
since they were convinced that nothing was an obstacle to the
conquerors, and nothing safe to the conquered, sent ambassadors to
Caesar by the consent of all who remained, and surrendered themselves to
him; and in recounting the calamity of their state, said that their
senators were reduced from 600 to three; that from 60,000 men they [were
reduced] to scarcely 500 who could bear arms; whom Caesar, that he might
appear to use compassion towards the wretched and the suppliant, most
carefully spared; and ordered them to enjoy their own territories and
towns, and commanded their neighbours that they should restrain
themselves and their dependants from offering injury or outrage [to
them].

XXIX.--When the Aduatuci, of whom we have written above, were coming
with all their forces to the assistance of the Nervii, upon this battle
being reported to them, they returned home after they were on the march;
deserting all their towns and forts, they conveyed together all their
possessions into one town, eminently fortified by nature. While this
town had on all sides around it very high rocks and precipices, there
was left on one side a gently ascending approach, of not more than 200
feet in width; which place they had fortified with a very lofty double
wall: besides, they had placed stones of great weight and sharpened
stakes upon the walls. They were descended from the Cimbri and Teutones,
who, when they were marching into our province and Italy, having
deposited on this side the river Rhine such of their baggage-trains as
they could not drive or convey with them, left 6000 of their men as a
guard and defence for them. These having, after the destruction of their
countrymen, been harassed for many years by their neighbours, while one
time they waged war offensively, and at another resisted it when waged
against them, concluded a peace with the consent of all, and chose this
place as their settlement.

XXX.--And on the first arrival of our army they made frequent sallies
from the town, and contended with our men in trifling skirmishes:
afterwards, when hemmed in by a rampart of twelve feet [in height], and
fifteen miles in circuit, they kept themselves within the town. When,
vineae having been brought up and a mound raised, they observed that a
tower also was being built at a distance, they at first began to mock
the Romans from their wall, and to taunt them with the following
speeches. "For what purpose was so vast a machine constructed at so
great a distance?" "With what hands," or "with what strength did they,
especially [as they were] men of such very small stature" (for our
shortness of stature, in comparison with the great size of their bodies,
is generally a subject of much contempt to the men of Gaul), "trust to
place against their walls a tower of such great weight."

XXXI.--But when they saw that it was being moved, and was approaching
their walls, startled by the new and unaccustomed sight, they sent
ambassadors to Caesar [to treat] about peace; who spoke in the following
manner: "That they did not believe the Romans waged war without divine
aid, since they were able to move forward machines of such a height with
so great speed, and thus fight from close quarters: that they resigned
themselves and all their possessions to [Caesar's] disposal: that they
begged and earnestly entreated one thing, viz., that if perchance,
agreeably to his clemency and humanity, which they had heard of from
others, he should resolve that the Aduatuci were to be spared, he would
not deprive them of their arms; that all their neighbours were enemies
to them and envied their courage, from whom they could not defend
themselves if their arms were delivered up: that it was better for them,
if they should be reduced to that state, to suffer any fate from the
Roman people, than to be tortured to death by those among whom they had
been accustomed to rule."

XXXII.--To these things Caesar replied, "That he, in accordance with his
custom, rather than owing to their desert, should spare the state, if
they should surrender themselves before the battering-ram should touch
the wall; but that there was no condition of surrender, except upon
their arms being delivered up; that he should do to them that which he
had done in the case of the Nervii, and would command their neighbours
not to offer any injury to those who had surrendered to the Roman
people." The matter being reported to their countrymen, they said that
they would execute his commands. Having cast a very large quantity of
their arms from the wall into the trench which was before the town, so
that the heaps of arms almost equalled the top of the wall and the
rampart, and nevertheless having retained and concealed, as we
afterwards discovered, about a third part in the town, the gates were
opened, and they enjoyed peace for that day.

XXXIII.--Towards evening Caesar ordered the gates to be shut, and the
soldiers to go out of the town, lest the townspeople should receive any
injury from them by night. They [the Aduatuci], by a design before
entered into, as we afterwards understood, because they believed that,
as a surrender had been made, our men would dismiss their guards, or at
least would keep watch less carefully, partly with those arms which they
had retained and concealed, partly with shields made of bark or
interwoven wickers, which they had hastily covered over with skins (as
the shortness of time required) in the third watch, suddenly made a
sally from the town with all their forces [in that direction] in which
the ascent to our fortifications seemed the least difficult. The signal
having been immediately given by fires, as Caesar had previously
commanded, a rush was made thither [_i.e._ by the Roman soldiers] from
the nearest fort; and the battle was fought by the enemy as vigorously
as it ought to be fought by brave men, in the last hope of safety, in a
disadvantageous place, and against those who were throwing their weapons
from a rampart and from towers; since all hope of safety depended on
their courage alone. About 4000 of the men having been slain, the rest
were forced back into the town. The day after, Caesar, after breaking
open the gates, which there was no one then to defend, and sending in
our soldiers, sold the whole spoil of that town. The number of 53,000
persons was reported to him by those who had bought them.

XXXIV.--At the same time he was informed by P. Crassus, whom he had sent
with one legion against the Veneti, the Unelli, the Osismii, the
Curiosolitae, the Sesuvii, the Aulerci, and the Rhedones, which are
maritime states, and touch upon the [Atlantic] ocean, that all these
nations were brought under the dominion and power of the Roman people.

XXXV.--These things being achieved, [and] all Gaul being subdued, so
high an opinion of this war was spread among the barbarians, that
ambassadors were sent to Caesar by those nations who dwelt beyond the
Rhine, to promise that they would give hostages and execute his
commands. Which embassies Caesar, because he was hastening into Italy
and Illyricum, ordered to return to him at the beginning of the
following summer. He himself, having led his legions into winter-quarters
among the Carnutes, the Andes, and the Turones, which states
were close to those regions in which he had waged war, set out for
Italy; and a thanksgiving of fifteen days was decreed for those
achievements, upon receiving Caesar's letter; [an honour] which before
that time had been conferred on none.



BOOK III

I.--When Caesar was setting out for Italy, he sent Servius Galba with
the twelfth legion and part of the cavalry against the Nantuates, the
Veragri, and Seduni, who extend from the territories of the Allobroges,
and the lake of Geneva, and the river Rhone to the top of the Alps. The
reason for sending him was, that he desired that the pass along the
Alps, through which [the Roman] merchants had been accustomed to travel
with great danger, and under great imposts, should be opened. He
permitted him, if he thought it necessary, to station the legion in
these places, for the purpose of wintering. Galba having fought some
successful battles, and stormed several of their forts, upon ambassadors
being sent to him from all parts and hostages given and a peace
concluded, determined to station two cohorts among the Nantuates, and to
winter in person with the other cohorts of that legion in a village of
the Veragri, which is called Octodurus; and this village being situated
in a valley, with a small plain annexed to it, is bounded on all sides
by very high mountains. As this village was divided into two parts by a
river, he granted one part of it to the Gauls, and assigned the other,
which had been left by them unoccupied, to the cohorts to winter in. He
fortified this [latter] part with a rampart and a ditch.

II.--When several days had elapsed in winter quarters, and he had
ordered corn to be brought in, he was suddenly informed by his scouts
that all the people had gone off in the night from that part of the town
which he had given up to the Gauls, and that the mountains which hung
over it were occupied by a very large force of the Sedani and Veragri.
It had happened for several reasons that the Gauls suddenly formed the
design of renewing the war and cutting off that legion. First, because
they despised a single legion, on account of its small number, and that
not quite full (two cohorts having been detached, and several
individuals being absent, who had been despatched for the purpose of
seeking provision); then, likewise, because they thought that on account
of the disadvantageous character of the situation, even their first
attack could not be sustained [by us] when they would rush from the
mountains into the valley, and discharge their weapons upon us. To this
was added, that they were indignant that their children were torn from
them under the title of hostages, and they were persuaded that the
Romans designed to seize upon the summits of the Alps, and unite those
parts to the neighbouring province [of Gaul], not only to secure the
passes, but also as a constant possession.

III.--Having received these tidings, Galba, since the works of the
winter quarters and the fortifications were not fully completed, nor was
sufficient preparation made with regard to corn and other provisions
(since, as a surrender had been made, and hostages received, he had
thought he need entertain no apprehension of a war), speedily summoning
a council, began to anxiously inquire their opinions. In which council,
since so much sudden danger had happened contrary to the general
expectation, and almost all the higher places were seen already covered
with a multitude of armed men, nor could [either] troops come to their
relief, or provisions be brought in, as the passes were blocked up [by
the enemy]; safety being now nearly despaired of, some opinions of this
sort were delivered; that, "leaving their baggage, and making a sally,
they should hasten away for safety by the same routes by which they had
come thither." To the greater part, however, it seemed best, reserving
that measure to the last, to await the issue of the matter, and to
defend the camp.

IV.--A short time only having elapsed, so that time was scarcely given
for arranging and executing those things which they had determined on,
the enemy, upon the signal being given, rushed down [upon our men] from
all parts, and discharged stones and darts upon our rampart. Our men at
first, while their strength was fresh, resisted bravely, nor did they
cast any weapon ineffectually from their higher station. As soon as any
part of the camp, being destitute of defenders, seemed to be hard
pressed, thither they ran, and brought assistance. But they were
over-matched in this, that the enemy when wearied by the long continuance
of the battle, went out of the action, and others with fresh strength
came in their place; none of which things could be done by our men, owing
to the smallness of their number; and not only was permission not given
to the wearied [Roman] to retire from the fight, but not even to the
wounded [was liberty granted] to quit the post where he had been
stationed, and recover.

V.--When they had now been fighting for more than six hours, without
cessation, and not only strength, but even weapons were failing our men,
and the enemy were pressing on more rigorously, and had begun to
demolish the rampart and to fill up the trench, while our men were
becoming exhausted, and the matter was now brought to the last
extremity, P. Sextius Baculus, a centurion of the first rank, whom we
have related to have been disabled by severe wounds in the engagement
with the Nervii, and also C. Volusenus, a tribune of the soldiers, a man
of great skill and valour, hasten to Galba, and assure him that the only
hope of safety lay in making a sally, and trying the last resource.
Whereupon, assembling the centurions, he quickly gives orders to the
soldiers to discontinue the fight a short time, and only collect the
weapons flung [at them], and recruit themselves after their fatigue, and
afterwards, upon the signal being given, sally forth from the camp, and
place in their valour all their hope of safety.

VI.--They do what they were ordered; and, making a sudden sally from all
the gates [of the camp], leave the enemy the means neither of knowing
what was taking place, nor of collecting themselves. Fortune thus taking
a turn, [our men] surround on every side, and slay those who had
entertained the hope of gaining the camp, and having killed more than
the third part of an army of more than 30,000 men (which number of the
barbarians it appeared certain had come up to our camp), put to flight
the rest when panic-stricken, and do not suffer them to halt even upon
the higher grounds. All the forces of the enemy being thus routed, and
stripped of their arms, [our men] betake themselves to their camp and
fortifications. Which battle being finished, inasmuch as Galba was
unwilling to tempt fortune again, and remembered that he had come into
winter quarters with one design, and saw that he had met with a
different state of affairs; chiefly however urged by the want of corn
and provision, having the next day burned all the buildings of that
village, he hastens to return into the province; and as no enemy opposed
or hindered his march, he brought the legion safe into the [country of
the] Nantuates, thence into [that of] the Allobroges, and there
wintered.

VII.--These things being achieved, while Caesar had every reason to
suppose that Gaul was reduced to a state of tranquillity, the Belgae
being overcome, the Germans expelled, the Seduni among the Alps
defeated, and when he had, therefore, in the beginning of winter, set
out for Illyricum, as he wished to visit those nations, and acquire a
knowledge of their countries, a sudden war sprang up in Gaul. The
occasion of that war was this: P. Crassus, a young man, had taken up his
winter quarters with the seventh legion among the Andes, who border upon
the [Atlantic] ocean. He, as there was a scarcity of corn in those
parts, sent out some officers of cavalry and several military tribunes
amongst the neighbouring states, for the purpose of procuring corn and
provision; in which number T. Terrasidius was sent amongst the Esubii;
M. Trebius Gallus amongst the Curiosolitae; Q. Velanius, with T. Silius,
amongst the Veneti.

VIII.--The influence of this state is by far the most considerable of
any of the countries on the whole sea coast, because the Veneti both
have a very great number of ships, with which they have been accustomed
to sail to Britain, and [thus] excel the rest in their knowledge and
experience of nautical affairs; and as only a few ports lie scattered
along that stormy and open sea, of which they are in possession, they
hold as tributaries almost all those who are accustomed to traffic in
that sea. With them arose the beginning [of the revolt] by their
detaining Silius and Velanius; for they thought that they should recover
by their means the hostages which they had given to Crassus. The
neighbouring people, led on by their influence (as the measures of the
Gauls are sudden and hasty), detain Trebius and Terrasidius for the same
motive; and quickly sending ambassadors, by means of their leading men,
they enter into a mutual compact to do nothing except by general
consent, and abide the same issue of fortune; and they solicit the other
states to choose rather to continue in that liberty which they had
received from their ancestors, than endure slavery under the Romans. All
the sea coast being quickly brought over to their sentiments, they send
a common embassy to P. Crassus [to say], "If he wished to receive back
his officers, let him send back to them their hostages."

IX.--Caesar, being informed of these things by Crassus, since he was so
far distant himself, orders ships of war to be built in the meantime on
the river Loire, which flows into the ocean; rowers to be raised from
the province; sailors and pilots to be provided. These matters being
quickly executed, he himself, as soon as the season of the year permits,
hastens to the army. The Veneti, and the other states also, being
informed of Caesar's arrival, when they reflected how great a crime they
had committed, in that the ambassadors (a character which had amongst
all nations ever been sacred and inviolable) had by them been detained
and thrown into prison, resolve to prepare for a war in proportion to
the greatness of their danger, and especially to provide those things
which appertain to the service of a navy; with the greater confidence,
inasmuch as they greatly relied on the nature of their situation. They
knew that the passes by land were cut off by estuaries, that the
approach by sea was most difficult, by reason of our ignorance of the
localities, [and] the small number of the harbours, and they trusted
that our army would not be able to stay very long among them, on account
of the insufficiency of corn; and again, even if all these things should
turn out contrary to their expectation, yet they were very powerful in
their navy. They, well understood that the Romans neither had any number
of ships, nor were acquainted with the shallows, the harbours, or the
islands of those parts where they would have to carry on the war; and
that navigation was very different in a narrow sea from what it was in
the vast and open ocean. Having come to this resolution, they fortify
their towns, convey corn into them from the country parts, bring
together as many ships as possible to Venetia, where it appeared Caesar
would at first carry on the war. They unite to themselves as allies for
that war, the Osismii, the Lexovii, the Nannetes, the Ambiliati, the
Morini, the Diablintes, and the Menapii; and send for auxiliaries from
Britain, which is situated over against those regions.

X.--There were these difficulties which we have mentioned above, in
carrying on the war, but many things, nevertheless, urged Caesar to that
war; the open insult offered to the state in the detention of the Roman
knights, the rebellion raised after surrendering, the revolt after
hostages were given, the confederacy of so many states, but principally,
lest if [the conduct of] this part was overlooked, the other nations
should think that the same thing was permitted them. Wherefore, since he
reflected that almost all the Gauls were fond of revolution, and easily
and quickly excited to war; that all men likewise, by nature, love
liberty and hate the condition of slavery, he thought he ought to divide
and more widely distribute his army, before more states should join the
confederation.

XI.--He therefore sends T. Labienus, his lieutenant, with the cavalry to
the Treviri, who are nearest to the river Rhine. He charges him to visit
the Remi and the other Belgians, and to keep them in their allegiance
and repel the Germans (who were said to have been summoned by the Belgae
to their aid) if they attempted to cross the river by force in their
ships. He orders P. Crassus to proceed into Aquitania with twelve
legionary cohorts and a great number of the cavalry, lest auxiliaries
should be sent into Gaul by these states, and such great nations be
united. He sends Q. Titurius Sabinus, his lieutenant, with three
legions, among the Unelli, the Curiosolitae, and the Lexovii, to take
care that their forces should be kept separate from the rest. He
appoints D. Brutus, a young man, over the fleet and those Gallic vessels
which he had ordered to be furnished by the Pictones and the Santoni,
and the other provinces which remained at peace; and commands him to
proceed towards the Veneti, as soon as he could. He himself hastens
thither with the land forces.

XII.--The sites of their towns were generally such that, being placed on
extreme points [of land] and on promontories, they neither had an
approach by land when the tide had rushed in from the main ocean, which
always happens twice in the space of twelve hours; nor by ships,
because, upon the tide ebbing again, the ships were likely to be dashed
upon the shoals. Thus, by either circumstance, was the storming of their
towns rendered difficult; and if at any time perchance the Veneti,
overpowered by the greatness of our works (the sea having been excluded
by a mound and large dams, and the latter being made almost equal in
height to the walls of the town), had begun to despair of their
fortunes, bringing up a large number of ships, of which they had a very
great quantity, they carried off all their property and betook
themselves to the nearest towns; there they again defended themselves by
the same advantages of situation. They did this the more easily during a
great part of the summer, because our ships were kept back by storms,
and the difficulty of sailing was very great in that vast and open sea,
with its strong tides and its harbours far apart and exceedingly few in
number.

XIII.--For their ships were built and equipped after this manner. The
keels were somewhat flatter than those of our ships, whereby they could
more easily encounter the shallows and the ebbing of the tide: the prows
were raised very high, and in like manner the sterns were adapted to the
force of the waves and storms [which they were formed to sustain]. The
ships were built wholly of oak, and designed to endure any force and
violence whatever; the benches, which were made of planks a foot in
breadth, were fastened by iron spikes of the thickness of a man's thumb;
the anchors were secured fast by iron chains instead of cables, and for
sails they used skins and thin dressed leather. These [were used] either
through their want of canvas and their ignorance of its application, of
for this reason, which is more probable, that they thought that such
storms of the ocean, and such violent gales of wind could not be
resisted by sails, nor ships of such great burden be conveniently enough
managed by them. The encounter of our fleet with these ships was of such
a nature that our fleet excelled in speed alone, and the plying of the
oars; other things, considering the nature of the place [and] the
violence of the storms, were more suitable and better adapted on their
side; for neither could our ships injure theirs with their beaks (so
great was their strength), nor on account of their height was a weapon
easily cast up to them; and for the same reason they were less readily
locked in by rocks. To this was added, that whenever a storm began to
rage and they ran before the wind, they both could weather the storm
more easily and heave to securely in the shallows, and when left by the
tide feared nothing from rocks and shelves: the risk of all which things
was much to be dreaded by our ships.

XIV.--Caesar, after taking many of their towns, perceiving that so much
labour was spent in vain and that the flight of the enemy could not be
prevented on the capture of their towns, and that injury could not be
done them, he determined to wait for his fleet. As soon as it came up
and was first seen by the enemy, about 220 of their ships, fully
equipped and appointed with every kind of [naval] implement, sailed
forth from the harbour, and drew up opposite to ours; nor did it appear
clear to Brutus, who commanded the fleet, or to the tribunes of the
soldiers and the centurions, to whom the several ships were assigned,
what to do, or what system of tactics to adopt; for they knew that
damage could not be done by their beaks; and that, although turrets were
built [on their decks], yet the height of the stems of the barbarian
ships exceeded these; so that weapons could not be cast up from [our]
lower position with sufficient effect, and those cast by the Gauls fell
the more forcibly upon us. One thing provided by our men was of great
service, [viz.] sharp hooks inserted into and fastened upon poles, of a
form not unlike the hooks used in attacking town walls. When the ropes
which fastened the sail-yards to the masts were caught by them and
pulled, and our vessel vigorously impelled with the oars, they [the
ropes] were severed; and when they were cut away, the yards necessarily
fell down; so that as all the hope of the Gallic vessels depended on
their sails and rigging, upon these being cut away, the entire
management of the ships was taken from them at the same time. The rest
of the contest depended on courage; in which our men decidedly had the
advantage; and the more so because the whole action was carried on in
the sight of Caesar and the entire army; so that no act, a little more
valiant than ordinary, could pass unobserved, for all the hills and
higher grounds, from which there was a near prospect of the sea, were
occupied by our army.

XV.--The sail-yards [of the enemy], as we have said, being brought down,
although two and [in some cases] three ships [of theirs] surrounded each
one [of ours], the soldiers strove with the greatest energy to board the
ships of the enemy: and, after the barbarians observed this taking
place, as a great many of their ships were beaten, and as no relief for
that evil could be discovered, they hastened to seek safety in flight.
And, having now turned their vessels to that quarter in which the wind
blew, so great a calm and lull suddenly arose, that they could not move
out of their place, which circumstance, truly, was exceedingly opportune
for finishing the business; for our men gave chase and took them one by
one, so that very few out of all the number, [and those] by the
intervention of night, arrived at the land, after the battle had lasted
almost from the fourth hour till sunset.

XVI.--By this battle the war with the Veneti and the whole of the sea
coast was finished; for both all the youth, and all, too, of more
advanced age, in whom there was any discretion or rank, had assembled in
that battle; and they had collected in that one place whatever naval
forces they had anywhere; and when these were lost, the survivors had no
place to retreat to, nor means of defending their towns. They
accordingly surrendered themselves and all their possessions to Caesar,
on whom Caesar thought that punishment should be inflicted the more
severely, in order that for the future the rights of ambassadors might
be more carefully respected, by barbarians: having, therefore, put to
death all their senate, he sold the rest for slaves.

XVII.--While these things are going on amongst the Veneti, Q. Titurius
Sabinus with those troops which he had received from Caesar, arrives in
the territories of the Unelli. Over these people Viridovix ruled, and
held the chief command of all those states which had revolted: from
which he had collected a large and powerful army. And in those few days,
the Aulerci and the Sexovii, having slain their senate because they
would not consent to be promoters of the war, shut their gates [against
us] and united themselves to Viridovix; a great multitude besides of
desperate men and robbers assembled out of Gaul from all quarters, whom
the hope of plundering and the love of fighting had called away from
husbandry and their daily labour. Sabinus kept himself within his camp,
which was in a position convenient for everything; while Viridovix
encamped over against him at a distance of two miles, and daily bringing
out his forces, gave him an opportunity of fighting; so that Sabinus had
now not only come into contempt with the enemy, but also was somewhat
taunted by the speeches of our soldiers; and furnished so great a
suspicion of his cowardice that the enemy presumed to approach even to
the very rampart of our camp. He adopted this conduct for the following
reason: because he did not think that a lieutenant ought to engage in
battle with so great a force, especially while he who held the chief
command was absent, except on advantageous ground or some favourable
circumstance presented itself.

XVIII.--After having established this suspicion of his cowardice, he
selected a certain suitable and crafty Gaul, who was one of those whom
he had with him as auxiliaries. He induces him by great gifts and
promises to go over to the enemy; and informs [him] of what he wished to
be done. Who, when he arrives amongst them as a deserter, lays before
them the fears of the Romans; and informs them by what difficulties
Caesar himself was harassed, and that the matter was not far removed
from this--that Sabinus would the next night privately draw off his army
out of the camp and set forth to Caesar, for the purpose of carrying
[him] assistance, which, when they heard, they all cry out together that
an opportunity of successfully conducting their enterprise ought not to
be thrown away; that they ought to go to the [Roman] camp. Many things
persuaded the Gauls to this measure; the delay of Sabinus during the
previous days; the positive assertion of the [pretended] deserter; want
of provisions, for a supply of which they had not taken the requisite
precautions; the hope springing from the Venetic war; and [also] because
in most cases men willingly believe what they wish. Influenced by these
things, they do not discharge Viridovix and the other leaders from the
council, before they gained permission from them to take up arms and
hasten to [our] camp; which being granted, rejoicing as if victory were
fully certain, they collected faggots and brushwood, with which to fill
up the Roman trenches, and hasten to the camp.

XIX.--The situation of the camp was a rising ground, gently sloping from
the bottom for about a mile. Thither they proceeded with great speed (in
order that as little time as possible might be given to the Romans to
collect and arm themselves), and arrived quite out of breath. Sabinus
having encouraged his men, gives them the signal, which they earnestly
desired. While the enemy were encumbered by reason of the burdens which
they were carrying, he orders a sally to be suddenly made from two gates
[of the camp]. It happened, by the advantage of situation, by the
unskilfulness and the fatigue of the enemy, by the valour of our
soldiers, and their experience in former battles, that they could not
stand one attack of our men, and immediately turned their backs: and our
men with full vigour followed them while disordered, and slew a great
number of them; the horse pursuing the rest, left but few, who escaped
by flight. Thus at the same time, Sabinus was informed of the naval
battle and Caesar of victory gained by Sabinus; and all the states
immediately surrendered themselves to Titurius: for as the temper of the
Gauls is impetuous and ready to undertake wars, so their mind is weak,
and by no means resolute in enduring calamities.

XX.--About the same time, P. Crassus, when he had arrived in Aquitania
(which, as has been before said, both from its extent of territory and
the great number of its people, is to be reckoned a third part of Gaul),
understanding that he was to wage war in these parts, where a few years
before L. Valerius Praeconinus, the lieutenant, had been killed, and his
army routed, and from which L. Manilius, the proconsul, had fled with
the loss of his baggage, he perceived that no ordinary care must be used
by him. Wherefore, having provided corn, procured auxiliaries and
cavalry, [and] having summoned by name many valiant men from Tolosa,
Carcaso, and Narbo, which are the states of the province of Gaul, that
border on these regions [Aquitania], he led his army into the
territories of the Sotiates. On his arrival being known, the Sotiates
having brought together great forces and [much] cavalry, in which their
strength principally lay, and assailing our army on the march, engaged
first in a cavalry action, then when their cavalry was routed, and our
men pursuing, they suddenly display their infantry forces, which they
had placed in ambuscade in a valley. These attacked our men [while]
disordered, and renewed the fight.

XXI.--The battle was long and vigorously contested, since the Sotiates,
relying on their former victories, imagined that the safety of the whole
of Aquitania rested on their valour; [and] our men, on the other hand,
desired it might be seen what they could accomplish without their
general and without the other legions, under a very young commander; at
length the enemy, worn out with wounds, began to turn their backs, and a
great number of them being slain, Crassus began to besiege the
[principal] town of the Sotiates on his march. Upon their valiantly
resisting, he raised vineae and turrets. They at one time attempting a
sally, at another forming mines to our rampart and vineae (at which the
Aquitani are eminently skilled, because in many places amongst them
there are copper mines); when they perceived that nothing could be
gained by these operations through the perseverance of our men, they
send ambassadors to Crassus, and entreat him to admit them to a
surrender. Having obtained it, they, being ordered to deliver up their
arms, comply.

XXII.--And while the attention of our men is engaged in that matter, in
another part Adcantuannus, who held the chief command, with 600 devoted
followers, whom they call soldurii (the conditions of whose association
are these,--that they enjoy all the conveniences of life with those to
whose friendship they have devoted themselves: if anything calamitous
happen to them, either they endure the same destiny together with them,
or commit suicide: nor hitherto, in the memory of men, has there been
found any one who, upon his being slain to whose friendship he had
devoted himself, refused to die); Adcantuannus, [I say] endeavouring to
make a sally with these, when our soldiers had rushed together to arms,
upon a shout being raised at that part of the fortification, and a
fierce battle had been fought there, was driven back into the town, yet
he obtained from Crassus [the indulgence] that he should enjoy the same
terms of surrender [as the other inhabitants].

XXIII.--Crassus, having received their arms and hostages, marched into
the territories of the Vocates and the Tarusates. But then, the
barbarians being alarmed, because they had heard that a town fortified
by the nature of the place and by art had been taken by us in a few days
after our arrival there, began to send ambassadors into all quarters, to
combine, to give hostages one to another, to raise troops. Ambassadors
also are sent to those states of Hither Spain which are nearest to
Aquitania, and auxiliaries and leaders are summoned from them; on whose
arrival they proceed to carry on the war with great confidence, and with
a great host of men. They who had been with Q. Sertorius the whole
period [of his war in Spain] and were supposed to have very great skill
in military matters, are chosen leaders. These, adopting the practice of
the Roman people, begin to select [advantageous] places, to fortify
their camp, to cut off our men from provisions, which, when Crassus
observes, [and likewise] that his forces, on account of their small
number, could not safely be separated; that the enemy both made
excursions and beset the passes, and [yet] left sufficient guard for
their camp; that on that account, corn and provision could not very
conveniently be brought up to him, and that the number of the enemy was
daily increased, he thought that he ought not to delay in giving battle.
This matter being brought to a council, when he discovered that all
thought the same thing, he appointed the next day for the fight.

XXIV.--Having drawn out all his forces at the break of day, and
marshalled them in a double line, he posted the auxiliaries in the
centre, and waited to see what measures the enemy would take. They,
although on account of their great number and their ancient renown in
war, and the small number of our men, they supposed they might safely
fight, nevertheless considered it safer to gain the victory without any
wound, by besetting the passes [and] cutting off the provisions: and if
the Romans, on account of the want of corn, should begin to retreat,
they intended to attack them while encumbered in their march and
depressed in spirit [as being assailed while] under baggage. This
measure being approved of by the leaders and the forces of the Romans
drawn out, the enemy [still] kept themselves in their camp. Crassus
having remarked this circumstance, since the enemy, intimidated by their
own delay, and by the reputation [_i.e._ for cowardice arising thence]
had rendered our soldiers more eager for fighting, and the remarks of
all were heard [declaring] that no longer ought delay to be made in
going to the camp, after encouraging his men, he marches to the camp of
the enemy, to the great gratification of his own troops.

XXV.--There, while some were filling up the ditch, and others, by
throwing a large number of darts, were driving the defenders from the
rampart and fortifications, and the auxiliaries, on whom Crassus did not
much rely in the battle, by supplying stones and weapons [to the
soldiers], and by conveying turf to the mound, presented the appearance
and character of men engaged in fighting; while also the enemy were
fighting resolutely and boldly, and their weapons, discharged from their
higher position, fell with great effect; the horse, having gone round
the camp of the enemy, reported to Crassus that the camp was not
fortified with equal care on the side of the Decuman gate, and had an
easy approach.

XXVI.--Crassus, having exhorted the commanders of the horse to animate
their men by great rewards and promises, points out to them what he
wished to have done. They, as they had been commanded, having brought
out the four cohorts, which, as they had been left as a guard for the
camp, were not fatigued by exertion, and having led them round by a
somewhat longer way, lest they could be seen from the camp of the enemy,
when the eyes and minds of all were intent upon the battle, quickly
arrived at those fortifications which we have spoken of, and, having
demolished these, stood in the camp of the enemy before they were seen
by them, or it was known what was going on. And then, a shout being
heard in that quarter, our men, their strength having been recruited
(which usually occurs on the hope of victory), began to fight more
vigorously. The enemy, surrounded on all sides, [and] all their affairs
being despaired of, made great attempts to cast themselves down over the
ramparts and to seek safety in flight. These the cavalry pursued over
the very open plains, and after leaving scarcely a fourth part out of
the number of 50,000, which it was certain had assembled out of
Aquitania and from the Cantabri, returned late at night to the camp.

XXVII.--Having heard of this battle, the greatest part of Aquitania
surrendered itself to Crassus, and of its own accord sent hostages, in
which number were the Tarbelli, the Bigerriones, the Preciani, the
Vocasates, the Tarusates, the Elurates, the Garites, the Ausci, the
Garumni, the Sibuzates, the Cocosates. A few [and those] most remote
nations, relying on the time of the year, because winter was at hand,
neglected to do this.

XXVIII.--About the same time Caesar, although the summer was nearly
past, yet since, all Gaul being reduced, the Morini and the Menapii
alone remained in arms, and had never sent ambassadors to him [to make a
treaty] of peace, speedily led his army thither, thinking that that war
might soon be terminated. They resolved to conduct the war on a very
different method from the rest of the Gauls; for as they perceived that
the greatest nations [of Gaul] who had engaged in war, had been routed
and overcome, and as they possessed continuous ranges of forests and
morasses, they removed themselves and all their property thither. When
Caesar had arrived at the opening of these forests, and had begun to
fortify his camp, and no enemy was in the meantime seen, while our men
were dispersed on their respective duties, they suddenly rushed out from
all parts of the forest, and made an attack on our men. The latter
quickly took up arms and drove them back again to their forests; and
having killed a great many, lost a few of their own men while pursuing
them too far through those intricate places.

XXIX.--During the remaining days after this, Caesar began to cut down
the forests; and that no attack might be made on the flank of the
soldiers, while unarmed and not foreseeing it, he placed together
(opposite to the enemy) all that timber which was cut down, and piled it
up as a rampart on either flank. When a great space had been, with
incredible speed, cleared in a few days, when the cattle [of the enemy]
and the rear of their baggage-train were already seized by our men, and
they themselves were seeking for the thickest parts of the forests,
storms of such a kind came on that the work was necessarily suspended,
and, through the continuance of the rains, the soldiers could not any
longer remain in their tents. Therefore, having laid waste all their
country, [and] having burnt their villages and houses, Caesar led back
his army and stationed them in winter-quarters among the Aulerci and
Lexovii, and the other states which had made war upon him last.



BOOK IV

I.-The following winter (this was the year in which Cn. Pompey and M.
Crassus were consuls), those Germans [called] the Usipetes, and likewise
the Tenchtheri, with a great number of men, crossed the Rhine, not far
from the place at which that river discharges itself into the sea. The
motive for crossing [that river] was that, having been for several years
harassed by the Suevi, they were constantly engaged in war, and hindered
from the pursuits of agriculture. The nation of the Suevi is by far the
largest and the most warlike nation of all the Germans. They are said to
possess a hundred cantons, from each of which they yearly send from
their territories for the purpose of war a thousand armed men: the
others who remain at home, maintain [both] themselves and those engaged
in the expedition. The latter again, in their turn, are in arms the year
after: the former remain at home. Thus neither husbandry nor the art and
practice of war are neglected. But among them there exists no private
and separate land; nor are they permitted to remain more than one year
in one place for the purpose of residence. They do not live much on
corn, but subsist for the most part on milk and flesh, and are much
[engaged] in hunting; which circumstance must, by the nature of their
food, and by their daily exercise and the freedom of their life (for
having from boyhood been accustomed to no employment, or discipline,
they do nothing at all contrary to their inclination), both promote
their strength and render them men of vast stature of body. And to such
a habit have they brought themselves, that even in the coldest parts
they wear no clothing whatever except skins, by reason of the scantiness
of which a great portion of their body is bare, and besides they bathe
in open rivers.

II.--Merchants have access to them rather that they may have persons to
whom they may sell those things which they have taken in war, than
because they need any commodity to be imported to them. Moreover, even
as to labouring cattle, in which the Gauls take the greatest pleasure,
and which they procure at a great price, the Germans do not employ such
as are imported, but those poor and ill-shaped animals which belong to
their country; these, however, they render capable of the greatest
labour by daily exercise. In cavalry actions they frequently leap from
their horses and fight on foot; and train their horses to stand still in
the very spot on which they leave them, to which they retreat with great
activity when there is occasion; nor, according to their practice, is
anything regarded as more unseemly, or more unmanly, than to use
housings. Accordingly, they have the courage, though they be themselves
but few, to advance against any number whatever of horse mounted with
housings. They on no account permit wine to be imported to them, because
they consider that men degenerate in their powers of enduring fatigue,
and are rendered effeminate by that commodity.

III.--They esteem it their greatest praise as a nation that the lands
about their territories lie unoccupied to a very great extent, inasmuch
as [they think] that by this circumstance is indicated that a great
number of nations cannot, withstand their power; and thus on one side of
the Suevi the lands are said to lie desolate for about six hundred
miles. On the other side they border on the Ubii, whose state was large
and flourishing, considering the condition of the Germans, and who are
somewhat more refined than those of the same race and the rest [of the
Germans], and that because they border on the Rhine, and are much
resorted to by merchants, and are accustomed to the manners of the
Gauls, by reason of their approximity to them. Though the Suevi, after
making the attempt frequently and in several wars, could not expel this
nation from their territories, on account of the extent and population
of their state, yet they made them tributaries, and rendered them less
distinguished and powerful [than they had ever been].

IV.--In the same condition were the Usipetes and the Tenchtheri (whom we
have mentioned above), who for many years resisted the power of the
Suevi, but being at last driven from their possessions, and having
wandered through many parts of Germany, came to the Rhine, to districts
which the Menapii inhabited, and where they had lands, houses, and
villages on either side of the river. The latter people, alarmed by the
arrival of so great a multitude, removed from those houses which they
had on the other side of the river, and having placed guards on this
side the Rhine, proceeded to hinder the Germans from crossing. They,
finding themselves, after they had tried all means, unable either to
force a passage on account of their deficiency in shipping, or cross by
stealth on account of the guards of the Menapii, pretended to return to
their own settlements and districts; and, after having proceeded three
days' march, returned; and their cavalry having performed the whole of
this journey in one night, cut off the Menapii, who were ignorant of,
and did not expect [their approach, and] who, having moreover been
informed of the departure of the Germans by their scouts, had without
apprehension returned to their villages beyond the Rhine. Having slain
these, and seized their ships, they crossed the river before that part
of the Menapii, who were at peace in their settlements over the Rhine,
were apprised of [their intention]; and seizing all their houses,
maintained themselves upon their provisions during the rest of the
winter.

V.--Caesar, when informed of these matters, fearing the fickle
disposition of the Gauls, who are easily prompted to take up
resolutions, and much addicted to change, considered that nothing was to
be entrusted to them; for it is the custom of that people to compel
travellers to stop, even against their inclination, and inquire what
they may have heard, or may know, respecting any matter; and in towns
the common people throng around merchants and force them to state from
what countries they come, and what affairs they know of there. They
often engage in resolutions concerning the most important matters,
induced by these reports and stories alone; of which they must
necessarily instantly repent, since they yield to mere unauthorised
reports; and since most people give to their questions answers framed
agreeably to their wishes.

VI.--Caesar, being aware of their custom, in order that he might not
encounter a more formidable war, sets forward to the army earlier in the
year than he was accustomed to do. When he had arrived there, he
discovered that those things, which he had suspected would occur, had
taken place; that embassies had been sent to the Germans by some of the
states, and that they had been entreated to leave the Rhine, and had
been promised that all things which they desired should be provided by
the Gauls. Allured by this hope, the Germans were then making excursions
to greater distances, and had advanced to the territories of the
Eburones and the Condrusi, who are under the protection of the Treviri.
After summoning the chiefs of Gaul, Caesar thought proper to pretend
ignorance of the things which he had discovered; and having conciliated
and confirmed their minds, and ordered some cavalry to be raised,
resolved to make war against the Germans.

VII.--Having provided corn and selected his cavalry, he began to direct
his march towards those parts in which he heard the Germans were. When
he was distant from them only a few days' march, ambassadors come to him
from their state; whose speech was as follows:--"That the Germans
neither make war upon the Roman people first, nor do they decline, if
they are provoked, to engage with them in arms; for that this was the
custom of the Germans handed down to them from their forefathers, to
resist whatsoever people make war upon them and not to avert it by
entreaty; this, however, they confessed,--that they had come hither
reluctantly, having been expelled from their country. If the Romans were
disposed to accept their friendship, they might be serviceable allies to
them; and let them either assign them lands, or permit them to retain
those which they had acquired by their arms; that they are inferior to
the Suevi alone, to whom not even the immortal gods can show themselves
equal; that there was none at all besides on earth whom they could not
conquer."

VIII.--To these remarks Caesar replied in such terms as he thought
proper; but the conclusion of his speech was, "That he could make no
alliance with them, if they continued in Gaul; that it was not probable
that they who were not able to defend their own territories, should get
possession of those of others, nor were there any lands lying waste in
Gaul which could be given away, especially to so great a number of men,
without doing wrong [to others]; but they might, if they were desirous,
settle in the territories of the Ubii; whose ambassadors were then with
him, and were complaining of the aggressions of the Suevi, and
requesting assistance from him; and that he would obtain this request
from them."

IX.--The ambassadors said that they would report these things to their
countrymen; and, after having deliberated on the matter, would return to
Caesar after the third day, they begged that he would not in the
meantime advance his camp nearer to them. Caesar said that he could not
grant them even that; for he had learned that they had sent a great part
of their cavalry over the Meuse to the Ambivariti, some days before, for
the purpose of plundering and procuring forage. He supposed that they
were then waiting for these horse, and that the delay was caused on this
account.

X.--The Meuse rises from mount Le Vosge, which is in the territories of
the Lingones; and, having received a branch of the Rhine, which is
called the Waal, forms the island of the Batavi, and not more than
eighty miles from it it falls into the ocean. But the Rhine takes its
course among the Lepontii, who inhabit the Alps, and is carried with a
rapid current for a long distance through the territories of the
Sarunates, Helvetii, Sequani, Mediomatrici, Tribuci, and Treviri, and
when it approaches the ocean, divides into several branches; and, having
formed many and extensive islands, a great part of which are inhabited
by savage and barbarous nations (of whom there are some who are supposed
to live on fish and the eggs of sea-fowl), flows into the ocean by
several mouths.

XI.--When Caesar was not more than twelve miles distant from the enemy,
the ambassadors return to him, as had been arranged; who meeting him on
the march, earnestly entreated him not to advance any farther. When they
could not obtain this, they begged him to send on a despatch to those
who had marched in advance of the main army, and forbid them to engage;
and grant them permission to send ambassadors to the Ubii, and if the
princes and senate of the latter would give them security by oath, they
assured Caesar that they would accept such conditions as might be
proposed by him; and requested that he would give them the space of
three days for negotiating these affairs. Caesar thought that these
things tended to the self-same point [as their other proposal]; [namely]
that, in consequence of a delay of three days intervening, their horse
which were at a distance might return; however, he said, that he would
not that day advance farther than four miles for the purpose of
procuring water; he ordered that they should assemble at that place in
as large a number as possible the following day, that he might inquire
into their demands. In the meantime he sends messengers to the officers
who had marched in advance with all the cavalry to order them not to
provoke the enemy to an engagement, and if they themselves were
assailed, to sustain the attack until he came up with the army.

XII.--But the enemy, as soon as they saw our horse, the number of which
was 5000, whereas they themselves had not more than 800 horse, because
those which had gone over the Meuse for the purpose of foraging had not
returned, while our men had no apprehensions, because their ambassadors
had gone away from Caesar a little before, and that day had been
requested by them as a period of truce, made an onset on our men, and
soon threw them into disorder. When our men, in their turn, made a
stand, they, according to their practice, leaped from their horses to
their feet, and stabbing our horses in the belly and overthrowing a
great many of our men, put the rest to flight, and drove them forward so
much alarmed that they did not desist from their retreat till they had
come in sight of our army. In that encounter seventy-four of our horse
were slain; among them, Piso, an Aquitanian, a most valiant man, and
descended from a very illustrious family; whose grandfather had held the
sovereignty of his state, and had been styled friend by our senate. He,
while he was endeavouring to render assistance to his brother who was
surrounded by the enemy, and whom he rescued from danger, was himself
thrown from his horse, which was wounded under him, but still opposed
[his antagonists] with the greatest intrepidity, as long as he was able
to maintain the conflict. When at length he fell, surrounded on all
sides and after receiving many wounds, and his brother, who had then
retired from the fight, observed it from a distance, he spurred on his
horse, threw himself upon the enemy, and was killed.

XIII.--After this engagement, Caesar considered that neither ought
ambassadors to be received to audience, nor conditions be accepted by
him from those who, after having sued for peace by way of stratagem and
treachery, had made war without provocation. And to wait till the
enemy's forces were augmented and their cavalry had returned, he
concluded, would be the greatest madness; and knowing the fickleness of
the Gauls, he felt how much influence the enemy had already acquired
among them by this one skirmish. He [therefore] deemed that no time for
converting measures ought to be afforded them. After having resolved on
these things and communicated his plans to his lieutenants and quaestor
in order that he might not suffer any opportunity for engaging to escape
him, a very seasonable event occurred, namely, that on the morning of
the next day, a large body of Germans, consisting of their princes and
old men, came to the camp to him to practise the same treachery and
dissimulation; but, as they asserted, for the purpose of acquitting
themselves for having engaged in a skirmish the day before, contrary to
what had been agreed and to what, indeed, they themselves had requested;
and also if they could by any means obtain a truce by deceiving him.
Caesar, rejoicing that they had fallen into his power, ordered them to
be detained. He then drew all his forces out of the camp, and commanded
the cavalry, because he thought they were intimidated by the late
skirmish, to follow in the rear.

XIV.--Having marshalled his army in three lines, and in a short time
performed a march of eight miles, he arrived at the camp of the enemy
before the Germans could perceive what was going on; who being suddenly
alarmed by all the circumstances, both by the speediness of our arrival
and the absence of their own officers, as time was afforded neither for
concerting measures nor for seizing their arms, are perplexed as to
whether it would be better to lead out their forces against the enemy,
or to defend their camp, or seek their safety by flight. Their
consternation being made apparent by their noise and tumult, our
soldiers, excited by the treachery of the preceding day, rushed into the
camp: such of them as could readily get their arms for a short time
withstood our men, and gave battle among their carts and baggage-waggons;
but the rest of the people, [consisting] of boys and women (for they had
left their country and crossed the Rhine with all their families), began
to fly in all directions; in pursuit of whom Caesar sent the cavalry.

XV.--The Germans when, upon hearing a noise behind them, [they looked
and] saw that their families were being slain, throwing away their arms
and abandoning their standards, fled out of the camp, and when they had
arrived at the confluence of the Meuse and the Rhine, the survivors
despairing of farther escape, as a great number of their countrymen had
been killed, threw themselves into the river and there perished,
overcome by fear, fatigue, and the violence of the stream. Our soldiers,
after the alarm of so great a war, for the number of the enemy amounted
to 430,000, returned to their camp, all safe to a man, very few being
even wounded. Caesar granted those whom he had detained in the camp
liberty of departing. They however, dreading revenge and torture from
the Gauls, whose lands they had harassed, said that they desired to
remain with him. Caesar granted them permission.

XVI.--The German war being finished, Caesar thought it expedient for him
to cross the Rhine, for many reasons; of which this was the most
weighty, that, since he saw the Germans were so easily urged to go into
Gaul, he desired they should have their fears for their own territories
when they discovered that the army of the Roman people both could and
dared pass the Rhine. There was added also, that that portion of the
cavalry of the Usipetes and the Tenchtheri, which I have above related
to have crossed the Meuse for the purpose of plundering and procuring
forage, and was not present at the engagement, had betaken themselves,
after the retreat of their countrymen, across the Rhine into the
territories of the Sigambri, and united themselves to them. When Caesar
sent ambassadors to them, to demand that they should give up to him
those who had made war against him and against Gaul, they replied, "That
the Rhine bounded the empire of the Roman people; if he did not think it
just for the Germans to pass over into Gaul against his consent, why did
he claim that anything beyond the Rhine should be subject to his
dominion or power?" The Ubii also, who alone, out of all the nations
lying beyond the Rhine, had sent ambassadors to Caesar, and formed an
alliance and given hostages, earnestly entreated "that he would bring
them assistance, because they were grievously oppressed by the Suevi;
or, if he was prevented from doing so by the business of the
commonwealth, he would at least transport his army over the Rhine; that
that would be sufficient for their present assistance and their hope for
the future; that so great was the name and the reputation of his army,
even among the most remote nations of the Germans, arising from the
defeat of Ariovistus and this last battle which was fought, that they
might be safe under the fame and friendship of the Roman people." They
promised a large number of ships for transporting the army.

XVII.--Caesar, for those reasons which I have mentioned, had resolved to
cross the Rhine; but to cross by ships he neither deemed to be
sufficiently safe, nor considered consistent with his own dignity or
that of the Roman people. Therefore, although the greatest difficulty in
forming a bridge was presented to him, on account of the breadth,
rapidity, and depth of the river, he nevertheless considered that it
ought to be attempted by him, or that his army ought not otherwise to be
led over. He devised this plan of a bridge. He joined together at the
distance of two feet, two piles, each a foot and a half thick, sharpened
a little at the lower end, and proportioned in length to the depth of
the river. After he had, by means of engines, sunk these into the river,
and fixed them at the bottom, and then driven them in with rammers, not
quite perpendicularly, like a stake, but bending forward and sloping, so
as to incline in the direction of the current of the river; he also
placed two [other piles] opposite to these, at the distance of forty
feet lower down, fastened together in the same manner, but directed
against the force and current of the river. Both these, moreover, were
kept firmly apart by beams two feet thick (the space which the binding
of the piles occupied), laid in at their extremities between two braces
on each side; and in consequence of these being in different directions
and fastened on sides the one opposite to the other, so great was the
strength of the work, and such the arrangement of the materials, that in
proportion as the greater body of water dashed against the bridge, so
much the closer were its parts held fastened together. These beams were
bound together by timber laid over them in the direction of the length
of the bridge, and were [then] covered over with laths and hurdles; and
in addition to this, piles were driven into the water obliquely, at the
lower side of the bridge, and these serving as buttresses, and being
connected with every portion of the work, sustained the force of the
stream: and there were others also above the bridge, at a moderate
distance; that if trunks of trees or vessels were floated down the river
by the barbarians for the purpose of destroying the work, the violence
of such things might be diminished by these defences, and might not
injure the bridge.

XVIII.--Within ten days after the timber began to be collected, the
whole work was completed, and the whole army led over. Caesar, leaving a
strong guard at each end of the bridge, hastens into the territories of
the Sigambri. In the meantime ambassadors from several nations come to
him, whom, on their suing for peace and alliance, he answers in a
courteous manner, and orders hostages to be brought to him. But the
Sigambri, at the very time the bridge was begun to be built, made
preparations for a flight (by the advice of such of the Tenchtheri and
Usipetes as they had amongst them), and quitted their territories and
conveyed away all their possessions, and concealed themselves in deserts
and woods.

XIX.--Caesar, having remained in their territories a few days, and burnt
all their villages and houses, and cut down their corn, proceeded into
the territories of the Ubii; and having promised them his assistance, if
they were ever harassed by the Suevi, he learned from them these
particulars: that the Suevi, after they had by means of their scouts
found that the bridge was being built, had called a council, according
to their custom, and sent orders to all parts of their state to remove
from the towns and convey their children, wives, and all their
possessions into the woods, and that all who could bear arms should
assemble in one place; that the place thus chosen was nearly the centre
of those regions which the Suevi possessed; that in this spot they had
resolved to await the arrival of the Romans, and give them battle there.
When Caesar discovered this, having already accomplished all those
things on account of which he had resolved to lead his army over,
namely, to strike fear into the Germans, take vengeance on the Sigambri,
and free the Ubii from the invasion of the Suevi, having spent
altogether eighteen days beyond the Rhine, and thinking he had advanced
far enough to serve both honour and interest, he returned into Gaul, and
cut down the bridge.

XX.--During the short part of summer which remained, Caesar, although in
these countries, as all Gaul lies towards the north, the winters are
early, nevertheless resolved to proceed into Britain, because he
discovered that in almost all the wars with the Gauls succours had been
furnished to our enemy from that country; and even if the time of year
should be insufficient for carrying on the war, yet he thought it would
be of great service to him if he only entered the island, and saw into
the character of the people, and got knowledge of their localities,
harbours, and landing-places, all which were for the most part unknown
to the Gauls. For neither does any one except merchants generally go
thither, nor even to them was any portion of it known, except the
sea-coast and those parts which are opposite to Gaul. Therefore, after
having called up to him the merchants from all parts, he could learn
neither what was the size of the island, nor what or how numerous were
the nations which inhabited it, nor what system of war they followed,
nor what customs they used, nor what harbours were convenient for a
great number of large ships.

XXI.--He sends before him Caius Volusenus with a ship of war, to acquire
a knowledge of these particulars before he in person should make a
descent into the island, as he was convinced that this was a judicious
measure. He commissioned him to thoroughly examine into all matters, and
then return to him as soon as possible. He himself proceeds to the
Morini with all his forces. He orders ships from all parts of the
neighbouring countries, and the fleet which the preceding summer he had
built for the war with the Veneti, to assemble in this place. In the
meantime, his purpose having been discovered, and reported to the
Britons by merchants, ambassadors come to him from several states of the
island, to promise that they will give hostages, and submit to the
government of the Roman people. Having given them an audience, he after
promising liberally, and exhorting them to continue in that purpose,
sends them back to their own country, and [despatches] with them
Commius, whom, upon subduing the Atrebates, he had created king there, a
man whose courage and conduct he esteemed, and who he thought would be
faithful to him, and whose influence ranked highly in those countries.
He orders him to visit as many states as he could, and persuade them to
embrace the protection of the Roman people, and apprise them that he
would shortly come thither. Volusenus, having viewed the localities as
far as means could be afforded one who dared not leave his ship and
trust himself to barbarians, returns to Caesar on the fifth day, and
reports what he had there observed.

XXII.--While Caesar remains in these parts for the purpose of procuring
ships, ambassadors come to him from a great portion of the Morini, to
plead their excuse respecting their conduct on the late occasion;
alleging that it was as men uncivilised, and as those who were
unacquainted with our custom, that they had made war upon the Roman
people, and promising to perform what he should command. Caesar,
thinking that this had happened fortunately enough for him, because he
neither wished to leave an enemy behind him, nor had an opportunity for
carrying on a war, by reason of the time of year, nor considered that
employment in such trifling matters was to be preferred to his
enterprise on Britain, imposes a large number of hostages; and when
these were brought, he received them to his protection. Having collected
together and provided about eighty transport ships, as many as he
thought necessary for conveying over two legions, he assigned such
[ships] of war as he had besides to the quaestor, his lieutenants, and
officers of cavalry. There were in addition to these eighteen ships of
burden which were prevented, eight miles from that place, by winds, from
being able to reach the same port. These he distributed amongst the
horse; the rest of the army he delivered to Q. Titurius Sabinus and L.
Aurunculeius Cotta, his lieutenants, to lead into the territories of the
Menapii and those cantons of the Morini from which ambassadors had not
come to him. He ordered P. Sulpicius Rufus, his lieutenant, to hold
possession of the harbour, with such a garrison as he thought
sufficient.

XXIII.--These matters being arranged, finding the weather favourable for
his voyage, he set sail about the third watch, and ordered the horse to
march forward to the farther port, and there embark and follow him. As
this was performed rather tardily by them, he himself reached Britain
with the first squadron of ships, about the fourth hour of the day, and
there saw the forces of the enemy drawn up in arms on all the hills. The
nature of the place was this: the sea was confined by mountains so close
to it that a dart could be thrown from their summit upon the shore.
Considering this by no means a fit place for disembarking, he remained
at anchor till the ninth hour, for the other ships to arrive there.
Having in the meantime assembled the lieutenants and military tribunes,
he told them both what he had learnt from Volusenus, and what he wished
to be done; and enjoined them (as the principle of military matters, and
especially as maritime affairs, which have a precipitate and uncertain
action, required) that all things should be performed by them at a nod
and at the instant. Having dismissed them, meeting both with wind and
tide favourable at the same time, the signal being given and the anchor
weighed, he advanced about seven miles from that place, and stationed
his fleet over against an open and level shore.

XXIV.--But the barbarians, upon perceiving the design of the Romans,
sent forward their cavalry and charioteers, a class of warriors of whom
it is their practice to make great use in their battles, and following
with the rest of their forces, endeavoured to prevent our men landing.
In this was the greatest difficulty, for the following reasons, namely,
because our ships, on account of their great size, could be stationed
only in deep water; and our soldiers, in places unknown to them, with
their hands embarrassed, oppressed with a large and heavy weight of
armour, had at the same time to leap from the ships, stand amidst the
waves, and encounter the enemy; whereas they, either on dry ground, or
advancing a little way into the water, free in all their limbs, in
places thoroughly known to them, could confidently throw their weapons
and spur on their horses, which were accustomed to this kind of service.
Dismayed by these circumstances and altogether untrained in this mode of
battle, our men did not all exert the same vigour and eagerness which
they had been wont to exert in engagements on dry ground.

XXV.--When Caesar observed this, he ordered the ships of war, the
appearance of which was somewhat strange to the barbarians and the
motion more ready for service, to be withdrawn a little from the
transport vessels, and to be propelled by their oars, and be stationed
towards the open flank of the enemy, and the enemy to be beaten off and
driven away with slings, arrows, and engines: which plan was of great
service to our men; for the barbarians being startled by the form of our
ships and the motions of our oars and the nature of our engines, which
was strange to them, stopped, and shortly after retreated a little. And
while our men were hesitating [whether they should advance to the
shore], chiefly on account of the depth of the sea, he who carried the
eagle of the tenth legion, after supplicating the gods that the matter
might turn out favourably to the legion, exclaimed, "Leap, fellow
soldiers, unless you wish to betray your eagle to the enemy. I, for my
part, will perform my duty to the commonwealth and my general." When he
had said this with a loud voice, he leaped from the ship and proceeded
to bear the eagle toward the enemy. Then our men, exhorting one another
that so great a disgrace should not be incurred, all leaped from the
ship. When those in the nearest vessels saw them, they speedily followed
and approached the enemy.

XXVI.--The battle was maintained vigorously on both sides. Our men,
however, as they could neither keep their ranks, nor get firm footing,
nor follow their standards, and as one from one ship and another from
another assembled around whatever standards they met, were thrown into
great confusion. But the enemy, who were acquainted with all the
shallows, when from the shore they saw any coming from a ship one by
one, spurred on their horses, and attacked them while embarrassed; many
surrounded a few, others threw their weapons upon our collected forces
on their exposed flank. When Caesar observed this, he ordered the boats
of the ships of war and the spy sloops to be filled with soldiers, and
sent them up to the succour of those whom he had observed in distress.
Our men, as soon as they made good their footing on dry ground, and all
their comrades had joined them, made an attack upon the enemy, and put
them to flight, but could not pursue them very far, because the horse
had not been able to maintain their course at sea and reach the island.
This alone was wanting to Caesar's accustomed success.

XXVII.--The enemy being thus vanquished in battle, as soon as they
recovered after their flight, instantly sent ambassadors to Caesar to
negotiate about peace. They promised to give hostages and perform what
he should command. Together with these ambassadors came Commius the
Atrebatian, who, as I have above said, had been sent by Caesar into
Britain. Him they had seized upon when leaving his ship, although in the
character of ambassador he bore the general's commission to them, and
thrown into chains: then after the battle was fought, they sent him
back, and in suing for peace cast the blame of that act upon the common
people, and entreated that it might be pardoned on account of their
indiscretion. Caesar, complaining that after they had sued for peace,
and had voluntarily sent ambassadors into the continent for that
purpose, they had made war without a reason, said that he would pardon
their indiscretion, and imposed hostages, a part of whom they gave
immediately; the rest they said they would give in a few days, since
they were sent for from remote places. In the meantime they ordered
their people to return to the country parts, and the chiefs assembled
from all quarters, and proceeded to surrender themselves and their
states to Caesar.

XXVIII.--A peace being established by these proceedings four days after
we had come into Britain, the eighteen ships, to which reference has
been made above, and which conveyed the cavalry, set sail from the upper
port with a gentle gale; when, however, they were approaching Britain
and were seen from the camp, so great a storm suddenly arose that none
of them could maintain their course at sea; and some were taken back to
the same port from which they had started;--others, to their great
danger, were driven to the lower part of the island, nearer to the west;
which, however, after having cast anchor, as they were getting filled
with water, put out to sea through necessity in a stormy night, and made
for the continent.

XXIX.--It happened that night to be full moon, which usually occasions
very high tides in that ocean; and that circumstance was unknown to our
men. Thus, at the same time, the tide began to fill the ships of war
which Caesar had provided to convey over his army, and which he had
drawn up on the strand; and the storm began to dash the ships of burden
which were riding at anchor against each other; nor was any means
afforded our men of either managing them or of rendering any service. A
great many ships having been wrecked, inasmuch as the rest, having lost
their cables, anchors, and other tackling, were unfit for sailing, a
great confusion, as would necessarily happen, arose throughout the army;
for there were no other ships in which they could be conveyed back, and
all things which are of service in repairing vessels were wanting, and
corn for the winter had not been provided in those places, because it
was understood by all that they would certainly winter in Gaul.

XXX.--On discovering these things the chiefs of Britain, who had come up
after the battle was fought to perform those conditions which Caesar had
imposed, held a conference, when they perceived that cavalry, and ships,
and corn were wanting to the Romans, and discovered the small number of
our soldiers from the small extent of the camp (which, too, was on this
account more limited than ordinary because Caesar had conveyed over his
legions without baggage), and thought that the best plan was to renew
the war, and cut off our men from corn and provisions and protract the
affair till winter; because they felt confident that, if they were
vanquished or cut off from a return, no one would afterwards pass over
into Britain for the purpose of making war. Therefore, again entering
into a conspiracy, they began to depart from the camp by degrees and
secretly bring up their people from the country parts.

XXXI.--But Caesar, although he had not as yet discovered their measures,
yet, both from what had occurred to his ships, and from the circumstance
that they had neglected to give the promised hostages, suspected that
the thing would come to pass which really did happen. He therefore
provided remedies against all contingencies; for he daily conveyed corn
from the country parts into the camp, used the timber and brass of such
ships as were most seriously damaged for repairing the rest, and ordered
whatever things besides were necessary for this object to be brought to
him from the continent. And thus, since that business was executed by
the soldiers with the greatest energy, he effected that, after the loss
of twelve ships, a voyage could be made well enough in the rest.

XXXII.--While these things are being transacted, one legion had been
sent to forage, according to custom, and no suspicion of war had arisen
as yet, and some of the people remained in the country parts, others
went backwards and forwards to the camp, they who were on duty at the
gates of the camp reported to Caesar that a greater dust than was usual
was seen in that direction in which the legion had marched. Caesar,
suspecting that which was [really the case],--that some new enterprise
was undertaken by the barbarians, ordered the two cohorts which were on
duty to march into that quarter with him, and two other cohorts to
relieve them on duty; the rest to be armed and follow him immediately.
When he had advanced some little way from the camp, he saw that his men
were overpowered by the enemy and scarcely able to stand their ground,
and that, the legion being crowded together, weapons were being cast on
them from all sides. For as all the corn was reaped in every part with
the exception of one, the enemy, suspecting that our men would repair to
that, had concealed themselves in the woods during the night. Then
attacking them suddenly, scattered as they were, and when they had laid
aside their arms, and were engaged in reaping, they killed a small
number, threw the rest into confusion, and surrounded them with their
cavalry and chariots.

XXXIII.--Their mode of fighting with their chariots is this: firstly,
they drive about in all directions and throw their weapons and generally
break the ranks of the enemy with the very dread of their horses and the
noise of their wheels; and when they have worked themselves in between
the troops of horse, leap from their chariots and engage on foot. The
charioteers in the meantime withdraw some little distance from the
battle, and so place themselves with the chariots that, if their masters
are overpowered by the number of the enemy, they may have a ready
retreat to their own troops. Thus they display in battle the speed of
horse, [together with] the firmness of infantry; and by daily practice
and exercise attain to such expertness that they are accustomed, even on
a declining and steep place, to check their horses at full speed, and
manage and turn them in an instant and run along the pole, and stand on
the yoke, and thence betake themselves with the greatest celerity to
their chariots again.

XXXIV.-Under these circumstances, our men being dismayed by the novelty
of this mode of battle, Caesar most seasonably brought assistance; for
upon his arrival the enemy paused, and our men recovered from their
fear; upon which, thinking the time unfavourable for provoking the enemy
and coming to an action, he kept himself in his own quarter, and, a
short time having intervened, drew back the legions into the camp. While
these things were going on, and all our men engaged, the rest of the
Britons, who were in the fields, departed. Storms then set in for
several successive days, which both confined our men to camp and
hindered the enemy from attacking us. In the meantime the barbarians
despatched messengers to all parts and reported to their people the
small number of our soldiers, and how good an opportunity was given for
obtaining spoil and for liberating themselves for ever, if they should
only drive the Romans from their camp. Having by these means speedily
got together a large force of infantry and of cavalry, they came up to
the camp.

XXXV.--Although Caesar anticipated that the same thing which had
happened on former occasions would then occur--that, if the enemy were
routed, they would escape from danger by their speed; still, having got
about thirty horse, which Commius the Atrebatian, of whom mention has
been made, had brought over with him [from Gaul], he drew up the legions
in order of battle before the camp. When the action commenced, the enemy
were unable to sustain the attack of our men long, and turned their
backs; our men pursued them as far as their speed and strength
permitted, and slew a great number of them; then, having destroyed and
burnt everything far and wide, they retreated to their camp.

XXXVI.--The same day, ambassadors sent by the enemy came to Caesar to
negotiate a peace. Caesar doubled the number of hostages which he had
before demanded; and ordered that they should be brought over to the
continent, because, since the time of the equinox was near, he did not
consider that, with his ships out of repair, the voyage ought to be
deferred till winter. Having met with favourable weather he set sail a
little after midnight, and all his fleet arrived safe at the continent,
except two of the ships of burden which could not make the same port
which the other ships did, and were carried a little lower down.

XXXVII.--When our soldiers, about 300 in number, had been drawn out of
these two ships, and were marching to the camp, the Morini, whom Caesar,
when setting forth for Britain, had left in a state of peace, excited by
the hope of spoil, at first surrounded them with a small number of men,
and ordered them to lay down their arms, if they did not wish to be
slain; afterwards however, when they, forming a circle, stood on their
defence, a shout was raised and about 6000 of the enemy soon assembled;
which being reported, Caesar sent all the cavalry in the camp as a
relief to his men. In the meantime our soldiers sustained the attack of
the enemy, and fought most valiantly for more than four hours, and,
receiving but few wounds themselves, slew several of them. But after our
cavalry came in sight, the enemy, throwing away their arms, turned their
backs, and a great number of them were killed.

XXXVIII.--The day following Caesar sent Labienus, his lieutenant, with
those legions which he had brought back from Britain, against the
Morini, who had revolted; who, as they had no place to which they might
retreat, on account of the drying up of their marshes (which they had
availed themselves of as a place of refuge the preceding year), almost
all fell into the power of Labienus. In the meantime Caesar's
lieutenants, Q. Titurius and L. Cotta, who had led the legions into the
territories of the Menapii, having laid waste all their lands, cut down
their corn and burnt their houses, returned to Caesar because the
Menapii had all concealed themselves in their thickest woods. Caesar
fixed the winter quarters of all the legions amongst the Belgae. Thither
only two British states sent hostages; the rest omitted to do so. For
these successes, a thanksgiving of twenty days was decreed by the senate
upon receiving Caesar's letter.



BOOK V

I.--Lucius Domitius and Appius Claudius being consuls, Caesar when
departing from his winter quarters into Italy, as he had been accustomed
to do yearly, commands the lieutenants whom he appointed over the
legions to take care that during the winter as many ships as possible
should be built, and the old repaired. He plans the size and shape of
them. For despatch of lading, and for drawing them on shore, he makes
them a little lower than those which we have been accustomed to use in
our sea; and that so much the more, because he knew that, on account of
the frequent changes of the tide, less swells occurred there; for the
purpose of transporting little and a great number of horses, [he makes
them] a little broader than those which we use in other seas. All these
he orders to be constructed for lightness and expedition, to which
object their lowness contributes greatly. He orders those things which
are necessary for equipping ships to be brought thither from Spain. He
himself, on the assizes of Hither Gaul being concluded, proceeds into
Illyricum, because he heard that the part of the province nearest them
was being laid waste by the incursions of the Pirustae. When he had
arrived there, he levies soldiers upon the states, and orders them to
assemble at an appointed place. Which circumstance having been reported
[to them], the Pirustae send ambassadors to him to inform him that no
part of those proceedings was done by public deliberation, and assert
that they were ready to make compensation by all means for the injuries
[inflicted]. Caesar, accepting their defence, demands hostages, and
orders them to be brought to him on a specified day, and assures them
that unless they did so he would visit their state with war. These being
brought to him on the day which he had ordered, he appoints arbitrators
between the states, who should estimate the damages and determine the
reparation.

II.--These things being finished, and the assizes being concluded, he
returns into Hither Gaul, and proceeds thence to the army. When he had
arrived there, having made a survey of the winter quarter, he finds
that, by the extraordinary ardour of the soldiers, amidst the utmost
scarcity of all materials, about six hundred ships of that kind which we
have described above, and twenty-eight ships of war, had been built, and
were not far from that state that they might be launched in a few days.
Having commended the soldiers and those who had presided over the work,
he informs them what he wishes to be done, and orders all the ships to
assemble at port Itius, from which port he had learned that the passage
into Britain was shortest, [being only] about thirty miles from the
continent. He left what seemed a sufficient number of soldiers for that
design; he himself proceeds into the territories of the Treviri with
four legions without baggage, and 800 horse, because they neither came
to the general diets [of Gaul], nor obeyed his commands, and were,
moreover, said to be tampering with the Germans beyond the Rhine.

III.--This state is by far the most powerful of all Gaul in cavalry, and
has great forces of infantry, and as we have remarked above, borders on
the Rhine. In that state, two persons, Indutiomarus and Cingetorix, were
then contending with each other for the supreme power; one of whom, as
soon as the arrival of Caesar and his legions was known, came to him;
assures him that he and all his party would continue in their
allegiance, and not revolt from the alliance of the Roman people, and
informs him of the things which were going on amongst the Treviri. But
Indutiomarus began to collect cavalry and infantry, and make
preparations for war, having concealed those who by reason of their age
could not be under arms in the forest Arduenna, which is of immense
size, [and] extends from the Rhine across the country of the Treviri to
the frontiers of the Remi. But after that, some of the chief persons of
the state, both influenced by their friendship for Cingetorix, and
alarmed at the arrival of our army, came to Caesar and began to solicit
him privately about their own interests, since they could not provide
for the safety of the state; Indutiomarus, dreading lest he should be
abandoned by all, sends ambassadors to Caesar, to declare that he
absented himself from his countrymen, and refrained from coming to him
on this account, that he might the more easily keep the state in its
allegiance, lest on the departure of all the nobility the commonalty
should, in their indiscretion, revolt. And thus the whole state was at
his control; and that he, if Caesar would permit, would come to the camp
to him, and would commit his own fortunes and those of the state to his
good faith.

IV.--Caesar, though he discerned from what motive these things were
said, and what circumstance deterred him from his meditated plan, still,
in order that he might not be compelled to waste the summer among the
Treviri, while all things were prepared for the war with Britain,
ordered Indutiomarus to come to him with 200 hostages. When these were
brought, [and] among them his son and near relations whom he had
demanded by name, he consoled Indutiomarus, and enjoined him to continue
in his allegiance; yet, nevertheless, summoning to him the chief men of
the Treviri, he reconciled them individually to Cingetorix: this he both
thought should be done by him in justice to the merits of the latter,
and also judged that it was of great importance that the influence of
one whose singular attachment towards him he had fully seen, should
prevail as much as possible among his people. Indutiomarus was very much
offended at this act, [seeing that] his influence was diminished among
his countrymen; and he, who already before had borne a hostile mind
towards us, was much more violently inflamed against us through
resentment at this.

V.--These matters being settled, Caesar went to port Itius with the
legions. There he discovers that forty ships which had been built in the
country of the Meldi, having been driven back by a storm, had been
unable to maintain their course, and had returned to the same port from
which they had set out; he finds the rest ready for sailing, and
furnished with everything. In the same place, the cavalry of the whole
of Gaul, in number 4000, assembles, and [also] the chief persons of all
the states; he had determined to leave in Gaul a very few of them, whose
fidelity towards him he had clearly discerned, and take the rest with
him as hostages; because he feared a commotion in Gaul when he should be
absent.

VI.--There was together with the others, Dumnorix, the Aeduan, of whom
we have made previous mention. Him in particular he had resolved to have
with him, because he had discovered him to be fond of change, fond of
power, possessing great resolution, and great influence among the Gauls.
To this was added that Dumnorix had before said in an assembly of
Aeduans, that the sovereignty of the state had been made over to him by
Caesar; which speech the Aedui bore with impatience and yet dared not
send ambassadors to Caesar for the purpose of either rejecting or
deprecating [that appointment]. That fact Caesar had learned from his
own personal friends. He at first strove to obtain by every entreaty
that he should be left in Gaul; partly, because, being unaccustomed to
sailing, he feared the sea; partly, because he said he was prevented by
divine admonitions. After he saw that this request was firmly refused
him, all hope of success being lost, he began to tamper with the chief
persons of the Gauls, to call them apart singly and exhort them to
remain on the continent; to agitate them with the fear that it was not
without reason that Gaul should be stript of all her nobility; that it
was Caesar's design to bring over to Britain and put to death all those
whom he feared to slay in the sight of Gaul, to pledge his honour to the
rest, to ask for their oath that they would by common deliberation
execute what they should perceive to be necessary for Gaul. These things
were reported to Caesar by several persons.

VII.--Having learned this fact, Caesar, because he had conferred so much
honour upon the Aeduan state, determined that Dumnorix should be
restrained and deterred by whatever means he could; and that, because he
perceived his insane designs to be proceeding farther and farther, care
should be taken lest he might be able to injure him and the
commonwealth. Therefore, having stayed about twenty-five days in that
place, because the north wind, which usually blows a great part of every
season, prevented the voyage, he exerted himself to keep Dumnorix in his
allegiance [and] nevertheless learn all his measures: having at length
met with favourable weather, he orders the foot soldiers and the horse
to embark in the ships. But, while the minds of all were occupied,
Dumnorix began to take his departure from the camp homewards with the
cavalry of the Aedui, Caesar being ignorant of it. Caesar, on this
matter being reported to him, ceasing from his expedition and deferring
all other affairs, sends a great part of the cavalry to pursue him, and
commands that he be brought back; he orders that if he use violence and
do not submit, that he be slain: considering that Dumnorix would do
nothing as a rational man while he himself was absent, since he had
disregarded his command even when present. He, however, when recalled,
began to resist and defend himself with his hand, and implore the
support of his people, often exclaiming that "he was free and the
subject of a free state." They surround and kill the man as they had
been commanded; but the Aeduan horsemen all return to Caesar.

VIII.--When these things were done [and] Labienus, left on the continent
with three legions and 2000 horse, to defend the harbours and provide
corn, and discover what was going on in Gaul, and take measures
according to the occasion and according to the circumstance; he himself,
with five legions and a number of horse, equal to that which he was
leaving on the continent, set sail at sunset and [though for a time]
borne forward by a gentle south-west wind, he did not maintain his
course, in consequence of the wind dying away about midnight, and being
carried on too far by the tide, when the sun rose, espied Britain passed
on his left. Then, again, following the change of tide, he urged on with
the oars that he might make that port of the island in which he had
discovered the preceding summer that there was the best landing-place,
and in this affair the spirit of our soldiers was very much to be
extolled; for they with the transports and heavy ships, the labour of
rowing not being [for a moment] discontinued, equalled the speed of the
ships of war. All the ships reached Britain nearly at mid-day; nor was
there seen a [single] enemy in that place, but, as Caesar afterwards
found from some prisoners, though large bodies of troops had assembled
there, yet being alarmed by the great number of our ships, more than
eight hundred of which, including the ships of the preceding year, and
those private vessels which each had built for his own convenience, had
appeared at one time, they had quitted the coast and concealed
themselves among the higher points.

IX.--Caesar, having disembarked his army and chosen a convenient place
for the camp, when he discovered from the prisoners in what part the
forces of the enemy had lodged themselves, having left ten cohorts and
300 horse at the sea, to be a guard to the ships, hastens to the enemy,
at the third watch, fearing the less for the ships for this reason,
because he was leaving them fastened at anchor upon an even and open
shore; and he placed Q. Atrius over the guard of the ships. He himself,
having advanced by night about twelve miles, espied the forces of the
enemy. They, advancing to the river with their cavalry and chariots from
the higher ground, began to annoy our men and give battle. Being
repulsed by our cavalry, they concealed themselves in woods, as they had
secured a place admirably fortified by nature and by art, which, as it
seemed, they had before prepared on account of a civil war; for all
entrances to it were shut up by a great number of felled trees. They
themselves rushed out of the woods to fight here and there, and
prevented our men from entering their fortifications. But the soldiers
of the seventh legion, having formed a testudo and thrown up a rampart
against the fortification, took the place and drove them out of the
woods, receiving only a few wounds. But Caesar forbade his men to pursue
them in their flight any great distance; both because he was ignorant of
the nature of the ground, and because, as a great part of the day was
spent, he wished time to be left for the fortification of the camp.

X.--The next day, early in the morning, he sent both foot-soldiers and
horse in three divisions on an expedition to pursue those who had fled.
These having advanced a little way, when already the rear [of the enemy]
was in sight, some horse came to Caesar from Quintus Atrius, to report
that the preceding night, a very great storm having arisen, almost all
the ships were dashed to pieces and cast upon the shore, because neither
the anchors and cables could resist, nor could the sailors and pilots
sustain the violence of the storm; and thus great damage was received by
that collision of the ships.

XI.--These things being known [to him], Caesar orders the legions and
cavalry to be recalled and to cease from their march; he himself returns
to the ships: he sees clearly before him almost the same things which he
had heard of from the messengers and by letter, so that, about forty
ships being lost, the remainder seemed capable of being repaired with
much labour. Therefore he selects workmen from the legions, and orders
others to be sent for from the continent; he writes to Labienus to build
as many ships as he could with those legions which were with him. He
himself, though the matter was one of great difficulty and labour, yet
thought it to be most expedient for all the ships to be brought up on
shore and joined with the camp by one fortification. In these matters he
employed about ten days, the labour of the soldiers being unremitting
even during the hours of night. The ships having been brought up on
shore and the camp strongly fortified, he left the same forces which he
did before as a guard for the ships; he sets out in person for the same
place that he had returned from. When he had come thither, greater
forces of the Britons had already assembled at that place, the chief
command and management of the war having been entrusted to
Cassivellaunus, whose territories a river, which is called the Thames,
separates from the maritime states at about eighty miles from the sea.
At an earlier period perpetual wars had taken place between him and the
other states; but, greatly alarmed by our arrival, the Britons had
placed him over the whole war and the conduct of it.

XII.--The interior portion of Britain is inhabited by those of whom they
say that it is handed down by tradition that they were born in the
island itself: the maritime portion by those who had passed over from
the country of the Belgae for the purpose of plunder and making war;
almost all of whom are called by the names of those states from which
being sprung they went thither, and having waged war, continued there
and began to cultivate the lands. The number of the people is countless,
and their buildings exceedingly numerous, for the most part very like
those of the Gauls: the number of cattle is great. They use either brass
or iron rings, determined at a certain weight, as their money. Tin is
produced in the midland regions; in the maritime, iron; but the quantity
of it is small: they employ brass, which is imported. There, as in Gaul,
is timber of every description, except beech and fir. They do not regard
it lawful to eat the hare, and the cock, and the goose; they, however,
breed them for amusement and pleasure. The climate is more temperate
than in Gaul, the colds being less severe.

XIII.--The island is triangular in its form, and one of its sides is
opposite to Gaul. One angle of this side, which is in Kent, whither
almost all ships from Gaul are directed, [looks] to the east; the lower
looks to the south. This side extends about 500 miles. Another side lies
towards Spain and the west, on which part is Ireland, less, as is
reckoned, than Britain by one-half; but the passage [from it] into
Britain is of equal distance with that from Gaul. In the middle of this
voyage is an island, which is called Mona; many smaller islands besides
are supposed to lie [there], of which islands some have written that at
the time of the winter solstice it is night there for thirty consecutive
days. We, in our inquiries about that matter, ascertained nothing,
except that, by accurate measurements with water, we perceived the
nights to be shorter there than on the continent. The length of this
side, as their account states, is 700 miles. The third side is towards
the north, to which portion of the island no land is opposite; but an
angle of that side looks principally towards Germany. This side is
considered to be 800 miles in length. Thus the whole island is [about]
2000 miles in circumference.

XIV.--The most civilised of all these nations are they who inhabit Kent,
which is entirely a maritime district, nor do they differ much from the
Gallic customs. Most of the inland inhabitants do not sow corn, but live
on milk and flesh, and are clad with skins. All the Britons, indeed, dye
themselves with wood, which occasions a bluish colour, and thereby have
a more terrible appearance in fight. They wear their hair long, and have
every part of their body shaved except their head and upper lip. Ten and
even twelve have wives common to them, and particularly brothers among
brothers, and parents among their children; but if there be any issue by
these wives, they are reputed to be the children of those by whom
respectively each was first espoused when a virgin.

XV.--The horse and charioteers of the enemy contended vigorously in a
skirmish with our cavalry on the march; yet so that our men were
conquerors in all parts, and drove them to their woods and hills; but,
having slain a great many, they pursued too eagerly, and lost some of
their men. But the enemy, after some time had elapsed, when our men were
off their guard, and occupied in the fortification of the camp, rushed
out of the woods, and making an attack upon those who were placed on
duty before the camp, fought in a determined manner; and two cohorts
being sent by Caesar to their relief, and these severally the first of
two legions, when these had taken up their position at a very small
distance from each other, as our men were disconcerted by the unusual
mode of battle, the enemy broke through the middle of them most
courageously, and retreated thence in safety. That day, Q. Laberius
Durus, a tribune of the soldiers, was slain. The enemy, since more
cohorts were sent against them, were repulsed.

XVI.--In the whole of this method of fighting since the engagement took
place under the eyes of all and before the camp, it was perceived that
our men, on account of the weight of their arms, inasmuch as they could
neither pursue [the enemy when] retreating, nor dare quit their
standards, were little suited to this kind of enemy; that the horse also
fought with great danger, because they [the Britons] generally retreated
even designedly, and, when they had drawn off our men a short distance
from the legions, leaped from their chariots and fought on foot in
unequal [and to them advantageous] battle. But the system of cavalry
engagement is wont to produce equal danger, and indeed the same, both to
those who retreat and those who pursue. To this was added, that they
never fought in close order, but in small parties and at great
distances, and had detachments placed [in different parts], and then the
one relieved the other, and the vigorous and fresh succeeded the
wearied.

XVII.--The following day the enemy halted on the hills, a distance from
our camp, and presented themselves in small parties, and began to
challenge our horse to battle with less spirit than the day before. But
at noon, when Caesar had sent three legions, and all the cavalry with C.
Trebonius, the lieutenant, for the purpose of foraging, they flew upon
the foragers suddenly from all quarters, so that they did not keep off
[even] from the standards and the legions. Our men making an attack on
them vigorously, repulsed them; nor did they cease to pursue them until
the horse, relying on relief, as they saw the legions behind them, drove
the enemy precipitately before them, and, slaying a great number of
them, did not give them the opportunity either of rallying or halting,
or leaping from their chariots. Immediately after this retreat, the
auxiliaries who had assembled from all sides, departed; nor after that
time did the enemy ever engage with us in very large numbers.

XVIII.--Caesar, discovering their design, leads his army into the
territories of Cassivellaunus to the river Thames; which river can be
forded in one place only, and that with difficulty. When he had arrived
there, he perceives that numerous forces of the enemy were marshalled on
the other bank of the river; the bank also was defended by sharp stakes
fixed in front, and stakes of the same kind fixed under the water were
covered by the river. These things being discovered from [some]
prisoners and deserters, Caesar, sending forward the cavalry, ordered
the legions to follow them immediately. But the soldiers advanced with
such speed and such ardour, though they stood above the water by their
heads only, that the enemy could not sustain the attack of the legions
and of the horse, and quitted the banks, and committed themselves to
flight.

XIX.--Cassivellaunus, as we have stated above, all hope [rising out] of
battle being laid aside, the greater part of his forces being dismissed,
and about 4000 charioteers only being left, used to observe our marches
and retire a little from the road, and conceal himself in intricate and
woody places, and in those neighbourhoods in which he had discovered we
were about to march, he used to drive the cattle and the inhabitants
from the fields into the woods; and, when our cavalry, for the sake of
plundering and ravaging the more freely, scattered themselves among the
fields, he used to send out charioteers from the woods by all the
well-known roads and paths, and, to the great danger of our horse, engage
with them; and this source of fear hindered them from straggling very
extensively. The result was that Caesar did not allow excursions to be
made to a great distance from the main body of the legions, and ordered
that damage should be done to the enemy in ravaging their lands and
kindling fires only so far as the legionary soldiers could, by their own
exertion and marching, accomplish it.

XX.--In the meantime, the Trinobantes, almost the most powerful state of
those parts, from which the young man Mandubratius embracing the
protection of Caesar had come to the continent of Gaul to [meet] him
(whose father, Imanuentius, had possessed the sovereignty in that state,
and had been killed by Cassivellaunus; he himself had escaped death by
flight), send ambassadors to Caesar, and promise that they will
surrender themselves to him and perform his commands; they entreat him
to protect Mandubratius from the violence of Cassivellaunus, and send to
their state some one to preside over it, and possess the government.
Caesar demands forty hostages from them, and corn for his army, and
sends Mandubratius to them. They speedily performed the things demanded,
and sent hostages to the number appointed, and the corn.

XXI.--The Trinobantes being protected and secured from any violence of
the soldiers, the Cenimagni, the Segontiaci, the Ancalites, the Bibroci,
and the Cassi, sending embassies, surrender themselves to Caesar. From
them he learns that the capital town of Cassivellaunus was not far from
that place, and was defended by woods and morasses, and a very large
number of men and of cattle had been collected in it. (Now the Britons,
when they have fortified the intricate woods, in which they are wont to
assemble for the purpose of avoiding the incursion of an enemy, with an
entrenchment and a rampart, call them a town.) Thither he proceeds with
his legions: he finds the place admirably fortified by nature and art;
he, however, undertakes to attack it in two directions. The enemy,
having remained only a short time, did not sustain the attack of our
soldiers, and hurried away on the other side of the town. A great amount
of cattle was found there, and many of the enemy were taken and slain in
their flight.

XXII.--While these things are going forward in those places,
Cassivellaunus sends messengers into Kent, which, we have observed
above, is on the sea, over which districts four several kings reigned,
Cingetorix, Carvilius, Taximagulus, and Segonax, and commands them to
collect all their forces, and unexpectedly assail and storm the naval
camp. When they had come to the camp, our men, after making a sally,
slaying many of their men, and also capturing a distinguished leader
named Lugotorix, brought back their own men in safety. Cassivellaunus,
when this battle was reported to him, as so many losses had been
sustained, and his territories laid waste, being alarmed most of all by
the desertion of the states, sends ambassadors to Caesar [to treat]
about a surrender through the mediation of Commius the Atrebatian.
Caesar, since he had determined to pass the winter on the continent, on
account of the sudden revolts of Gaul, and as much of the summer did not
remain, and he perceived that even that could be easily protracted,
demands hostages, and prescribes what tribute Britain should pay each
year to the Roman people; he forbids and commands Cassivellaunus that he
wage not war against Mandubratius or the Trinobantes.

XXIII.--When he had received the hostages, he leads back the army to the
sea, and finds the ships repaired. After launching these, because he had
a large number of prisoners, and some of the ships had been lost in the
storm, he determines to convey back his army at two embarkations. And it
so happened, that out of so large a number of ships, in so many voyages,
neither in this nor in the previous year was any ship missing which
conveyed soldiers; but very few out of those which were sent back to him
from the continent empty, as the soldiers of the former convoy had been
disembarked, and out of those (sixty in number) which Labienus had taken
care to have built, reached their destination; almost all the rest were
driven back, and when Caesar had waited for them for some time in vain,
lest he should be debarred from a voyage by the season of the year,
inasmuch as the equinox was at hand, he of necessity stowed his soldiers
the more closely, and, a very great calm coming on, after he had weighed
anchor at the beginning of the second watch, he reached land at break of
day and brought in all the ships in safety.

XXIV.--The ships having been drawn up and a general assembly of the
Gauls held at Samarobriva, because the corn that year had not prospered
in Gaul by reason of the droughts, he was compelled to station his army
in its winter-quarters, differently from the former years, and to
distribute the legions among several states: one of them he gave to C.
Fabius, his lieutenant, to be marched into the territories of the
Morini; a second to Q. Cicero, into those of the Nervii; a third to L.
Roscius, into those of the Essui; a fourth he ordered to winter with T.
Labienus among the Remi in the confines of the Treviri; he stationed
three in Belgium; over these he appointed M. Crassus, his questor, and
L. Munatius Plancus and C. Trebonius, his lieutenants. One legion which
he had raised last on the other side of the Po, and five cohorts, he
sent amongst the Eburones, the greatest portion of whom lie between the
Meuse and the Rhine, [and] who were under the government of Ambiorix and
Cativolcus. He ordered Q. Titurius Sabinus and L. Aurunculeius Cotta,
his lieutenants, to take the command of these soldiers. The legions
being distributed in this manner, he thought he could most easily remedy
the scarcity of corn; and yet the winter-quarters of all these legions
(except that which he had given to L. Roscius to be led into the most
peaceful and tranquil neighbourhood) were comprehended within [about]
100 miles. He himself in the meanwhile, until he had stationed the
legions and knew that the several winter-quarters were fortified,
determined to stay in Gaul.

XXV.--There was among the Carnutes a man named Tasgetius, born of very
high rank, whose ancestors had held the sovereignty in his state. To him
Caesar had restored the position of his ancestors, in consideration of
his prowess and attachment towards him, because in all his wars he had
availed himself of his valuable services. His personal enemies had
killed him when in the third year of his reign, many even of his own
state being openly promoters [of that act]. This event is related to
Caesar. He fearing, because several were involved in the act, that the
state might revolt at their instigation, orders Lucius Plancus, with a
legion, to proceed quickly from Belgium to the Carnutes, and winter
there, and arrest and send to him the persons by whose instrumentality
he should discover that Tasgetius was slain. In the meantime, he was
apprised by all the lieutenants and questors to whom he had assigned the
legions, that they had arrived in winter-quarters, and that the place
for the quarters was fortified.

XXVI.--About fifteen days after they had come into winter-quarters, the
beginning of a sudden insurrection and revolt arose from Ambiorix and
Cativolcus, who, though they had met with Sabinus and Cotta at the
borders of their kingdom, and had conveyed corn into our winter-quarters,
induced by the messages of Indutiomarus, one of the Treviri,
excited their people, and after having suddenly assailed the soldiers,
engaged in procuring wood, came with a large body to attack the camp.
When our men had speedily taken up arms and had ascended the rampart,
and sending out some Spanish horse on one side, had proved conquerors in
a cavalry action, the enemy, despairing of success, drew off their
troops from the assault. Then they shouted, according to their custom,
that some of our men should go forward to a conference, [alleging] that
they had some things which they desired to say respecting the common
interest, by which they trusted their disputes could be removed.

XXVII.--C. Arpineius, a Roman knight, the intimate friend of Q.
Titurius, and with him Q. Junius, a certain person from Spain, who
already on previous occasions had been accustomed to go to Ambiorix, at
Caesar's mission, is sent to them for the purpose of a conference:
before them Ambiorix spoke to this effect: "That he confessed that for
Caesar's kindness towards him he was very much indebted to him, inasmuch
as by his aid he had been freed from a tribute which he had been
accustomed to pay to the Aduatuci, his neighbours; and because his own
son and the son of his brother had been sent back to him, whom, when
sent in the number of hostages, the Aduatuci had detained among them in
slavery and in chains; and that he had not done that which he had done
in regard to the attacking of the camp, either by his own judgment or
desire, but by the compulsion of his state; and that his government was
of that nature, that the people had as much of authority over him as he
over the people. To the state moreover the occasion of the war was this
--that it could not withstand the sudden combination of the Gauls; that
he could easily prove this from his own weakness, since he was not so
little versed in affairs as to presume that with his forces he could
conquer the Roman people; but that it was the common resolution of Gaul;
that that day was appointed for the storming of all Caesar's
winter-quarters, in order that no legion should be able to come to the
relief of another legion, that Gauls could not easily deny Gauls,
especially when a measure seemed entered into for recovering their common
freedom. Since he had performed his duty to them on the score of patriotism
[he said], he has now regard to gratitude for the kindness of Caesar; that
he warned, that he prayed Titurius by the claims of hospitality, to
consult for his and his soldiers' safety; that a large force of the
Germans had been hired and had passed the Rhine; that it would arrive in
two days; that it was for them to consider whether they thought fit,
before the nearest people perceived it, to lead off their soldiers when
drawn out of winter-quarters, either to Cicero or to Labienus; one of
whom was about fifty miles distant from them, the other rather more;
that this he promised and confirmed by oath, that he would give them a
safe passage through his territories; and when he did that, he was both
consulting for his own state, because it would be relieved from the
winter-quarters, and also making a requital to Caesar for his
obligations."

XXVIII.--Arpineius and Junius relate to the lieutenants what they had
heard. They, greatly alarmed by the unexpected affair, though those
things were spoken by an enemy, still thought they were not to be
disregarded; and they were especially influenced by this consideration,
that it was scarcely credible that the obscure and humble state of the
Eburones had dared to make war upon the Roman people of their own
accord. Accordingly, they refer the matter to a council, and a, great
controversy arises among them. L. Aurunculeius, and several tribunes of
the soldiers and the centurions of the first rank, were of opinion "that
nothing should be done hastily, and that they should not depart from the
camp without Caesar's orders"; they declared, "that any forces of the
Germans, however great, might be encountered by fortified winter-quarters;
that this fact was a proof [of it]; that they had sustained the first
assault of the Germans most valiantly, inflicting many wounds upon them;
that they were not distressed for corn; that in the meantime relief
would come both from the nearest winter-quarters and from Caesar"; lastly,
they put the query, "what could be more undetermined, more undignified,
than to adopt measures respecting the most important affairs on the
authority of an enemy?"

XXIX.--In opposition to those things Titurius exclaimed, "That they
would do this too late, when greater forces of the enemy, after a
junction with the Germans, should have assembled; or when some disaster
had been received in the neighbouring winter-quarters; that the
opportunity for deliberating was short; that he believed that Caesar had
set forth into Italy, as the Carnutes would not otherwise have taken the
measure of slaying Tasgetius, nor would the Eburones, if he had been
present, have come to the camp with so great defiance of us; that he did
not regard the enemy, but the fact, as the authority; that the Rhine was
near; that the death of Ariovistus and our previous victories were
subjects of great indignation to the Germans; that Gaul was inflamed,
that after having received so many defeats she was reduced under the
sway of the Roman people, her pristine glory in military matters being
extinguished." Lastly, "who would persuade himself of this, that
Ambiorix had resorted to a design of that nature without sure grounds?
That his own opinion was safe on either side; if there be nothing very
formidable, they would go without danger to the nearest legion; if all
Gaul conspired with the Germans, their only safety lay in despatch. What
issue would the advice of Cotta and of those who differed from him,
have? from which, if immediate danger was not to be dreaded, yet
certainly famine, by a protracted siege, was."

XXX.--This discussion having been held on the two sides, when opposition
was offered strenuously by Cotta and the principal officers, "Prevail,"
said Sabinus, "if so you wish it"; and he said it with a louder voice,
that a great portion of the soldiers might hear him; "nor am I the
person among you," he said, "who is most powerfully alarmed by the
danger of death; these will be aware of it, and then, if any thing
disastrous shall have occurred, they will demand a reckoning at your
hands; these, who, if it were permitted by you, united three days hence
with the nearest winter-quarters, may encounter the common condition of
war with the rest, and not, as if forced away and separated far from the
rest, perish either by the sword or by famine."

XXXI.--They rise from the council, detain both, and entreat, that "they
do not bring the matter into the greatest jeopardy by their dissension
and obstinacy; the affair was an easy one, if only they all thought and
approved of the same thing, whether they remain or depart; on the other
hand, they saw no security in dissension." The matter is prolonged by
debate till midnight. At last Cotta, being overruled, yields his assent;
the opinion of Sabinus prevails. It is proclaimed that they will march
at day-break; the remainder of the night is spent without sleep, since
every soldier was inspecting his property, [to see] what he could carry
with him, and what, out of the appurtenances of the winter-quarters, he
would be compelled to leave; every reason is suggested to show why they
could not stay without danger, and how that danger would be increased by
the fatigue of the soldiers and their want of sleep. At break of day
they quit the camp, in a very extended line and with a very large amount
of baggage, in such a manner as men who were convinced that the advice
was given by Ambiorix, not as an enemy, but as most friendly [towards
them].

XXXII.--But the enemy, after they had made the discovery of their
intended departure by the noise during the night and their not retiring
to rest, having placed an ambuscade in two divisions in the woods, in a
suitable and concealed place, two miles from the camp, waited for the
arrival of the Romans; and when the greater part of the line of march
had descended into a considerable valley, they suddenly presented
themselves on either side of that valley, and began both to harass the
rear and hinder the van from ascending, and to give battle in a place
exceedingly disadvantageous to our men.

XXXIII.--Then at length Titurius, as one who had provided nothing
beforehand, was confused, ran to and fro, and set about arranging his
troops; these very things, however, he did timidly and in such a manner
that all resources seemed to fail him: which generally happens to those
who are compelled to take council in the action itself. But Cotta, who
had reflected that these things might occur on the march, and on that
account had not been an adviser of the departure, was wanting to the
common safety in no respect; both in addressing and encouraging the
soldiers, he performed the duties of a general, and in the battle those
of a soldier. And since they [Titurius and Cotta] could less easily
perform everything by themselves, and provide what was to be done in
each place, by reason of the length of the line of march, they ordered
[the officers] to give the command that they should leave the baggage
and form themselves into an orb, which measure, though in a contingency
of that nature it was not to be condemned, still turned out
unfortunately; for it both diminished the hope of our soldiers and
rendered the enemy more eager for the fight, because it appeared that
this was not done without the greatest fear and despair. Besides that
happened, which would necessarily be the case, that the soldiers for the
most part quitted their ensigns and hurried to seek and carry off from
the baggage whatever each thought valuable, and all parts were filled
with uproar and lamentation.

XXXIV.--But judgment was not wanting to the barbarians; for their
leaders ordered [the officers] to proclaim through the ranks "that no
man should quit his place; that the booty was theirs, and for them was
reserved whatever the Romans should leave; therefore let them consider
that all things depended on their victory." Our men were equal to them
in fighting, both in courage and in number, and though they were
deserted by their leader and by fortune, yet they still placed all hope
of safety in their valour, and as often as any cohort sallied forth on
that side, a great number of the enemy usually fell. Ambiorix, when he
observed this, orders the command to be issued that they throw their
weapons from a distance and do not approach too near, and in whatever
direction the Romans should make an attack, there give way (from the
lightness of their appointments and from their daily practice no damage
could be done them); [but] pursue them when betaking themselves to their
standards again.

XXXV.--Which command having been most carefully obeyed, when any cohort
had quitted the circle and made a charge, the enemy fled very
precipitately. In the meantime, that part of the Roman army, of
necessity, was left unprotected, and the weapons received on their open
flank. Again, when they had begun to return to that place from which
they had advanced, they were surrounded both by those who had retreated
and by those who stood next them; but if, on the other hand, they wished
to keep their place, neither was an opportunity left for valour, nor
could they, being crowded together, escape the weapons cast by so large
a body of men. Yet, though assailed by so many disadvantages, [and]
having received many wounds, they withstood the enemy, and, a great
portion of the day being spent, though they fought from day-break till
the eighth hour, they did nothing which was unworthy of them. At length,
each thigh of T. Balventius, who the year before had been chief
centurion, a brave man and one of great authority, is pierced with a
javelin; Q. Lucanius, of the same rank, fighting most valiantly, is
slain while he assists his son when surrounded by the enemy; L. Cotta,
the lieutenant, when encouraging all the cohorts and companies, is
wounded full in the mouth by a sling.

XXXVI.--Much troubled by these events, Q. Titurius, when he had
perceived Ambiorix in the distance encouraging his men, sends to him his
interpreter, Cn. Pompey, to beg that he would spare him and his
soldiers. He, when addressed, replied, "If he wished to confer with him,
it was permitted; that he hoped what pertained to the safety of the
soldiers could be obtained from the people; that to him however
certainly no injury would be done, and that he pledged his faith to that
effect." He consults with Cotta, who had been wounded, whether it would
appear right to retire from battle, and confer with Ambiorix; [saying]
that he hoped to be able to succeed respecting his own and the soldiers'
safety. Cotta says he will not go to an armed enemy, and in that
perseveres.

XXXVII.--Sabinus orders those tribunes of the soldiers whom he had at
the time around him, and the centurions of the first ranks, to follow
him, and when he had approached near to Ambiorix, being ordered to throw
down his arms, he obeys the order and commands his men to do the same.
In the meantime, while they treat upon the terms, and a longer debate
than necessary is designedly entered into by Ambiorix, being surrounded
by degrees, he is slain. Then they according to their custom shout out
"Victory," and raise their war-cry, and, making an attack on our men,
break their ranks. There L. Cotta, while fighting, is slain, together
with the greater part of the soldiers; the rest betake themselves to the
camp from which they had marched forth, and one of them, L. Petrosidius,
the standard bearer, when he was overpowered by the great number of the
enemy, threw the eagle within the entrenchments and is himself slain
while fighting with the greatest courage before the camp. They with
difficulty sustain the attack till night; despairing of safety, they all
to a man destroy themselves in the night. A few escaping from the
battle, make their way to Labienus at winter-quarters, after wandering
at random through the woods, and inform him of these events.

XXXVIII.--Elated by this victory, Ambiorix marches immediately with his
cavalry to the Aduatuci, who bordered on his kingdom; he halts neither
day nor night, and orders the infantry to follow him closely. Having
related the exploit and roused the Aduatuci, the next day he arrived
among the Nervii, and entreats "that they should not throw away the
opportunity of liberating themselves for ever and of punishing the
Romans for those wrongs which they had received from them"; [he tells
them] "that two lieutenants have been slain, and that a large portion of
the army has perished; that it was not a matter of difficulty for the
legion which was wintering with Cicero to be cut off, when suddenly
assaulted; he declares himself ready to co-operate in that design." He
easily gains over the Nervii by this speech.

XXXIX.--Accordingly, messengers having been forthwith despatched to the
Centrones, the Grudii, the Levaci, the Pleumoxii, and the Geiduni, all
of whom are under their government, they assemble as large bodies as
they can, and rush unexpectedly to the winter-quarters of Cicero, the
report of the death of Titurius not having as yet been conveyed to him.
That also occurred to him which was the consequence of a necessary
work,--that some soldiers who had gone off into the woods for the
purpose of procuring timber and therewith constructing fortifications,
were intercepted by the sudden arrival of [the enemy's] horse. These
having been entrapped, the Eburones, the Nervii, and the Aduatuci and
all their allies and dependants, begin to attack the legion: our men
quickly run together to arms and mount the rampart: they sustained the
attack that day with great difficulty, since the enemy placed all their
hope in despatch, and felt assured that, if they obtained this victory,
they would be conquerors for ever.

XL.--Letters are immediately sent to Caesar by Cicero, great rewards
being offered [to the messengers] if they carried them through. All the
passes having been beset, those who were sent are intercepted. During
the night as many as 120 towers are raised with incredible despatch out
of the timber which they had collected for the purpose of fortification:
the things which seemed necessary to the work are completed. The
following day the enemy, having collected far greater forces, attack the
camp [and] fill up the ditch. Resistance is made by our men in the same
manner as the day before: this same thing is done afterwards during the
remaining days. The work is carried on incessantly in the night: not
even to the sick, or wounded, is opportunity given for rest: whatever
things are required for resisting the assault of the next day are
provided during the night: many stakes burnt at the end, and a large
number of mural pikes are procured: towers are built up, battlements and
parapets are formed of interwoven hurdles. Cicero himself, though he was
in very weak health, did not leave himself the night-time for repose, so
that he was forced to spare himself by the spontaneous movement and
entreaties of the soldiers.

XLI.--Then these leaders and chiefs of the Nervii, who had any intimacy
and grounds of friendship with Cicero, say they desire to confer with
him. When permission was granted, they recount the same things which
Ambiorix had related to Titurius, namely, "that all Gaul was in arms,
that the Germans had passed the Rhine, that the winter-quarters of
Caesar and of the others were attacked." They report in addition also,
about the death of Sabinus. They point to Ambiorix for the purpose of
obtaining credence; "they are mistaken," say they, "if they hoped for
any relief from those who distrust their own affairs; that they bear
such feelings towards Cicero and the Roman people that they deny them
nothing but winter-quarters and are unwilling that this practice should
become constant; that through their [the Nervii's] means it is possible
for them [the Romans] to depart from their winter-quarters safely and to
proceed without fear into whatever parts they desire." To these Cicero
made only one reply: "that it is not the custom of the Roman people to
accept any condition from an armed enemy: if they are willing to lay
down their arms, they may employ him as their advocate and send
ambassadors to Caesar: that he believed, from his [Caesar's] justice,
they would obtain the things which they might request."

XLII.--Disappointed in this hope, the Nervii surround the winter-quarters
with a rampart eleven feet high, and a ditch thirteen feet in
depth. These military works they had learnt from our men in the
intercourse of former years, and, having taken some of our army
prisoners, were instructed by them: but, as they had no supply of iron
tools which are requisite for this service, they were forced to cut the
turf with their swords, and to empty out the earth with their hands and
cloaks, from which circumstance the vast number of the men could be
inferred; for in less than three hours they completed a fortification of
ten miles in circumference; and during the rest of the days they began
to prepare and construct towers of the height of the ramparts, and
grappling irons, and mantlets, which the same prisoners had taught them.

XLIII.--On the seventh day of the attack, a very high wind having sprung
up, they began to discharge by their slings hot balls made of burnt or
hardened clay, and heated javelins, upon the huts, which, after the
Gallic custom, were thatched with straw. These quickly took fire, and by
the violence of the wind, scattered their flames in every part of the
camp. The enemy following up their success with a very loud shout, as if
victory were already obtained and secured, began to advance their towers
and mantlets, and climb the rampart with ladders. But so great was the
courage of our soldiers, and such their presence of mind, that though
they were scorched on all sides, and harassed by a vast number of
weapons, and were aware that their baggage and their possessions were
burning, not only did no one quit the rampart for the purpose of
withdrawing from the scene, but scarcely did any one even then look
behind; and they all fought most vigorously and most valiantly. This day
was by far the most calamitous to our men; it had this result, however,
that on that day the largest number of the enemy was wounded and slain,
since they had crowded beneath the very rampart, and the hindmost did
not afford the foremost a retreat. The flame having abated a little, and
a tower having been brought up in a particular place and touching the
rampart, the centurions of the third cohort retired from the place in
which they were standing, and drew off all their men: they began to call
on the enemy by gestures and by words, to enter if they wished; but none
of them dared to advance. Then stones having been cast from every
quarter, the enemy were dislodged, and their tower set on fire.

XLIV.--In that legion there were two very brave men, centurions, who
were now approaching the first ranks, T. Pulfio, and L. Varenus. These
used to have continual disputes between them which of them should be
preferred, and every year used to contend for promotion with the utmost
animosity. When the fight was going on most vigorously before the
fortifications, Pulfio, one of them, says, "Why do you hesitate,
Varenus? or what [better] opportunity of signalising your valour do you
seek? This very day shall decide our disputes." When he had uttered
these words, he proceeds beyond the fortifications, and rushes on that
part of the enemy which appeared the thickest. Nor does Varenus remain
within the rampart, but respecting the high opinion of all, follows
close after. Then, when an inconsiderable space intervened, Pulfio
throws his javelin at the enemy, and pierces one of the multitude who
was running up, and while the latter was wounded and slain, the enemy
cover him with their shields, and all throw their weapons at the other
and afford him no opportunity of retreating. The shield of Pulfio is
pierced and a javelin is fastened in his belt. This circumstance turns
aside his scabbard and obstructs his right hand when attempting to draw
his sword: the enemy crowd around him when [thus] embarrassed. His rival
runs up to him and succours him in this emergency. Immediately the whole
host turn from Pulfio to him, supposing the other to be pierced through
by the javelin. Varenus rushes on briskly with his sword and carries on
the combat hand to hand, and having slain one man, for a short time
drove back the rest: while he urges on too eagerly, slipping into a
hollow, he fell. To him, in his turn, when surrounded, Pulfio brings
relief; and both having slain a great number, retreat into the
fortifications amidst the highest applause. Fortune so dealt with both
in this rivalry and conflict, that the one competitor was a succour and
a safeguard to the other, nor could it be determined which of the two
appeared worthy of being preferred to the other.

XLV.--In proportion as the attack became daily more formidable and
violent, and particularly because, as a great number of the soldiers
were exhausted with wounds, the matter had come to a small number of
defenders, more frequent letters and messengers were sent to Caesar; a
part of which messengers were taken and tortured to death in the sight
of our soldiers. There was within our camp a certain Nervian, by name
Vertico, born in a distinguished position, who in the beginning of the
blockade had deserted to Cicero, and had exhibited his fidelity to him.
He persuades his slave, by the hope of freedom, and by great rewards, to
convey a letter to Caesar. This he carries out bound about his javelin,
and mixing among the Gauls without any suspicion by being a Gaul, he
reaches Caesar. From him they received information of the imminent
danger of Cicero and the legion.

XLVI.--Caesar having received the letter about the eleventh hour of the
day, immediately sends a messenger to the Bellovaci, to M. Crassus,
questor there, whose winter-quarters were twenty-five miles distant from
him. He orders the legion to set forward in the middle of the night and
come to him with despatch. Crassus set out with the messenger. He sends
anther to C. Fabius, the lieutenant, ordering him to lead forth his
legion into the territories of the Atrebates, to which he knew his march
must be made. He writes to Labienus to come with his legion to the
frontiers of the Nervii, if he could do so to the advantage of the
commonwealth: he does not consider that the remaining portion of the
army, because it was somewhat farther distant, should be waited for; but
assembles about 400 horse from the nearest winter-quarters.

XLVII.--Having been apprised of the arrival of Crassus by the scouts at
about the third hour, he advances twenty miles that day. He appoints
Crassus over Samarobriva and assigns him a legion, because he was
leaving there the baggage of the army, the hostages of the states, the
public documents, and all the corn, which he had conveyed thither for
passing the winter. Fabius, without delaying a moment, meets him on the
march with his legion, as he had been commanded. Labienus, having learnt
the death of Sabinus and the destruction of the cohorts, as all the
forces of the Treviri had come against him, beginning to fear lest, if
he made a departure from his winter-quarters, resembling a flight, he
should not be able to support the attack of the enemy, particularly
since he knew them to be elated by their recent victory, sends back a
letter to Caesar, informing him with what great hazard he would lead out
his legion from winter-quarters; he relates at large the affair which
had taken place among the Eburones; he informs him that all the infantry
and cavalry of the Treviri had encamped at a distance of only three
miles from his own camp.

XLVIII.--Caesar, approving of his motives, although he was disappointed
in his expectation of three legions, and reduced to two, yet placed his
only hopes of the common safety in despatch. He goes into the
territories of the Nervii by long marches. There he learns from some
prisoners what things are going on in the camp of Cicero, and in how
great jeopardy the affair is. Then with great rewards he induces a
certain man of the Gallic horse to convey a letter to Cicero. This he
sends written in Greek characters, lest the letter being intercepted,
our measures should be discovered by the enemy. He directs him, if he
should be unable to enter, to throw his spear with the letter fastened
to the thong inside the fortifications of the camp. He writes in the
letter, that he having set out with his legions, will quickly be there:
he entreats him to maintain his ancient valour. The Gaul apprehending
danger, throws his spear as he had been directed. It by chance stuck in
a tower, and, not being observed by our men for two days, was seen by a
certain soldier on the third day: when taken down, it was carried to
Cicero. He, after perusing it, reads it out in an assembly of the
soldiers, and fills all with the greatest joy. Then the smoke of the
fires was seen in the distance, a circumstance which banished all doubt
of the arrival of the legions.

XLIX.--The Gauls, having discovered the matter through their scouts,
abandon the blockade, and march towards Caesar with all their forces:
these were about 60,000 armed men. Cicero, an opportunity being now
afforded, again begs of that Vertico, the Gaul, whom we mentioned above,
to convey back a letter to Caesar; he advises him to perform his journey
warily; he writes in the letter that the enemy had departed and had
turned their entire force against him. When this letter was brought to
him about the middle of the night, Caesar apprises his soldiers of its
contents, and inspires them with courage for fighting: the following
day, at the dawn, he moves his camp, and, having proceeded four miles,
he espies the forces of the enemy on the other side of a considerable
valley and rivulet. It was an affair of great danger to fight with such
large forces in a disadvantageous situation. For the present, therefore,
inasmuch as he knew that Cicero was released from the blockade, and
thought that he might, on that account, relax his speed, he halted there
and fortifies a camp in the most favourable position he can. And this,
though it was small in itself, [there being] scarcely 7000 men, and
these too without baggage, still by the narrowness of the passages, he
contracts as much as he can, with this object, that he may come into the
greatest contempt with the enemy. In the meanwhile, scouts having been
sent in all directions, he examines by what most convenient path he
might cross the valley.

L.--That day, slight skirmishes of cavalry having taken place near the
river, both armies kept in their own positions: the Gauls, because they
were awaiting larger forces which had not then arrived; Caesar, [to see]
if perchance by pretence of fear he could allure the enemy towards his
position, so that he might engage in battle, in front of his camp, on
this side of the valley; if he could not accomplish this, that, having
inquired about the passes, he might cross the valley and the river with
the less hazard. At day-break the cavalry of the enemy approaches to the
camp and joins battle with our horse. Caesar orders the horse to give
way purposely, and retreat to the camp: at the same time he orders the
camp to be fortified with a higher rampart in all directions, the gates
to be barricaded, and in executing these things as much confusion to be
shown as possible, and to perform them under the pretence of fear.

LI.--Induced by all these things the enemy lead over their forces and
draw up their line in a disadvantageous position; and as our men also
had been led down from the ramparts, they approach nearer, and throw
their weapons into the fortification from all sides, and sending heralds
round, order it to be proclaimed that, if "any, either Gaul or Roman,
was willing to go over to them before the third hour, it was permitted;
after that time there would not be permission"; and so much did they
disregard our men, that the gates having been blocked up with single
rows of turf as a mere appearance, because they did not seem able to
burst in that way, some began to pull down the rampart with their hands,
others to fill up the trenches. Then Caesar, making a sally from all the
gates, and sending out the cavalry, soon puts the enemy to flight, so
that no one at all stood his ground with the intention of fighting; and
he slew a great number of them, and deprived all of their arms.

LII.--Caesar, fearing to pursue them very far, because woods and
morasses intervened, and also [because] he saw that they suffered no
small loss in abandoning their position, reaches Cicero the same day
with all his forces safe. He witnesses with surprise the towers,
mantlets, and [other] fortifications belonging to the enemy: the legion
having been drawn out, he finds that even every tenth soldier had not
escaped without wounds. From all these things he judges with what danger
and with what great courage matters had been conducted; he commends
Cicero according to his desert and likewise the legion; he addresses
individually the centurions and the tribunes of the soldiers, whose
valour he had discovered to have been signal. He receives information of
the death of Sabinus and Cotta from the prisoners. An assembly being
held the following day, he states the occurrence; he consoles and
encourages the soldiers; he suggests that the disaster, which had been
occasioned by the misconduct and rashness of his lieutenant, should be
borne with a patient mind, because by the favour of the immortal gods
and their own valour, neither was lasting joy left to the enemy, nor
very lasting grief to them.

LIII.--In the meanwhile the report respecting the victory of Caesar is
conveyed to Labienus through the country of the Remi with incredible
speed, so that, though he was about sixty miles distant from the
winter-quarter of Cicero, and Caesar had arrived there after the ninth
hour, before midnight a shout arose at the gates of the camp, by which
shout an indication of the victory and a congratulation on the part of
the Remi were given to Labienus. This report having been carried to the
Treviri, Indutiormarus, who had resolved to attack the camp of Labienus
the following day, flies by night and leads back all his forces into the
country of the Treviri. Caesar sends back Fabius with his legion to his
winter-quarters; he himself determines to winter with three legions near
Samarobriva in three different quarters, and, because such great
commotions had arisen in Gaul, he resolved to remain during the whole
winter with the army himself. For the disaster respecting the death of
Sabinus having been circulated among them, almost all the states of Gaul
were deliberating about war, sending messengers and embassies into all
quarters, inquiring what further measure they should take, and holding
councils by night in secluded places. Nor did any period of the whole
winter pass over without fresh anxiety to Caesar, or without his
receiving some intelligence respecting the meetings and commotions of
the Gauls. Among these, he is informed by L. Roscius, the lieutenant
whom he had placed over the thirteenth legion, that large forces of
those states of the Gauls, which are called the Armoricae, had assembled
for the purpose of attacking him and were not more than eight miles
distant; but intelligence respecting the victory of Caesar being carried
[to them], had retreated in such a manner that their departure appeared
like a flight.

LIV.--But Caesar, having summoned to him the principal persons of each
state, in one case by alarming them, since he declared that he knew what
was going on, and in another case by encouraging them, retained a great
part of Gaul in its allegiance. The Senones, however, which is a state
eminently powerful and one of great influence among the Gauls,
attempting by general design to slay Cavarinus whom Caesar had created
king among them (whose brother, Moritasgus, had held the sovereignty at
the period of the arrival of Caesar in Gaul, and whose ancestors had
also previously held it) when he discovered their plot and fled, pursued
him even to the frontiers [of the state], and drove him from his kingdom
and his home; and, after having sent ambassadors to Caesar for the
purpose of concluding a peace, when he ordered all their senate to come
to him, did not obey that command. So far did it operate among those
barbarian people, that there were found some to be the first to wage
war; and so great a change of inclinations did it produce in all, that
except the Aedui and the Remi, whom Caesar had always held in especial
honour, the one people for their long standing and uniform fidelity
towards the Roman people, the other for their late service in the Gallic
war, there was scarcely a state which was not suspected by us. And I do
not know whether that ought much to be wondered at, as well for several
other reasons, as particularly because they who ranked above all nations
for prowess in war, most keenly regretted that they had lost so much of
that reputation as to submit to commands from the Roman people.

LV.--But the Treviri and Indutiomarus let no part of the entire winter
pass without sending ambassadors across the Rhine, importuning the
states, promising money, and asserting that, as a large portion of our
army had been cut off, a much smaller portion remained. However, none of
the German states could be induced to cross the Rhine, since "they had
twice essayed it," they said, "in the war with Ariovistus and in the
passage of the Tenchtheri there; that fortune was not to be tempted any
more." Indutiomarus disappointed in this expectation, nevertheless began
to raise troops, and discipline them, and procure horses from the
neighbouring people and allure to him by great rewards the outlaws and
convicts throughout Gaul. And such great influence had he already
acquired for himself in Gaul by these means, that embassies were
flocking to him in all directions, and seeking, publicly and privately,
his favour and friendship.

LVI.--When he perceived that they were coming to him voluntarily; that
on the one side the Senones and the Carnutes were stimulated by their
consciousness of guilt, on the other side the Nervii and the Aduatuci
were preparing war against the Romans, and that forces of volunteers
would not be wanting to him if he began to advance from his own
territories, he proclaims an armed council (this according to the custom
of the Gauls is the commencement of war) at which, by a common law, all
the youth were wont to assemble in arms; whoever of them comes last is
killed in the sight of the whole assembly after being racked with every
torture. In that council he declares Cingetorix, the leader of the other
faction, his own son-in-law (whom we have above mentioned, as having
embraced the protection of Caesar, and never having deserted him) an
enemy and confiscates his property. When these things were finished, he
asserts in the council that he, invited by the Senones and the Carnutes,
and several other states of Gaul, was about to march thither through the
territories of the Remi, devastate their lands, and attack the camp of
Labienus: before he does that, he informs them of what he desires to be
done.

LVII.--Labienus, since he was confining himself within a camp strongly
fortified by the nature of the ground and by art, had no apprehensions
as to his own and the legion's danger, but was devising that he might
throw away no opportunity of conducting the war successfully.
Accordingly, the speech of Indutiomarus, which he had delivered in the
council, having been made known [to him] by Cingetorix and his allies,
he sends messengers to the neighbouring states and summons horse from
all quarters: he appoints to them a fixed day for assembling. In the
meantime, Indutiomarus, with all his cavalry, nearly every day used to
parade close to his [Labienus's] camp; at one time, that he might inform
himself of the situation of the camp; at another time, for the purpose
of conferring with or of intimidating him. Labienus confined his men
within the fortifications and promoted the enemy's belief of his fear by
whatever methods he could.

LVIII.--Since Indutiomarus was daily advancing up to the camp with
greater defiance, all the cavalry of the neighbouring states which he
[Labienus] had taken care to have sent for, having been admitted in one
night, he confined all his men within the camp by guards with such great
strictness, that that fact could by no means be reported or carried to
the Treviri. In the meanwhile Indutiomarus, according to his daily
practice, advances up to the camp and spends a great part of the day
there: his horse cast their weapons, and with very insulting language
call out our men to battle. No reply being given by our men, the enemy
when they thought proper, depart towards evening in a disorderly and
scattered manner, Labienus unexpectedly sends out all the cavalry by two
gates; he gives this command and prohibition, that, when the enemy
should be terrified and put to flight (which he foresaw would happen, as
it did), they should all make for Indutiomarus, and no one wound any man
before he should have seen him slain, because he was unwilling that he
should escape, in consequence of gaining time by the delay [occasioned
by the pursuit] of the rest. He offers great rewards for those who
should kill him: he sends up the cohorts as a relief to the horse. The
issue justifies the policy of the man, and, since all aimed at one,
Indutiomarus is slain, having been overtaken at the very ford of the
river, and his head is carried to the camp: the horse, when returning,
pursue and slay all whom they can. This affair having been known, all
the forces of the Eburones and the Nervii which had assembled, depart;
and for a short time after this action, Caesar was less harassed in the
government of Gaul.



BOOK VI

I.--Caesar, expecting for many reasons a greater commotion in Gaul,
resolves to hold a levy by the means of M. Silanus, C. Antistius
Reginus, and T. Sextius, his lieutenants: at the same time he requested
of Cn. Pompey, the proconsul, that since he was remaining near the city
invested with military command for the interests of the commonwealth, he
would command those men whom when consul he had levied by the military
oath in Cisalpine Gaul, to join their respective corps, and to proceed
to him; thinking it of great importance, as far as regarded the opinion
which the Gauls would entertain for the future, that the resources of
Italy should appear so great, that if any loss should be sustained in
war, not only could it be repaired in a short time, but likewise be
further supplied by still larger forces. And when Pompey had granted
this to the interests of the commonwealth and the claims of friendship,
Caesar having quickly completed the levy by means of his lieutenants,
after three legions had been both formed and brought to him before the
winter [had] expired, and the number of those cohorts which he had lost
under Q. Titurius had been doubled, taught the Gauls, both by his
dispatch and by his forces, what the discipline and the power of the
Roman people could accomplish.

II.--Indutiomarus having been slain, as we have stated, the government
was conferred upon his relatives by the Treviri. They cease not to
importune the neighbouring Germans and to promise them money: when they
could not obtain [their object] from those nearest them, they try those
more remote. Having found some states willing to accede to their wishes,
they enter into a compact with them by a mutual oath, and give hostages
as a security for the money: they attach Ambiorix to them by an alliance
and confederacy. Caesar, on being informed of their acts, since he saw
that war was being prepared on all sides, that the Nervii, Aduatuci, and
Menapii, with the addition of all the Germans on this side of the Rhine
were under arms, that the Senones did not assemble according to his
command, and were concerting measures with the Carnutes and the
neighbouring states, that the Germans were importuned by the Treviri in
frequent embassies, thought that he ought to take measures for the war
earlier [than usual].

III.-Accordingly, while the winter was not yet ended, having
concentrated the four nearest legions, he marched unexpectedly into the
territories of the Nervii, and before they could either assemble, or
retreat, after capturing a large number of cattle and of men, and
wasting their lands and giving up that booty to the soldiers, compelled
them to enter into a surrender and give him hostages. That business
having been speedily executed, he again led his legions back into
winter-quarters. Having proclaimed a council of Gaul in the beginning of
the spring, as he had been accustomed [to do], when the deputies from
the rest, except the Senones, the Carnutes, and the Treviri, had come,
judging this to be the commencement of war and revolt, that he might
appear to consider all things of less consequence [than that war], he
transfers the council to Lutetia of the Parisii. These were adjacent to
the Senones, and had united their state to them during the memory of
their fathers, but were thought to have no part in the present plot.
Having proclaimed this from the tribunal, he advances the same day
towards the Senones with his legions and arrives among them by long
marches.

IV.--Acco, who had been the author of that enterprise, on being informed
of his arrival, orders the people to assemble in the towns; to them,
while attempting this and before it could be accomplished, news is
brought that the Romans are close at hand: through necessity they give
over their design and send ambassadors to Caesar for the purpose of
imploring pardon; they make advances to him through the Aedui, whose
state was from ancient times under the protection of Rome. Caesar
readily grants them pardon and receives their excuse at the request of
the Aedui; because he thought that the summer season was one for an
impending war, not for an investigation. Having imposed one hundred
hostages, he delivers these to the Aedui to be held in charge by them.
To the same place the Carnutes send ambassadors and hostages, employing
as their mediators the Remi, under whose protection they were: they
receive the same answers. Caesar concludes the council and imposes a
levy of cavalry on the states.

V.--This part of Gaul having been tranquillized, he applies himself
entirely both in mind and soul to the war with the Treviri and Ambiorix.
He orders Cavarinus to march with him with the cavalry of the Senones,
lest any commotion should arise either out of his hot temper, or out of
the hatred of the state which he had incurred. After arranging these
things, as he considered it certain that Ambiorix would not contend in
battle, he watched his other plans attentively. The Menapii bordered on
the territories of the Eburones, and were protected by one continued
extent of morasses and woods; and they alone out of Gaul had never sent
ambassadors to Caesar on the subject of peace. Caesar knew that a tie of
hospitality subsisted between them and Ambiorix: he also discovered that
the latter had entered into an alliance with the Germans by means of the
Treviri. He thought that these auxiliaries ought to be detached from him
before he provoked him to war; lest he, despairing of safety, should
either proceed to conceal himself in the territories of the Menapii, or
should be driven to coalesce with the Germans beyond the Rhine. Having
entered upon this resolution, he sends the baggage of the whole army to
Labienus, in the territories of the Treviri and orders two legions to
proceed to him: he himself proceeds against the Menapii with five
lightly-equipped legions. They, having assembled no troops, as they
relied on the defence of their position, retreat into the woods and
morasses, and convey thither all their property.

VI.--Caesar, having divided his forces with C. Fabius, his lieutenant,
and M. Crassus, his questor, and having hastily constructed some
bridges, enters their country in three divisions, burns their houses and
villages, and gets possession of a large number of cattle and men.
Constrained by these circumstances, the Menapii send ambassadors to him
for the purpose of suing for peace. He, after receiving hostages,
assures them that he will consider them in the number of his enemies if
they shall receive within their territories either Ambiorix or his
ambassadors. Having determinately settled these things, he left among
the Menapii, Commius the Atrebatian with some cavalry as a guard; he
himself proceeds toward the Treviri.

VII.--While these things are being performed by Caesar, the Treviri,
having drawn together large forces of infantry and of cavalry, were
preparing to attack Labienus and the legion which was wintering in their
territories, and were already not further distant from him than a
journey of two days, when they learn that two legions had arrived by the
order of Caesar. Having pitched their camp fifteen miles off, they
resolve to await the support of the Germans. Labienus, having learned
the design of the enemy, hoping that through their rashness there would
be some opportunity of engaging, after leaving a guard of five cohorts
for the baggage, advances against the enemy with twenty-five cohorts and
a large body of cavalry, and, leaving the space of a mile between them,
fortifies his camp. There was between Labienus and the enemy a river
difficult to cross and with steep banks: this neither did he himself
design to cross, nor did he suppose the enemy would cross it. Their hope
of auxiliaries was daily increasing. He [Labienus] openly says in a
council that "since the Germans are said to be approaching, he would not
bring into uncertainty his own and the army's fortunes, and the next day
would move his camp at early dawn. These words are quickly carried to
the enemy, since out of so large a number of cavalry composed of Gauls,
nature compelled some to favour the Gallic interests. Labienus, having
assembled the tribunes of the soldiers and principal centurions by
night, states what his design is, and, that he may the more easily give
the enemy a belief of his fears, he orders the camp to be moved with
greater noise and confusion than was usual with the Roman people. By
these means he makes his departure [appear], like a retreat. These
things, also, since the camps were so near, are reported to the enemy by
scouts before daylight.

VIII.--Scarcely had the rear advanced beyond the fortifications when the
Gauls, encouraging one another "not to cast from their hands the
anticipated booty, that it was a tedious thing, while the Romans were
panic stricken, to be waiting for the aid of the Germans, and that their
dignity did not suffer them to fear to attack with such great forces so
small a band, particularly when retreating and encumbered," do not
hesitate to cross the river and give battle in a disadvantageous
position. Labienus suspecting that these things would happen, was
proceeding quietly, and using the same pretence of a march, in order
that he might entice them across the river. Then, having sent forward
the baggage some short distance and placed it on a certain eminence, he
says, "Soldiers, you have the opportunity you have sought: you hold the
enemy in an encumbered and disadvantageous position: display to us your
leaders the same valour you have ofttimes displayed to your general:
imagine that he is present and actually sees these exploits." At the
same time he orders the troops to face about towards the enemy and form
in line of battle, and, despatching a few troops of cavalry as a guard
for the bag gage, he places the rest of the horse on the wings. Our men,
raising a shout, quickly throw their javelins at the enemy. They, when,
contrary to their expectation, they saw those whom they believed to be
retreating, advance towards them with threatening banners, were not able
to sustain even the charge, and, being put to flight at the first
onslaught, sought the nearest woods: Labienus pursuing them with the
cavalry, upon a large number being slain, and several taken prisoners,
got possession of the state a few days after; for the Germans who were
coming to the aid of the Treviri, having been informed of their flight,
retreated to their homes. The relations of Indutiomarus, who had been
the promoters of the revolt, accompanying them, quitted their own state
with them. The supreme power and government were delivered to
Cingetorix, whom we have stated to have remained firm in his allegiance
from the commencement.

IX.--Caesar, after he came from the territories of the Menapii into
those of the Treviri, resolved for two reasons to cross the Rhine; one
of which was, because they had sent assistance to the Treviri against
him; the other, that Ambiorix might not have a retreat among them.
Having determined on these matters, he began to build a bridge a little
above that place, at which he had before conveyed over his army. The
plan having been known and laid down, the work is accomplished in a few
days by the great exertion of the soldiers. Having left a strong guard
at the bridge on the side of the Treviri, lest any commotion should
suddenly arise among them, he leads over the rest of the forces and the
cavalry. The Ubii, who before had sent hostages and come to a
capitulation, send ambassadors to him, for the purpose of vindicating
themselves, to assure him that "neither had auxiliaries been sent to the
Treviri from their state, nor had they violated their allegiance"; they
entreat and beseech him "to spare them, lest, in his common hatred of
the Germans, the innocent should suffer the penalty of the guilty: they
promise to give more hostages, if he desire them." Having investigated
the case, Caesar finds that the auxiliaries had been sent by the Suevi;
he accepts the apology of the Ubii, and makes minute inquiries
concerning the approaches and the routes to the territories of the
Suevi. X.--In the meanwhile he is informed by the Ubii, a few days
after, that the Suevi are drawing all their forces into one place, and
are giving orders to those nations which are under their government to
send auxiliaries of infantry and of cavalry. Having learned these
things, he provides a supply of corn, selects a proper place for his
camp, and commands the Ubii to drive off their cattle and carry away all
their possessions from the country parts into the towns, hoping that
they, being a barbarous and ignorant people, when harassed by the want
of provisions, might be brought to an engagement on disadvantageous
terms: he orders them to send numerous scouts among the Suevi, and learn
what things are going on among them. They execute the orders, and, a few
days having intervened, report that all the Suevi, after certain
intelligence concerning the army of the Romans had come, retreated with
all their own forces and those of their allies, which they had
assembled, to the utmost extremities of their territories: that there is
a wood there of very great extent, which is called Bacenis; that this
stretches a great way into the interior, and, being opposed as a natural
barrier, defends from injuries and incursions the Cherusci against the
Suevi, and the Suevi against the Cherusci: that at the entrance of that
forest the Suevi had determined to await the coming up of the Romans.

XI.--Since we have come to this place, it does not appear to be foreign
to our subject to lay before the reader an account of the manners of
Gaul and Germany, and wherein these nations differ from each other. In
Gaul there are factions not only in all the states, and in all the
cantons and their divisions, but almost in each family, and of these
factions those are the leaders who are considered according to their
judgment to possess the greatest influence, upon whose will and
determination the management of all affairs and measures depends. And
that seems to have been instituted in ancient times with this view, that
no one of the common people should be in want of support against one
more powerful; for none [of those leaders] suffers his party to be
oppressed and defrauded, and if he do otherwise, he has no influence
among his party. This same policy exists throughout the whole of Gaul;
for all the states are divided into two factions.

XII.--When Caesar arrived in Gaul, the Aedui were the leaders of one
faction, the Sequani of the other. Since the latter were less powerful
by themselves, inasmuch as the chief influence was from of old among the
Aedui, and their dependencies were great, they had united to themselves
the Germans and Ariovistus, and had brought them over to their party by
great sacrifices and promises. And having fought several successful
battles and slain all the nobility of the Aedui, they had so far
surpassed them in power, that they brought over, from the Aedui to
themselves, a large portion of their dependants and received from them
the sons of their leading men as hostages, and compelled them to swear
in their public character that they would enter into no design against
them; and held a portion of the neighbouring land, seized on by force,
and possessed the sovereignty of the whole of Gaul. Divitiacus urged by
this necessity, had proceeded to Rome to the senate, for the purpose of
entreating assistance, and had returned without accomplishing his
object. A change of affairs ensued on the arrival of Caesar, the
hostages were returned to the Aedui, their old dependencies restored,
and new acquired through Caesar (because those who had attached
themselves to their alliance saw that they enjoyed a better state and a
milder government), their other interests, their influence, their
reputation were likewise increased, and in consequence, the Sequani lost
the sovereignty. The Remi succeeded to their place, and, as it was
perceived that they equalled the Aedui in favour with Caesar, those, who
on account of their old animosities could by no means coalesce with the
Aedui, consigned themselves in clientship to the Remi. The latter
carefully protected them. Thus they possessed both a new and suddenly
acquired influence. Affairs were then in that position, that the Aedui
were considered by far the leading people, and the Remi held the second
post of honour.

XIII.--Throughout all Gaul there are two orders of those men who are of
any rank and dignity: for the commonality is held almost in the
condition of slaves, and dares to undertake nothing of itself and is
admitted to no deliberation. The greater part, when they are pressed
either by debt, or the large amount of their tributes, or the oppression
of the more powerful, give themselves up in vassalage to the nobles, who
possess over them the same rights without exception as masters over
their slaves. But of these two orders, one is that of the Druids, the
other that of the knights. The former are engaged in things sacred,
conduct the public and the private sacrifices, and interpret all matters
of religion. To these a large number of the young men resort for the
purpose of instruction, and they [the Druids] are in great honour among
them. For they determine respecting almost all controversies, public and
private; and if any crime has been perpetrated, if murder has been
committed, if there be any dispute about an inheritance, if any about
boundaries, these same persons decide it; they decree rewards and
punishments if any one, either in a private or public capacity, has not
submitted to their decision, they interdict him from the sacrifices.
This among them is the most heavy punishment. Those who have been thus
interdicted are esteemed in the number of the impious and the criminal:
all shun them, and avoid their society and conversation, lest they
receive some evil from their contact; nor is justice administered to
them when seeking it, nor is any dignity bestowed on them. Over all
these Druids one presides, who possesses supreme authority among them.
Upon his death, if any individual among the rest is pre-eminent in
dignity, he succeeds; but, if there are many equal, the election is made
by the suffrages of the Druids; sometimes they even contend for the
presidency with arms. These assemble at a fixed period of the year in a
consecrated place in the territories of the Carnutes, which is reckoned
the central region of the whole of Gaul. Hither all, who have disputes,
assemble from every part, and submit to their decrees and
determinations. This institution is supposed to have been devised in
Britain, and to have been brought over from it into Gaul; and now those
who desire to gain a more accurate knowledge of that system generally
proceed thither for the purpose of studying it.

XIV.--The Druids do not go to war, nor pay tribute together with the
rest; they have an exemption from military service and a dispensation in
all matters. Induced by such great advantages, many embrace this
profession of their own accord, and [many] are sent to it by their
parents and relations. They are said there to learn by heart a great
number of verses; accordingly some remain in the course of training
twenty years. Nor do they regard it lawful to commit these to writing,
though in almost all other matters, in their public and private
transactions, they use Greek characters. That practice they seem to me
to have adopted for two reasons; because they neither desire their
doctrines to be divulged among the mass of the people, nor those who
learn, to devote themselves the less to the efforts of memory, relying
on writing; since it generally occurs to most men, that, in their
dependence on writing, they relax their diligence in learning
thoroughly, and their employment of the memory. They wish to inculcate
this as one of their leading tenets, that souls do not become extinct,
but pass after death from one body to another, and they think that men
by this tenet are in a great degree excited to valour, the fear of death
being disregarded. They likewise discuss and impart to the youth many
things respecting the stars and their motion, respecting the extent of
the world and of our earth, respecting the nature of things, respecting
the power and the majesty of the immortal gods.

XV.--The other order is that of the knights. These, when there is
occasion and any war occurs (which before Caesar's arrival was for the
most part wont to happen every year, as either they on their part were
inflicting injuries or repelling those which others inflicted on them),
are all engaged in war. And those of them most distinguished by birth
and resources, have the greatest number of vassals and dependants about
them. They acknowledge this sort of influence and power only.

XVI.--The nation of all the Gauls is extremely devoted to superstitious
rites; and on that account they who are troubled with unusually severe
diseases and they who are engaged in battles and dangers, either
sacrifice men as victims, or vow that they will sacrifice them, and
employ the Druids as the performers of those sacrifices; because they
think that unless the life of a man be offered for the life of a man,
the mind of the immortal gods cannot be rendered propitious, and they
have sacrifices of that kind ordained for national purposes. Others have
figures of vast size, the limbs of which formed of osiers they fill with
living men, which being set on fire, the men perish enveloped in the
flames. They consider that the oblation of such as have been taken in
theft, or in robbery, or any other offence, is more acceptable to the
immortal gods; but when a supply of that class is wanting, they have
recourse to the oblation of even the innocent.

XVII.--They worship as their divinity, Mercury in particular, and have
many images of him, and regard him as the inventor of all arts, they
consider him, the guide of their journeys and marches, and believe him
to have very great influence over the acquisition of gain and mercantile
transactions. Next to him they worship Apollo, and Mars, and Jupiter,
and Minerva; respecting these deities they have for the most part the
same belief as other nations: that Apollo averts diseases, that Minerva
imparts the invention of manufactures, that Jupiter possesses the
sovereignty of the heavenly powers; that Mars presides over wars. To him
when they have determined to engage in battle, they commonly vow those
things they shall take in war. When they have conquered, they sacrifice
whatever captured animals may have survived the conflict, and collect
the other things into one place. In many states you may see piles of
these things heaped up in their consecrated spots; nor does it often
happen that any one, disregarding the sanctity of the case, dares either
to secrete in his house things captured, or take away those deposited;
and the most severe punishment, with torture, has been established for
such a deed.

XVIII.--All the Gauls assert that they are descended from the god Dis,
and say that this tradition has been handed down by the Druids. For that
reason they compute the divisions of every season, not by the number of
days, but of nights; they keep birthdays and the beginnings of months
and years in such an order that the day follows the night. Among the
other usages of their life, they differ in this from almost all other
nations, that they do not permit their children to approach them openly
until they are grown up so as to be able to bear the service of war; and
they regard it as indecorous for a son of boyish age to stand in public
in the presence of his father.

XIX.--Whatever sums of money the husbands have received in the name of
dowry from their wives, making an estimate of it, they add the same
amount out of their own estates. An account is kept of all this money
conjointly, and the profits are laid by: whichever of them shall have
survived [the other], to that one the portion of both reverts, together
with the profits of the previous time. Husbands have power of life and
death over their wives as well as over their children: and when the
father of a family, born in a more than commonly distinguished rank, has
died, his relations assemble, and, if the circumstances of his death are
suspicious, hold an investigation upon the wives in the manner adopted
towards slaves; and if proof be obtained, put them to severe torture,
and kill them. Their funerals, considering the state of civilization
among the Gauls, are magnificent and costly; and they cast into the fire
all things, including living creatures, which they suppose to have been
dear to them when alive; and, a little before this period, slaves and
dependants, who were ascertained to have been beloved by them, were,
after the regular funeral rites were completed, burnt together with
them.

XX.--Those states which are considered to conduct their commonwealth
more judiciously, have it ordained by their laws, that, if any person
shall have heard by rumour and report from his neighbours anything
concerning the commonwealth, he shall convey it to the magistrate and
not impart it to any other; because it has been discovered that
inconsiderate and inexperienced men were often alarmed by false reports
and driven to some rash act, or else took hasty measures in affairs of
the highest importance. The magistrates conceal those things which
require to be kept unknown; and they disclose to the people whatever
they determine to be expedient. It is not lawful to speak of the
commonwealth, except in council.

XXI.--The Germans differ much from these usages, for they have neither
Druids to preside over sacred offices, nor do they pay great regard to
sacrifices. They rank in the number of the gods those alone whom they
behold, and by whose instrumentality they are obviously benefited,
namely, the sun, fire, and the moon; they have not heard of the other
deities even by report. Their whole life is occupied in hunting and in
the pursuits of the military art; from childhood they devote themselves
to fatigue and hardships. Those who have remained chaste for the longest
time, receive the greatest commendation among their people: they think
that by this the growth is promoted, by this the physical powers are
increased and the sinews are strengthened. And to have had knowledge of
a woman before the twentieth year they reckon among the most disgraceful
acts; of which matter there is no concealment, because they bathe
promiscuously in the rivers and [only] use skins or small cloaks of
deers' hides, a large portion of the body being in consequence naked.

XXII.--They do not pay much attention to agriculture, and a large
portion of their food consists in milk, cheese, and flesh; nor has any
one a fixed quantity of land or his own individual limits; but the
magistrates and the leading men each year apportion to the tribes and
families, who have united together, as much land as, and in the place in
which, they think proper, and the year after compel them to remove
elsewhere. For this enactment they advance many reasons--lest seduced by
long-continued custom, they may exchange their ardour in the waging of
war for agriculture; lest they may be anxious to acquire extensive
estates, and the more powerful drive the weaker from their possessions;
lest they construct their houses with too great a desire to avoid cold
and heat; lest the desire of wealth spring up, from which cause
divisions and discords arise; and that they may keep the common people
in a contented state of mind, when each sees his own means placed on an
equality with [those of] the most powerful.

XXIII.--It is the greatest glory to the several states to have as wide
deserts as possible around them, their frontiers having been laid waste.
They consider this the real evidence of their prowess, that their
neighbours shall be driven out of their lands and abandon them, and that
no one dare settle near them; at the same time they think that they
shall be on that account the more secure, because they have removed the
apprehension of a sudden incursion. When a state either repels war waged
against it, or wages it against another, magistrates are chosen to
preside over that war with such authority, that they have power of life
and death. In peace there is no common magistrate, but the chiefs of
provinces and cantons administer justice and determine controversies
among their own people. Robberies which are committed beyond the
boundaries of each state bear no infamy, and they avow that these are
committed for the purpose of disciplining their youth and of preventing
sloth. And when any of their chiefs has said in an assembly "that he
will be their leader, let those who are willing to follow, give in their
names"; they who approve of both the enterprise and the man arise and
promise their assistance and are applauded by the people; such of them
as have not followed him are accounted in the number of deserters and
traitors, and confidence in all matters is afterwards refused them. To
injure guests they regard as impious; they defend from wrong those who
have come to them for any purpose whatever, and esteem them inviolable;
to them the houses of all are open and maintenance is freely supplied.

XXIV.--And there was formerly a time when the Gauls excelled the Germans
in prowess, and waged war on them offensively, and, on account of the
great number of their people and the insufficiency of their land, sent
colonies over the Rhine. Accordingly, the Volcae Tectosages seized on
those parts of Germany which are the most fruitful [and lie] around the
Hercynian forest (which, I perceive, was known by report to Eratosthenes
and some other Greeks, and which they call Orcynia) and settled there.
Which nation to this time retains its position in those settlements, and
has a very high character for justice and military merit: now also they
continue in the same scarcity, indigence, hardihood, as the Germans, and
use the same food and dress; but their proximity to the Province and
knowledge of commodities from countries beyond the sea supplies to the
Gauls many things tending to luxury as well as civilization. Accustomed
by degrees to be overmatched and worsted in many engagements, they do
not even compare themselves to the Germans in prowess.

XXV.--The breadth of this Hercynian forest, which has been referred to
above, is to a quick traveller, a journey of nine days. For it cannot be
otherwise computed, nor are they acquainted with the measures of roads.
It begins at the frontiers of the Helvetii, Nemetes, and Rauraci, and
extends in a right line along the river Danube to the territories of the
Daci and the Anartes: it bends thence to the left in a different
direction from the river, and owing to its extent touches the confines
of many nations; nor is there any person belonging to this part of
Germany who says that he either has gone to the extremity of that
forest, though he had advanced a journey of sixty days, or has heard in
what place it begins. It is certain that many kinds of wild beasts are
produced in it which have not been seen in other parts; of which the
following are such as differ principally from other animals, and appear
worthy of being committed to record.

XXVI.--There is an ox of the shape of a stag, between whose ears a horn
rises from the middle of the forehead, higher and straighter than those
horns which are known to us. From the top of this, branches, like palms;
stretch out a considerable distance. The shape of the female and of the
male is the same; the appearance and the size of the horns is the same.

XXVII.--There are also [animals] which are called elks. The shape of
these, and the varied colour of their skins, is much like roes, but in
size they surpass them a little and are destitute of horns, and have
legs without joints and ligatures; nor do they lie down for the purpose
of rest, nor, if they have been thrown down by any accident, can they
raise or lift themselves up. Trees serve as beds to them; they lean
themselves against them, and thus reclining only slightly, they take
their rest; when the huntsmen have discovered from the footsteps of
these animals whither they are accustomed to betake themselves, they
either undermine all the trees at the roots, or cut into them so far
that the upper part of the trees may appear to be left standing. When
they have leant upon them, according to their habit, they knock down by
their weight the unsupported trees, and fall down themselves along with
them.

XXVIII.-There is a third kind, consisting of those animals which are
called uri. These are a little below the elephant in size, and of the
appearance, colour, and shape of a bull. Their strength and speed are
extraordinary; they spare neither man nor wild beast which they have
espied. These the Germans take with much pains in pits and kill them.
The young men harden themselves with this exercise, and practice
themselves in this kind of hunting, and those who have slain the
greatest number of them, having produced the horns in public, to serve
as evidence, receive great praise. But not even when taken very young
can they be rendered familiar to men and tamed. The size, shape, and
appearance of their horns differ much from the horns of our oxen. These
they anxiously seek after, and bind at the tips with silver, and use as
cups at their most sumptuous entertainments.

XXIX.--Caesar, after he discovered through the Ubian scouts that the
Suevi had retired into their woods, apprehending a scarcity of corn,
because, as we have observed above, all the Germans pay very little
attention to agriculture, resolved not to proceed any farther; but, that
he might not altogether relieve the barbarians from the fear of his
return, and that he might delay their succours, having led back his
army, he breaks down, to the length of 200 feet, the farther end of the
bridge, which joined the banks of the Ubii, and, at the extremity of the
bridge raises towers of four stories, and stations a guard of twelve
cohorts for the purpose of defending the bridge, and strengthens the
place with considerable fortifications. Over that fort and guard he
appointed C. Volcatius Tullus, a young man; he himself, when the corn
began to ripen, having set forth for the war with 40 Ambiorix (through
the forest Arduenna, which is the largest of all Gaul, and reaches from
the banks of the Rhine and the frontiers of the Treviri to those of the
Nervii, and extends over more than 500 miles), he sends forward L.
Minucius Basilus with all the cavalry, to try if he might gain any
advantage by rapid marches and the advantage of time, he warns him to
forbid fires being made in the camp, lest any indication of his approach
be given at a distance: he tells him that he will follow immediately.

XXX.--Basilus does as he was commanded; having performed his march
rapidly, and even surpassed the expectations of all, he surprises in the
fields many not expecting him; through their information he advances
towards Ambiorix himself, to the place in which he was said to be with a
few horse. Fortune accomplishes much, not only in other matters, but
also in the art of war. For as it happened by a remarkable chance, that
he fell upon [Ambiorix] himself unguarded and unprepared, and that his
arrival was seen by the people before the report or information of his
arrival was carried thither; so it was an incident of extraordinary
fortune that, although every implement of war which he was accustomed to
have about him was seized, and his chariots and horses surprised, yet he
himself escaped death. But it was effected owing to this circumstance,
that his house being surrounded by a wood, (as are generally the
dwellings of the Gauls, who, for the purpose of avoiding heat, mostly
seek the neighbourhood of woods and rivers) his attendants and friends
in a narrow spot sustained for a short time the attack of our horse.
While they were fighting, one of his followers mounted him on a horse:
the woods sheltered him as he fled. Thus fortune tended much both
towards his encountering and his escaping danger.

XXXI.--Whether Ambiorix did not collect his forces from cool
deliberation, because he considered he ought not to engage in a battle,
or [whether] he was debarred by time and prevented by the sudden arrival
of our horse, when he supposed the rest of the army was closely
following, is doubtful; but certainly, despatching messengers through
the country, he ordered every one to provide for himself; and a part of
them fled into the forest Arduenna, a part into the extensive morasses;
those who were nearest the ocean, concealed themselves in the islands
which the tides usually form; many, departing from their territories,
committed themselves and all their possessions to perfect strangers.
Cativolcus, king of one-half of the Eburones, who had entered into the
design together with Ambiorix, since, being now worn out by age, he was
unable to endure the fatigue either of war or flight, having cursed
Ambiorix with every imprecation, as the person who had been the
contriver of that measure, destroyed himself with the juice of the yew
tree, of which there is a great abundance in Gaul and Germany.

XXXII.--The Segui and Condrusi, of the nation and number of the Germans,
and who are between the Eburones and the Treviri, sent ambassadors to
Caesar to entreat that he would not regard them in the number of his
enemies, nor consider that the cause of all the Germans on this side the
Rhine was one and the same; that they had formed no plans of war, and
had sent no auxiliaries to Ambiorix. Caesar, having ascertained this
fact by an examination of his prisoners commanded that if any of the
Eburones in their flight had repaired to them, they should be sent back
to him; he assures them that if they did that, he will not injure their
territories. Then, having divided his forces into three parts, he sent
the baggage of all the legions to Aduatuca. That is the name of a fort.
This is nearly in the middle of the Eburones, where Titurius and
Aurunculeius had been quartered for the purpose of wintering. This place
he selected as well on other accounts as because the fortifications of
the previous year remained, in order that he might relieve the labour of
the soldiers. He left the fourteenth legion as a guard for the baggage,
one of those three which he had lately raised in Italy and brought over.
Over that legion and camp he places Q. Tullius Cicero and gives him 200
horse.

XXXIII.--Having divided the army, he orders T. Labienus to proceed with
three legions towards the ocean into those parts which border on the
Menappii; he sends C. Trebonius with a like number of legions to lay
waste that district which lies contiguous to the Aduatuci; he himself
determines to go with the remaining three to the river Sambre, which
flows into the Meuse, and to the most remote parts of Arduenna, whither
he heard that Ambiorix had gone with a few horse. When departing, he
promises that he will return before the end of the seventh day, on which
day he was aware corn was due to that legion which was being left in
garrison. He directs Labienus and Trebonius to return by the same day,
if they can do so agreeably to the interests of the republic; so that
their measures having been mutually imparted, and the plans of the enemy
having been discovered, they might be able to commence a different line
of operations.

XXXIV.--There was, as we have above observed, no regular army, nor a
town, nor a garrison which could defend itself by arms; but the people
were scattered in all directions. Where either a hidden valley, or a
woody spot, or a difficult morass furnished any hope of protection or of
security to any one, there he had fixed himself. These places were known
to those that dwelt in the neighbourhood, and the matter demanded great
attention, not so much in protecting the main body of the army (for no
peril could occur to them altogether from those alarmed and scattered
troops), as in preserving individual soldiers; which in some measure
tended to the safety of the army. For both the desire of booty was
leading many too far, and the woods with their unknown and hidden routes
would not allow them to go in large bodies. If he desired the business
to be completed and the race of those infamous people to be cut off,
more bodies of men must be sent in several directions and the soldiers
must be detached on all sides; if he were disposed to keep the companies
at their standards, as the established discipline and practice of the
Roman army required, the situation itself was a safeguard to the
barbarians, nor was there wanting to individuals the daring to lay
secret ambuscades and beset scattered soldiers. But amidst difficulties
of this nature as far as precautions could be taken by vigilance, such
precautions were taken; so that some opportunities of injuring the enemy
were neglected, though the minds of all were burning to take revenge,
rather than that injury should be effected with any loss to our
soldiers. Caesar despatches messengers to the neighbouring states; by
the hope of booty he invites all to him, for the purpose of plundering
the Eburones, in order that the life of the Gauls might be hazarded in
the woods rather than the legionary soldiers; at the same time, in order
that a large force being drawn around them, the race and name of that
state may be annihilated for such a crime. A large number from all
quarters speedily assembles.

XXXV.--These things were going on in all parts of the territories of the
Eburones, and the seventh day was drawing near, by which day Caesar had
purposed to return to the baggage and the legion. Here it might be
learned how much fortune achieves in war, and how great casualties she
produces. The enemy having been scattered and alarmed, as we related
above, there was no force which might produce even a slight occasion of
fear. The report extends beyond the Rhine to the Germans that the
Eburones are being pillaged, and that all were without distinction
invited to the plunder. The Sigambri, who are nearest to the Rhine, by
whom, we have mentioned above, the Tenchtheri and Usipetes were received
after their retreat, collect 2000 horse; they cross the Rhine in ships
and barks thirty miles below that place where the bridge was entire and
the garrison left by Caesar; they arrive at the frontiers of the
Eburones, surprise many who were scattered in flight, and get possession
of a large amount of cattle, of which barbarians are extremely covetous.
Allured by booty, they advance farther; neither morass nor forest
obstructs these men, born amidst war and depredations; they inquire of
their prisoners in what parts Caesar is; they find that he has advanced
farther, and learn that all the army has removed. Thereon one of the
prisoners says, "Why do you pursue such wretched and trifling spoil;
you, to whom it is granted to become even now most richly endowed by
fortune? In three hours you can reach Aduatuca; there the Roman army has
deposited all its fortunes; there is so little of a garrison that not
even the wall can be manned, nor dare any one go beyond the
fortifications." A hope having been presented them, the Germans leave in
concealment the plunder they had acquired; they themselves hasten to
Aduatuca, employing as their guide the same man by whose information
they had become informed of these things.

XXXVI.--Cicero, who during all the foregoing days had kept his soldiers
in camp with the greatest exactness, and agreeably to the injunctions of
Caesar, had not permitted even any of the camp-followers to go beyond
the fortification, distrusting on the seventh day that Caesar would keep
his promise as to the number of days, because he heard that he had
proceeded farther, and no report as to his return was brought to him,
and being urged at the same time by the expressions of those who called
his tolerance almost a siege, if, forsooth, it was not permitted them to
go out of the camp, since he might expect no disaster, whereby he could
be injured, within three miles of the camp, while nine legions and all
the cavalry were under arms, and the enemy scattered and almost
annihilated, sent five cohorts into the neighbouring cornlands, between
which and the camp only one hill intervened, for the purpose of
foraging. Many soldiers of the legions had been left invalided in the
camp, of whom those who had recovered in this space of time, being about
300, are set together under one standard; a large number of soldiers'
attendants besides, with a great number of beasts of burden, which had
remained in the camp, permission being granted, follow them.

XXXVII.--At this very time, the German horse by chance come up, and
immediately, with the same speed with which they had advanced, attempt
to force the camp at the Decuman gate, nor were they seen, in
consequence of woods lying in the way on that side, before they were
just reaching the camp: so much so, that the sutlers who had their
booths under the rampart had not an opportunity of retreating within the
camp. Our men, not anticipating it, are perplexed by the sudden affair,
and the cohort on the outpost scarcely sustains the first attack. The
enemy spread themselves on the other sides to ascertain if they could
find any access. Our men with difficulty defend the gates; the very
position of itself and the fortification secures the other accesses.
There is a panic in the entire camp, and one inquires of another the
cause of the confusion, nor do they readily determine whither the
standards should be borne, nor into what quarter each should betake
himself. One avows that the camp is already taken, another maintains
that, the enemy having destroyed the army and commander-in-chief, are
come thither as conquerors; most form strange superstitious fancies from
the spot, and place before their eyes the catastrophe of Cotta and
Titurius, who had fallen in the same fort. All being greatly
disconcerted by this alarm, the belief of the barbarians is strengthened
that there is no garrison within, as they had heard from their prisoner.
They endeavour to force an entrance and encourage one another not to
cast from their hands so valuable a prize.

XXXVIII.-P. Sextius Baculus, who had led a principal century under
Caesar (of whom we have made mention in previous engagements), had been
left an invalid in the garrison, and had now been five days without
food. He, distrusting his own safety and that of all, goes forth from
his tent unarmed; he sees that the enemy are close at hand and that the
matter is in the utmost danger; he snatches arms from those nearest, and
stations himself at the gate. The centurions of that cohort which was on
guard follow him; for a short time they sustain the fight together.
Sextius faints, after receiving many wounds; he is with difficulty
saved, drawn away by the hands of the soldiers. This space having
intervened, the others resume courage, so far as to venture to take
their place on the fortifications and present the aspect of defenders.

XXXIX.--The foraging having in the meantime been completed, our soldiers
distinctly hear the shout; the horse hasten on before and discover in
what danger the affair is. But here there is no fortification to receive
them, in their alarm: those last enlisted and unskilled in military
discipline turn their faces to the military tribune and the centurions;
they wait to find what orders may be given by them. No one is so
courageous as not to be disconcerted by the suddenness of the affair.
The barbarians, espying our standard in the distance, desist from the
attack; at first they suppose that the legions, which they had learned
from their prisoners had removed farther off, had returned; afterwards,
despising their small number, they make an attack on them at all sides.

XL.-The camp-followers run forward to the nearest rising ground; being
speedily driven from this they throw themselves among the standards and
companies: they thus so much the more alarm the soldiers already
affrighted. Some propose that, forming a wedge, they suddenly break
through, since the camp was so near; and if any part should be
surrounded and slain, they fully trust that at least the rest may be
saved; others, that they take their stand on an eminence, and all
undergo the same destiny. The veteran soldiers, whom we stated to have
set out together [with the others] under a standard, do not approve of
this. Therefore encouraging each other, under the conduct of Caius
Trebonius, a Roman knight, who had been appointed over them, they break
through the midst of the enemy, and arrive in the camp safe to a man.
The camp-attendants and the horse following close upon them with the
same impetuosity, are saved by the courage of the soldiers. But those
who had taken their stand upon the eminence having even now acquired no
experience of military matters, neither could persevere in that
resolution which they approved of, namely, to defend themselves from
their higher position, nor imitate that vigour and speed which they had
observed to have availed others; but, attempting to reach the camp, had
descended into an unfavourable situation. The Centurions, some of whom
had been promoted for their valour from the lower ranks of other legions
to higher ranks in this legion, in order that they might not forfeit
their glory for military exploits previously acquired, fell together
fighting most valiantly. The enemy having been dislodged by their
valour, a part of the soldiers arrived safe in camp contrary to their
expectations; a part perished, surrounded by the barbarians.

XLI.--The Germans, despairing of taking the camp by storm, because they
saw that our men had taken up their position on the fortifications,
retreated beyond the Rhine with that plunder which they had deposited in
the woods. And so great was the alarm, even after the departure of the
enemy, that when C. Volusenus, who had been sent with the cavalry,
arrived that night, he could not gain credence that. Caesar was close at
hand with his army safe. Fear had so pre-occupied the minds of all,
that, their reason being almost estranged, they said that all the other
forces having been cut off, the cavalry alone had arrived there by
flight, and asserted that, if the army were safe, the Germans would not
have attacked the camp: which fear the arrival of Caesar removed.

XLII.--He, on his return, being well aware of the casualties of war,
complained of one thing [only], namely, that the cohorts had been sent
away from the outposts and garrison [duty], and pointed out that room
ought not to have been left for even the most trivial casualty; that
fortune had exercised great influence in the sudden arrival of their
enemy; much greater, in that she had turned the barbarians away from the
very rampart and gates of the camp. Of all which events, it seemed the
most surprising that the Germans, who had crossed the Rhine with this
object, that they might plunder the territories of Ambiorix, being led
to the camp of the Romans, rendered Ambiorix a most acceptable service.

XLIII.--Caesar, having again marched to harass the enemy, after
collecting a large number [of auxiliaries] from the neighbouring states,
despatches them in all directions. All the villages and all the
buildings, which each beheld, were on fire: spoil was being driven off
from all parts; the corn not only was being consumed by so great numbers
of cattle and men, but also had fallen to the earth, owing to the time
of the year and the storms; so that if any had concealed themselves for
the present, still, it appeared likely that they must perish through
want of all things, when the army should be drawn off. And frequently it
came to that point, as so large a body of cavalry had been sent abroad
in all directions, that the prisoners declared Ambiorix had just then
been seen by them in flight, and had not even passed out of sight, so
that the hope of overtaking him being raised, and unbounded exertions
having been resorted to, those who thought they should acquire the
highest favour with Caesar, nearly overcame nature by their ardour, and
continually a little only seemed wanting to complete success; but he
rescued himself by [means of] lurking-places and forests, and, concealed
by the night, made for other districts and quarters, with no greater
guard than that of four horsemen, to whom alone he ventured to confide
his life.

XLIV.--Having devastated the country in such a manner, Caesar leads back
his army with the loss of two cohorts to Durocortorum of the Remi, and,
having summoned a council of Gaul to assemble at that place, he resolved
to hold an investigation respecting the conspiracy of the Senones and
Carnutes, and having pronounced a most severe sentence upon Acco, who
had been the contriver of that plot, he punished him after the custom of
our ancestors. Some fearing a trial, fled; when he had forbidden these
fire and water, he stationed in winter quarters two legions at the
frontiers of the Treviri, two among the Lingones, the remaining six at
Agendicum, in the territories of the Senones; and, having provided corn
for the army, he set out for Italy, as he had determined, to hold the
assizes.



BOOK VII

I.--Gaul being tranquil, Caesar, as he had determined, sets out for
Italy to hold the provincial assizes. There he receives intelligence of
the death of Clodius; and, being informed of the decree of the senate
[to the effect] that all the youth of Italy should take the military
oath, he determined to hold a levy throughout the entire province.
Report of these events is rapidly borne into Transalpine Gaul. The Gauls
themselves add to the report, and invent what the case seemed to
require, [namely] that Caesar was detained by commotions in the city,
and could not, amidst so violent dissensions, come to his army. Animated
by this opportunity, they who already, previously to this occurrence,
were indignant that they were reduced beneath the dominion of Rome,
begin to organize their plans for war more openly and daringly. The
leading men of Gaul, having convened councils among themselves in the
woods, and retired places, complain of the death of Acco: they point out
that this fate may fall in turn on themselves: they bewail the unhappy
fate of Gaul; and by every sort of promises and rewards, they earnestly
solicit some to begin the war, and assert the freedom of Gaul at the
hazard of their lives. They say that special care should be paid to
this, that Caesar should be cut off from his army, before their secret
plans should be divulged. That this was easy, because neither would the
legions, in the absence of their general, dare to leave their winter
quarters, nor could the general reach his army without a guard: finally,
that it was better to be slain in battle than not to recover their
ancient glory in war, and that freedom which they had received from
their forefathers.

II.--Whilst these things are in agitation, the Carnutes declare "that
they would decline no danger for the sake of the general safety," and
promise that they would be the first of all to begin the war; and since
they cannot at present take precautions, by giving and receiving
hostages, that the affair shall not be divulged they require that a
solemn assurance be given them by oath and plighted honour, their
military standards being brought together (in which manner their most
sacred obligations are made binding), that they should not be deserted
by the rest of the Gauls on commencing the war.

III.--When the appointed day came, the Carnutes, under the command of
Cotuatus and Conetodunus, desperate men, meet together at Genabum, and
slay the Roman citizens who had settled there for the purpose of trading
(among the rest, Caius Fusius Cita, a distinguished Roman knight, who by
Caesar's orders had presided over the provision department), and plunder
their property. The report is quickly spread among all the states of
Gaul; for, whenever a more important and remarkable event takes place,
they transmit the intelligence through their lands and districts by a
shout; the others take it up in succession, and pass it to their
neighbours, as happened on this occasion; for the things which were done
at Genabum at sunrise were heard in the territories of the Arverni
before the end of the first watch, which is an extent of more than a
hundred and sixty miles.

IV.--There in like manner, Vercingetorix the son of Celtillus the
Arvernian, a young man of the highest power (whose father had held the
supremacy of entire Gaul, and had been put to death by his fellow
citizens, for this reason, because he aimed at sovereign power),
summoned together his dependents, and easily excited them. On his design
being made known, they rush to arms: he is expelled from the town of
Gergovia by his uncle Gobanitio and the rest of the nobles, who were of
opinion, that such an enterprise ought not to be hazarded: he did not
however desist, but held in the country a levy of the needy and
desperate. Having collected such a body of troops, he brings over to his
30 sentiments such of his fellow citizens as he has access to: he
exhorts them to take up arms in behalf of the general freedom, and
having assembled great forces he drives from the state his opponents, by
whom he had been expelled a short time previously. He is saluted king by
his partisans; he sends ambassadors in every direction, he conjures them
to adhere firmly to their promise. He quickly attaches to his interests
the Senones, Parisii, Pictones, Cadurci, Turones, Aulerci, Lemovice, and
all the others who border on the ocean; the supreme command is conferred
on him by unanimous consent. On obtaining this authority, he demands
hostages from all these states, he orders a fixed number of soldiers to
be sent to him immediately; he determines what quantity of arms each
state shall prepare at home, and before what time; he pays particular
attention to the cavalry. To the utmost vigilance he adds the utmost
rigour of authority; and by the severity of his punishments brings over
the wavering: for on the commission of a greater crime he puts the
perpetrators to death by fire and every sort of tortures; for a slighter
cause, he sends home the offenders with their ears cut off, or one of
their eyes put out, that they may be an example to the rest, and
frighten others by the severity of their punishment.

V.--Having quickly collected an army by their punishments, he sends
Lucterius, one of the Cadurci, a man of the utmost daring, with part of
his forces, into the territory of the Ruteni; and marches in person into
the country of the Bituriges. On his arrival, the Bituriges send
ambassadors to the Aedui, under whose protection they were, to solicit
aid in order that they might more easily resist the forces of the enemy.
The Aedui, by the advice of the lieutenants whom Caesar had left with
the army, send supplies of horse and foot to succour the Bituriges. When
they came to the river Loire, which separates the Bituriges from the
Aedui, they delayed a few days there, and, not daring to pass the river,
return home, and send back word to the lieutenants that they had
returned through fear of the treachery of the Bituriges, who, they
ascertained, had formed this design, that if the Aedui should cross the
river, the Bituriges on the one side, and the Arverni on the other,
should surround them. Whether they did this for the reason which they
alleged to the lieutenants, or influenced by treachery, we think that we
ought not to state as certain, because we have no proof. On their
departure, the Bituriges immediately unite themselves to the Arverni.

VI.--These affairs being announced to Caesar in Italy at the time when
he understood that matters in the city had been reduced to a more
tranquil state by the energy of Cneius Pompey, he set out for
Transalpine Gaul. After he had arrived there, he was greatly at a loss
to know by what means he could reach his army. For if he should summon
the legions into the province, he was aware that on their march they
would have to fight in his absence; he foresaw too, that if he himself
should endeavour to reach the army, he would act injudiciously, in
trusting his safety even to those who seemed to be tranquillized.

VII.--In the meantime Lucterius the Cadurcan, having been sent into the
country of the Ruteni, gains over that state to the Arverni. Having
advanced into the country of the Nitiobriges, and Gabali, he receives
hostages from both nations, and, assembling a numerous force, marches to
make a descent on the province in the direction of Narbo. Caesar, when
this circumstance was announced to him, thought that the march to Narbo
ought to take the precedence of all his other plans. When he arrived
there, he encourages the timid, and stations garrisons among the Ruteni,
in the province of the Volcae Arecomici, and the country around Narbo
which was in the vicinity of the enemy; he orders a portion of the
forces from the province, and the recruits which he had brought from
Italy, to rendezvous among the Helvii who border on the territories of
the Arverni.

VIII.--These matters being arranged, and Lucterius now checked and
forced to retreat, because he thought it dangerous to enter the line of
Roman garrisons, Caesar marches into the country of the Helvii; although
mount Cevennes, which separates the Arverni from the Helvii, blocked up
the way with very deep snow, as it was the severest season of the year;
yet having cleared away the snow to the depth of six feet, and having
opened the roads, he reaches the territories of the Arverni, with
infinite labour to his soldiers. This people being surprised, because
they considered themselves defended by the Cevennes as by a wall, and
the paths at this season of the year had never before been passable even
to individuals, he orders the cavalry to extend themselves as far as
they could, and strike as great a panic as possible into the enemy.
These proceedings are speedily announced to Vercingetorix by rumour and
his messengers. Around him all the Arverni crowd in alarm, and solemnly
entreat him to protect their property, and not to suffer them to be
plundered by the enemy, especially as he saw that all the war was
transferred into their country. Being prevailed upon by their entreaties
he moves his camp from the country of the Bituriges in the direction of
the Arverni.

IX.--Caesar, having delayed two days in that place, because he had
anticipated that, in the natural course of events, such would be the
conduct of Vercingetorix, leaves the army under pretence of raising
recruits and cavalry: he places Brutus, a young man, in command of these
forces; he gives him instructions that the cavalry should range as
extensively as possible in all directions; that he would exert himself
not to be absent from the camp longer than three days. Having arranged
these matters, he marches to Vienna by as long journeys as he can, when
his own soldiers did not expect him. Finding there a fresh body of
cavalry, which he had sent on to that place several days before,
marching incessantly night and day, he advanced rapidly through the
territory of the Aedui into that of the Lingones, in which two legions
were wintering, that, if any plan affecting his own safety should have
been organised by the Aedui, he might defeat it by the rapidity of his
movements. When he arrived there, he sends information to the rest of
the legions, and gathers all his army into one place before intelligence
of his arrival could be announced to the Arverni.

Vercingetorix, on hearing this circumstance, leads back his army into
the country of the Bituriges; and after marching from it to Gergovia, a
town of the Boii, whom Caesar had settled there after defeating them in
the Helvetian war, and had rendered tributary to the Aedui, he
determined to attack it.

X.--This action caused great perplexity to Caesar in the selection of
his plans; [he feared] lest, if he should confine his legions in one
place for the remaining portion of the winter, all Gaul should revolt
when the tributaries of the Aedui were subdued, because it would appear
that there was in him no protection for his friends; but if he should
draw them too soon out of their winter quarters, he might be distressed
by the want of provisions, in consequence of the difficulty of
conveyance. It seemed better, however, to endure every hardship than to
alienate the affections of all his allies, by submitting to such an
insult. Having, therefore, impressed on the Aedui the necessity of
supplying him with provisions, he sends forward messengers to the Boii
to inform them of his arrival, and encourage them to remain firm in
their allegiance, and resist the attack of the enemy with great
resolution. Having left two legions and the luggage of the entire army
at Agendicum, he marches to the Boii.

XI.--On the second day, when he came to Vellaunodunum, a town of the
Senones, he determined to attack it, in order that he might not leave an
enemy in his rear, and might the more easily procure supplies of
provisions, and drew a line of circumvallation around it in two days: on
the third day, ambassadors being sent from the town to treat of a
capitulation, he orders their arms to be brought together, their cattle
to be brought forth, and six hundred hostages to be given. He leaves
Caius Trebonius, his lieutenant, to complete these arrangements; he
himself sets out with the intention of marching as soon as possible to
Genabum, a town of the Carnutes, who having then for the first time
received information of the siege of Vellaunodunum, as they thought that
it would be protracted to a longer time, were preparing a garrison to
send to Genabum for the defence of that town. Caesar arrived here in two
days; after pitching his camp before the town, being prevented by the
time of the day, he defers the attack to the next day, and orders his
soldiers to prepare whatever was necessary for that enterprise; and as a
bridge over the Loire connected the town of Genabum with the opposite
bank, fearing lest the inhabitants should escape by night from the town,
he orders two legions to keep watch under arms. The people of Genabum
came forth silently from the city before midnight, and began to cross
the river. When this circumstance was announced by scouts, Caesar,
having set fire to the gates, sends in the legions which he had ordered
to be ready, and obtains possession of the town so completely, that very
few of the whole number of the enemy escaped being taken alive, because
the narrowness of the bridge and the roads prevented the multitude from
escaping. He pillages and burns the town, gives the booty to the
soldiers, then leads his army over the Loire, and marches into the
territories of the Bituriges.

XII.--Vercingetorix, when he ascertained the arrival of Caesar, desisted
from the siege [of Gergovia], and marched to meet Caesar. The latter had
commenced to besiege Noviodunum; and when ambassadors came from this
town to beg that he would pardon them and spare their lives, in order
that he might execute the rest of his designs with the rapidity by which
he had accomplished most of them, he orders their arms to be collected,
their horses to be brought forth, and hostages to be given. A part of
the hostages being now delivered up, when the rest of the terms were
being performed, a few centurions and soldiers being sent into the town
to collect the arms and horses, the enemy's cavalry, which had
outstripped the main body of Vercingetorix's army, was seen at a
distance; as soon as the townsmen beheld them, and entertained hopes of
assistance, raising a shout, they began to take up arms, shut the gates,
and line the walls. When the centurions in the town understood from the
signal-making of the Gauls that they were forming some new design, they
drew their swords and seized the gates, and recovered all their men
safe.

XIII.--Caesar orders the horse to be drawn out of the camp, and
commences a cavalry action. His men being now distressed, Caesar sends
to their aid about four hundred German horse, which he had determined,
at the beginning, to keep with himself. The Gauls could not withstand
their attack, but were put to flight, and retreated to their main body,
after losing a great number of men. When they were routed, the townsmen,
again intimidated, arrested those persons by whose exertions they
thought that the mob had been roused, and brought them to Caesar, and
surrendered themselves to him. When these affairs were accomplished,
Caesar marched to the Avaricum, which was the largest and best fortified
town in the territories of the Bituriges, and situated in a most fertile
tract of country; because he confidently expected that on taking that
town, he would reduce beneath his dominion the state of the Bituriges.

XIV.--Vercingetorix, after sustaining such a series of losses at
Vellaunodunum, Genabum, and Noviodunum, summons his men to a council. He
impresses on them "that the war must be prosecuted on a very different
system from that which had been previously adopted; but they should by
all means aim at this object, that the Romans should be prevented from
foraging and procuring provisions; that this was easy, because they
themselves were well supplied with cavalry and were likewise assisted by
the season of the year; that forage could not be cut; that the enemy
must necessarily disperse, and look for it in the houses, that all these
might be daily destroyed by the horse. Besides that the interests of
private property must be neglected for the sake of the general safety;
that the villages and houses ought to be fired, over such an extent of
country in every direction from Boia, as the Romans appeared capable of
scouring in their search for forage. That an abundance of these
necessaries could be supplied to them, because they would be assisted by
the resources of those in whose territories the war would be waged: that
the Romans either would not bear the privation, or else would advance to
any distance from the camp with considerable danger; and that it made no
difference whether they slew them or stripped them of their baggage,
since, if it was lost, they could not carry on the war. Besides that,
the towns ought to be burnt which were not secured against every danger
by their fortifications or natural advantages; that there should not be
places of retreat for their own countrymen for declining military
service, nor be exposed to the Romans as inducements to carry off
abundance of provisions and plunder. If these sacrifices should appear
heavy or galling, that they ought to consider it much more distressing
that their wives and children should be dragged off to slavery, and
themselves slain; the evils which must necessarily befall the conquered.

XV.--This opinion having been approved of by unanimous consent, more
than twenty towns of the Bituriges are burnt in one day. Conflagrations
are beheld in every quarter; and although all bore this with great
regret, yet they laid before themselves this consolation, that, as the
victory was certain, they could quickly recover their losses. There is a
debate concerning Avaricum in the general council, whether they should
decide that it should be burnt or defended. The Bituriges threw
themselves at the feet of all the Gauls, and entreat that they should
not be compelled to set fire with their own hands to the fairest city of
almost the whole of Gaul, which was both a protection and ornament to
the state; they say that "they could easily defend it, owing to the
nature of the ground, for, being enclosed almost on every side by a
river and a marsh, it had only one entrance, and that very narrow."
Permission being granted to them at their earnest request, Vercingetorix
at first dissuades them from it, but afterwards concedes the point,
owing to their entreaties and the compassion of the soldiers. A proper
garrison is selected for the town.

XVI.--Vercingetorix follows closely upon Caesar by shorter marches, and
selects for his camp a place defended by woods and marshes, at the
distance of fifteen miles from Avaricum. There he received intelligence
by trusty scouts, every hour in the day, of what was going on at
Avaricum, and ordered whatever he wished to be done; he closely watched
all our expeditions for corn and forage, and whenever they were
compelled to go to a greater distance, he attacked them when dispersed,
and inflicted severe loss upon them; although the evil was remedied by
our men, as far as precautions could be taken, by going forth at
irregular times, and by different ways.

XVII.--Caesar pitching his camp at that side of the town which was not
defended by the river and marsh, and had a very narrow approach, as we
have mentioned, began to raise the vineae and erect two towers; for the
nature of the place prevented him from drawing a line of
circumvallation. He never ceased to importune the Boii and Aedui for
supplies of corn; of whom the one [the Aedui], because they were acting
with no zeal, did not aid him much; the others [the Boii], as their
resources were not great, quickly consumed what they had. Although the
army was distressed by the greatest want of corn, through the poverty of
the Boii, the apathy of the Aedui, and the burning of the houses, to
such a degree, that for several days the soldiers were without corn, and
satisfied their extreme hunger with cattle driven from the remote
villages; yet no language was heard from them unworthy of the majesty of
the Roman people and their former victories. Moreover, when Caesar
addressed the legions, one by one, when at work, and said that he would
raise the siege, if they felt the scarcity too severely, they
unanimously begged him "not to do so; that they had served for several
years under his command in such a manner, that they never submitted to
insult, and never abandoned an enterprise without accomplishing it; that
they should consider it a disgrace if they abandoned the siege after
commencing it; that it was better to endure every hardship than not to
avenge the manes of the Roman citizens who perished at Genabum by the
perfidy of the Gauls." They entrusted the same declarations to the
centurions and military tribunes, that through them they might be
communicated to Caesar.

XVIII.--When the towers had now approached the walls, Caesar ascertained
from the captives that Vercingetorix, after destroying the forage, had
pitched his camp nearer Avaricum, and that he himself with the cavalry
and light-armed infantry, who generally fought among the horse, had gone
to lay an ambuscade in that quarter to which he thought that our troops
would come the next day to forage. On learning these facts, he set out
from the camp secretly at midnight, and reached the camp of the enemy
early in the morning. They having quickly learned the arrival of Caesar
by scouts, hid their cars and baggage in the thickest parts of the
woods, and drew up all their forces in a lofty and open space: which
circumstance being announced, Caesar immediately ordered the baggage to
be piled, and the arms to be got ready.

XIX.--There was a hill of a gentle ascent from the bottom; a dangerous
and impassable marsh, not more than fifty feet broad, begirt it on
almost every side. The Gauls, having broken down the bridges, posted
themselves on this hill, in confidence of their position, and being
drawn up in tribes according to their respective states, held all the
fords and passages of that marsh with trusty guards, thus determined
that if the Romans should attempt to force the marsh, they would
overpower them from the higher ground while sticking in it, so that
whoever saw the nearness of the position, would imagine that the two
armies were prepared to fight on almost equal terms; but whoever should
view accurately the disadvantage of position, would discover that they
were showing off an empty affectation of courage. Caesar clearly points
out to his soldiers, who were indignant that the enemy could bear the
sight of them at the distance of so short a space, and were earnestly
demanding the signal for action, "with how great loss and the death of
how many gallant men the victory would necessarily be purchased: and
when he saw them so determined to decline no danger for his renown, that
he ought to be considered guilty of the utmost injustice if he did not
hold their life dearer than his own personal safety." Having thus
consoled his soldiers, he leads them back on the same day to the camp,
and determined to prepare the other things which were necessary for the
siege of the town.

XX.--Vercingetorix, when he had returned to his men, was accused of
treason, in that he had moved his camp nearer the Romans, in that he had
gone away with all the cavalry, in that he had left so great forces
without a commander, in that, on his departure, the Romans had come at
such a favourable season, and with such despatch; that all these
circumstances could not have happened accidentally or without design;
that he preferred holding the sovereignty of Gaul by the grant of
Caesar, to acquiring it by their favour. Being accused in such a manner,
he made the following reply to these charges:--"That his moving his camp
had been caused by want of forage, and had been done even by their
advice; that his approaching near the Romans had been a measure dictated
by the favourable nature of the ground, which would defend him by its
natural strength; that the service of the cavalry could not have been
requisite in marshy ground, and was useful in that place to which they
had gone; that he, on his departure, had given the supreme command to no
one intentionally, lest he should be induced by the eagerness of the
multitude to hazard an engagement, to which he perceived that all were
inclined, owing to their want of energy, because they were unable to
endure fatigue any longer. That, if the Romans in the meantime came up
by chance, they [the Gauls] should feel grateful to fortune; if invited
by the information of some one they should feel grateful to him, because
they were enabled to see distinctly from the higher ground the smallness
of the number of their enemy, and despise the courage of those who, not
daring to fight, retreated disgracefully into their camp. That he
desired no power from Caesar by treachery, since he could have it by
victory, which was now assured to himself and to all the Gauls; nay,
that he would even give them back the command, if they thought that they
conferred honour on him, rather then received safety from him. That you
may be assured," said he, "that I speak these words with truth;--listen
to these Roman soldiers!" He produces some camp-followers whom he had
surprised on a foraging expedition some days before, and had tortured by
famine and confinement. They being previously instructed in what answers
they should make when examined, say, "That they were legionary soldiers,
that, urged by famine and want, they had recently gone forth from the
camp, [to see] if they could find any corn or cattle in the fields; that
the whole army was distressed by a similar scarcity, nor had any one now
sufficient strength, nor could bear the labour of the work; and
therefore that the general was determined, if he made no progress in the
siege, to draw off his army in three days." "These benefits," says
Vercingetorix, "you receive from me, whom you accuse of treason--me, by
whose exertions you see so powerful and victorious an army almost
destroyed by famine, without shedding one drop of your blood; and I have
taken precautions that no state shall admit within its territories this
army in its ignominious flight from this place."

XXI.--The whole multitude raise a shout and clash their arms, according
to their custom, as they usually do in the case of him whose speech they
approve; [they exclaim] that Vercingetorix was a consummate general, and
that they had no doubt of his honour; that the war could not be
conducted with greater prudence. They determine that ten thousand men
should be picked out of the entire army and sent into the town, and
decide that the general safety should not be entrusted to the Bituriges
alone, because they were aware that the glory of the victory must rest
with the Bituriges, if they made good the defence of the town.

XXII.--To the extraordinary valour of our soldiers, devices of every
sort were opposed by the Gauls; since they are a nation of consummate
ingenuity, and most skilful in imitating and making those things which
are imparted by any one; for they turned aside the hooks with nooses,
and when they had caught hold of them firmly, drew them on by means of
engines, and undermined the mound the more skilfully on this account,
because there are in their territories extensive iron mines, and
consequently every description of mining operations is known and
practised by them. They had furnished, moreover, the whole wall on every
side with turrets, and had covered them with skins. Besides, in their
frequent sallies by day and night, they attempted either to set fire to
the mound, or attack our soldiers when engaged in the works; and,
moreover, by splicing the upright timbers of their own towers, they
equalled the height of ours, as fast as the mound had daily raised them,
and countermined our mines, and impeded the working of them by stakes
bent and sharpened at the ends, and boiling pitch, and stones of very
great weight, and prevented them from approaching the walls.

XXIII.--But this is usually the form of all the Gallic walls. Straight
beams, connected lengthwise and two feet distant from each other at
equal intervals, are placed together on the ground; these are mortised
on the inside, and covered with plenty of earth. But the intervals which
we have mentioned, are closed up in front by large stones. These being
thus laid and cemented together, another row is added above, in such a
manner that the same interval may be observed, and that the beams may
not touch one another, but equal spaces intervening, each row of beams
is kept firmly in its place by a row of stones. In this manner the whole
wall is consolidated, until the regular height of the wall be completed.
This work, with respect to appearance and variety, is not unsightly,
owing to the alternate rows of beams and stones, which preserve their
order in right lines; and, besides, it possesses great advantages as
regards utility and the defence of cities; for the stone protects it
from fire, and the wood from the battering ram, since it [the wood]
being mortised in the inside with rows of beams, generally forty feet
each in length, can neither be broken through nor torn asunder.

XXIV.--The siege having been impeded by so many disadvantages, the
soldiers, although they were retarded during the whole time, by the mud,
cold, and constant showers, yet by their incessant labour overcame all
these obstacles, and in twenty-five days raised a mound three hundred
and thirty feet broad and eighty feet high. When it almost touched the
enemy's walls, and Caesar, according to his usual custom, kept watch at
the work, and encouraged the soldiers not to discontinue the work for a
moment: a little before the third watch they discovered that the mound
was sinking, since the enemy had set it on fire by a mine; and at the
same time a shout was raised along the entire wall, and a sally was made
from two gates on each side of the turrets. Some at a distance were
casting torches and dry wood from the wall on the mound, others were
pouring on it pitch, and other materials, by which the flame might be
excited, so that a plan could hardly be formed, as to where they should
first run to the defence, or to what part aid should be brought.
However, as two legions always kept guard before the camp by Caesar's
orders, and several of them were at stated times at the work, measures
were promptly taken, that some should oppose the sallying party, others
draw back the towers and make a cut in the rampart; and moreover, that
the whole army should hasten from the camp to extinguish the flames.

XXV.--When the battle was going on in every direction, the rest of the
night being now spent, and fresh hopes of victory always arose before
the enemy: the more so on this account because they saw the coverings of
our towers burnt away, and perceived that we, being exposed, could not
easily go to give assistance, and they themselves were always relieving
the weary with fresh men, and considered that all the safety of Gaul
rested on this crisis; there happened in my own view a circumstance
which, having appeared to be worthy of record, we thought it ought not
to be omitted. A certain Gaul before the gate of the town, who was
casting into the fire opposite the turret balls of tallow and fire which
were passed along to him, was pierced with a dart on the right side and
fell dead. One of those next him stepped over him as he lay, and
discharged the same office: when the second man was slain in the same
manner by a wound from a cross-bow, a third succeeded him, and a fourth
succeeded the third: nor was this post left vacant by the besieged,
until, the fire of the mound having been extinguished, and the enemy
repulsed in every direction, an end was put to the fighting.

XXVI.--The Gauls having tried every expedient, as nothing had succeeded,
adopted the design of fleeing from the town the next day, by the advice
and order of Vercingetorix. They hoped that, by attempting it at the
dead of night, they would effect it without any great loss of men,
because the camp of Vercingetorix was not far distant from the town, and
the extensive marsh which intervened was likely to retard the Romans in
the pursuit. And they were now preparing to execute this by night, when
the matrons suddenly ran out into the streets, and weeping cast
themselves at the feet of their husbands, and requested of them, with
every entreaty, that they should not abandon themselves and their common
children to the enemy for punishment, because the weakness of their
nature and physical powers prevented them from taking to flight. When
they saw that they (as fear does not generally admit of mercy in extreme
danger) persisted in their resolution, they began to shout aloud, and
give intelligence of their flight to the Romans. The Gauls being
intimidated by fear of this, lest the passes should be pre-occupied by
the Roman cavalry, desisted from their design.

XXVII.--The next day Caesar, the tower being advanced, and the works
which he had determined to raise being arranged, a violent storm
arising, thought this no bad time for executing his designs, because he
observed the guards arranged on the walls a little too negligently, and
therefore ordered his own men to engage in their work more remissly, and
pointed out what he wished to be done. He drew up his soldiers in a
secret position within the vineae, and exhorts them to reap, at least,
the harvest of victory proportionate to their exertions. He proposed a
reward for those who should first scale the walls, and gave the signal
to the soldiers. They suddenly flew out from all quarters and quickly
filled the wall.

XXVIII.--The enemy being alarmed by the suddenness of the attack, were
dislodged from the wall and towers, and drew up, in form of a wedge, in
the market-place and the open streets, with this intention that, if an
attack should be made on any side, they should fight with their line
drawn up to receive it. When they saw no one descending to the level
ground, and the enemy extending themselves along the entire wall in
every direction, fearing lest every hope of flight should be cut off,
they cast away their arms, and sought, without stopping, the most remote
parts of the town. A part was then slain by the infantry when they were
crowding upon one another in the narrow passage of the gates; and a part
having got without the gates, were cut to pieces by the cavalry: nor was
there one who was anxious for the plunder. Thus, being excited by the
massacre at Genabum and the fatigue of the siege, they spared neither
those worn out with years, women, or children. Finally, out of all that
number, which amounted to about forty thousand, scarcely eight hundred,
who fled from the town when they heard the first alarm, reached
Vercingetorix in safety: and he, the night being now far spent, received
them in silence after their flight (fearing that any sedition should
arise in the camp from their entrance in a body and the compassion of
the soldiers), so that, having arranged his friends and the chiefs of
the states at a distance on the road, he took precautions that they
should be separated and conducted to their fellow countrymen, to
whatever part of the camp had been assigned to each state from the
beginning.

XXIX.--Vercingetorix having convened an assembly on the following day,
consoled and encouraged his soldiers in the following words:--"That they
should not be too much depressed in spirit, nor alarmed at their loss;
that the Romans did not conquer by valour nor in the field, but by a
kind of art and skill in assault, with which they themselves were
unacquainted; that whoever expected every event in the war to be
favourable, erred; that it never was his opinion that Avaricum should be
defended, of the truth of which statement he had themselves as
witnesses, but that it was owing to the imprudence of the Bituriges, and
the too ready compliance of the rest, that this loss was sustained;
that, however, he would soon compensate it by superior advantages; for
that he would, by his exertions, bring over those states which severed
themselves from the rest of the Gauls, and would create a general
unanimity throughout the whole of Gaul, the union of which not even the
whole earth could withstand, and that he had it already almost effected;
that in the meantime it was reasonable that he should prevail on them,
for the sake of the general safety, to begin to fortify their camp, in
order that they might the more easily sustain the sudden attacks of the
enemy."

XXX.--This speech was not disagreeable to the Gauls, principally,
because he himself was not disheartened by receiving so severe a loss,
and had not concealed himself, nor shunned the eyes of the people: and
he was believed to possess greater foresight and sounder judgment than
the rest, because, when the affair was undecided, he had at first been
of opinion that Avaricum should be burnt, and afterwards that it should
be abandoned. Accordingly, as ill success weakens the authority of other
generals, so, on the contrary, his dignity increased daily, although a
loss was sustained: at the same time they began to entertain hopes, on
his assertion, of uniting the rest of the states to themselves, and on
this occasion, for the first time, the Gauls began to fortify their
camps, and were so alarmed that although they were men unaccustomed to
toil, yet they were of opinion that they ought to endure and suffer
everything which should be imposed upon them.

XXXI.--Nor did Vercingetorix use less efforts than he had promised, to
gain over the other states, and [in consequence] endeavoured to entice
their leaders by gifts and promises. For this object he selected fitting
emissaries by whose subtle pleading or private friendship each of the
nobles could be most easily influenced. He takes care that those who
fled to him on the storming of Avaricum should be provided with arms and
clothes. At the same time, that his diminished forces should be
recruited, he levies a fixed quota of soldiers from each state, and
defines the number and day before which he should wish them brought to
the camp, and orders all the archers, of whom there was a very great
number in Gaul, to be collected and sent to him. By these means, the
troops which were lost at Avaricum are speedily replaced. In the
meantime, Teutomarus, the son of Ollovicon, the king of the Nitiobriges,
whose father had received the appellation of friend from our senate,
came to him with a great number of his own horse and those whom he had
hired from Aquitania.

XXXII.--Caesar, after delaying several days at Avaricum, and finding
there the greatest plenty of corn and other provisions, refreshed his
army after their fatigue and privation. The winter being almost ended,
when he was invited by the favourable season of the year to prosecute
the war and march against the enemy, [and try] whether he could draw
them from the marshes and woods, or else press them by a blockade; some
noblemen of the Aedui came to him as ambassadors to entreat "that in an
extreme emergency he should succour their state; that their affairs were
in the utmost danger, because, whereas single magistrates had been
usually appointed in ancient times and held the power of king for a
single year, two persons now exercised this office, and each asserted
that he was appointed according to their laws. That one of them was
Convictolitanis, a powerful and illustrious youth; the other Cotus,
sprung from a most ancient family, and personally a man of very great
influence and extensive connections. His brother Valetiacus had borne
the same office during the last year: that the whole state was up in
arms; the senate divided, the people divided; that each of them had his
own adherents; and that, if the animosity would be fomented any longer
the result would be that one part of the state would come to a collision
with the other; that it rested with his activity and influence to
prevent it."

XXXIII.--Although Caesar considered it ruinous to leave the war and the
enemy, yet, being well aware what great evils generally arise from
internal dissensions, lest a state so powerful and so closely connected
with the Roman people, which he himself had always fostered and honoured
in every respect, should have recourse to violence and arms, and that
the party which had less confidence in its own power should summon aid
from Vercingetorix, he determined to anticipate this movement; and
because, by the laws of the Aedui, it was not permitted those who held
the supreme authority to leave the country, he determined to go in
person to the Aedui, lest he should appear to infringe upon their
government and laws, and summoned all the senate, and those between whom
the dispute was, to meet him at Decetia. When almost all the state had
assembled there, and he was informed that one brother had been declared
magistrate by the other, when only a few persons were privately summoned
for the purpose, at a different time and place from what he ought,
whereas the laws not only forbade two belonging to one family to be
elected magistrates while each was alive, but even deterred them from
being in the senate, he compelled Cotus to resign his office; he ordered
Convictolitanis, who had been elected by the priests, according to the
usage of the state, in the presence of the magistrates, to hold the
supreme authority.

XXXIV.--Having pronounced this decree between [the contending parties],
he exhorted the Aedui to bury in oblivion their disputes and
dissensions, and, laying aside all these things, devote themselves to
the war, and expect from him, on the conquest of Gaul, those rewards
which they should have earned, and send speedily to him all their
cavalry and ten thousand infantry, which he might place in different
garrisons to protect his convoys of provisions, and then divided his
army into two parts: he gave Labienus four legions to lead into the
country of the Senones and Parisii; and led in person six into the
country of the Arverni, in the direction of the town of Gergovia, along
the banks of the Allier. He gave part of the cavalry to Labienus, and
kept part to himself. Vercingetorix, on learning this circumstance,
broke down all the bridges over the river and began to march on the
other bank of the Allier.

XXXV.--When each army was in sight of the other, and was pitching their
camp almost opposite that of the enemy, scouts being distributed in
every quarter, lest the Romans should build a bridge and bring over
their troops; it was to Caesar a matter attended with great
difficulties, lest he should be hindered from passing the river during
the greater part of the summer, as the Allier cannot generally be forded
before the autumn. Therefore, that this might not happen, having pitched
his camp in a woody place opposite to one of those bridges which
Vercingetorix had taken care should be broken down, the next day he
stopped behind with two legions in a secret place: he sent on the rest
of the forces as usual, with all the baggage, after having selected some
cohorts, that the number of the legions might appear to be complete.
Having ordered these to advance as far as they could, when now, from the
time of day, he conjectured they had come to an encampment, he began to
rebuild the bridge on the same piles, the lower part of which remained
entire. Having quickly finished the work and led his legions across, he
selected a fit place for a camp, and recalled the rest of his troops.
Vercingetorix, on ascertaining this fact, went before him by forced
marches, in order that he might not be compelled to come to an action
against his will.

XXXVI.--Caesar, in five days' march, went from that place to Gergovia,
and after engaging in a slight cavalry skirmish that day, on viewing the
situation of the city, which, being built on a very high mountain, was
very difficult of access, he despaired of taking it by storm, and
determined to take no measures with regard to besieging it before he
should secure a supply of provisions. But Vercingetorix, having pitched
his camp on the mountain near the town, placed the forces of each state
separately and at small intervals around himself, and having occupied
all the hills of that range as far as they commanded a view [of the
Roman encampment], he presented a formidable appearance; he ordered the
rulers of the states, whom he had selected as his council of war, to
come to him daily at the dawn, whether any measure seemed to require
deliberation or execution. Nor did he allow almost any day to pass
without testing in a cavalry action, the archers being intermixed, what
spirit and valour there was in each of his own men. There was a hill
opposite the town, at the very foot of that mountain, strongly fortified
and precipitous on every side (which if our men could gain, they seemed
likely to exclude the enemy from a great share of their supply of water,
and from free foraging; but this place was occupied by them with a weak
garrison): however, Caesar set out from the camp in the silence of
night, and dislodging the garrison before succour could come from the
town, he got possession of the place and posted two legions there, and
drew from the greater camp to the less a double trench twelve feet
broad, so that the soldiers could even singly pass secure from any
sudden attack of the enemy.

XXXVII.--Whilst these affairs were going on at Gergovia,
Convictolitanis, the Aeduan, to whom we have observed the magistracy was
adjudged by Caesar, being bribed by the Arverni, holds a conference with
certain young men, the chief of whom were Litavicus and his brothers,
who were born of a most noble family. He shares the bribe with them, and
exhorts them to "remember that they were free and born for empire; that
the state of the Aedui was the only one which retarded the most certain
victory of the Gauls; that the rest were held in check by its authority;
and, if it was brought over, the Romans would not have room to stand on
in Gaul; that he had received some kindness from Caesar, only so far,
however, as gaining a most just cause by his decision; but that he
assigned more weight to the general freedom; for, why should the Aedui
go to Caesar to decide concerning their rights and laws, rather than the
Romans come to the Aedui?" The young men being easily won over by the
speech of the magistrate and the bribe, when they declared that they
would even be leaders in the plot, a plan for accomplishing it was
considered, because they were confident their state could not be induced
to undertake the war on slight grounds. It was resolved that Litavicus
should have the command of the ten thousand which were being sent to
Caesar for the war, and should have charge of them on their march, and
that his brothers should go before him to Caesar. They arrange the other
measures, and the manner in which they should have them done.

XXXVIII.--Litavicus, having received the command of the army, suddenly
convened the soldiers, when he was about thirty miles distant from
Gergovia, and, weeping, said, "Soldiers, whither are we going? All our
knights and all our nobles have perished. Eporedorix and Viridomarus,
the principal men of the state, being accused of treason, have been
slain by the Romans without even permission to plead their cause. Learn
this intelligence from those who have escaped from the massacre; for I,
since my brothers and all my relations have been slain, am prevented by
grief from declaring what has taken place." Persons are brought forward
whom he had instructed in what he would have them say, and make the same
statements to the soldiery as Litavicus had made: that all the knights
of the Aedui were slain because they were said to have held conferences
with the Arverni; that they had concealed themselves among the multitude
of soldiers, and had escaped from the midst of the slaughter. The Aedui
shout aloud and conjure Litavicus to provide for their safety. "As if,"
said he, "it were a matter of deliberation, and not of necessity, for us
to go to Gergovia and unite ourselves to the Arverni. Or have we any
reasons to doubt that the Romans, after perpetrating the atrocious
crime, are now hastening to slay us? Therefore, if there be any spirit
in us, let us avenge the death of those who have perished in a most
unworthy manner, and let us slay these robbers." He points to the Roman
citizens, who had accompanied them, in reliance on his protection. He
immediately seizes a great quantity of corn and provisions, cruelly
tortures them, and then puts them to death, sends messengers throughout
the entire state of the Aedui, and rouses them completely by the same
falsehood concerning the slaughter of their knights and nobles; he
earnestly advises them to avenge, in the same manner as he did, the
wrongs which they had received.

XXXIX.--Eporedorix, the Aeduan, a young man born in the highest rank and
possessing very great influence at home, and, along with Viridomarus, of
equal age and influence, but of inferior birth, whom Caesar had raised
from a humble position to the highest rank, on being recommended to him
by Divitiacus, had come in the number of horse, being summoned by Caesar
by name. These had a dispute with each other for precedence, and in the
struggle between the magistrates they had contended with their utmost
efforts, the one for Convictolitanis, the other for Cotus. Of these
Eporedorix, on learning the design of Litavicus, lays the matter before
Caesar almost at midnight; he entreats that Caesar should not suffer
their state to swerve from the alliance with the Roman people, owing to
the depraved counsels of a few young men, which he foresaw would be the
consequence if so many thousand men should unite themselves to the
enemy, as their relations could not neglect their safety, nor the state
regard it as a matter of slight importance.

XL.--Caesar felt great anxiety on this intelligence, because he had
always especially indulged the state of the Aedui, and, without any
hesitation, draws out from the camp four light-armed legions and all the
cavalry: nor had he time, at such a crisis, to contract the camp,
because the affair seemed to depend upon despatch. He leaves Caius
Fabius, his lieutenant, with two legions to guard the camp. When he
ordered the brothers of Litavicus to be arrested, he discovers that they
had fled a short time before to the camp of the enemy. He encouraged his
soldiers "not to be disheartened by the labour of the journey on such a
necessary occasion," and, after advancing twenty-five miles, all being
most eager, he came in sight of the army of the Aedui, and, by sending
on his cavalry, retards and impedes their march; he then issues strict
orders to all his soldiers to kill no one. He commands Eporedorix and
Viridomarus, who they thought were killed, to move among the cavalry and
address their friends. When they were recognized and the treachery of
Litavicus discovered, the Aedui began to extend their hands to intimate
submission, and, laying down their arms, to deprecate death. Litavicus,
with his clansmen, who after the custom of the Gauls consider it a crime
to desert their patrons, even in extreme misfortune, flees forth to
Gergovia.

XLI.--Caesar, after sending messengers to the state of the Aedui, to
inform them that they whom he could have put to death by the right of
war were spared through his kindness, and after giving three hours of
the night to his army for his repose, directed his march to Gergovia.
Almost in the middle of the journey, a party of horse that were sent by
Fabius stated in how great danger matters were; they inform him that the
camp was attacked by a very powerful army, while fresh men were
frequently relieving the wearied, and exhausting our soldiers by the
incessant toil, since, on account of the size of the camp, they had
constantly to remain on the rampart; that many had been wounded by the
immense number of arrows and all kinds of missiles; that the engines
were of great service in withstanding them; that Fabius, at their
departure, leaving only two gates open, was blocking up the rest, and
was adding breast-works to the ramparts, and was preparing himself for a
similar casualty on the following day. Caesar, after receiving this
information, reached the camp before sunrise owing to the very great
zeal of his soldiers.

XLII.--Whilst these things are going on at Gergovia, the Aedui, on
receiving the first announcements from Litavicus, leave themselves no
time to ascertain the truth of these statements. Some are stimulated by
avarice, others by revenge and credulity, which is an innate propensity
in that race of men to such a degree that they consider a slight rumour
as an ascertained fact. They plunder the property of the Roman citizens,
and either massacre them or drag them away to slavery. Convictolitanis
increases the evil state of affairs, and goads on the people to fury,
that by the commission of some outrage they may be ashamed to return to
propriety. They entice from the town of Cabillonus, by a promise of
safety, Marcus Aristius, a military tribune, who was on his march to his
legion; they compel those who had settled there for the purpose of
trading to do the same. By constantly attacking them on their march they
strip them of all their baggage; they besiege day and night those that
resisted; when many were slain on both sides, they excite a greater
number to arms.

XLIII.--In the meantime, when intelligence was brought that all their
soldiers were in Caesar's power, they run in a body to Aristius; they
assure him that nothing had been done by public authority; they order an
inquiry to be made about the plundered property; they confiscate the
property of Litavicus and his brothers; they send ambassadors to Caesar
for the purpose of clearing themselves. They do all this with a view to
recover their soldiers; but being contaminated by guilt, and charmed by
the gains arising from the plundered property, as that act was shared in
by many, and being tempted by the fear of punishment, they began to form
plans of war and stir up the other states by embassies. Although Caesar
was aware of this proceeding, yet he addresses the ambassadors with as
much mildness as he can: "That he did not think worse of the state on
account of the ignorance and fickleness of the mob, nor would diminish
his regard for the Aedui." He himself, fearing a greater commotion in
Gaul, in order to prevent his being surrounded by all the states, began
to form plans as to the manner in which he should return from Gergovia
and again concentrate his forces, lest a departure arising from the fear
of a revolt should seem like a flight.

XLIV.--Whilst he was considering these things an opportunity of acting
successfully seemed to offer. For, when he had come into the smaller
camp for the purpose of securing the works, he noticed that the hill in
the possession of the enemy was stript of men, although, on the former
days, it could scarcely be seen on account of the numbers on it. Being
astonished, he inquires the reason of it from the deserters, a great
number of whom flocked to him daily. They all concurred in asserting,
what Caesar himself had already ascertained by his scouts, that the back
of that hill was almost level; but likewise woody and narrow, by which
there was a pass to the other side of the town; that they had serious
apprehensions for this place, and had no other idea, on the occupation
of one hill by the Romans, than that, if they should lose the other,
they would be almost surrounded, and cut off from all egress and
foraging; that they were all summoned by Vercingetorix to fortify this
place.

XLV.--Caesar, on being informed of this circumstance, sends several
troops of horse to the place immediately after midnight; he orders them
to range in every quarter with more tumult than usual. At dawn he orders
a large quantity of baggage to be drawn out of the camp, and the
muleteers with helmets, in the appearance and guise of horsemen, to ride
round the hills. To these he adds a few cavalry, with instructions to
range more widely to make a show. He orders them all to seek the same
quarter by a long circuit; these proceedings were seen at a distance
from the town, as Gergovia commanded a view of the camp, nor could the
Gauls ascertain at so great a distance what certainty there was in the
manoeuvre. He sends one legion to the same hill, and after it had
marched a little, stations it in the lower ground, and conceals it in
the woods. The suspicions of the Gauls are increased, and all their
forces are marched to that place to defend it. Caesar, having perceived
the camp of the enemy deserted, covers the military insignia of his men,
conceals the standards, and transfers his soldiers in small bodies from
the greater to the less camp, and points out to the lieutenants whom he
had placed in command over the respective legions, what he should wish
to be done; he particularly advises them to restrain their men from
advancing too far, through their desire of fighting, or their hope of
plunder; he sets before them what disadvantages the unfavourable nature
of the ground carries with it; that they could be assisted by despatch
alone: that success depended on a surprise, and not on a battle. After
stating these particulars, he gives the signal for action, and detaches
the Aedui at the same time by another ascent an the right.

XLVI.--The town wall was 1200 paces distant from the plain and foot of
the ascent, in a straight line, if no gap intervened; whatever circuit
was added to this ascent, to make the hill easy, increased the length of
the route. But almost in the middle of the hill, the Gauls had
previously built a wall six feet high, made of large stones, and
extending in length as far as the nature of the ground permitted, as a
barrier to retard the advance of our men; and leaving all the lower
space empty, they had filled the upper part of the hill, as far as the
wall of the town, with their camps very close to one another. The
soldiers, on the signal being given, quickly advance to this
fortification, and passing over it, make themselves masters of the
separate camps. And so great was their activity in taking the camps,
that Teutomarus, the king of the Nitiobriges, being suddenly surprised
in his tent, as he had gone to rest at noon, with difficulty escaped
from the hands of the plunderers, with the upper part of his person
naked, and his horse wounded.

XLVII.--Caesar, having accomplished the object which he had in view,
ordered the signal to be sounded for a retreat; and the soldiers of the
tenth legion, by which he was then accompanied, halted. But the soldiers
of the other legions, not hearing the sound of the trumpet, because
there was a very large valley between them, were however kept back by
the tribunes of the soldiers and the lieutenants, according to Caesar's
orders; but being animated by the prospect of speedy victory, and the
flight of the enemy, and the favourable battles of former periods, they
thought nothing so difficult that their bravery could not accomplish it;
nor did they put an end to the pursuit, until they drew nigh to the wall
of the town and the gates. But then, when a shout arose in every quarter
of the city, those who were at a distance being alarmed by the sudden
tumult, fled hastily from the town, since they thought that the enemy
were within the gates. The matrons begin to cast their clothes and
silver over the wall, and bending over as far as the lower part of the
bosom, with outstretched hands beseech the Romans to spare them, and not
to sacrifice to their resentment even women and children, as they had
done at Avaricum. Some of them let themselves down from the walls by
their hands, and surrendered to our soldiers. Lucius Fabius, a centurion
of the eighth legion, who, it was ascertained, had said that day among
his fellow soldiers that he was excited by the plunder of Avaricum, and
would not allow any one to mount the wall before him, finding three men
of his own company, and being raised up by them, scaled the wall. He
himself, in turn, taking hold of them one by one, drew them up to the
wall.

XLVIII.--In the meantime those who had gone to the other part of the
town to defend it, as we have mentioned above, at first, aroused by
hearing the shouts, and, afterwards, by frequent accounts that the town
was in possession of the Romans, sent forward their cavalry, and
hastened in larger numbers to that quarter. As each first came he stood
beneath the wall, and increased the number of his countrymen engaged in
action. When a great multitude of them had assembled, the matrons, who a
little before were stretching their hands from the walls to the Romans,
began to beseech their countrymen, and after the Gallic fashion to show
their dishevelled hair, and bring their children into public view.
Neither in position nor in numbers was the contest an equal one to the
Romans; at the same time, being exhausted by running and the long
continuation of the fight, they could not easily withstand fresh and
vigorous troops.

XLIX.--Caesar, when he perceived that his soldiers were fighting on
unfavourable ground, and that the enemy's forces were increasing, being
alarmed for the safety of his troops, sent orders to Titus Sextius, one
of his lieutenants, whom he had left to guard the smaller camp, to lead
out his cohorts quickly from the camp, and post them at the foot of the
hill, on the right wing of the enemy; that if he should see our men
driven from the ground, he should deter the enemy from following too
closely. He himself, advancing with the legion a little from that place
where he had taken his post, awaited the issue of the battle.

L.--While the fight was going on most vigorously, hand to hand, and the
enemy depended on their position and numbers, our men on their bravery,
the Aedui suddenly appeared on our exposed flank, as Caesar had sent
them by another ascent on the right, for the sake of creating a
diversion. These, from the similarity of their arms, greatly terrified
our men; and although they were discovered to have their right shoulders
bare, which was usually the sign of those reduced to peace, yet the
soldiers suspected that this very thing was done by the enemy to deceive
them. At the same time Lucius Fabius the centurion, and those who had
scaled the wall with him, being surrounded and slain, were cast from the
wall. Marcus Petreius, a centurion of the same legion, after attempting
to hew down the gates, was overpowered by numbers, and, despairing of
his safety, having already received many wounds, said to the soldiers of
his own company who followed him: "Since I cannot save you as well as
myself, I shall at least provide for your safety, since I allured by the
love of glory, led you into this danger, do you save yourselves when an
opportunity is given." At the same time he rushed into the midst of the
enemy, and slaying two of them, drove back the rest a little from the
gate. When his men attempted to aid him, "In vain," he says, "you
endeavour to procure my safety since blood and strength are now failing
me, therefore leave this, while you have the opportunity, and retreat to
the legion." Thus he fell fighting a few moments after, and saved his
men by his own death.

LI.--Our soldiers, being hard pressed on every side, were dislodged from
their position, with the loss of forty-six centurions; but the tenth
legion, which had been posted in reserve on ground a little more level,
checked the Gauls in their eager pursuit. It was supported by the
cohorts of the thirteenth legion, which, being led from the smaller
camp, had, under the command of Titus Sextius, occupied the higher
ground. The legions, as soon as they reached the plain, halted and faced
the enemy. Vercingetorix led back his men from the part of the hill
within the fortifications. On that day little less than seven hundred of
the soldiers were missing.

LII.--On the next day, Caesar, having called a meeting, censured the
rashness and avarice of his soldiers, "In that they had judged for
themselves how far they ought to proceed, or what they ought to do, and
could not be kept back by the tribunes of the soldiers and the
lieutenants;" and stated, "what the disadvantage of the ground could
effect, what opinion he himself had entertained at Avaricum, when having
surprised the enemy without either general or cavalry, he had given up a
certain victory, lest even a trifling loss should occur in the contest
owing to the disadvantage of position. That as much as he admired the
greatness of their courage, since neither the fortifications of the
camp, nor the height of the mountain, nor the wall of the town could
retard them; in the same degree he censured their licentiousness and
arrogance, because they thought that they knew more than their general
concerning victory, and the issue of actions: and that he required in
his soldiers forbearance and self-command, not less than valour and
magnanimity."

LIII.--Having held this assembly, and having encouraged the soldiers at
the conclusion of his speech, "That they should not be dispirited on
this account, nor attribute to the valour of the enemy what the
disadvantage of position had caused;" entertaining the same views of his
departure that he had previously had, he led forth the legions from the
camp, and drew up his army in order of battle in a suitable place. When
Vercingetorix, nevertheless, would not descend to the level ground, a
slight cavalry action, and that a successful one, having taken place, he
led back his army into the camp. When he had done this, the next day,
thinking that he had done enough to lower the pride of the Gauls, and to
encourage the minds of his soldiers, he moved his camp in the direction
of the Aedui. The enemy not even then pursuing us, on the third day he
repaired the bridge over the river Allier, and led over his whole army.

LIV.--Having then held an interview with Viridomarus and Eporedorix the
Aeduans, he learns that Litavicus had set out with all the cavalry to
raise the Aedui; that it was necessary that they too should go before
him to confirm the state in their allegiance. Although he now saw
distinctly the treachery of the Aedui in many things, and was of opinion
that the revolt of the entire state would be hastened by their
departure; yet he thought that they should not be detained, lest he
should appear either to offer an insult, or betray some suspicion of
fear. He briefly states to them when departing his services towards the
Aedui: in what a state and how humbled he had found them, driven into
their towns, deprived of their lands, stripped of all their forces, a
tribute imposed on them, and hostages wrested from them with the utmost
insult; and to what condition and to what greatness he had raised them,
[so much so] that they had not only recovered their former position, but
seemed to surpass the dignity and influence of all the previous eras of
their history. After giving these admonitions he dismissed them.

LV.--Noviodunum was a town of the Aedui, advantageously situated on the
banks of the Loire. Caesar had conveyed hither all the hostages of Gaul,
the corn, public money, a great part of his own baggage and that of his
army; he had sent hither a great number of horses, which he had
purchased in Italy and Spain on account of this war. When Eporedorix and
Viridomarus came to this place, and received information of the
disposition of the state, that Litavicus had been admitted by the Aedui
into Bibracte, which is a town of the greatest importance among them,
that Convictolitanis the chief magistrate and a great part of the senate
had gone to meet him, that ambassadors had been publicly sent to
Vercingetorix to negotiate a peace and alliance; they thought that so
great an opportunity ought not to be neglected. Therefore, having put to
the sword the garrison of Noviodunum and those who had assembled there
for the purpose of trading or were on their march, they divided the
money and horses among themselves; they took care that the hostages of
the [different] states should be brought to Bibracte, to the chief
magistrate; they burnt the town to prevent its being of any service to
the Romans, as they were of opinion that they could not hold it; they
carried away in their vessels whatever corn they could in the hurry;
they destroyed the remainder, by [throwing it] into the river or setting
it on fire; they themselves began to collect forces from the
neighbouring country, to place guards and garrisons in different
positions along the banks of the Loire, and to display the cavalry on
all sides to strike terror into the Romans, [to try] if they could cut
them off from a supply of provisions. In which expectation they were
much aided, from the circumstance that the Loire had swollen to such a
degree from the melting of the snows, that it did not seem capable of
being forded at all.

LVI.--Caesar on being informed of these movements was of opinion that he
ought to make haste, even if he should run some risk in completing the
bridges, in order that he might engage before greater forces of the
enemy should be collected in that place. For no one even then considered
it an absolutely necessary act, that changing his design he should
direct his march into the Province, both because the infamy and disgrace
of the thing, and the intervening mount Cevennes, and the difficulty of
the roads prevented him; and especially because he had serious
apprehensions for the safety of Labienus whom he had detached, and those
legions whom he had sent with him. Therefore, having made very long
marches by day and night, he came to the river Loire, contrary to the
expectation of all; and having by means of the cavalry found out a ford,
suitable enough considering the emergency, of such depth that their arms
and shoulders could be above water for supporting their accoutrements,
he dispersed his cavalry in such a manner as to break the force of the
current, and having confounded the enemy at the first sight, led his
army across the river in safety; and finding corn and cattle in the
fields, after refreshing his army with them, he determined to march into
the country of the Senones.

LVII.--Whilst these things are being done by Caesar, Labienus, leaving
at Agendicum the recruits who had lately arrived from Italy, to guard
the baggage, marches with four legions to Lutetia (which is a town of
the Parisii, situated on an island of the river Seine), whose arrival
being discovered by the enemy, numerous forces arrived from the
neighbouring states. The supreme command is entrusted to Camulogenus,
one of the Aulerci, who, although almost worn out with age, was called
to that honour on account of his extraordinary knowledge of military
tactics. He, when he observed that there was a large marsh which
communicated with the Seine, and rendered all that country impassable,
encamped there, and determined to prevent our troops from passing it.

LVIII.--Labienus at first attempted to raise vineae, fill up the marsh
with hurdles and clay, and secure a road. After he perceived that this
was too difficult to accomplish, he issued in silence from his camp at
the third watch, and reached Melodunum by the same route by which he
came. This is a town of the Senones, situated on an island in the Seine,
as we have just before observed of Lutetia. Having seized upon about
fifty ships and quickly joined them together, and having placed soldiers
in them, he intimidated by his unexpected arrival the inhabitants, of
whom a great number had been called out to the war, and obtains
possession of the town without a contest. Having repaired the bridge,
which the enemy had broken down during the preceding days, he led over
his army, and began to march along the banks of the river to Lutetia.
The enemy, on learning the circumstance from those who had escaped from
Melodunum, set fire to Lutetia, and order the bridges of that town to be
broken down: they themselves set out from the marsh, and take their
position on the banks of the Seine, over against Lutetia and opposite
the camp of Labienus.

LIX.--Caesar was now reported to have departed from Gergovia;
intelligence was likewise brought to them concerning the revolt of the
Aedui, and a successful rising in Gaul; and that Caesar, having been
prevented from prosecuting his journey and crossing the Loire, and
having been compelled by the want of corn, had marched hastily to the
province. But the Bellovaci, who had been previously disaffected of
themselves, on learning the revolt of the Aedui, began to assemble
forces and openly to prepare for war; Then Labienus, as the change in
affairs was so great, thought that he must adopt a very different system
from what he had previously intended, and he did not now think of making
any new acquisitions, or of provoking the enemy to an action; but that
he might bring back his army safe to Agendicum. For, on one side, the
Bellovaci, a state which held the highest reputation for prowess in
Gaul, were pressing on him; and Camulogenus, with a disciplined and
well-equipped army, held the other side; moreover, a very great river
separated and cut off the legions from the garrison and baggage. He saw
that, in consequence of such great difficulties being thrown in his way,
he must seek aid from his own energy of disposition.

LX.--Having, therefore, called a council of war a little before evening,
he exhorted his soldiers to execute with diligence and energy such
commands as he should give; he assigns the ships which he had brought
from Melodunum to Roman knights, one to each, and orders them to fall
down the river silently for four miles, at the end of the fourth watch,
and there wait for him. He leaves the five cohorts, which he considered
to be the most steady in action, to guard the camp; he orders the five
remaining cohorts of the same legion to proceed a little after midnight
up the river with all their baggage, in a great tumult. He collects also
some small boats; and sends them in the same direction, with orders to
make a loud noise in rowing. He himself, a little after, marched out in
silence, and, at the head of three legions, seeks that place to which he
had ordered the ships to be brought.

LXI.--When he had arrived there, the enemy's scouts, as they were
stationed along every part of the river, not expecting an attack,
because a great storm had suddenly arisen, were surprised by our
soldiers: the infantry and cavalry are quickly transported, under the
superintendence of the Roman knights, whom he had appointed to that
office. Almost at the same time, a little before daylight, intelligence
was given to the enemy that there was an unusual tumult in the camp of
the Romans, and that a strong force was marching up the river, and that
the sound of oars was distinctly heard in the same quarter, and that
soldiers were being conveyed across in ships a little below. On hearing
these things, because they were of opinion that the legions were passing
in three different places, and that the entire army, being terrified by
the revolt of the Aedui, were preparing for flight, they divided their
forces also into three divisions. For leaving a guard opposite to the
camp and sending a small body in the direction of Metiosedum, with
orders to advance as far as the ships would proceed, they led the rest
of their troops against Labienus.

LXII.--By day-break all our soldiers were brought across and the army of
the enemy was in sight. Labienus, having encouraged his soldiers "to
retain the memory of their ancient valour, and so many most successful
actions, and imagine Caesar himself, under whose command they had so
often routed the enemy, to be present," gives the signal for action. At
the first onset the enemy are beaten and put to flight in the right
wing, where the seventh legion stood: on the left wing, which position
the twelfth legion held, although the first ranks fell transfixed by the
javelins of the Romans, yet the rest resisted most bravely; nor did any
one of them show the slightest intention of flying. Camulogenus, the
general of the enemy, was present and encouraged his troops. But when
the issue of the victory was still uncertain, and the circumstances
which were taking place on the left wing were announced to the tribunes
of the seventh legion, they faced about their legion to the enemy's rear
and attacked it: not even then did any one retreat, but all were
surrounded and slain. Camulogenus met the same fate. But those who were
left as a guard opposite the camp of Labienus, when they heard that the
battle was commenced, marched to aid their countrymen and take
possession of a hill, but were unable to withstand the attack of the
victorious soldiers. In this manner, mixed with their own fugitives,
such as the woods and mountains did not shelter were cut to pieces by
our cavalry. When this battle was finished, Labienus returns to
Agendicum, where the baggage of the whole army had been left: from it he
marched with all his forces to Caesar.

LXIII.--The revolt of the Aedui being known, the war grows more
dangerous. Embassies are sent by them in all directions: as far as they
can prevail by influence, authority, or money, they strive to excite the
state [to revolt]. Having got possession of the hostages whom Caesar had
deposited with them, they terrify the hesitating by putting them to
death. The Aedui request Vercingetorix to come to them and communicate
his plans of conducting the war. On obtaining this request they insist
that the chief command should be assigned to them; and when the affair
became a disputed question, a council of all Gaul is summoned to
Bibracte. They come together in great numbers and from every quarter to
the same place. The decision is left to the votes of the mass: all to a
man approve of Vercingetorix as their general. The Remi, Lingones, and
Treviri were absent from this meeting; the two former because they
attached themselves to the alliance of Rome; the Treviri because they
were very remote and were hard pressed by the Germans; which was also
the reason of their being absent during the whole war, and their sending
auxiliaries to neither party. The Aedui are highly indignant at being
deprived of the chief command; they lament the change of fortune, and
miss Caesar's indulgence towards them; however, after engaging in the
war, they do not dare to pursue their own measures apart from the rest.
Eporedorix and Viridomarus, youths of the greatest promise, submit
reluctantly to Vercingetorix.

LXIV.--The latter demands hostages from the remaining states: nay, more,
appointed a day for this proceeding; he orders all the cavalry, fifteen
thousand in number, to quickly assemble here; he says that he will be
content with the infantry which he had before, and would not tempt
fortune nor come to a regular engagement; but since he had abundance of
cavalry, it would be very easy for him to prevent the Romans from
obtaining forage or corn, provided that they themselves should
resolutely destroy their corn and set fire to their houses, by which
sacrifice of private property they would evidently obtain perpetual
dominion and freedom. After arranging these matters he levies ten
thousand infantry on the Aedui and Segusiani, who border on our
province: to these he adds eight hundred horse. He sets over them the
brother of Eporedorix, and orders him to wage war against the
Allobroges. On the other side he sends the Gabali and the nearest
cantons of the Arverni against the Helvii; he likewise sends the Ruteni
and Cadurci to lay waste the territories of the Volcae Arecomici.
Besides, by secret messages and embassies, he tampers with the
Allobroges, whose minds, he hopes, had not yet settled down after the
excitement of the late war. To their nobles he promises money, and to
their state the dominion of the whole province.

LXV.--The only guards provided against all these contingencies were
twenty-two cohorts, which were collected from the entire province by
Lucius Caesar, the lieutenant, and opposed to the enemy in every
quarter. The Helvii, voluntarily engaging in battle with their
neighbours, are defeated, and Caius Valerius Donotaurus, the son of
Caburus, the principal man of the state, and several others, being
slain, they are forced to retire within their towns and fortifications.
The Allobroges, placing guards along the course of the Rhine, defend
their frontiers with great vigilance and energy. Caesar, as he perceived
that the enemy were superior in cavalry, and he himself could receive no
aid from the province or Italy, while all communication was cut off,
sends across the Rhine into Germany to those states which he had subdued
in the preceding campaigns, and summons from them cavalry and the
light-armed infantry, who were accustomed to engage among them. On their
arrival, as they were mounted on unserviceable horses, he takes horses
from the military tribunes and the rest, nay, even from the Roman
knights and veterans, and distributes them among the Germans.

LXVI.--In the meantime, whilst these things are going on, the forces of
the enemy from the Arverni, and the cavalry which had been demanded from
all Gaul, meet together. A great number of these having been collected,
when Caesar was marching into the country of the Sequani, through the
confines of the Lingones, in order that he might the more easily render
aid to the province, Vercingetorix encamped in three camps, about ten
miles from the Romans: and having summoned the commanders of the cavalry
to a council, he shows that the time of victory was come; that the
Romans were fleeing into the province and leaving Gaul; that this was
sufficient for obtaining immediate freedom; but was of little moment in
acquiring peace and tranquillity for the future; for the Romans would
return after assembling greater forces, and would not put an end to the
war; Therefore they should attack them on their march, when encumbered.
If the infantry should [be obliged to] relieve their cavalry, and be
retarded by doing so, the march could not be accomplished: if,
abandoning their baggage, they should provide for their safety (a result
which, he trusted, was more likely to ensue), they would lose both
property and character. For as to the enemy's horse, they ought not to
entertain a doubt that none of them would dare to advance beyond the
main body. In order that they [the Gauls] may do so with greater spirit,
he would marshal all their forces before the camp, and intimidate the
enemy. The cavalry unanimously shout out, "That they ought to bind
themselves by a most sacred oath, that he should not be received under a
roof, nor have access to his children, parents, or wife, who shall not
twice have ridden through the enemy's army." LXVII.--This proposal
receiving general approbation, and all being forced to take the oath, on
the next day the cavalry were divided into three parts, and two of these
divisions made a demonstration on our two flanks; while one in front
began to obstruct our march. On this circumstance being announced,
Caesar orders his cavalry also to form three divisions and charge the
enemy. Then the action commences simultaneously in every part: the main
body halts; the baggage is received within the ranks of the legions. If
our men seemed to be distressed, or hard pressed in any quarter, Caesar
usually ordered the troops to advance, and the army to wheel round in
that quarter; which conduct retarded the enemy in the pursuit, and
encouraged our men by the hope of support. At length the Germans, on the
right wing, having gained the top of the hill, dislodge the enemy from
their position and pursue them even as far as the river at which
Vercingetorix with the infantry was stationed, and slay several of them.
The rest, on observing this action, fearing lest they should be
surrounded, betake themselves to flight. A slaughter ensues in every
direction, and three of the noblest of the Audi are taken and brought to
Caesar: Cotus, the commander of the cavalry, who had been engaged in the
contest with Convictolitanis the last election, Cavarillus, who had held
the command of the infantry after the revolt of Litavicus, and
Eporedorix, under whose command the Aedui had engaged in war against the
Sequani, before the arrival of Caesar.

LXVIII.--All his cavalry being routed, Vercingetorix led back his troops
in the same order as he had arranged them before the camp, and
immediately began to march to Alesia, which is a town of the Mandubii;
and ordered the baggage to be speedily brought forth from the camp, and
follow him closely. Caesar, having conveyed his baggage to the nearest
hill, and having left two legions to guard it, pursued as far as the
time of day would permit, and after slaying about three thousand of the
rear of the enemy, encamped at Alesia on the next day. On reconnoitring
the situation of the city, finding that the enemy were panic-stricken,
because the cavalry in which they placed their chief reliance were
beaten, he encouraged his men to endure the toil, and began to draw a
line of circumvallation round Alesia.

LXIX.--The town itself was situated on the top of a hill, in a very
lofty position, so that it did not appear likely to be taken, except by
a regular siege. Two rivers, on two different sides, washed the foot of
the hill. Before the town lay a plain of about three miles in length; on
every other side hills at a moderate distance, and of an equal degree of
height, surrounded the town. The army of the Gauls had filled all the
space under the wall, comprising the part of the hill which looked to
the rising sun, and had drawn in front a trench and a stone wall six
feet high. The circuit of that fortification, which was commenced by the
Romans, comprised eleven miles. The camp was pitched in a strong
position, and twenty-three redoubts were raised in it, in which
sentinels were placed by day, lest any sally should be made suddenly;
and by night the same were occupied by watches and strong guards.

LXX.-The work having been begun, a cavalry action ensues in that plain,
which we have already described as broken by hills, and extending three
miles in length. The contest is maintained on both sides with the utmost
vigour; Caesar sends the Germans to aid our troops when distressed, and
draws up the legions in front of the camp, lest any sally should be
suddenly made by the enemy's infantry. The courage of our men is
increased by the additional support of the legions; the enemy being put
to flight, hinder one another by their numbers, and as only the narrower
gates were left open, are crowded together in them; then the Germans
pursue them with vigour even to the fortifications. A great slaughter
ensues; some leave their horses, and endeavour to cross the ditch and
climb the wall. Caesar orders the legions which he had drawn up in front
of the rampart to advance a little. The Gauls, who were within the
fortifications, were no less panic-stricken, thinking that the enemy
were coming that moment against them, and unanimously shout "to arms;"
some in their alarm rush into the town; Vercingetorix orders the gates
to be shut, lest the camp should be left undefended. The Germans
retreat, after slaying many and taking several horses.

LXXI.--Vercingetorix adopts the design of sending away all his cavalry
by night, before the fortifications should be completed by the Romans.
He charges them when departing "that each of them should go to his
respective state, and press for the war all who were old enough to bear
arms; he states his own Merits, and conjures them to consider his
safety, and not surrender him, who had deserved so well of the general
freedom, to the enemy for torture; he points out to them that, if they
should be remiss, eighty thousand chosen men would perish with him;
that, upon making a calculation, he had barely corn for thirty days, but
could hold out a little longer by economy." After giving these
instructions he silently dismisses the cavalry in the second watch, [on
that side] where our works were not completed; he orders all the corn to
be brought to himself; he ordains capital punishment to such as should
not obey; he distributes among them, man by man, the cattle, great
quantities of which had been driven there by the Mandubii; he began to
measure out the corn sparingly, and by little and little; he receives
into the town all the forces which he had posted in front of it. In this
manner he prepares to await the succours from Gaul, and carry on the
war.

LXXII.--Caesar, on learning these proceedings from the deserters and
captives, adopted the following system of fortification; he dug a trench
twenty feet deep, with perpendicular sides, in such a manner that the
base of this trench should extend so far as the edges were apart at the
top. He raised all his other works at a distance of four hundred feet
from that ditch; [he did] that with this intention, lest (since he
necessarily embraced so extensive an area, and the whole works could not
be easily surrounded by a line of soldiers) a large number of the enemy
should suddenly, or by night, sally against the fortifications; or lest
they should by day cast weapons against our men while occupied with the
works. Having left this interval, he drew two trenches fifteen feet
broad, and of the same depth; the innermost of them, being in low and
level ground, he filled with water conveyed from the river. Behind these
he raised a rampart and wall twelve feet high: to this he added a
parapet and battlements, with large stakes cut like stags' horns,
projecting from the junction of the parapet and battlements, to prevent
the enemy from scaling it, and surrounded the entire work with turrets,
which were eighty feet distant from one another.

LXXIII.--It was necessary, at one and the same time, to procure timber
[for the rampart], lay in supplies of corn, and raise also extensive
fortifications, and the available troops were in consequence of this
reduced in number, since they used to advance to some distance from the
camp, and sometimes the Gauls endeavoured to attack our works, and to
make a sally from the town by several gates and in great force. On which
Caesar thought that further additions should be made to these works, in
order that the fortifications might be defensible by a small number of
soldiers. Having, therefore, cut down the trunks of trees or very thick
branches, and having stripped their tops of the bark, and sharpened them
into a point, he drew a continued trench everywhere five feet deep.
These stakes being sunk into this trench, and fastened firmly at the
bottom, to prevent the possibility of their being torn up, had their
branches only projecting from the ground. There were five rows in
connection with, and intersecting each other; and whoever entered within
them were likely to impale themselves on very sharp stakes. The soldiers
called these "cippi." Before these, which were arranged in oblique rows
in the form of a quincunx, pits three feet deep were dug, which
gradually diminished in depth to the bottom. In these pits tapering
stakes, of the thickness of a man's thigh, sharpened at the top and
hardened in the fire, were sunk in such a manner as to project from the
ground not more than four inches; at the same time for the purpose of
giving them strength and stability, they were each filled with trampled
clay to the height of one foot from the bottom: the rest of the pit was
covered over with osiers and twigs, to conceal the deceit. Eight rows of
this kind were dug, and were three feet distant from each other. They
called this a lily from its resemblance to that flower. Stakes a foot
long, with iron hooks attached to them, were entirely sunk in the ground
before these, and were planted in every place at small intervals; these
they called spurs.

LXXIV.--After completing these works, having selected as level ground as
he could, considering the nature of the country, and having enclosed an
area of fourteen miles, he constructed, against an external enemy,
fortifications of the same kind in every respect, and separate from
these, so that the guards of the fortifications could not be surrounded
even by immense numbers, if such a circumstance should take place owing
to the departure of the enemy's cavalry; and in order that the Roman
soldiers might not be compelled to go out of the camp with great risk,
he orders all to provide forage and corn for thirty days.

LXXV.--Whilst those things are carried on at Alesia, the Gauls, having
convened a council of their chief nobility, determine that all who could
bear arms should not be called out, which was the opinion of
Vercingetorix, but that a fixed number should be levied from each state;
lest, when so great a multitude assembled together, they could neither
govern nor distinguish their men, nor have the means of supplying them
with corn. They demand thirty-five thousand men from the Aedui and their
dependents, the Segusiani, Ambivareti, and Aulerci Brannovices; an equal
number from the Arverni in conjunction with the Eleuteti Cadurci,
Gabali, and Velauni, who were accustomed to be under the command of the
Arverni; twelve thousand each from the Senones, Sequani, Bituriges,
Santones, Ruteni, and Carnutes; ten thousand from the Bellovaci; the
same number from the Lemovici; eight thousand each from the Pictones,
and Turoni, and Parisii, and Helvii; five thousand each from the
Suessiones, Ambiani, Mediomatrici, Petrocorii, Nervii, Morini, and
Nitiobriges; the same number from the Aulerci Cenomani; four thousand
from the Atrebates; three thousand each from the Bellocassi, Lexovii,
and Aulerci Eburovices; thirty thousand from the Rauraci, and Boii; six
thousand, from all the states together which border on the Atlantic, and
which in their dialect are called Armoricae (in which number are
comprehended the Curisolites, Rhedones, Ambibari, Caltes, Osismii,
Lemovices, Veneti, and Unelli). Of these the Bellovaci did not
contribute their number, as they said that they would wage war against
the Romans on their own account, and at their own discretion, and would
not obey the order of any one: however, at the request of Commius, they
sent two thousand, in consideration of a tie of hospitality which
subsisted between him and them.

LXXVI.--Caesar had, as we have previously narrated, availed himself of
the faithful and valuable services of this Commius, in Britain, in
former years: in consideration of which merits he had exempted from
taxes his [Commius's] state, and had conferred on Commius himself the
country of the Morini. Yet such was the unanimity of the Gauls in
asserting their freedom, and recovering their ancient renown in war,
that they were influenced neither by favours, nor by the recollection of
private friendship; and all earnestly directed their energies and
resources to that war, and collected eight thousand cavalry, and about
two hundred and forty thousand infantry. These were reviewed in the
country of the Aedui, and a calculation was made of their numbers:
commanders were appointed: the supreme command is entrusted to Commius
the Atrebatian, Viridomarus and Eporedorix the Aeduans, and
Vergasillaunus the Arvernian, the cousin-german of Vercingetorix. To
them are assigned men selected from each state, by whose advice the war
should be conducted. All march to Alesia, sanguine and full of
confidence: nor was there a single individual who imagined that the
Romans could withstand the sight of such an immense host: especially in
an action carried on both in front and rear, when [on the inside] the
besieged would sally from the town and attack the enemy, and on the
outside so great forces of cavalry and infantry would be seen.

LXXVII.--But those who were blockaded at Alesia, the day being past on
which they had expected auxiliaries from their countrymen, and all their
corn being consumed, ignorant of what was going on among the Aedui,
convened an assembly and deliberated on the exigency of their situation.
After various opinions had been expressed among them, some of which
proposed a surrender, others a sally, whilst their strength would
support it, the speech of Critognatus ought not to be omitted for its
singular and detestable cruelty. He sprung from the noblest family among
the Arverni, and possessing great influence, says, "I shall pay no
attention to the opinion of those who call a most disgraceful surrender
by the name of a capitulation; nor do I think that they ought to be
considered as citizens, or summoned to the council. My business is with
those who approve of a sally: in whose advice the memory of our ancient
prowess seems to dwell in the opinion of you all. To be unable to bear
privation for a short time is disgraceful cowardice, not true valour.
Those who voluntarily offer themselves to death are more easily found
than those who would calmly endure distress. And I would approve of this
opinion (for honour is a powerful motive with me), could I foresee no
other loss, save that of life: but let us, in adopting our design, look
back on all Gaul, which we have stirred up to our aid. What courage do
you think would our relatives and friends have, if eighty thousand men
were butchered in one spot, supposing that they should be forced to come
to an action almost over our corpses? Do not utterly deprive them of
your aid, for they have spurned all thoughts of personal danger on
account of your safety; nor by your folly, rashness, and cowardice,
crush all Gaul and doom it to an eternal slavery. Do you doubt their
fidelity and firmness because they have not come at the appointed day?
What then? Do you suppose that the Romans are employed every day in the
outer fortifications for mere amusement? If you cannot be assured by
their despatches, since every avenue is blocked up, take the Romans as
evidence that their approach is drawing near; since they, intimidated by
alarm at this, labour night and day at their works. What, therefore, is
my design? To do as our ancestors did in the war against the Cimbri and
Teutones, which was by no means equally momentous; who, when driven into
their towns, and oppressed by similar privations, supported life by the
corpses of those who appeared useless for war on account of their age,
and did not surrender to the enemy: and even if we had not a precedent
for such cruel conduct, still I should consider it most glorious that
one should be established, and delivered to posterity. For in what was
that war like this? The Cimbri, after laying Gaul waste, and inflicting
great calamities, at length departed from our country, and sought other
lands; they left us our rights, laws, lands, and liberty. But what other
motive or wish have the Romans, than, induced by envy, to settle in the
lands and states of those whom they have learned by fame to be noble and
powerful in war, and impose on them perpetual slavery? For they never
have carried on wars on any other terms. But if you know not these
things which are going on in distant countries, look to the neighbouring
Gaul, which being reduced to the form of a province, stripped of its
rights and laws, and subjected to Roman despotism, is oppressed by
perpetual slavery."

LXXVIII.--When different opinions were expressed, they determined that
those who, owing to age or ill health, were unserviceable for war,
should depart from the town, and that themselves should try every
expedient before they had recourse to the advice of Critognatus:
however, that they would rather adopt that design, if circumstances
should compel them and their allies should delay, than accept any terms
of a surrender or peace. The Mandubii, who had admitted them into the
town, are compelled to go forth with their wives and children. When
these came to the Roman fortifications, weeping, they begged of the
soldiers by every entreaty to receive them as slaves and relieve them
with food. But Caesar, placing guards on the rampart, forbade them to be
admitted.

LXXIX.--In the meantime, Commius and the rest of the leaders, to whom
the supreme command had been intrusted, came with all their forces to
Alesia, and having occupied the entire hill, encamp not more than a mile
from our fortifications. The following day, having led forth their
cavalry from the camp, they fill all that plain, which, we have related,
extended three miles in length, and draw out their infantry a little
from that place, and post them on the higher ground. The town Alesia
commanded a view of the whole plain. The besieged run together when
these auxiliaries were seen; mutual congratulations ensue, and the minds
of all are elated with joy. Accordingly, drawing out their troops, they
encamp before the town, and cover the nearest trench with hurdles and
fill it up with earth, and make ready for a sally and every casualty.

LXXX.--Caesar, having stationed his army on both sides of the
fortifications, in order that, if occasion should arise, each should
hold and know his own post, orders the cavalry to issue forth from the
camp and commence action. There was a commanding view from the entire
camp, which occupied a ridge of hills; and the minds of all the soldiers
anxiously awaited the issue of the battle. The Gauls had scattered
archers and light-armed infantry here and there, among their cavalry, to
give relief to their retreating troops, and sustain the impetuosity of
our cavalry. Several of our soldiers were unexpectedly wounded by these,
and left the battle. When the Gauls were confident that their countrymen
were the conquerors in the action, and beheld our men hard pressed by
numbers, both those who were hemmed in by the line of circumvallation
and those who had come to aid them, supported the spirits of their men
by shouts and yells from every quarter. As the action was carried on in
sight of all, neither a brave nor cowardly act could be concealed; both
the desire of praise and the fear of ignominy, urged on each party to
valour. After fighting from noon almost to sunset, without victory
inclining in favour of either, the Germans, on one side, made a charge
against the enemy in a compact body, and drove them back; and, when they
were put to flight, the archers were surrounded and cut to pieces. In
other parts, likewise, our men pursued to the camp the retreating enemy,
and did not give them an opportunity of rallying. But those who had come
forth from Alesia returned into the town dejected and almost despairing
of success.

LXXXI.--The Gauls, after the interval of a day, and after making, during
that time, an immense number of hurdles, scaling ladders, and iron
hooks, silently went forth from the camp at midnight and approached the
fortifications in the plain. Raising a shout suddenly, that by this
intimation those who were besieged in the town might learn their
arrival, they began to cast down hurdles and dislodge our men from the
rampart by slings, arrows, and stones, and executed the other movements
which are requisite in storming. At the same time, Vercingetorix having
heard the shout, gives the signal to his troops by a trumpet, and leads
them forth from the town. Our troops, as each man's post had been
assigned him some days before, man the fortifications; they intimidate
the Gauls by slings, large stones, stakes which they had placed along
the works, and bullets. All view being prevented by the darkness, many
wounds are received on both sides; several missiles are thrown from the
engines. But Marcus Antonius, and Caius Trebonius, the lieutenants, to
whom the defence of these parts had been allotted, draughted troops from
the redoubts which were more remote, and sent them to aid our troops, in
whatever direction they understood that they were hard pressed.

LXXXII.--Whilst the Gauls were at a distance from the fortification,
they did more execution, owing to the immense number of their weapons:
after they came nearer, they either unawares empaled themselves on the
spurs, or were pierced by the mural darts from the ramparts and towers,
and thus perished. After receiving many wounds on all sides, and having
forced no part of the works, when day drew nigh, fearing lest they
should be surrounded by a sally made from the higher camp on the exposed
flank, they retreated to their countrymen. But those within, whilst they
bring forward those things which had been prepared by Vercingetorix for
a sally, fill up the nearest trenches; having delayed a long time in
executing these movements, they learned the retreat of their countrymen
before they drew nigh to the fortifications. Thus they returned to the
town without accomplishing their object.

LXXXIII.--The Gauls, having been twice repulsed with great loss, consult
what they should do: they avail themselves of the information of those
who were well acquainted with the country; from them they ascertain the
position and fortification of the upper camp. There was, on the north
side, a hill, which our men could not include in their works, on account
of the extent of the circuit, and had necessarily made their camp in
ground almost disadvantageous, and pretty steep. Caius Antistius
Reginus, and Caius Caninius Rebilus, two of the lieutenants, with two
legions, were in possession of this camp. The leaders of the enemy,
having reconnoitred the country by their scouts, select from the entire
army sixty thousand men; belonging to those states which bear the
highest character for courage: they privately arrange among themselves
what they wished to be done, and in what manner; they decide that the
attack should take place when it should seem to be noon. They appoint
over their forces Vergasillaunus, the Arvernian, one of the four
generals, and a near relative of Vercingetorix. He, having issued from
the camp at the first watch, and having almost completed his march a
little before the dawn, hid himself behind the mountain, and ordered his
soldiers to refresh themselves after their labour during the night. When
noon now seemed to draw nigh, he marched hastily against that camp which
we have mentioned before; and, at the same time, the cavalry began to
approach the fortifications in the plain, and the rest of the forces to
make a demonstration in front of the camp.

LXXXIV.--Vercingetorix, having beheld his countrymen from the citadel of
Alesia, issues forth from the town; he brings forth from the camp long
hooks, movable pent-houses, mural hooks, and other things, which he had
prepared for the purpose of making a sally. They engage on all sides at
once, and every expedient is adopted. They flocked to whatever part of
the works seemed weakest. The army of the Romans is distributed along
their extensive lines, and with difficulty meets the enemy in every
quarter. The shouts which were raised by the combatants in their rear,
had a great tendency to intimidate our men, because they perceived that
their danger rested on the valour of others: for generally all evils
which are distant most powerfully alarm men's minds.

LXXXV.--Caesar, having selected a commanding situation, sees distinctly
whatever is going on in every quarter, and sends assistance to his
troops when hard pressed. The idea uppermost in the minds of both
parties is, that the present is the time in which they would have the
fairest opportunity of making a struggle; the Gauls despairing of all
safety, unless they should succeed in forcing the lines: the Romans
expecting an end to all their labours if they should gain the day. The
principal struggle is at the upper lines, to which, we have said,
Vergasillaunus was sent. The least elevation of ground, added to a
declivity, exercises a momentous influence. Some are casting missiles,
others, forming a testudo, advance to the attack; fresh men by turns
relieve the wearied. The earth, heaped up by all against the
fortifications, gives the means of ascent to the Gauls, and covers those
works which the Romans had concealed in the ground. Our men have no
longer arms or strength.

LXXXVI.--Caesar, on observing these movements, sends Labienus with six
cohorts to relieve his distressed soldiers: he orders him, if he should
be unable to withstand them, to draw off the cohorts and make a sally;
but not to do this except through necessity. He himself goes to the
rest, and exhorts them not to succumb to the toil; he shows them that
the fruits of all former engagements depend on that day and hour. The
Gauls within, despairing of forcing the fortifications in the plains on
account of the greatness of the works, attempt the places precipitous in
ascent: hither they bring the engines which they had prepared; by the
immense number of their missiles they dislodge the defenders from the
turrets: they fill the ditches with clay and hurdles, then clear the
way; they tear down the rampart and breast-work with hooks.

LXXXVII.--Caesar sends at first young Brutus, with six cohorts, and
afterwards Caius Fabius, his lieutenant, with seven others: finally, as
they fought more obstinately, he leads up fresh men to the assistance of
his soldiers. After renewing the action, and repulsing the enemy, he
marches in the direction in which he had sent Labienus, drafts four
cohorts from the nearest redoubt, and orders part of the cavalry to
follow him, and part to make the circuit of the external fortifications
and attack the enemy in the rear. Labienus, when neither the ramparts or
ditches could check the onset of the enemy, informs Caesar by messengers
of what he intended to do. Caesar hastens to share in the action.

LXXXVIII.--His arrival being known from the colour of his robe, and the
troops of cavalry, and the cohorts which he had ordered to follow him
being seen, as these low and sloping grounds were plainly visible from
the eminences, the enemy join battle. A shout being raised by both
sides, it was succeeded by a general shout along the ramparts and whole
line of fortifications. Our troops, laying aside their javelins, carry
on the engagement with their swords. The cavalry is suddenly seen in the
rear of the Gauls: the other cohorts advance rapidly; the enemy turn
their backs; the cavalry intercept them in their flight, and a great
slaughter ensues. Sedulius the general and chief of the Lemovices is
slain; Vergasillaunus, the Arvernian, is taken alive in the flight,
seventy-four military standards are brought to Caesar, and few out of so
great a number return safe to their camp. The besieged, beholding from
the town the slaughter and flight of their countrymen, despairing of
safety, lead back their troops from the fortifications. A flight of the
Gauls from their camp immediately ensues on hearing of this disaster,
and had not the soldiers been wearied by sending frequent
reinforcements, and the labour of the entire day, all the enemy's forces
could have been destroyed. Immediately after midnight, the cavalry are
sent out and overtake the rear, a great number are taken or cut to
pieces, the rest by flight escape in different directions to their
respective states. Vercingetorix, having convened a council the
following day, declares, "That he had undertaken that war, not on
account of his own exigencies, but on account of the general freedom;
and since he must yield to fortune, he offered himself to them for
either purpose, whether they should wish to atone to the Romans by his
death, or surrender him alive." Ambassadors are sent to Caesar on this
subject. He orders their arms to be surrendered, and their chieftains
delivered up. He seated himself at the head of the lines in front of the
camp, the Gallic chieftains are brought before him. They surrender
Vercingetorix, and lay down their arms. Reserving the Aedui and Arverni,
[to try] if he could gain over, through their influence, their
respective states, he distributes one of the remaining captives to each
soldier, throughout the entire army, as plunder.

XC.--After making these arrangements, he marches into the [country of
the] Aedui, and recovers that state. To this place ambassadors are sent
by the Arverni, who promise that they will execute his commands. He
demands a great number of hostages. He sends the legions to winter
quarters; he restores about twenty thousand captives to the Aedui and
Arverni; he orders Titus Labienus to march into the [country of the]
Sequani with two legions and the cavalry, and to him he attaches Marcus
Sempronius Rutilus; he places Caius Fabius, and Lucius Minucius Basilus,
with two legions in the country of the Remi, lest they should sustain
any loss from the Bellovaci in their neighbourhood. He sends Caius
Antistius Reginus into the [country of the] Ambivareti, Titus Sextius
into the territories of the Bituriges, and Caius Caninius Rebilus into
those of the Ruteni, with one legion each. He stations Quintus Tullius
Cicero, and Publius Sulpicius among the Aedui at Cabillo and Matisco on
the Saone, to procure supplies of corn. He himself determines to winter
at Bibracte. A supplication of twenty days is decreed by the senate at
Rome, on learning these successes from Caesar's despatches.



BOOK VIII

CONTINUATION OF CAESAR'S GALLIC WAR ASCRIBED TO AULUS HIRTIUS

PREFACE

Prevailed on by your continued solicitations, Balbus, I have engaged in
a most difficult task, as my daily refusals appear to plead not my
inability, but indolence, as an excuse. I have compiled a continuation
of the Commentaries of our Caesar's Wars in Gaul, not indeed to be
compared to his writings, which either precede or follow them; and
recently, I have completed what he left imperfect after the transactions
in Alexandria, to the end, not indeed of the civil broils, to which we
see no issue, but of Caesar's life. I wish that those who may read them
could know how unwillingly I undertook to write them, as then I might
the more readily escape the imputation of folly and arrogance, in
presuming to intrude among Caesar's writings. For it is agreed on all
hands, that no composition was ever executed with so great care, that it
is not exceeded in elegance by these Commentaries, which were published
for the use of historians, that they might not want memoirs of such
achievements; and they stand so high in the esteem of all men, that
historians seem rather deprived of than furnished with materials. At
which we have more reason to be surprised than other men; for they can
only appreciate the elegance and correctness with which he finished
them, while we know with what ease and expedition. Caesar possessed not
only an uncommon flow of language and elegance of style, but also a
thorough knowledge of the method of conveying his ideas. But I had not
even the good fortune to share in the Alexandrian or African war; and
though these were partly communicated to me by Caesar himself, in
conversation, yet we listen with a different degree of attention to
those things which strike us with admiration by their novelty, and those
which we design to attest to posterity. But, in truth, whilst I urge
every apology, that I may not be compared to Caesar, I incur the charge
of vanity, by thinking it possible that I can in the judgment of any one
be put in competition with him. Farewell.

I.--Gaul being entirely reduced, when Caesar having waged war
incessantly during the former summer, wished to recruit his soldiers
after so much fatigue, by repose in winter quarters, news was brought
him that several states were simultaneously renewing their hostile
intentions, and forming combinations. For which a probable reason was
assigned: namely, that the Gauls were convinced that they were not able
to resist the Romans with any force they could collect in one place; and
hoped that if several states made war in different places at the same
time, the Roman army would neither have aid, nor time, nor forces, to
prosecute them all: nor ought any single state to decline any
inconveniences that might befall them, provided that by such delay the
rest should be enabled to assert their liberty.

II.--That this notion might not be confirmed among the Gauls, Caesar
left Marcus Antonius, his quaestor, in charge of his quarters, and set
out himself with a guard of horse, the day before the kalends of
January, from the town Bibracte, to the thirteenth legion, which he had
stationed in the country of the Bituriges, not far from the territories
of the Aedui, and joined to it the eleventh legion which was next it.
Leaving two cohorts to guard the baggage, he leads the rest of his army
into the most plentiful part of the country of the Bituriges; who,
possessing an extensive territory and several towns, were not to be
deterred, by a single legion quartered among them, from making warlike
preparation, and forming combinations.

III.-By Caesar's sudden arrival, it happened, as it necessarily must, to
an unprovided and dispersed people, that they were surprised by our
horse, whilst cultivating the fields without any apprehensions, before
they had time to fly to their towns. For the usual sign of an enemy's
invasion, which is generally intimated by the burning of their towns,
was forbidden by Caesar's orders: lest if he advanced far, forage and
corn should become scarce, or the enemy be warned by the fires to make
their escape. Many thousands being taken, as many of the Bituriges as
were able to escape the first coming of the Romans, fled to the
neighbouring states, relying either on private friendship, or public
alliance. In vain; for Caesar, by hasty marches, anticipated them in
every place, nor did he allow any state leisure to consider the safety
of others, in preference to their own. By this activity, he both
retained his friends in their loyalty, and by fear, obliged the wavering
to accept offers of peace. Such offers being made to the Bituriges, when
they perceived that through Caesar's clemency, an avenue was open to his
friendship, and that the neighbouring states had given hostages, without
incurring any punishment, and had been received under his protection,
they did the same.

IV.-Caesar promises his soldiers, as a reward for their labour and
patience, in cheerfully submitting to hardships from the severity of the
winter, the difficulty of the roads, and the intolerable cold, two
hundred sestertii each, and to every centurian two thousand, to be given
instead of plunder; and sending his legions back to quarters, he himself
returned on the fortieth day to Bibracte. Whilst he was dispensing
justice there, the Bituriges send ambassadors to him, to entreat his aid
against the Carnutes, who they complained had made war against them.
Upon this intelligence, though he had not remained more than eighteen
days in winter quarters, he draws the fourteenth and sixth legion out of
quarters on the Saone, where he had posted them as mentioned in a former
Commentary to procure supplies of corn. With these two legions he
marches in pursuit of the Carnutes.

V.--When the news of the approach of our army reached the enemy, the
Carnutes, terrified by the sufferings of other states, deserted their
villages and towns (which were small buildings, raised in a hurry, to
meet the immediate necessity, in which they lived to shelter themselves
against the winter, for, being lately conquered, they had lost several
towns), and dispersed and fled. Caesar, unwilling to expose his soldiers
to the violent storms that break out, especially at that season, took up
his quarters at Genabum, a town of the Carnutes; and lodged his men in
houses, partly belonging to the Gauls, and partly built to shelter the
tents, and hastily covered with thatch. But the horse and auxiliaries he
sends to all parts to which he was told the enemy had marched; and not
without effect, as our men generally returned loaded with booty. The
Carnutes, overpowered by the severity of the winter, and the fear of
danger, and not daring to continue long in any place, as they were
driven from their houses, and not finding sufficient protection in the
woods, from the violence of the storms, after losing a considerable
number of their men, disperse, and take refuge among the neighbouring
states.

VI.--Caesar, being contented, at so severe a season, to disperse the
gathering foes, and prevent any new war from breaking out, and being
convinced, as far as reason could foresee, that no war of consequence
could be set on foot in the summer campaign, stationed Caius Trebonius,
with the two legions which he had with him, in quarters at Genabum: and
being informed by frequent embassies from the Remi, that the Bellovaci
(who exceed all the Gauls and Belgae in military prowess), and the
neighbouring states, headed by Correus, one of the Bellovaci, and
Comius, the Atrebatian, were raising an army, and assembling at a
general rendezvous, designing with their united forces to invade the
territories of the Suessiones, who were put under the patronage of the
Remi: and moreover, considering that not only his honour, but his
interest was concerned, that such of his allies, as deserved well of the
republic, should suffer no calamity; he again draws the eleventh legion
out of quarters and writes besides to Caius Fabius, to march with his
two legions to the country of the Suessiones; and he sends to Trebonius
for one of his two legions. Thus, as far as the convenience of the
quarters, and the management of the war admitted, he laid the burden of
the expedition on the legions by turns, without any intermission to his
own toils.

VII.--As soon as his troops were collected, he marched against the
Bellovaci: and pitching his camp in their territories, detached troops
of horse all round the country, to take prisoners, from whom he might
learn the enemy's plan. The horse, having executed his orders, bring him
back word that but few were found in the houses: and that even these had
not stayed at home to cultivate their lands (for the emigration was
general from all parts), but had been sent back to watch our motions.
Upon Caesar's inquiring from them, where the main body of the Bellovaci
were posted, and what was their design: they made answer, "that all the
Bellovaci, fit for carrying arms, had assembled in one place, and along
with them the Ambiani, Aulerci, Caletes, Velocasses, and Atrebates, and
that they had chosen for their camp an elevated position, surrounded by
a dangerous morass: that they had conveyed all their baggage into the
most remote woods: that several noblemen were united in the management
of the war; but that the people were most inclined to be governed by
Correus, because they knew that he had the strongest aversion to the
name of the Roman people: that a few days before Comius had left the
camp to engage the Germans to their aid whose nation bordered on theirs,
and whose numbers were countless: that the Bellovaci had come to a
resolution, with the consent of all the generals and the earnest desire
of the people, if Caesar should come with only three legions, as was
reported, to give him battle, that they might not be obliged to
encounter his whole army on a future occasion, when they should be in a
more wretched and distressed condition; but if he brought a stronger
force, they intended to remain in the position they had chosen, and by
ambuscade to prevent the Romans from getting forage (which at that
season was both scarce and much scattered), corn, and other
necessaries."

VIII.--When Caesar was convinced of the truth of this account from the
concurring testimony of several persons, and perceived that the plans
which were proposed were full of prudence, and very unlike the rash
resolves of a barbarous people, he considered it incumbent on him to use
every exertion, in order that the enemy might despise his small force
and come to an action. For he had three veteran legions of distinguished
valour, the seventh, eighth, and ninth. The eleventh consisted of chosen
youth of great hopes, who had served eight campaigns, but who, compared
with the others, had not yet acquired any great reputation for
experience and valour. Calling therefore a council, and laying before it
the intelligence which he had received, he encouraged his soldiers. In
order if possible to entice the enemy to an engagement by the appearance
of only three legions, he ranged his army in the following manner: that
the seventh, eighth, and ninth legions should march before all the
baggage; that then the eleventh should bring up the rear of the whole
train of baggage (which however was but small, as is usual on such
expeditions), so that the enemy could not get a sight of a greater
number than they themselves were willing to encounter. By this
disposition he formed his army almost into a square, and brought them
within sight of the enemy sooner than was anticipated.

IX.--When the Gauls, whose bold resolutions had been reported to Caesar,
saw the legions advance with a regular motion, drawn up in battle array;
either from the danger of an engagement, or our sudden approach, or with
the design of watching our movements, they drew up their forces before
the camp, and did not quit the rising ground. Though Caesar wished to
bring them to battle, yet being surprised to see so vast a host of the
enemy, he encamped opposite to them, with a valley between them, deep
rather than extensive. He ordered his camp to be fortified with a
rampart twelve feet high, with breast-works built on it proportioned to
its height; and two trenches, each fifteen feet broad, with
perpendicular sides to be sunk: likewise several turrets, three stories
high, to be raised, with a communication to each other by galleries laid
across and covered over; which should be guarded in front by small
parapets of osiers; that the enemy might be repulsed by two rows of
soldiers. The one of whom, being more secure from danger by their
height, might throw their darts with more daring and to a greater
distance; the other, which was nearer the enemy, being stationed on the
rampart, would be protected by their galleries from darts falling on
their heads. At the entrance he erected gates and turrets of a
considerable height.

X.-Caesar had a double design in this fortification; for he both hoped
that the strength of his works, and his [apparent] fears would raise
confidence in the barbarians; and when there should be occasion to make
a distant excursion to get forage or corn, he saw that his camp would be
secured by the works with a very small force. In the meantime there were
frequent skirmishes across the marsh, a few on both sides sallying out
between the two camps. Sometimes, however, our Gallic or German
auxiliaries crossed the marsh, and furiously pursued the enemy; or on
the other hand the enemy passed it and beat back our men. Moreover there
happened in the course of our daily foraging, what must of necessity
happen, when corn is to be collected by a few scattered men out of
private houses, that our foragers dispersing in an intricate country
were surrounded by the enemy; by which, though we suffered but an
inconsiderable loss of cattle and servants, yet it raised foolish hopes
in the barbarians; but more especially, because Comius, who I said had
gone to get aid from the Germans, returned with some cavalry, and though
the Germans were only 500, yet the barbarians were elated by their
arrival.

XI.-Caesar, observing that the enemy kept for several days within their
camp, which was well secured by a morass and its natural situation, and
that it could not be assaulted without a dangerous engagement, nor the
place enclosed with lines without an addition to his army, wrote to
Trebonius to send with all despatch for the thirteenth legion which was
in winter-quarters among the Bituriges under Titus Sextius, one of his
lieutenants; and then to come to him by forced marches with the three
legions. He himself sent the cavalry of the Remi, and Lingones, and
other states, from whom he had required a vast number, to guard his
foraging parties, and to support them in case of any sudden attack of
the enemy.

XII.--As this continued for several days, and their vigilance was
relaxed by custom (an effect which is generally produced by time), the
Bellovaci, having made themselves acquainted with the daily stations of
our horse, lie in ambush with a select body of foot in a place covered
with woods; to it they sent their horse the next day, who were first to
decoy our men into the ambuscade, and then when they were surrounded, to
attack them. It was the lot of the Remi to fall into this snare, to whom
that day had been allotted to perform this duty; for, having suddenly
got sight of the enemy's cavalry, and despising their weakness, in
consequence of their superior numbers, they pursued them too eagerly,
and were surrounded on every side by the foot. Being by this means
thrown into disorder they returned with more precipitation than is usual
in cavalry actions, with the loss of Vertiscus, the governor of their
state, and the general of their horse, who, though scarcely able to sit
on horseback through years, neither, in accordance with the custom of
the Gauls, pleaded his age in excuse for not accepting the command, nor
would he suffer them to fight without him. The spirits of the barbarians
were puffed up and inflated at the success of this battle, in killing
the prince and general of the Remi; and our men were taught by this
loss, to examine the country, and post their guards with more caution,
and to be more moderate in pursuing a retreating enemy.

XIII.--In the meantime daily skirmishes take place continually in view
of both camps; these were fought at the ford and pass of the morass. In
one of these contests the Germans, whom Caesar had brought over the
Rhine, to fight intermixed with the horse, having resolutely crossed the
marsh, and slain the few who made resistance, and boldly pursued the
rest, so terrified them, that not only those who were attacked hand to
hand, or wounded at a distance, but even those who were stationed at a
greater distance to support them, fled disgracefully; and being often
beaten from the rising grounds, did not stop till they had retired into
their camp, or some, impelled by fear, had fled farther. Their danger
drew their whole army into such confusion, that it was difficult to
judge whether they were more insolent after a slight advantage, or more
dejected by a trifling calamity.

XIV.--After spending several days in the same camp, the guards of the
Bellovaci, learning that Caius Trebonius was advancing nearer with his
legions, and fearing a siege like that of Alesia, send off by night all
who were disabled by age or infirmity, or unarmed, and along with them
their whole baggage. Whilst they are preparing their disorderly and
confused troop for march (for the Gauls are always attended by a vast
multitude of waggons, even when they have very light baggage), being
overtaken by daylight, they drew their forces out before their camp, to
prevent the Romans attempting a pursuit before the line of their baggage
had advanced to a considerable distance. But Caesar did not think it
prudent to attack them when standing on their defence, with such a steep
hill in their favour, nor keep his legions at such a distance that they
could quit their post without danger: but, perceiving that his camp was
divided from the enemy's by a deep morass, so difficult to cross that he
could not pursue with expedition, and that the hill beyond the morass,
which extended almost to the enemy's camp, was separated from it only by
a small valley, he laid a bridge over the morass and led his army
across, and soon reached the plain on the top of the hill, which was
fortified on either side by a steep ascent. Having there drawn up his
army in order of battle, he marched to the furthest hill, from which he
could, with his engines, shower darts upon the thickest of the enemy.

XV.--The Gauls, confiding in the natural strength of their position,
though they would not decline an engagement if the Romans attempted to
ascend the hill, yet dared not divide their forces into small parties,
lest they should be thrown into disorder by being dispersed, and
therefore remained in order of battle. Caesar, perceiving that they
persisted in their resolution, kept twenty cohorts in battle array, and,
measuring out ground there for a camp, ordered it to be fortified.
Having completed his works, he drew up his legions before the rampart
and stationed the cavalry in certain positions, with their horses
bridled. When the Bellovaci saw the Romans prepared to pursue them, and
that they could not wait the whole night, or continue longer in the same
place without provisions, they formed the following plan to secure a
retreat. They handed to one another the bundles of straw and sticks on
which they sat (for it is the custom of the Gauls to sit when drawn up
in order of battle, as has been asserted in former commentaries), of
which they had great plenty in their camp, and piled them in the front
of their line; and at the close of the day, on a certain signal, set
them all on fire at one and the same time. The continued blaze soon
screened all their forces from the sight of the Romans, which no sooner
happened than the barbarians fled with the greatest precipitation.

XVI.--Though Caesar could not perceive the retreat of the enemy for the
intervention of the fire, yet, suspecting that they had adopted that
method to favour their escape, he made his legions advance, and sent a
party of horse to pursue them; but, apprehensive of an ambuscade, and
that the enemy might remain in the same place and endeavour to draw our
men into a disadvantageous situation, he advances himself but slowly.
The horse, being afraid to venture into the smoke and dense line of
flame, and those who were bold enough to attempt it being scarcely able
to see their horses' heads, gave the enemy free liberty to retreat,
through fear of an ambuscade. Thus, by a flight, full at once of
cowardice and address, they advanced without any loss about ten miles,
and encamped in a very strong position. From which, laying numerous
ambuscades, both of horse and foot, they did considerable damage to the
Roman foragers.

XVII.--After this had happened several times, Caesar discovered, from a
certain prisoner, that Correus, the general of the Bellovaci, had
selected six thousand of his bravest foot and a thousand horse, with
which he designed to lie in ambush in a place to which he suspected the
Romans would send to look for forage, on account of the abundance of
corn and grass. Upon receiving information of their design Caesar drew
out more legions than he usually did, and sent forward his cavalry as
usual, to protect the foragers. With these he intermixed a guard of
light infantry, and himself advanced with the legions as fast as he
could.

XVIII.--The Gauls, placed in ambush, had chosen for the seat of action a
level piece of bound, not more than a mile in extent, enclosed on every
side by a thick wood or a very deep river, as by a toil, and this they
surrounded. Our men, apprised of the enemy's design, marched in good
order to the ground, ready both in heart and hand to give battle, and
willing to hazard any engagement when the legions were at their back. On
their approach, as Correus supposed that he had got an opportunity of
effecting his purpose, he at first shows himself with a small party and
attacks the foremost troops. Our men resolutely stood the charge, and
did not crowd together in one place, as commonly happens from surprise
in engagements between the horse, whose numbers prove injurious to
themselves.

XIX.--When by the judicious arrangement of our forces only a few of our
men fought by turns, and did not suffer themselves to be surrounded, the
rest of the enemy broke out from the woods whilst Correus was engaged.
The battle was maintained in different parts with great vigour, and
continued for a long time undecided, till at length a body of foot
gradually advanced from the woods in order of battle and forced our
horse to give ground: the light infantry, which were sent before the
legions to the assistance of the cavalry, soon came up, and, mixing with
the horse, fought with great courage. The battle was for some time
doubtful, but, as usually happens, our men, who stood the enemy's first
charge, became superior from this very circumstance that, though
suddenly attacked from an ambuscade, they had sustained no loss. In the
meantime the legions were approaching, and several messengers arrived
with notice to our men and the enemy that the [Roman] general was near
at hand, with his forces in battle array. Upon this intelligence, our
men, confiding in the support of the cohorts, fought most resolutely,
fearing, lest if they should be slow in their operations they should let
the legions participate in the glory of the conquest. The enemy lose
courage and attempt to escape by different ways. In vain; for they were
themselves entangled in that labyrinth in which they thought to entrap
the Romans. Being defeated and put to the rout, and having lost the
greater part of their men, they fled in consternation whither-soever
chance carried them; some sought the woods, others the river, but were
vigorously pursued by our men and put to the sword. Yet, in the
meantime, Correus, unconquered by calamity, could not be prevailed on to
quit the field and take refuge in the woods, or accept our offers of
quarter, but, fighting courageously and wounding several, provoked our
men, elated with victory, to discharge their weapons against him.

XX.--After this transaction, Caesar, having come up immediately after
the battle, and imagining that the enemy, upon receiving the news of so
great a defeat, would be so depressed that they would abandon their
camp, which was not above eight miles distant from the scene of action,
though he saw his passage obstructed by the river, yet he marched his
army over and advanced. But the Bellovaci and the other states, being
informed of the loss they had sustained by a few wounded men who having
escaped by the shelter of the woods, had returned to them after the
defeat, and learning that everything had turned out unfavourable, that
Correus was slain, and the horse and most valiant of their foot cut off,
imagined that the Romans were marching against them, and calling a
council in haste by sound of trumpet, unanimously cry out to send
ambassadors and hostages to Caesar.

XXI.--This proposal having met with general approbation, Comius the
Atrebatian fled to those Germans from whom he had borrowed auxiliaries
for that war. The rest instantly send ambassadors to Caesar; and
requested that he would be contented with that punishment of his enemy,
which if he had possessed the power to inflict on them before the
engagement, when they were yet uninjured, they were persuaded from his
usual clemency and mercy, he never would have inflicted; that the power
of the Bellovaci was crushed by the cavalry action; that many thousands
of their choicest foot had fallen, that scarce a man had escaped to
bring the fatal news. That, however, the Bellovaci had derived from the
battle one advantage, of some importance, considering their loss; that
Correus, the author of the rebellion, and agitator of the people, was
slain: for that whilst he lived, the senate had never equal influence in
the state with the giddy populace.

XXII.--Caesar reminded the ambassadors who made these supplications,
that the Bellovaci had at the same season the year before, in
conjunction with other states of Gaul, undertaken a war, and that they
had persevered the most obstinately of all in their purpose, and were
not brought to a proper way of thinking by the submission of the rest;
that he knew and was aware that the guilt of a crime was easily
transferred to the dead; but that no one person could have such
influence, as to be able by the feeble support of the multitude to raise
a war and carry it on without the consent of the nobles, in opposition
to the senate, and in despite of every virtuous man; however he was
satisfied with the punishment which they had drawn upon themselves.

XXIII.--The night following the ambassadors bring back his answer to
their countrymen, and prepare the hostages. Ambassadors flock in from
the other states, which were waiting for the issue of the [war with the]
Bellovaci: they give hostages, and receive his orders; all except
Comius, whose fears restrained him from entrusting his safety to any
person's honour. For the year before, while Caesar was holding the
assizes in Hither Gaul, Titus Labienus, having discovered that Comius
was tampering with the states, and raising a conspiracy against Caesar,
thought he might punish his infidelity without perfidy; but judging that
he would not come to his camp at his invitation, and unwilling to put
him on his guard by the attempt, he sent Caius Volusenus Quadratus, with
orders to have him put to death under pretence of a conference. To
effect his purpose, he sent with him some chosen centurions. When they
came to the conference, and Volusenus, as had been agreed on, had taken
hold of Comius by the hand, and one of the centurions, as if surprised
at so uncommon an incident, attempted to kill him, he was prevented by
the friends of Comius, but wounded him severely in the head by the first
blow. Swords were drawn on both sides, not so much with a design to
fight as to effect an escape, our men believing that Comius had received
a mortal stroke; and the Gauls, from the treachery which they had seen,
dreading that a deeper design lay concealed. Upon this transaction, it
was said that Comius made a resolution never to come within sight of any
Roman.

XXIV.--When Caesar, having completely conquered the most warlike
nations, perceived that there was now no state which could make
preparations for war to oppose him, but that some were removing and
fleeing from their country to avoid present subjection, he resolved to
detach his army into different parts of the country. He kept with
himself Marcus Antonius the quaestor, with the eleventh legion; Caius
Fabius was detached with twenty-five cohorts into the remotest part of
Gaul, because it was rumoured that some states had risen in arms, and he
did not think that Caius Caninius Rebilus, who had the charge of that
country, was strong enough to protect it with two legions. He ordered
Titus Labienus to attend himself, and sent the twelfth legion which had
been under him in winter quarters, to Hither Gaul, to protect the Roman
colonies, and prevent any loss by the inroads of barbarians, similar to
that which had happened the year before to the Tergestines, who were cut
off by a sudden depredation and attack. He himself marched to depopulate
the country of Ambiorix, whom he had terrified and forced to fly, but
despaired of being able to reduce under his power; but he thought it
most consistent with his honour to waste his country both of
inhabitants, cattle, and buildings, so that from the abhorrence of his
countrymen, if fortune suffered any to survive, he might be excluded
from a return to his state for the calamities which he had brought on
it.

XXV.--After he had sent either his legions or auxiliaries through every
part of Ambiorix's dominions, and wasted the whole country by sword,
fire, and rapine, and had killed or taken prodigious numbers, he sent
Labienus with two legions against the Treviri, whose state, from its
vicinity to Germany, being engaged in constant war, differed but little
from the Germans, in civilization and savage barbarity; and never
continued in its allegiance, except when awed by the presence of his
army.

XXVI.--In the meantime Caius Caninius, a lieutenant, having received
information by letters and messages from Duracius, who had always
continued in friendship to the Roman people, though a part of his state
had revolted, that a great multitude of the enemy were in arms in the
country of the Pictones, marched to the town Limonum. When he was
approaching it, he was informed by some prisoners, that Duracius was
shut up by several thousand men, under the command of Dumnacus, general
of the Andes, and that Limonum was besieged, but not daring to face the
enemy with his weak legions, he encamped in a strong position: Dumnacus,
having notice of Caninius's approach, turned his whole force against the
legions, and prepared to assault the Roman camp. But after spending
several days in the attempt, and losing a considerable number of men,
without being able to make a breach in any part of the works, he
returned again to the siege of Limonum.

XXVII.--At the same time, Caius Fabius, a lieutenant, brings back many
states to their allegiance, and confirms their submission by taking
hostages; he was then informed by letters from Caninius, of the
proceedings among the Pictones. Upon which he set off to bring
assistance to Duracius. But Dumnacus hearing of the approach of Fabius,
and despairing of safety, if at the same time he should be forced to
withstand the Roman army without, and observe, and be under apprehension
from the town's people, made a precipitate retreat from that place with
all his forces. Nor did he think that he should be sufficiently secure
from danger, unless he led his army across the Loire, which was too deep
a river to pass except by a bridge. Though Fabius had not yet come
within sight of the enemy, nor joined Caninius; yet being informed of
the nature of the country, by persons acquainted with it, he judged it
most likely that the enemy would take that way, which he found they did
take. He therefore marched to that bridge with his army, and ordered his
cavalry to advance no further before the legions, than that they could
return to the same camp at night, without fatiguing their horses. Our
horse pursued according to orders, and fell upon Dumnacus's rear, and
attacking them on their march, while fleeing, dismayed, and laden with
baggage, they slew a great number, and took a rich booty. Having
executed the affair so successfully, they retired to the camp.

XXVIII.--The night following, Fabius sent his horse before him, with
orders to engage the enemy, and delay their march till he himself should
come up. That his orders might be faithfully performed, Quintus Atius
Varus, general of the horse, a man of uncommon spirit and skill,
encouraged his men, and pursuing the enemy, disposed some of his troops
in convenient places, and with the rest gave battle to the enemy. The
enemy's cavalry made a bold stand, the foot relieving each other, and
making a general halt, to assist their horse against ours. The battle
was warmly contested. For our men, despising the enemy whom they had
conquered the day before, and knowing that the legions were following
them, animated both by the disgrace of retreating, and a desire of
concluding the battle expeditiously by their own courage, fought most
valiantly against the foot: and the enemy, imagining that no more forces
would come against them, as they had experienced the day before, thought
they had got a favourable opportunity of destroying our whole cavalry.

XXIX.-After the conflict had continued for some time with great
violence, Dumnacus drew out his army in such a manner, that the foot
should by turns assist the horse. Then the legions, marching in close
order, came suddenly in sight of the enemy. At this sight, the barbarian
horse were so astonished, and the foot so terrified, that breaking
through the line of baggage, they betook themselves to flight with a
loud shout, and in great disorder. But our horse, who a little before
had vigorously engaged them, whilst they made resistance, being elated
with joy at their victory, raising a shout on every side, poured round
them as they ran, and as long as their horses had strength to pursue, or
their arms to give a blow, so long did they continue the slaughter of
the enemy in that battle, and having killed above twelve thousand men in
arms, or such as threw away their arms through fear, they took their
whole train of baggage.

XXX.--After this defeat, when it was ascertained that Drapes, a Senonian
(who in the beginning of the revolt of Gaul, had collected from all
quarters men of desperate fortunes, invited the slaves to liberty,
called in the exiles of the whole kingdom, given an asylum to robbers,
and intercepted the Roman baggage and provisions), was marching to the
province with five thousand men, being all he could collect after the
defeat, and that Luterius a Cadurcian who, as it has been observed in a
former commentary, had designed to make an attack on the Province in the
first revolt of Gaul, had formed a junction with him, Caius Caninius
went in pursuit of them with two legions, lest great disgrace might be
incurred from the fears or injuries done to the Province by the
depredations of a band of desperate men.

XXXI.--Caius Fabius set off with the rest of the army to the Carnutes
and those other states, whose forces he was informed had served as
auxiliaries in that battle, which he fought against Dumnacus. For he had
no doubt that they would be more submissive after their recent
sufferings, but if respite and time were given them, they might be
easily excited by the earnest solicitations of the same Dumnacus. On
this occasion Fabius was extremely fortunate and expeditious in
recovering the states. For the Carnutes, who, though often harassed had
never mentioned peace, submitted and gave hostages: and the other
states, which lie in the remotest parts of Gaul, adjoining the ocean,
and which are called Armoricae, influenced by the example of the
Carnutes, as soon as Fabius arrived with his legions, without delay
comply with his command. Dumnacus, expelled from his own territories,
wandering and skulking about, was forced to seek refuge by himself in
the most remote parts of Gaul.

XXXII.--But Crapes in conjunction with Literius, knowing that Caninius
was at hand with the legions, and that they themselves could not without
certain destruction enter the boundaries of the province, whilst an army
was in pursuit of them, and being no longer at liberty to roam up and
down and pillage, halt in the country of the Cadurci, as Luterius had
once in his prosperity possessed a powerful influence over the
inhabitants, who were his countrymen, and being always the author of new
projects, had considerable authority among the barbarians; with his own
and Drapes' troops he seized Uxellodunum, a town formerly in vassalage
to him and strongly fortified by its natural situation; and prevailed on
the inhabitants to join him.

XXXIII.--After Caninius had rapidly marched to this place, and perceived
that all parts of the town were secured by very craggy rocks, which it
would be difficult for men in arms to climb even if they met with no
resistance; and, moreover, observing that the town's people were
possessed of effects, to a considerable amount, and that if they
attempted to convey them away in a clandestine manner, they could not
escape our horse, nor even our legions; he divided his forces into three
parts, and pitched three camps on very high ground, with the intention
of drawing lines round the town by degrees, as his forces could bear the
fatigue.

XXXIV.--When the townsmen perceived his design, being terrified by the
recollection of the distress at Alesia, they began to dread similar
consequences from a siege; and above all Luterius, who had experienced
that fatal event, cautioned them to make provision of corn; they
therefore resolve by general consent to leave part of their troops
behind, and set out with their light troops to bring in corn. The scheme
having met with approbation, the following night Drapes and Luterius,
leaving two thousand men in the garrison, marched out of the town with
the rest. After a few days' stay in the country of the Cadurci (some of
whom were disposed to assist them with corn, and others were unable to
prevent their taking it) they collected a great store. Sometimes also
attacks were made on our little forts by sallies at night. For this
reason Caninius deferred drawing his works round the whole town, lest he
should be unable to protect them when completed, or by disposing his
garrisons in several places, should make them too weak.

XXXV.--Drapes and Luterius, having laid in a large supply of corn,
occupy a position at about ten miles distance from the town, intending
from it to convey the corn into the town by degrees. They chose each his
respective department. Drapes stayed behind in the camp with part of the
army to protect it; Luterius conveys the train with provisions into the
town. Accordingly, having disposed guards here and there along the road,
about the tenth hour of the night, he set out by narrow paths through
the woods, to fetch the corn into the town. But their noise being heard
by the sentinels of our camp, and the scouts which we had sent out,
having brought an account of what was going on, Caninius instantly with
the ready-armed cohorts from the nearest turrets made an attack on the
convoy at the break of day. They, alarmed at so unexpected an evil, fled
by different ways to their guard: which as soon as our men perceived,
they fell with great fury on the escort, and did not allow a single man
to be taken alive. Luterius escaped thence with a few followers, but did
not return to the camp.

XXXVI.--After this success, Caninius learnt from some prisoners, that a
part of the forces was encamped with Drapes, not more than ten miles
off; which being confirmed by several, supposing that after the defeat
of one general, the rest would be terrified, and might be easily
conquered, he thought it a most fortunate event that none of the enemy
had fled back from the slaughter to the camp, to give Drapes notice of
the calamity which had befallen him. And as he could see no danger in
making the attempt, he sent forward all his cavalry and the German foot,
men of great activity, to the enemy's camp. He divides one legion among
the three camps, and takes the other without baggage along with him.
When he had advanced near the enemy, he was informed by scouts, which he
had sent before him, that the enemy's camp, as is the custom of
barbarians, was pitched low, near the banks of a river, and that the
higher grounds were unoccupied: but that the German horse had made a
sudden attack on them, and had begun the battle. Upon this intelligence,
he marched up with his legion, armed and in order of battle. Then, on a
signal being suddenly given on every side, our men took possession of
the higher grounds. Upon this, the German horse observing the Roman
colours, fought with great vigour. Immediately all the cohorts attack
them on every side; and having either killed or made prisoners of them
all, gained great booty. In that battle, Drapes himself was taken
prisoner.

XXXVII.--Caninius, having accomplished the business so successfully,
without having scarcely a man wounded, returned to besiege the town;
and, having destroyed the enemy without, for fear of whom he had been
prevented from strengthening his redoubts, and surrounding the enemy
with his lines, he orders the work to be completed on every side. The
next day, Caius Fabius came to join him with his forces, and took upon
him the siege of one side.

XXXVIII.--In the meantime, Caesar left Caius Antonius in the country of
the Bellovaci, with fifteen cohorts, that the Belgae might have no
opportunity of forming new plans in future. He himself visits the other
states, demands a great number of hostages, and by his encouraging
language allays the apprehensions of all. When he came to the Carnutes,
in whose state he has in a former commentary mentioned that the war
first broke out; observing, that from a consciousness of their guilt,
they seemed to be in the greatest terror: to relieve the state the
sooner from its fear, he demanded that Guturvatus, the promoter of that
treason, and the instigator of that rebellion, should be delivered up to
punishment. And though the latter did not dare to trust his life even to
his own countrymen, yet such diligent search was made by them all, that
he was soon brought to our camp. Caesar was forced to punish him, by the
clamours of the soldiers, contrary to his natural humanity, for they
alleged that all the dangers and losses incurred in that war, ought to
be imputed to Guturvatus. Accordingly, he was whipped to death, and his
head cut off.

XXXIX.--Here Caesar was informed by numerous letters from Caninius of
what had happened to Drapes and Luterius, and in what conduct the town's
people persisted: and though he despised the smallness of their numbers,
yet he thought their obstinacy deserving a severe punishment, lest Gaul
in general should adopt an idea that she did not want strength but
perseverance to oppose the Romans; and lest the other states, relying on
the advantage of situation, should follow their example and assert their
liberty; especially as he knew that all the Gauls understood that his
command was to continue but one summer longer, and if they could hold
out for that time, that they would have no further danger to apprehend.
He therefore left Quintus Calenus, one of his lieutenants behind him,
with two legions, and instructions to follow him by regular marches. He
hastened as much as he could with all the cavalry to Caninius.

XL.--Having arrived at Uxellodunum, contrary to the general expectation,
and perceiving that the town was surrounded by the works, and that the
enemy had no possible means of retiring from the assault, and being
likewise informed by the deserters that the townsmen had abundance of
corn; he endeavoured to prevent their getting water. A river divided the
valley below, which almost surrounded the steep craggy mountain on which
Uxellodunum was built. The nature of the ground prevented his turning
the current; for it ran so low down at the foot of the mountain, that no
drains could be sunk deep enough to draw it off in any direction. But
the descent to it was so difficult, that if we made opposition, the
besieged could neither come to the river, nor retire up the precipice
without hazard of their lives. Caesar, perceiving the difficulty,
disposed archers and slingers, and in some places, opposite to the
easiest descents, placed engines, and attempted to hinder the townsmen
from getting water at the river, which obliged them afterwards to go all
to one place to procure water.

XLI.--Close under the walls of the town, a copious spring gushed out on
that part, which for the space of nearly three hundred feet, was not
surrounded by the river. Whilst every other person wished that the
besieged could be debarred from this spring, Caesar alone saw that it
could be effected, though not without great danger. Opposite to it he
began to advance the vineae towards the mountain, and to throw up a
mound, with great labour and continual skirmishing. For the townsmen ran
down from the high ground, and fought without any risk, and wounded
several of our men, yet they obstinately pushed on and were not deterred
from moving forward the vineae, and from surmounting by their assiduity
the difficulties of situation. At the same time they work mines, and
move the crates and vineae to the source of the fountain. This was the
only work which they could do without danger or suspicion. A mound sixty
feet high was raised; on it was erected a turret of ten stories, not
with the intention that it should be on a level with the wall (for that
could not be effected by any works), but to rise above the top of the
spring. When our engines began to play from it upon the paths that led
to the fountain, and the townsmen could not go for water without danger,
not only the cattle designed for food and the working cattle, but a
great number of men also died of thirst.

XLII.--Alarmed at this calamity, the townsmen fill barrels with tallow,
pitch, and dried wood; these they set on fire, and roll down on our
works. At the same time, they fight most furiously, to deter the Romans,
by the engagement and danger, from extinguishing the flames. Instantly a
great blaze arose in the works. For whatever they threw down the
precipice, striking against the vine and agger, communicated the fire to
whatever was in the way. Our soldiers on the other hand, though they
were engaged in a perilous sort of encounter, and labouring under the
disadvantages of position, yet supported all with very great presence of
mind. For the action happened in an elevated situation, and in sight of
our army; and a great shout was raised on both sides; therefore every
man faced the weapons of the enemy and the flames in as conspicuous a
manner as he could, that his valour might be the better known and
attested.

XLIII.--Caesar, observing that several of his men were wounded, ordered
the cohorts to ascend the mountain on all sides, and, under pretence of
assailing the walls, to raise a shout: at which the besieged being
frightened, and not knowing what was going on in other places, call off
their armed troops from attacking our works, and dispose them on the
walls. Thus our men, without hazarding a battle, gained time partly to
extinguish the works which had caught fire, and partly to cut off the
communication. As the townsmen still continued to make an obstinate
resistance, and even, after losing the greatest part of their forces by
drought, persevered in their resolution: At last the veins of the spring
were cut across by our mines, and turned from their course. By this
their constant spring was suddenly dried up, which reduced them to such
despair that they imagined that it was not done by the art of man, but
the will of the gods; forced, therefore, by necessity, they at length
submitted.

XLIV.--Caesar, being convinced that his lenity was known to all men, and
being under no fears of being thought to act severely from a natural
cruelty, and perceiving that there would be no end to his troubles if
several states should attempt to rebel in like manner and in different
places, resolved to deter others by inflicting an exemplary punishment
on these. Accordingly he cut off the hands of those who had borne arms
against him. Their lives he spared, that the punishment of their
rebellion might be the more conspicuous. Drapes, who I have said was
taken by Caninius, either through indignation and grief arising from his
captivity, or through fear of severer punishments, abstained from food
for several days, and thus perished. At the same time, Luterius, who, I
have related, had escaped from the battle, having fallen into the hands
of Epasnactus, an Arvernian (for he frequently changed his quarters, and
threw himself on the honour of several persons, as he saw that he dare
not remain long in one place, and was conscious how great an enemy he
deserved to have in Caesar), was by this Epasnactus, the Arvernian, a
sincere friend of the Roman people, delivered without any hesitation, a
prisoner to Caesar.

XLV.--In the meantime, Labienus engages in a successful cavalry action
among the Treviri; and, having killed several of them and of the
Germans, who never refused their aid to any person against the Romans,
he got their chiefs alive into his power, and, amongst them, Surus, an
Aeduan, who was highly renowned both for his valour and birth, and was
the only Aeduan that had continued in arms till that time. Caesar, being
informed of this, and perceiving that he had met with good success in
all parts of Gaul, and reflecting that, in former campaigns, [Celtic]
Gaul had been conquered and subdued; but that he had never gone in
person to Aquitania, but had made a conquest of it, in some degree, by
Marcus Crassus, set out for it with two legions, designing to spend the
latter part of the summer there. This affair he executed with his usual
despatch and good fortune. For all the states of Aquitania sent
ambassadors to him and delivered hostages. These affairs being
concluded, he marched with a guard of cavalry towards Narbo, and drew
off his army into winter quarters by his lieutenants. He posted four
legions in the country of the Belgae, under Marcus Antonius, Caius
Trebonius, Publius Vatinius, and Quintus Tullius, his lieutenants. Two
he detached to the Aedui, knowing them to have a very powerful influence
throughout all Gaul. Two he placed among the Turoni, near the confines
of the Carnutes, to keep in awe the entire tract of country bordering on
the ocean; the other two he placed in the territories of the Lemovices,
at a small distance from the Arverni, that no part of Gaul might be
without an army. Having spent a few days in the province, he quickly ran
through all the business of the assizes, settled all public disputes,
and distributed rewards to the most deserving; for he had a good
opportunity of learning how every person was disposed towards the
republic during the general revolt of Gaul, which he had withstood by
the fidelity and assistance of the Province.

XLVII.--Having finished these affairs, he returned to his legions among
the Belgae and wintered at Nemetocenna: there he got intelligence that
Comius, the Atrebatian had had an engagement with his cavalry. For when
Antonius had gone into winter quarters, and the state of the Atrebates
continued in their allegiance, Comius, who, after that wound which I
before mentioned, was always ready to join his countrymen upon every
commotion, that they might not want a person to advise and head them in
the management of the war, when his state submitted to the Romans,
supported himself and his adherents on plunder by means of his cavalry,
infested the roads, and intercepted several convoys which were bringing
provisions to the Roman quarters.

XLVIII.--Caius Volusenus Quadratus was appointed commander of the horse
under Antonius, to winter with him: Antonius sent him in pursuit of the
enemy's cavalry; now Volusenus added to that valour which was pre-eminent
in him, a great aversion to Comius, on which account he executed
the more willingly the orders which he received. Having, therefore, laid
ambuscades, he had several encounters with his cavalry and came off
successful. At last, when a violent contest ensued, and Volusenus,
through eagerness to intercept Comius, had obstinately pursued him with
a small party; and Comius had, by the rapidity of his flight, drawn
Volusenus to a considerable distance from his troops, he, on a sudden,
appealed to the honour of all about him for assistance not to suffer the
wound, which he had perfidiously received, to go without vengeance; and,
wheeling his horse about, rode unguardedly before the rest up to the
commander. All his horse following his example, made a few of our men
turn their backs and pursued them. Comius, clapping spurs to his horse,
rode up to Volusenus, and, pointing his lance, pierced him in the thigh
with great force. When their commander was wounded, our men no longer
hesitated to make resistance, and, facing about, beat back the enemy.
When this occurred, several of the enemy, repulsed by the great
impetuosity of our men, were wounded, and some were trampled to death in
striving to escape, and some were made prisoners. Their general escaped
this misfortune by the swiftness of his horse. Our commander, being
severely wounded, so much so that he appeared to run the risk of losing
his life, was carried back to the camp. But Comius, having either
gratified his resentment, or, because he had lost the greatest part of
his followers, sent ambassadors to Antonius, and assured him that he
would give hostages as a security that he would go wherever Antonius
should prescribe, and would comply with his orders, and only entreated
that this concession should be made to his fears, that he should not be
obliged to go into the presence of any Roman. As Antonius judged that
his request originated in a just apprehension, he indulged him in it and
accepted his hostages.

 * * * * *

Caesar, I know, has made a separate commentary of each year's
transactions, which I have not thought it necessary for me to do,
because the following year, in which Lucius Paulus and Caius Marcellus
were consuls, produced no remarkable occurrences in Gaul. But that no
person may be left in ignorance of the place where Caesar and his army
were at that time, I have thought proper to write a few words in
addition to this commentary.

 * * * * *

XLIX.--Caesar, whilst in winter quarters in the country of the Belgae,
made it his only business to keep the states in amity with him, and to
give none either hopes of, or pretext for, a revolt. For nothing was
further from his wishes than to be under the necessity of engaging in
another war at his departure; lest, when he was drawing his army out of
the country, any war should be left unfinished, which the Gauls would
cheerfully undertake, when there was no immediate danger. Therefore, by
treating the states with respect, making rich presents to the leading
men, imposing no new burdens, and making the terms of their subjection
lighter, he easily kept Gaul (already exhausted by so many unsuccessful
battles) in obedience.

L.--When the winter quarters were broken up, he himself, contrary to his
usual practice, proceeded to Italy, by the longest possible stages, in
order to visit the free towns and colonies, that he might recommend to
them the petition of Marcus Antonius, his treasurer, for the priesthood.
For he exerted his interest both cheerfully in favour of a man strongly
attached to him, whom he had sent home before him to attend the
election, and zealously to oppose the faction and power of a few men,
who, by rejecting Marcus Antonius, wished to undermine Caesar's
influence when going out of office. Though Caesar heard on the road,
before he reached Italy, that he was created augur, yet he thought
himself in honour bound to visit the free town and colonies, to return
them thanks for rendering such service to Antonius by their presence in
such great numbers [at the election], and at the same time to recommend
to them himself, and his honour in his suit for the consulate the
ensuing year. For his adversaries arrogantly boasted that Lucius
Lentulus and Caius Marcellus had been appointed consuls, who would strip
Caesar of all honour and dignity: and that the consulate had been
injuriously taken from Sergius Galba, though he had been much superior
in votes and interest, because he was united to Caesar, both by
friendship, and by serving as lieutenant under him.

LI.--Caesar, on his arrival, was received by the principal towns and
colonies with incredible respect and affection; for this was the first
time he came since the war against united Gaul. Nothing was omitted
which could be thought of for the ornament of the gates, roads, and
every place through which Caesar was to pass. All the people with their
children went out to meet him. Sacrifices were offered up in every
quarter. The market places and temples were laid out with
entertainments, as if anticipating the joy of a most splendid triumph.
So great was the magnificence of the richer and zeal of the poorer ranks
of the people.

LII.--When Caesar had gone through all the states of Cisalpine Gaul, he
returned with the greatest haste to the army at Nemetocenna; and having
ordered all his legions to march from winter quarters to the territories
of the Treviri, he went thither and reviewed them. He made Titus
Labienus governor of Cisalpine Gaul, that he might be the more inclined
to support him in his suit for the consulate. He himself made such
journeys, as he thought would conduce to the health of his men by change
of air; and though he was frequently told that Labienus was solicited by
his enemies, and was assured that a scheme was in agitation by the
contrivance of a few, that the senate should interpose their authority
to deprive him of a part of his army; yet he neither gave credit to any
story concerning Labienus, nor could be prevailed upon to do anything in
opposition to the authority of the senate; for he thought that his cause
would be easily gained by the free voice of the senators. For Caius
Curio, one of the tribunes of the people, having undertaken to defend
Caesar's cause and dignity, had often proposed to the senate, "that if
the dread of Caesar's arms rendered any apprehensive, as Pompey's
authority and arms were no less formidable to the forum, both should
resign their command, and disband their armies. That then the city would
be free, and enjoy its due rights." And he not only proposed this, but
of himself called upon the senate to divide on the question. But the
consuls and Pompey's friends interposed to prevent it; and regulating
matters as they desired, they broke up the meeting.

LIII.--This testimony of the unanimous voice of the senate was very
great, and consistent with their former conduct; for the preceding year,
when Marcellus attacked Caesar's dignity, he proposed to the senate,
contrary to the law of Pompey and Crassus, to dispose of Caesar's
province, before the expiration of his command, and when the votes were
called for, and Marcellus, who endeavoured to advance his own dignity,
by raising envy against Caesar, wanted a division, the full senate went
over to the opposite side. The spirit of Caesar's foes was not broken by
this, but it taught them, that they ought to strengthen their interest
by enlarging their connections, so as to force the senate to comply with
whatever they resolved on.

LIV.--After this a decree was passed by the senate, that one legion
should be sent by Pompey, and another by Caesar, to the Parthian war.
But these two legions were evidently drawn from Caesar alone. For the
first legion which Pompey sent to Caesar, he gave Caesar, as if it
belonged to himself, though it was levied in Caesar's province. Caesar,
however, though no one could doubt the design of his enemies, sent the
legion back to Cneius Pompey, and in compliance with the decree of the
senate, ordered the fifteenth, belonging to himself, and which was
quartered in Cisalpine Gaul, to be delivered up. In its room he sent the
thirteenth into Italy, to protect the garrisons from which he had
drafted the fifteenth. He disposed his army in winter quarters, placed
Caius Trebonius, with four legions among the Belgae, and detached Caius
Fabius, with four more, to the Aedui; for he thought that Gaul would be
most secure if the Belgae, a people of the greatest valour, and the
Aedui, who possessed the most powerful influence, were kept in awe by
his armies.

LV.--He himself set out for Italy; where he was informed on his arrival,
that the two legions sent home by him, and which by the senate's decree,
should have been sent to the Parthian war, had been delivered over to
Pompey, by Caius Marcellus the consul, and were retained in Italy.
Although from this transaction it was evident to every one that war was
designed against Caesar, yet he resolved to submit to any thing, as long
as there were hopes left of deciding the dispute in an equitable manner,
rather than have recourse to arms.


       *       *       *       *       *


THE CIVIL WAR

BOOK I

I.--When Caesar's letter was delivered to the consuls, they were with
great difficulty, and a hard struggle of the tribunes, prevailed on to
suffer it to be read in the senate; but the tribunes could not prevail,
that any question should be put to the senate on the subject of the
letter. The consuls put the question on the regulation of the state.
Lucius Lentulus the consul promises that he will not fail the senate and
republic, "if they declared their sentiments boldly and resolutely, but
if they turned their regard to Caesar, and courted his favour, as they
did on former occasions, he would adopt a plan for himself, and not
submit to the authority of the senate: that he too had a means of
regaining Caesar's favour and friendship." Scipio spoke to the same
purport, "that it was Pompey's intention not to abandon the republic, if
the senate would support him; but if they should hesitate and act
without energy, they would in vain implore his aid, if they should
require it hereafter."

II.--This speech of Scipio's, as the senate was convened in the city,
and Pompey was near at hand, seemed to have fallen from the lips of
Pompey himself. Some delivered their sentiments with more moderation, as
Marcellus first, who in the beginning of his speech, said, "that the
question ought not to be put to the senate on this matter, till levies
were made throughout all Italy, and armies raised under whose protection
the senate might freely and safely pass such resolutions as they thought
proper": as Marcus Calidius afterwards, who was of opinion, "that Pompey
should set out for his province, that there might be no cause for arms:
that Caesar was naturally apprehensive as two legions were forced from
him, that Pompey was retaining those troops, and keeping them near the
city to do him injury": as Marcus Rufus, who followed Calidius almost
word for word. They were all harshly rebuked by Lentulus, who
peremptorily refused to propose Calidius's motion. Marcellus, overawed
by his reproofs, retracted his opinion. Thus most of the senate,
intimidated by the expressions of the consul, by the fears of a present
army, and the threats of Pompey's friends, unwillingly and reluctantly
adopted Scipio's opinion, that Caesar should disband his army by a
certain day, and should he not do so, he should be considered as acting
against the state. Marcus Antonius, and Quintus Cassius, tribunes of the
people, interposed. The question was immediately put on their
interposition. Violent opinions were expressed: whoever spoke with the
greatest acrimony and cruelty, was most highly commended by Caesar's
enemies.

III.--The senate having broken up in the evening, all who belonged to
that order were summoned by Pompey. He applauded the forward, and
secured their votes for the next day; the more moderate he reproved and
excited against Caesar. Many veterans, from all parts, who had served in
Pompey's armies, were invited to his standard by the hopes of rewards
and promotions. Several officers belonging to the two legions, which had
been delivered up by Caesar, were sent for. The city and the Comitium
were crowded with tribunes, centurions, and veterans. All the consuls'
friends, all Pompey's connections, all those who bore any ancient enmity
to Caesar, were forced into the senate house. By their concourse and
declarations the timid were awed, the irresolute confirmed, and the
greater part deprived of the power of speaking their sentiments with
freedom. Lucius Piso, the censor, offered to go to Caesar: as did
likewise Lucius Roscius, the praetor, to inform him of these affairs,
and require only six days' time to finish the business. Opinions were
expressed by some to the effect that commissioners should be sent to
Caesar to acquaint him with the senate's pleasure.

IV.--All these proposals were rejected, and opposition made to them all,
in the speeches of the consul, Scipio, and Cato. An old grudge against
Caesar and chagrin at a defeat actuated Cato. Lentulus was wrought upon
by the magnitude of his debts, and the hopes of having the government of
an army and provinces, and by the presents which he expected from such
princes as should receive the title of friends of the Roman people, and
boasted amongst his friends, that he would be a second Sylla, to whom
the supreme authority should return. Similar hopes of a province and
armies, which he expected to share with Pompey on account of his
connection with him, urged on Scipio; and moreover, [he was influenced
by] the fear of being called to trial, and the adulation and an
ostentatious display of himself and his friends in power, who at that
time had great influence in the republic, and courts of judicature.
Pompey himself, incited by Caesar's enemies, because he was unwilling
that any person should bear an equal degree of dignity, had wholly
alienated himself from Caesar's friendship, and procured a
reconciliation with their common enemies; the greatest part of whom he
had himself brought upon Caesar during his affinity with him. At the
same time, chagrined at the disgrace which he had incurred by converting
the two legions from their expedition through Asia and Syria, to
[augment] his own power and authority, he was anxious to bring matters
to a war.

V.--For these reasons everything was done in a hasty and disorderly
manner, and neither was time given to Caesar's relations to inform him
[of the state of affairs] nor liberty to the tribunes of the people to
deprecate their own danger, nor even to retain the last privilege, which
Sylla had left them, the interposing their authority; but on the seventh
day they were obliged to think of their own safety, which the most
turbulent tribunes of the people were not accustomed to attend to, nor
to fear being called to an account for their actions, till the eighth
month. Recourse is had to that extreme and final decree of the senate
(which was never resorted to even by daring proposers except when the
city was in danger of being set on fire, or when the public safety was
despaired of). "That the consuls, praetors, tribunes of the people, and
proconsuls in the city should take care that the state received no
injury." These decrees are dated the eighth day before the ides of
January; therefore, in the first five days, on which the senate could
meet, from the day on which Lentulus entered into his consulate, the two
days of election excepted, the severest and most virulent decrees were
passed against Caesar's government, and against those most illustrious
characters, the tribunes of the people. The latter immediately made
their escape from the city, and withdrew to Caesar, who was then at
Ravenna, awaiting an answer to his moderate demands; [to see] if matters
could be brought to a peaceful termination by any equitable act on the
part of the enemies.

VI.--During the succeeding days the senate is convened outside the city.
Pompey repeated the same things which he had declared through Scipio. He
applauded the courage and firmness of the senate, acquainted them with
his force, and told them that he had ten legions ready; that he was
moreover informed and assured that Caesar's soldiers were disaffected,
and that he could not persuade them to defend or even follow him.
Motions were made in the senate concerning other matters; that levies
should be made through all Italy; that Faustus Sylla should be sent as
propraetor into Mauritania; that money should be granted to Pompey from
the public treasury. It was also put to the vote that king Juba should
be [honoured with the title of] friend and ally. But Marcellus said that
he would not allow this motion for the present. Philip, one of the
tribunes, stopped [the appointment of] Sylla; the resolutions respecting
the other matters passed. The provinces, two of which were consular, the
remainder praetorian, were decreed to private persons; Scipio got Syria,
Lucius Domitius Gaul: Philip and Marcellus were omitted, from a private
motive, and their lots were not even admitted. To the other provinces
praetors were sent, nor was time granted as in former years, to refer to
the people on their appointment, nor to make them take the usual oath,
and march out of the city in a public manner, robed in the military
habit, after offering their vows; a circumstance which had never before
happened. Both the consuls leave the city, and private men had lictors
in the city and capital, contrary to all precedents of former times.
Levies were made throughout Italy, arms demanded, and money exacted from
the municipal towns, and violently taken from the temples. All
distinctions between things human and divine are confounded.

VII.--These things being made known to Caesar, he harangued his
soldiers; he reminded them "of the wrongs done to him at all times by
his enemies, and complained that Pompey had been alienated from him and
led astray by them through envy and a malicious opposition to his glory,
though he had always favoured and promoted Pompey's honour and dignity.
He complained that an innovation had been introduced into the republic,
that the intercession of the tribunes, which had been restored a few
years before by Sylla, was branded as a crime, and suppressed by force
of arms; that Sylla, who had stripped the tribunes of every other power,
had, nevertheless, left the privilege of intercession unrestrained; that
Pompey, who pretended to restore what they had lost, had taken away the
privileges which they formerly had; that whenever the senate decreed,
"that the magistrates should take care that the republic sustained no
injury" (by which words and decree the Roman people were obliged to
repair to arms), it was only when pernicious laws were proposed; when
the tribunes attempted violent measures; when the people seceded, and
possessed themselves of the temples and eminences of the city; (and
these instances of former times, he showed them were expiated by the
fate of Saturninus and the Gracchi): that nothing of this kind was
attempted now, nor even thought of: that no law was promulgated, no
intrigue with the people going forward, no secession made; he exhorted
them to defend from the malice of his enemies, the reputation and honour
of that general, under whose command they had for nine years most
successfully supported the state; fought many successful battles, and
subdued all Gaul and Germany." The soldiers of the thirteenth legion,
which was present (for in the beginning of the disturbances he had
called it out, his other legions not having yet arrived), all cry out
that they are ready to defend their general, and the tribunes of the
commons, from all injuries.

VIII.--Having made himself acquainted with the disposition of his
soldiers, Caesar set off with that legion to Ariminum, and there met the
tribunes, who had fled to him for protection; he called his other
legions from winter quarters, and ordered them to follow him. Thither
came Lucius Caesar, a young man, whose father was a lieutenant general
under Caesar. He, after concluding the rest of his speech, and stating
for what purpose he had come, told Caesar that he had commands of a
private nature for him from Pompey; that Pompey wished to clear himself
to Caesar, lest he should impute those actions which he did for the
republic, to a design of affronting him; that he had ever preferred the
interest of the state to his own private connections; that Caesar, too,
for his own honour, ought to sacrifice his desires and resentment to the
public good, and not vent his anger so violently against his enemies,
lest in his hopes of injuring them, he should injure the republic. He
spoke a few words to the same purport from himself, in addition to
Pompey's apology. Roscius, the praetor, conferred with Caesar almost in
the same words, and on the same subject, and declared that Pompey had
empowered him to do so.

IX.--Though these things seemed to have no tendency towards redressing
his injuries, yet having got proper persons by whom he could communicate
his wishes to Pompey; he required of them both, that as they had
conveyed Pompey's demands to him, they should not refuse to convey his
demands to Pompey; if by so little trouble they could terminate a great
dispute, and liberate all Italy from her fears.

"That the honour of the republic had ever been his first object, and
dearer to him than life; that he was chagrined, that the favour of the
Roman people was wrested from him by the injurious reports of his
enemies; that he was deprived of a half-year's command, and dragged back
to the city, though the people had ordered that regard should be paid to
his suit for the consulate at the next election, though he was not
present; that, however, he had patiently submitted to this loss of
honour for the sake of the republic; that when he wrote letters to the
senate, requiring that all persons should resign the command of their
armies, he did not obtain even that request; that levies were made
throughout Italy; that the two legions which had been taken from him,
under the pretence of the Parthian war, were kept at home, and that the
state was in arms. To what did all these things tend, unless to his
ruin? But, nevertheless, he was ready to condescend to any terms, and to
endure everything for the sake of the republic. Let Pompey go to his own
province; let them both disband their armies; let all persons in Italy
lay down their arms; let all fears be removed from the city; let free
elections, and the whole republic be resigned to the direction of the
senate and Roman people. That these things might be the more easily
performed, and conditions secured and confirmed by oath, either let
Pompey come to Caesar, or allow Caesar to go to him; it might be that
all their disputes would be settled by an interview."

X.--Roscius and Lucius Caesar, having received this message, went to
Capua, where they met the consuls and Pompey, and declared to them
Caesar's terms. Having deliberated on the matter, they replied, and sent
written proposals to him by the same persons, the purport of which was,
that Caesar should return into Gaul, leave Ariminum, and disband his
army: if he complied with this, that Pompey would go to Spain. In the
meantime, until security was given that Caesar would perform his
promises, that the consuls and Pompey would not give over their levies.

XI.--It was not an equitable proposal, to require that Caesar should
quit Ariminum and return to his province; but that he [Pompey] should
himself retain his province and the legions that belonged to another,
and desire that Caesar's army should be disbanded, whilst he himself was
making new levies: and that he should merely promise to go to his
province, without naming the day on which he would set out; so that if
he should not set out till after Caesar's consulate expired, yet he
would not appear bound by any religious scruples about asserting a
falsehood. But his not granting time for a conference, nor promising to
set out to meet him, made the expectation of peace appear very hopeless.
Caesar, therefore, sent Marcus Antonius, with five cohorts from Ariminum
to Arretium; he himself stayed at Ariminum with two legions, with the
intention of raising levies there. He secured Pisaurus, Fanum, and
Ancona, with a cohort each.

XII.--In the meantime, being informed that Thermus the praetor was in
possession of Iguvium, with five cohorts, and was fortifying the town,
but that the affections of all the inhabitants were very well inclined
towards himself; he detached Curio with three cohorts, which he had at
Ariminum and Pisaurus. Upon notice of his approach, Thermus, distrusting
the affections of the townsmen, drew his cohorts out of it, and made his
escape; his soldiers deserted him on the road, and returned home. Curio
recovered Iguvium, with the cheerful concurrence of all the inhabitants.
Caesar, having received an account of this, and relying on the
affections of the municipal towns, drafted all the cohorts of the
thirteenth legion from the garrisons, and set out for Auximum, a town
into which Attius had brought his cohorts, and of which he had taken
possession, and from which he had sent senators round about the country
of Picenum, to raise new levies.

XIII.--Upon news of Caesar's approach, the senate of Auximum went in a
body to Attius Varus; and told him that it was not a subject for them to
determine upon: yet neither they, nor the rest of the freemen would
suffer Caius Caesar, a general, who had merited so well of the republic,
after performing such great achievements, to be excluded from their town
and walls; wherefore he ought to pay some regard to the opinion of
posterity, and his own danger. Alarmed at this declaration, Attius Varus
drew out of the town the garrison which he had introduced, and fled. A
few of Caesar's front rank having pursued him, obliged him to halt, and
when the battle began, Varus is deserted by his troops: some of them
disperse to their homes, the rest come over to Caesar; and along with
them, Lucius Pupius, the chief centurion, is taken prisoner and brought
to Caesar. He had held the same rank before in Cneius Pompey's army. But
Caesar applauded the soldiers of Attius, set Pupius at liberty, returned
thanks to the people of Auximum, and promised to be grateful for their
conduct.

XIV.--Intelligence of this being brought to Rome, so great a panic
spread on a sudden that when Lentulus, the consul, came to open the
treasury, to deliver money to Pompey by the senate's decree, immediately
on opening the hallowed door he fled from the city. For it was falsely
rumoured that Caesar was approaching, and that his cavalry were already
at the gates. Marcellus, his colleague, followed him, and so did most of
the magistrates. Cneius Pompey had left the city the day before, and was
on his march to those legions which he had received from Caesar, and had
disposed in winter quarters in Apulia. The levies were stopped within
the city. No place on this side of Capua was thought secure. At Capua
they first began to take courage and to rally, and determined to raise
levies in the colonies, which had been sent thither by the Julian law:
and Lentulus brought into the public market-place the gladiators which
Caesar maintained there for the entertainment of the people, and
confirmed them in their liberty, and gave them horses and ordered them
to attend him; but afterwards, being warned by his friends that this
action was censured by the judgment of all, he distributed them among
the slaves of the districts of Campania, to keep guard there.

XV.--Caesar, having moved forward from Auximum, traversed the whole
country of Picenum. All the governors in these countries most cheerfully
received him, and aided his army with every necessary. Ambassadors came
to him even from Cingulum, a town which Labienus had laid out and built
at his own expense, and offered most earnestly to comply with his
orders. He demanded soldiers: they sent them. In the meantime, the
twelfth legion came to join Caesar; with these two he marched to
Asculum, the chief town of Picenum. Lentulus Spinther occupied that town
with ten cohorts; but, on being informed of Caesar's approach, he fled
from the town, and, in attempting to bring off his cohorts with him, was
deserted by a great part of his men. Being left on the road with a small
number, he fell in with Vibullius Rufus, who was sent by Pompey into
Picenum to confirm the people [in their allegiance]. Vibullius, being
informed by him of the transactions in Picenum, takes his soldiers from
him and dismisses him. He collects, likewise, from the neighbouring
countries, as many cohorts as he can from Pompey's new levies. Amongst
them he meets with Ulcilles Hirrus fleeing from Camerinum, with six
cohorts, which he had in the garrison there; by a junction with which he
made up thirteen cohorts. With them he marched by hasty journeys to
Corfinium, to Domitius Aenobarbus, and informed him that Caesar was
advancing with two legions. Domitius had collected about twenty cohorts
from Alba, and the Marsians, Pelignians, and neighbouring states.

XVI.--Caesar, having recovered Asculum and driven out Lentulus, ordered
the soldiers that had deserted from him to be sought out and a muster to
be made; and, having delayed for one day there to provide corn, he
marched to Corfinium. On his approach, five cohorts, sent by Domitius
from the town, were breaking down a bridge which was over the river, at
three miles' distance from it. An engagement taking place there with
Caesar's advanced-guard, Domitius's men were quickly beaten off from the
bridge and retreated precipitately into the town. Caesar, having marched
his legions over, halted before the town and encamped close by the
walls.

XVII.--Domitius, upon observing this, sent messengers well acquainted
with the country, encouraged by a promise of being amply rewarded, with
despatches to Pompey to Apulia, to beg and entreat him to come to his
assistance. That Caesar could be easily enclosed by the two armies,
through the narrowness of the country, and prevented from obtaining
supplies: unless he did so, that he and upwards of thirty cohorts, and a
great number of senators and Roman knights, would be in extreme danger.
In the meantime he encouraged his troops, disposed engines on the walls,
and assigned to each man a particular part of the city to defend. In a
speech to the soldiers he promised them lands out of his own estate; to
every private soldier four acres, and a corresponding share to the
centurions and veterans.

XVIII.--In the meantime, word was brought to Caesar that the people of
Sulmo, a town about seven miles distant from Corfinium, were ready to
obey his orders, but were prevented by Quintus Lucretius, a senator, and
Attius, a Pelignian, who were in possession of the town with a garrison
of seven cohorts. He sent Marcus Antonius thither, with five cohorts of
the eighth legion. The inhabitants, as soon as they saw our standards,
threw open their gates, and all the people, both citizens and soldiers,
went out to meet and welcome Antonius. Lucretius and Attius leaped off
the walls. Attius, being brought before Antonius, begged that he might
be sent to Caesar. Antonius returned the same day on which he had set
out with the cohorts and Attius. Caesar added these cohorts to his own
army, and sent Attius away in safety. The three first days Caesar
employed in fortifying his camp with strong works, in bringing in corn
from the neighbouring free towns, and waiting for the rest of his
forces. Within the three days the eighth legion came to him, and
twenty-two cohorts of the new levies in Gaul, and about three hundred
horse from the king of Noricum. On their arrival he made a second camp
on another part of the town, and gave the command of it to Curio. He
determined to surround the town with a rampart and turrets during the
remainder of the time. Nearly at the time when the greatest part of the
work was completed, all the messengers sent to Pompey returned.

XIX.--Having read Pompey's letter, Domitius, concealing the truth, gave
out in council that Pompey would speedily come to their assistance; and
encouraged them not to despond, but to provide everything necessary for
the defence of the town. He held private conferences with a few of his
most intimate friends, and determined on the design of fleeing. As
Domitius's countenance did not agree with his words, and he did
everything with more confusion and fear than he had shown on the
preceding days, and as he had several private meetings with his friends,
contrary to his usual practice, in order to take their advice, and as he
avoided all public councils and assemblies of the people, the truth
could be no longer hid nor dissembled; for Pompey had written back in
answer, "That he would not put matters to the last hazard; that Domitius
had retreated into the town of Corfinium, without either his advice or
consent. Therefore, if any opportunity should offer, he [Domitius]
should come to him with the whole force." But the blockade and works
round the town prevented his escape.

XX.--Domitius's design being noised abroad, the soldiers in Confinium
[**error in original: should be CORFINIUM] early in the evening began to
mutiny, and held a conference with each other by their tribunes and
centurions, and the most respectable amongst themselves: "that they were
besieged by Caesar; that his works and fortifications were almost
finished; that their general, Domitius, on whose hopes and expectations
they had confided, had thrown them off, and was meditating his own
escape; that they ought to provide for their own safety." At first the
Marsians differed in opinion, and possessed themselves of that part of
the town which they thought the strongest. And so violent a dispute
arose between them, that they attempted to fight and decide it by arms.
However, in a little time, by messengers sent from one side to the
other, they were informed of Domitius's meditated flight, of which they
were previously ignorant. Therefore they all with one consent brought
Domitius into public view, gathered round him, and guarded him; and sent
deputies out of their number to Caesar, to say that they were ready to
throw open their gates, to do whatever he should order, and to deliver
up Domitius alive into his hands.

XXI.--Upon intelligence of these matters, though Caesar thought it of
great consequence to become master of the town as soon as possible, and
to transfer the cohorts to his own camp, lest any change should be
wrought on their inclinations by bribes, encouragement, or fictitious
messages, because in war great events are often brought about by
trifling circumstances; yet, dreading lest the town should be plundered
by the soldiers entering into it, and taking advantage of the darkness
of the night, he commended the persons who came to him, and sent them
back to the town, and ordered the gates and walls to be secured. He
disposed his soldiers on the works, which he had begun, not at certain
intervals, as was his practice before, but in one continued range of
sentinels and stations, so that they touched each other, and formed a
circle round the whole fortification; he ordered the tribunes and
general officers to ride round; and exhorted them not only to be on
their guard against sallies from the town, but also to watch that no
single person should get out privately. Nor was any man so negligent or
drowsy as to sleep that night. To so great height was their expectation
raised, that they were carried away, heart and soul, each to different
objects, what would become of the Corfinians, what of Domitius, what of
Lentulus, what of the rest; what event would be the consequence of
another.

XXII.--About the fourth watch, Lentulus Spinther said to our sentinels
and guards from the walls, that he desired to have an interview with
Caesar, if permission were given him. Having obtained it, he was
escorted out of town; nor did the soldiers of Domitius leave him till
they brought him into Caesar's presence. He pleaded with Caesar for his
life, and entreated him to spare him, and reminded him of their former
friendship; and acknowledged that Caesar's favours to him were very
great; in that through his interest he had been admitted into the
college of priests; in that after his praetorship he had been appointed
to the government of Spain; in that he had been assisted by him in his
suit for the consulate. Caesar interrupted him in his speech, and told
him, "that he had not left his province to do mischief [to any man], but
to protect himself from the injuries of his enemies; to restore to their
dignity the tribunes of the people who had been driven out of the city
on his account, and to assert his own liberty, and that of the Roman
people, who were oppressed by a few factious men." Encouraged by this
address, Lentulus begged leave to return to the town, that the security
which he had obtained for himself might be an encouragement to the rest
to hope for theirs; saying that some were so terrified that they were
induced to make desperate attempts on their own lives. Leave being
granted him, he departed.

XXIII.--When day appeared Caesar ordered all the senators and their
children, the tribunes of the soldiers, and the Roman knights, to be
brought before him. Among the persons of senatorial rank were Lucius
Domitius, Publius Lentulus Spinther, Lucius Vibullius Rufus, Sextus
Quintilius Varus, the quaestor, and Lucius Rubrius, besides the son of
Domitius, and several other young men, and a great number of Roman
knights and burgesses, whom Domitius had summoned from the municipal
towns. When they were brought before him he protected them from the
insolence and taunts of the soldiers; told them in few words that they
had not made him a grateful return, on their part, for his very
extraordinary kindness to them, and dismissed them all in safety. Sixty
sestertia, which Domitius had brought with him and lodged in the public
treasury, being brought to Caesar by the magistrates of Corfinium, he
gave them back to Domitius, that he might not appear more moderate with
respect to the life of men than in money matters, though he knew that it
was public money, and had been given by Pompey to pay his army. He
ordered Domitius's soldiers to take the oath to himself, and that day
decamped and performed the regular march. He stayed only seven days
before Corfinium, and marched into Apulia through the country of the
Marrucinians, Frentanians, and Larinates.

XXIV.--Pompey, being informed of what had passed at Corfinium, marches
from Luceria to Canusium, and thence to Brundusium. He orders all the
forces raised everywhere by the new levies to repair to him. He gives
arms to the slaves that attended the flocks, and appoints horses for
them. Of these he made up about three hundred horse. Lucius, the
praetor, fled from Alba, with six cohorts: Rutilus Lupus, the praetor,
from Tarracina, with three. These having descried Caesar's cavalry at a
distance, which were commanded by Bivius Curius, and having deserted the
praetor, carried their colours to Curius and went over to him. In like
manner during the rest of his march, several cohorts fell in with the
main body of Caesar's army, others with his horse. Cneius Magius, from
Cremona, engineer-general to Pompey, was taken prisoner on the road and
brought to Caesar, but sent back by him to Pompey with this message: "As
hitherto he had not been allowed an interview, and was now on his march
to him at Brundusium, that it deeply concerned the commonwealth and
general safety that he should have an interview with Pompey; and that
the same advantage could not be gained at a great distance when the
proposals were conveyed to them by others, as if terms were argued by
them both in person."

XXV.--Having delivered this message he marched to Brundusium with six
legions, four of them veterans: the rest those which he had raised in
the late levy and completed on his march, for he had sent all Domitius's
cohorts immediately from Corfinium to Sicily. He discovered that the
consuls were gone to Dyrrachium with a considerable part of the army,
and that Pompey remained at Brundusium with twenty cohorts; but could
not find out, for a certainty, whether Pompey stayed behind to keep
possession of Brundusium, that he might the more easily command the
whole Adriatic sea, with the extremities of Italy and the coast of
Greece, and be able to conduct the war on either side of it, or whether
he remained there for want of shipping; and, being afraid that Pompey
would come to the conclusion that he ought not to relinquish Italy, he
determined to deprive him of the means of communication afforded by the
harbour of Brundusium. The plan of his work was as follows:--Where the
mouth of the port was narrowest he threw up a mole of earth on either
side, because in these places the sea was shallow. Having gone out so
far that the mole could not be continued in the deep water, he fixed
double floats, thirty feet on either side, before the mole. These he
fastened with four anchors at the four corners, that they might not be
carried away by the waves. Having completed and secured them, he then
joined to them other floats of equal size. These he covered over with
earth and mould, that he might not be prevented from access to them to
defend them, and in the front and on both sides he protected them with a
parapet of wicker work; and on every fourth one raised a turret, two
stories high, to secure them the better from being attacked by the
shipping and set on fire.

XXVI.--To counteract this, Pompey fitted out large merchant ships, which
he found in the harbour of Brundusium: on them he erected turrets three
stories high, and, having furnished them with several engines and all
sorts of weapons, drove them amongst Caesar's works, to break through
the floats and interrupt the works; thus there happened skirmishes every
day at a distance with slings, arrows, and other weapons. Caesar
conducted matters as if he thought that the hopes of peace were not yet
to be given up. And though he was very much surprised that Magius, whom
he had sent to Pompey with a message, was not sent back to him; and
though his attempting a reconciliation often retarded the vigorous
prosecution of his plans, yet he thought that he ought by all means to
persevere in the same line of conduct. He therefore sent Caninius
Rebilus to have an interview with Scribonius Libo, his intimate friend
and relation. He charges him to exhort Libo to effect a peace, but,
above all things, requires that he should be admitted to an interview
with Pompey. He declared that he had great hopes, if that were allowed
him, that the consequence would be that both parties would lay down
their arms on equal terms; that a great share of the glory and
reputation of that event would redound to Libo, if, through his advice
and agency, hostilities should be ended. Libo, having parted from the
conference with Caninius, went to Pompey, and, shortly after, returns
with answer that, as the consuls were absent, no treaty of compositions
could be engaged in without them. Caesar therefore thought it time at
length to give over the attempt which he had often made in vain, and act
with energy in the war.

XXVII.--When Caesar's works were nearly half finished, and after nine
days were spent in them, the ships which had conveyed the first division
of the army to Dyrrachium being sent back by the consuls, returned to
Brundusium. Pompey, either frightened at Caesar's works or determined
from the beginning to quit Italy, began to prepare for his departure on
the arrival of the ships; and the more effectually to retard Caesar's
attack, lest his soldiers should force their way into the town at the
moment of his departure, he stopped up the gates, built walls across the
streets and avenues, sunk trenches across the ways, and in them fixed
palisadoes and sharp stakes, which he made level with the ground by
means of hurdles and clay. But he barricaded with large beams fastened
in the ground and sharpened at the ends two passages and roads without
the walls, which led to the port. After making these arrangements, he
ordered his soldiers to go on board without noise, and disposed here and
there, on the wall and turrets, some light-armed veterans, archers and
slingers. These he designed to call off by a certain signal, when all
the soldiers were embarked, and left row-galleys for them in a secure
place.

XXVIII.--The people of Brundusium, irritated by the insolence of
Pompey's soldiers, and the insults received from Pompey himself, were in
favour of Caesar's party. Therefore, as soon as they were aware of
Pompey's departure, whilst his men were running up and down, and busied
about their voyage, they made signs from the tops of the houses: Caesar,
being apprized of the design by them, ordered scaling ladders to be got
ready, and his men to take arms, that he might not lose any opportunity
of coming to an action. Pompey weighed anchor at nightfall. The soldiers
who had been posted on the wall to guard it, were called off by the
signal which had been agreed on, and knowing the roads, ran down to the
ships. Caesar's soldiers fixed their ladders and scaled the walls: but
being cautioned by the people to beware of the hidden stakes and covered
trenches, they halted, and being conducted by the inhabitants by a long
circuit, they reached the port, and captured with their long boats and
small craft two of Pompey's ships, full of soldiers, which had struck
against Caesar's moles.

XXIX.-Though Caesar highly approved of collecting a fleet, and crossing
the sea, and pursuing Pompey before he could strengthen himself with his
transmarine auxiliaries, with the hope of bringing the war to a
conclusion, yet he dreaded the delay and length of time necessary to
effect it: because Pompey, by collecting all his ships, had deprived him
of the means of pursuing him at present. The only resource left to
Caesar, was to wait for a fleet from the distant regions of Gaul,
Picenum, and the straits of Gibraltar. But this, on account of the
season of the year, appeared tedious and troublesome. He was unwilling
that, in the meantime, the veteran army, and the two Spains, one of
which was bound to Pompey by the strongest obligations, should be
confirmed in his interest; that auxiliaries and cavalry should be
provided and Gaul and Italy reduced in his absence.

XXX.--Therefore, for the present, he relinquished all intention of
pursuing Pompey, and resolved to march to Spain, and commanded the
magistrates of the free towns to procure him ships, and to have them
conveyed to Brundusium. He detached Valerius, his lieutenant, with one
legion to Sardinia; Curio, the proprietor, to Sicily with three legions;
and ordered him, when he had recovered Sicily, to immediately transport
his army to Africa. Marcus Cotta was at this time governor of Sardinia:
Marcus Cato, of Sicily: and Tubero, by the lots, should have had the
government of Africa. The Caralitani, as soon as they heard that
Valerius was sent against them, even before he left Italy, of their own
accord drove Cotta out of the town; who, terrified because he understood
that the whole province was combined [against him], fled from Sardinia
to Africa. Cato was in Sicily, repairing the old ships of war, and
demanding new ones from the states, and these things he performed with
great zeal. He was raising levies of Roman citizens, among the Lucani
and Brutii, by his lieutenants, and exacting a certain quota of horse
and foot from the states of Sicily. When these things were nearly
completed, being informed of Curio's approach, he made a complaint that
he was abandoned and betrayed by Pompey, who had undertaken an
unnecessary war, without making any preparation, and when questioned by
him and other members in the senate, had assured them that every thing
was ready and provided for the war. After having made these complaints
in a public assembly, he fled from his province.

XXXI.--Valerius found Sardinia, and Curio, Sicily, deserted by their
governors when they arrived there with their armies. When Tubero arrived
in Africa, he found Attius Varus in the government of the province, who,
having lost his cohorts, as already related, at Auximum, had straightway
fled to Africa, and finding it without a governor, had seized it of his
own accord, and making levies, had raised two legions. From his
acquaintance with the people and country, and his knowledge of that
province, he found the means of effecting this; because a few years
before, at the expiration of his praetorship, he had obtained that
province. He, when Tubero came to Utica with his fleet, prevented his
entering the port or town, and did not suffer his son, though labouring
under sickness, to set foot on shore; but obliged him to weigh anchor
and quit the place.

XXXIL.--When these affairs were despatched, Caesar, that there might be
an intermission from labour for the rest of the season, drew off his
soldiers to the nearest municipal towns, and set off in person for Rome.
Having assembled the senate, he reminded them of the injustice of his
enemies; and told them, "That he aimed at no extraordinary honour, but
had waited for the time appointed by law, for standing candidate for the
consulate, being contented with what was allowed to every citizen. That
a bill had been carried by the ten tribunes of the people
(notwithstanding the resistance of his enemies, and a very violent
opposition from Cato, who in his usual manner, consumed the day by a
tedious harangue) that he should be allowed to stand candidate, though
absent, even in the consulship of Pompey; and if the latter disapproved
of the bill, why did he allow it to pass? if he approved of it, why
should he debar him [Caesar] from the people's favour? He made mention
of his own patience, in that he had freely proposed that all armies
should be disbanded, by which he himself would suffer the loss both of
dignity and honour. He urged the virulence of his enemies, who refused
to comply with what they required from others, and had rather that all
things should be thrown into confusion, than that they should lose their
power and their armies. He expatiated on their injustice, in taking away
his legions: their cruelty and insolence in abridging the privileges of
the tribunes; the proposals he had made, and his entreaties of an
interview, which had been refused him: For which reasons, he begged and
desired that they would undertake the management of the republic, and
unite with him in the administration of it. But if through fear they
declined it, he would not be a burden to them, but take the management
of it on himself. That deputies ought to be sent to Pompey, to propose a
reconciliation; as he did not regard what Pompey had lately asserted in
the senate, that authority was acknowledged to be vested in those
persons to whom ambassadors were sent, and fear implied in those that
sent them. That these were the sentiments of low, weak minds: that for
his part, as he had made it his study to surpass others in glory, so he
was desirous of excelling them in justice and equity."

XXXIII.--The senate approved of sending deputies, but none could be
found fit to execute the commission: for every person, from his own
private fears, declined the office. For Pompey, on leaving the city, had
declared in the open senate, that he would hold in the same degree of
estimation, those who stayed in Rome and those in Caesar's camp. Thus
three days were wasted in disputes and excuses. Besides, Lucius
Metellus, one of the tribunes, was suborned by Caesar's enemies, to
prevent this, and to embarrass everything else which Caesar should
propose. Caesar having discovered his intention, after spending several
days to no purpose, left the city, in order that he might not lose any
more time, and went to Transalpine Gaul, without effecting what he had
intended.

XXXIV.--On his arrival there, he was informed that, Vibullius Rufus,
whom he had taken a few days before at Corfinium, and set at liberty,
was sent by Pompey into Spain; and that Domitius also was gone to seize
Massilia with seven row-galleys, which were fitted up by some private
persons at Igilium and Cosa, and which he had manned with his own
slaves, freedmen, and colonists: and that some young noblemen of
Massilia had been sent before him; whom Pompey, when leaving Rome had
exhorted, that the late services of Caesar should not erase from their
minds the memory of his former favours. On receiving this message, the
Massilians had shut their gates against Caesar, and invited over to them
the Albici, who had formerly been in alliance with them, and who
inhabited the mountains that overhung Massilia: they had likewise
conveyed the corn from the surrounding country, and from all the forts
into the city; had opened armouries in the city: and were repairing the
walls, the fleet, and the gates.

XXXV.--Caesar sent for fifteen of the principal persons of Massilia to
attend him. To prevent the war commencing among them, he remonstrates
[in the following language]; "that they ought to follow the precedent
set by all Italy, rather than submit to the will of any one man." He
made use of such arguments as he thought would tend to bring them to
reason. The deputies reported his speech to their countrymen, and by the
authority of the state bring him back this answer: "That they understood
that the Roman people was divided into two factions: that they had
neither judgment nor abilities to decide which had the juster cause; but
that the heads of these factions were Cneius Pompey and Caius Caesar,
the two patrons of the state: the former of whom had granted to their
state the lands of the Volcae Arecomici, and Helvii; the latter had
assigned them a part of his conquests in Gaul, and had augmented their
revenue. Wherefore, having received equal favours from both, they ought
to show equal affection to both, and assist neither against the other,
nor admit either into their city or harbours."

XXXVI.--Whilst this treaty was going forward, Domitius arrived at
Massilia with his fleet, and was received into the city, and made
governor of it. The chief management of the war was entrusted to him. At
his command they send the fleet to all parts; they seize all the
merchantmen they could meet with, and carry them into the harbour; they
apply the nails, timber, and rigging, with which they were furnished to
rig and refit their other vessels. They lay up in the public stores, all
the corn that was found in the ships, and reserve the rest of their
lading and convoy for the siege of the town, should such an event take
place. Provoked at such ill treatment, Caesar led three legions against
Massilia, and resolved to provide turrets, and vinae to assault the
town, and to build twelve ships at Arelas, which being completed and
rigged in thirty days (from the time the timber was cut down), and being
brought to Massilia, he put under the command of Decimus Brutus; and
left Caius Trebonius his lieutenant, to invest the city.

XXXVII.--Whilst he was preparing and getting these things in readiness,
he sent Caius Fabius one of his lieutenants into Spain with three
legions, which he had disposed in winter quarters in Narbo, and the
neighbouring country; and ordered him immediately to seize the passes of
the Pyrenees, which were at that time occupied by detachments from
Lucius Afranius, one of Pompey's lieutenants. He desired the other
legions, which were passing the winter at a great distance, to follow
close after him. Fabius, according to his orders, by using expedition,
dislodged the party from the hills, and by hasty marches came up with
the army of Afranius.

XXXVIII.--On the arrival of Vibullius Rufus, whom, we have already
mentioned, Pompey had sent into Spain, Afranius, Petreius, and Varro,
his lieutenants (one of whom had the command of Hither Spain, with three
legions; the second of the country from the forest of Castulo to the
river Guadiana with two legions; the third from the river Guadiana to
the country of the Vettones and Lusitania, with the like number of
legions), divided amongst themselves their respective departments.
Petreius was to march from Lusitania through the Vettones, and join
Afranius with all his forces; Varro was to guard all Further Spain with
what legions he had. These matters being settled, reinforcements of
horse and foot were demanded from Lusitania, by Petreius; from the
Celtiberi, Cantabri, and all the barbarous nations which border on the
ocean, by Afranius. When they were raised, Petreius immediately marched
through the Vettones to Afranius. They resolved by joint consent to
carry on the war in the vicinity of Ilerda, on account of the advantages
of its situation.

XXXIX.--Afranius, as above mentioned, had three legions, Petreius two.
There were besides about eighty cohorts raised in Hither and Further
Spain (of which, the troops belonging to the former province had
shields, those of the latter targets), and about five thousand horse
raised in both provinces. Caesar had sent his legions into Spain, with
about six thousand auxiliary foot, and three thousand horse, which had
served under him in all his former wars, and the same number from Gaul,
which he himself had provided, having expressly called out all the most
noble and valiant men of each state. The bravest of these were from the
Aquitani and the mountaineers, who border on the Province in Gaul. He
had been informed that Pompey was marching through Mauritania with his
legions to Spain, and would shortly arrive. He at the same time borrowed
money from the tribunes and centurions, which he distributed amongst his
soldiers. By this proceeding he gained two points; he secured the
interest of the centurions by this pledge in his hands, and by his
liberality he purchased the affections of his army.

XL.--Fabius sounded the inclinations of the neighbouring states by
letters and messengers. He had made two bridges over the river Segre, at
the distance of four miles from each other. He sent foraging parties
over these bridges, because he had already consumed all the forage that
was on his side of the river. The generals of Pompey's army did almost
the same thing, and for the same reason: and the horse had frequent
skirmishes with each other. When two of Fabius's legions had, as was
their constant practice, gone forth as the usual protection to the
foragers, and had crossed the river, and the baggage, and all the horse
were following them, on a sudden, from the weight of the cattle, and the
mass of water, the bridge fell, and all the horse were cut off from the
main army, which being known to Petreius and Afranius, from the timber
and hurdles that were carried down the river, Afranius immediately
crossed his own bridge, which communicated between his camp and the
town, with four legions and all the cavalry, and marched against
Fabius's two legions. When his approach was announced, Lucius Plancus,
who had the command of those legions, compelled by the emergency, took
post on a rising ground; and drew up his army with two fronts, that it
might not be surrounded by the cavalry. Thus, though engaged with
superior numbers, he sustained the furious charge of the legions and the
horse. When the battle was begun by the horse, there were observed at a
distance by both sides the colours of two legions, which Caius Fabius
had sent round by the further bridge to reinforce our men, suspecting,
as the event verified, that the enemy's generals would take advantage of
the opportunity which fortune had put in their way, to attack our men.
Their approach put an end to the battle, and each general led back his
legions to their respective camps.

XLI.--In two days after Caesar came to the camp with nine hundred horse,
which he had retained for a bodyguard. The bridge which had been broken
down by the storm was almost repaired, and he ordered it to be finished
in the night. Being acquainted with the nature of the country, he left
behind him six cohorts to guard the bridge, the camp, and all his
baggage, and the next day set off in person for Ilerda, with all his
forces drawn up in three lines, and halted just before the camp of
Afranius, and having remained there a short time under arms, he offered
him battle on equal terms. When this offer was made, Afranius drew out
his forces, and posted them on the middle of a hill, near his camp. When
Caesar perceived that Afranius declined coming to an engagement, he
resolved to encamp at somewhat less than half a mile's distance from the
very foot of the mountain; and that his soldiers whilst engaged in their
works, might not be terrified by any sudden attack of the enemy, or
disturbed in their work, he ordered them not to fortify it with a wall,
which must rise high, and be seen at a distance, but draw, on the front
opposite the enemy, a trench fifteen feet broad. The first and second
lines continued under arms as was from the first appointed. Behind them
the third line was carrying on the work without being seen; so that the
whole was completed before Afranius discovered that the camp was being
fortified.

XLII.--In the evening Caesar drew his legions within this trench, and
rested them under arms the next night. The day following he kept his
whole army within it, and as it was necessary to bring materials from a
considerable distance, he for the present pursued the same plan in his
work; and to each legion, one after the other, he assigned one side of
the camp to fortify, and ordered trenches of the same magnitude to be
cut: he kept the rest of the legions under arms without baggage to
oppose the enemy. Afranius and Petreius, to frighten us and obstruct the
work, drew out their forces at the very foot of the mountain, and
challenged us to battle. Caesar, however, did not interrupt his work,
relying on the protection of the three legions, and the strength of the
fosse. After staying for a short time, and advancing no great distance
from the bottom of the hill, they led back their forces to their camp.
The third day Caesar fortified his camp with a rampart, and ordered the
other cohorts which he had left in the upper camp, and his baggage to be
removed to it.

XLIIL-Between the town of Ilerda and the next hill, on which Afranius
and Petreius were encamped, there was a plain about three hundred paces
broad, and near the middle of it an eminence somewhat raised above the
level: Caesar hoped that if he could get possession of this and fortify
it, he should be able to cut off the enemy from the town, the bridge,
and all the stores which they had laid up in the town. In expectation of
this he led three legions out of the camp, and, drawing up his army in
an advantageous position, he ordered the advanced men of one legion to
hasten forward and seize the eminence. Upon intelligence of this the
cohorts which were on guard before Afranius's camp were instantly sent a
nearer way to occupy the same post. The two parties engage, and as
Afranius's men had reached the eminence first, our men were repulsed,
and, on a reinforcement being sent, they were obliged to turn their
backs and retreat to the standards of legions.

XLIV.--The manner of fighting of those soldiers was to run forward with
great impetuosity and boldly take a post, and not to keep their ranks
strictly, but to fight in small scattered parties: if hard pressed they
thought it no disgrace to retire and give up the post, being accustomed
to this manner of fighting among the Lusitanians and other barbarous
nations; for it commonly happens that soldiers are strongly influenced
by the customs of those countries in which they have spent much time.
This method, however, alarmed our men, who were not used to such a
description of warfare. For they imagined that they were about to be
surrounded on their exposed flank by the single men who ran forward from
their ranks; and they thought it their duty to keep their ranks, and not
to quit their colours, nor, without good reason, to give up the post
which they had taken. Accordingly, when the advanced guard gave way, the
legion which was stationed on that wing did not keep its ground, but
retreated to the next hill.

XLV.--Almost the whole army being daunted at this, because it had
occurred contrary to their expectations and custom, Caesar encouraged
his men and led the ninth legion to their relief, and checked the
insolent and eager pursuit of the enemy, and obliged them, in their
turn, to show their backs and retreat to Ilerda, and take post under the
walls. But the soldiers of the ninth legion, being over zealous to
repair the dishonour which had been sustained, having rashly pursued the
fleeing enemy, advanced into disadvantageous ground and went up to the
foot of the mountain on which the town Ilerda was built. And when they
wished to retire they were again attacked by the enemy from the rising
ground. The place was craggy in the front and steep on either side, and
was so narrow that even three cohorts, drawn up in order of battle,
would fill it; but no relief could be sent on the flanks, and the horse
could be of no service to them when hard pressed. From the town, indeed,
the precipice inclined with a gentle slope for near four hundred paces.
Our men had to retreat this way, as they had, through their eagerness,
advanced too inconsiderately. The greatest contest was in this place,
which was much to the disadvantage of our troops, both on account of its
narrowness, and because they were posted at the foot of the mountain, so
that no weapon was thrown at them without effect: yet they exerted their
valour and patience, and bore every wound. The enemy's forces were
increasing, and cohorts were frequently sent to their aid from the camp
through the town, that fresh men might relieve the weary. Caesar was
obliged to do the same, and relieve the fatigued by sending cohorts to
that post.

XLVI.--After the battle had in this manner continued incessantly for
five hours, and our men had suffered much from superior numbers, having
spent all their javelins, they drew their swords and charged the enemy
up the hill, and, having killed a few, obliged the rest to fly. The
cohorts being beaten back to the wall, and some being driven by their
fears into the town, an easy retreat was afforded to our men. Our
cavalry also, on either flank, though stationed on sloping or low
ground, yet bravely struggled up to the top of the hill, and, riding
between the two armies, made our retreat more easy and secure. Such were
the various turns of fortune in the battle. In the first encounter about
seventy of our men fell: amongst them Quintus Fulgenius, first centurion
of the second line of the fourteenth legion, who, for his extraordinary
valour, had been promoted from the lower ranks to that post. About six
hundred were wounded. Of Afranius's party there were killed Titus
Caecilius, principal centurion, and four other centurions, and above two
hundred men.

XLVII.--But this opinion is spread abroad concerning this day, that each
party thought that they came off conquerors. Afranius's soldiers,
because, though they were esteemed inferior in the opinion of all, yet
they had stood our attack and sustained our charge, and, at first, had
kept the post and the hill which had been the occasion of the dispute;
and, in the first encounter, had obliged our men to fly: but ours,
because, notwithstanding the disadvantage of the ground and the
disparity of numbers, they had maintained the battle for five hours, had
advanced up the hill sword in hand, and had forced the enemy to fly from
the higher ground and driven them into the town. The enemy fortified the
hill, about which the contest had been, with strong works, and posted a
garrison on it.

XLVIII.--In two days after this transaction, there happened an
unexpected misfortune. For so great a storm arose, that it was agreed
that there were never seen higher floods in those countries; it swept
down the snow from all the mountains, and broke over the banks of the
river, and in one day carried away both the bridges which Fabius had
built,--a circumstance which caused great difficulties to Caesar's army.
For as our camp, as already mentioned, was pitched between two rivers,
the Segre and Cinca, and as neither of these could be forded for the
space of thirty miles, they were all of necessity confined within these
narrow limits. Neither could the states, which had espoused Caesar's
cause, furnish him with corn, nor the troops, which had gone far to
forage, return, as they were stopped by the waters: nor could the
convoys, coming from Italy and Gaul, make their way to the camp.
Besides, it was the most distressing season of the year, when there was
no corn in the blade, and it was nearly ripe: and the states were
exhausted, because Afranius had conveyed almost all the corn, before
Caesar's arrival, into Ilerda, and whatever he had left, had been
already consumed by Caesar. The cattle, which might have served as a
secondary resource against want, had been removed by the states to a
great distance on account of the war. They who had gone out to get
forage or corn, were chased by the light troops of the Lusitanians, and
the targeteers of Hither Spain, who were well acquainted with the
country, and could readily swim across the river, because it is the
custom of all those people not to join their armies without bladders.

XLIX.--But Afranius's army had abundance of everything; a great stock of
corn had been provided and laid in long before, a large quantity was
coming in from the whole province: they had a good store of forage. The
bridge of Ilerda afforded an opportunity of getting all these without
any danger, and the places beyond the bridge, to which Caesar had no
access, were as yet untouched.

L.--Those floods continued several days. Caesar endeavoured to repair
the bridges, but the height of the water did not allow him: and the
cohorts disposed along the banks did not suffer them to be completed;
and it was easy for them to prevent it, both from the nature of the
river and the height of the water, but especially because their darts
were thrown from the whole course of the bank on one confined spot; and
it was no easy matter at one and the same time to execute a work in a
very rapid flood, and to avoid the darts.

LI.--Intelligence was brought to Afranius that the great convoys, which
were on their march to Caesar, had halted at the river. Archers from the
Rutheni, and horse from the Gauls, with a long train of baggage,
according to the Gallic custom of travelling, had arrived there; there
were besides about six thousand people of all descriptions, with slaves
and freed men. But there was no order, or regular discipline, as every
one followed his own humour, and all travelled without apprehension,
taking the same liberty as on former marches. There were several young
noblemen, sons of senators, and of equestrian rank; there were
ambassadors from several states; there were lieutenants of Caesar's. The
river stopped them all. To attack them by surprise, Afranius set out in
the beginning of the night, with all his cavalry and three legions, and
sent the horse on before, to fall on them unawares; but the Gallic horse
soon got themselves in readiness, and attacked them. Though but few,
they withstood the vast number of the enemy, as long as they fought on
equal terms: but when the legions began to approach, having lost a few
men, they retreated to the next mountains. The delay occasioned by this
battle was of great importance to the security of our men; for having
gained time, they retired to the higher grounds. There were missing that
day about two hundred bow-men, a few horse, and an inconsiderable number
of servants and baggage.

LII.--However, by all these things, the price of provisions was raised,
which is commonly a disaster attendant, not only on a time of present
scarcity, but on the apprehension of future want. Provisions had now
reached fifty denarii each bushel; and the want of corn had diminished
the strength of the soldiers; and the inconveniences were increasing
every day: and so great an alteration was wrought in a few days, and
fortune had so changed sides, that our men had to struggle with the want
of every necessary; while the enemy had an abundant supply of all
things, and were considered to have the advantage. Caesar demanded from
those states which had acceded to his alliance, a supply of cattle, as
they had but little corn. He sent away the camp followers to the more
distant states, and endeavoured to remedy the present scarcity by every
resource in his power.

LIII.--Afranius and Petreius, and their friends, sent fuller and more
circumstantial accounts of these things to Rome, to their acquaintances.
Report exaggerated them so that the war appeared to be almost at an end.
When these letters and despatches were received at Rome, a great
concourse of people resorted to the house of Afranius, and
congratulations ran high: several went out of Italy to Cneius Pompey;
some of them, to be the first to bring him the intelligence; others,
that they might not be thought to have waited the issue of the war, and
to have come last of all.

LIV.--When Caesar's affairs were in this unfavourable position, and all
the passes were guarded by the soldiers and horse of Afranius, and the
bridges could not be prepared, Caesar ordered his soldiers to make ships
of the kind that his knowledge of Britain a few years before had taught
him. First, the keels and ribs were made of light timber, then, the rest
of the hulk of the ships was wrought with wicker-work, and covered over
with hides. When these were finished, he drew them down to the river in
waggons in one night, a distance of twenty-two miles from his camp, and
transported in them some soldiers across the river, and on a sudden took
possession of a hill adjoining the bank. This he immediately fortified,
before he was perceived by the enemy. To this he afterwards transported
a legion: and having begun a bridge on both sides, he finished it in two
days. By this means, he brought safe to his camp the convoys, and those
who had gone out to forage; and began to prepare a conveyance for the
provisions.

LV.--The same day he made a great part of his horse pass the river, who,
falling on the foragers by surprise as they were dispersed without any
suspicions, intercepted an incredible number of cattle and people; and
when some Spanish light-armed cohorts were sent to reinforce the enemy,
our men judiciously divided themselves into two parts, the one to
protect the spoil, the other to resist the advancing foe, and to beat
them back, and they cut off from the rest and surrounded one cohort,
which had rashly ventured out of the line before the others, and after
putting it to the sword, returned safe with considerable booty to the
camp over the same bridge.

LVI.--Whilst these affairs are going forward at Ilerda, the Massilians,
adopting the advice of Domitius, prepared seventeen ships of war, of
which eleven were decked. To these they add several smaller vessels,
that our fleet might be terrified by numbers: they man them with a great
number of archers and of the Albici, of whom mention has been already
made, and these they incited by rewards and promises. Domitius required
certain ships for his own use, which he manned with colonists and
shepherds, whom he had brought along with him. A fleet being thus
furnished with every necessary, he advanced with great confidence
against our ships, commanded by Decimus Brutus. It was stationed at an
island opposite to Massilia.

LVII.--Brutus was much inferior in number of ships; but Caesar had
appointed to that fleet the bravest men selected from all his legions,
antesignani and centurions, who had requested to be employed in that
service. They had provided iron hooks and harpoons, and had furnished
themselves with a vast number of javelins, darts, and missiles. Thus
prepared, and being apprised of the enemy's approach, they put out from
the harbour, and engaged the Massilians. Both sides fought with great
courage and resolution; nor did the Albici, a hardy people, bred on the
highlands and inured to arms, fall much short of our men in valour: and
being lately come from the Massilians, they retained in their minds
their recent promises: and the wild shepherds, encouraged by the hope of
liberty, were eager to prove their zeal in the presence of their
masters.

LVIII.--The Massilians themselves, confiding in the quickness of their
ships, and the skill of their pilots, eluded ours, and evaded the shock,
and as long as they were permitted by clear space, lengthening their
line they endeavoured to surround us, or to attack single ships with
several of theirs, or to run across our ships, and carry away our oars,
if possible; but when necessity obliged them to come nearer, they had
recourse, from the skill and art of the pilots, to the valour of the
mountaineers. But our men, not having such expert seamen, or skilful
pilots, for they had been hastily drafted from the merchant ships, and
were not yet acquainted even with the names of the rigging, were
moreover impeded by the heaviness and slowness of our vessels, which
having been built in a hurry and of green timber, were not so easily
manoeuvred. Therefore, when Caesar's men had an opportunity of a close
engagement, they cheerfully opposed two of the enemy's ships with one of
theirs. And throwing in the grappling irons, and holding both ships
fast, they fought on both sides of the deck, and boarded the enemy's;
and having killed numbers of the Albici and shepherds, they sank some of
their ships, took others with the men on board, and drove the rest into
the harbour. That day the Massilians lost nine ships, including those
that were taken.

LIX.--When news of this battle was brought to Caesar at Ilerda, the
bridge being completed at the same time, fortune soon took a turn. The
enemy, daunted by the courage of our horse, did not scour the country as
freely or as boldly as before: but sometimes advancing a small distance
from the camp, that they might have a ready retreat, they foraged within
narrower bounds: at other times, they took a longer circuit to avoid our
outposts and parties of horse; or having sustained some loss, or
descried our horse at a distance, they fled in the midst of their
expedition, leaving their baggage behind them; at length they resolved
to leave off foraging for several days, and, contrary to the practice of
all nations, to go out at night.

LX.--In the meantime the Oscenses and the Calagurritani, who were under
the government of the Oscenses, send ambassadors to Caesar, and offer to
submit to his orders. They are followed by the Tarraconenses, Jacetani,
and Ausetani, and in a few days more by the Illurgavonenses, who dwell
near the river Ebro. He requires of them all to assist him with corn, to
which they agreed, and having collected all the cattle in the country,
they convey them into his camp. One entire cohort of the
Illurgavonenses, knowing the design of their state, came over to Caesar,
from the place where they were stationed, and carried their colours with
them. A great change is shortly made in the face of affairs. The bridge
being finished, five powerful states being joined to Caesar, a way
opened for the receiving of corn, and the rumours of the assistance of
legions which were said to be on their march, with Pompey at their head,
through Mauritania, having died away, several of the more distant states
revolt from Afranius, and enter into league with Caesar.

LXI.--Whilst the spirits of the enemy were dismayed at these things,
Caesar, that he might not be always obliged to send his horse a long
circuit round by the bridge, having found a convenient place, began to
sink several drains, thirty feet deep, by which he might draw off a part
of the river Segre, and make a ford over it. When these were almost
finished, Afranius and Petreius began to be greatly alarmed, lest they
should be altogether cut off from corn and forage, because Caesar was
very strong in cavalry. They therefore resolved to quit their posts, and
to transfer the war to Celtiberia. There was, moreover, a circumstance
that confirmed them in this resolution: for of the two adverse parties,
that which had stood by Sertorius in the late war, being conquered by
Pompey, still trembled at his name and sway, though absent: the other
which had remained firm in Pompey's interest, loved him for the favours
which they had received: but Caesar's name was not known to the
barbarians. From these they expected considerable aid, both of horse and
foot, and hoped to protract the war till winter, in a friendly country.
Having come to this resolution, they gave orders to collect all the
ships in the river Ebro, and to bring them to Octogesa, a town situated
on the river Ebro, about twenty miles distant from their camp. At this
part of the river, they ordered a bridge to be made of boats fastened
together, and transported two legions over the river Segre, and
fortified their camp with a rampart, twelve feet high.

LXII.--Notice of this being given by the scouts, Caesar continued his
work day and night, with very great fatigue to the soldiers, to drain
the river, and so far effected his purpose, that the horse were both
able and bold enough, though with some difficulty and danger, to pass
the river; but the foot had only their shoulders and upper part of their
breast above the water, so that their fording it was retarded, not only
by the depth of the water, but also by the rapidity of the current.
However, almost at the same instant, news was received of the bridge
being nearly completed over the Ebro, and a ford was found in the Segre.

LXIII.--Now indeed the enemy began to think that they ought to hasten
their march. Accordingly, leaving two auxiliary cohorts in the garrison
at Ilerda, they crossed the Segre with their whole force, and formed one
camp with the two legions which they had led across a few days before.
Caesar had no resource, but to annoy and cut down their rear; since with
his cavalry to go by the bridge, required him to take a long circuit; so
that they would arrive at the Ebro by a much shorter route. The horse,
which he had detached, crossed the ford, and when Afranius and Petreius
had broken up their camp about the third watch, they suddenly appeared
on their rear, and spreading round them in great numbers, began to
retard and impede their march.

LXIV.--At break of day, it was perceived from the rising grounds which
joined Caesar's camp, that their rear was vigorously pressed by our
horse; that the last line sometimes halted and was broken; at other
times, that they joined battle and that our men were beaten back by a
general charge of their cohorts, and, in their turn, pursued them when
they wheeled about: but through the whole camp the soldiers gathered in
parties, and declared their chagrin that the enemy had been suffered to
escape from their hands and that the war had been unnecessarily
protracted. They applied to their tribunes and centurions, and entreated
them to inform Caesar that he need not spare their labour or consider
their danger; that they were ready and able, and would venture to ford
the river where the horse had crossed. Caesar, encouraged by their zeal
and importunity, though he felt reluctant to expose his army to a river
so exceedingly large, yet judged it prudent to attempt it and make a
trial. Accordingly, he ordered all the weaker soldiers, whose spirit or
strength seemed unequal to the fatigue, to be selected from each
century, and left them, with one legion besides, to guard the camp: the
rest of the legions he drew out without any baggage, and, having
disposed a great number of horses in the river, above and below the
ford, he led his army over. A few of his soldiers being carried away by
the force of the current, were stopped by the horse and taken up, and
not a man perished. His army being safe on the opposite bank, he drew
out his forces and resolved to lead them forward in three battalions:
and so great was the ardour of the soldiers that, notwithstanding the
addition of a circuit of six miles and a considerable delay in fording
the river, before the ninth hour of the day they came up with those who
had set out at the third watch.

LXV.--When Afranius, who was in company with Petreius, saw them at a
distance, being affrighted at so unexpected a sight, he halted on a
rising ground and drew up his army. Caesar refreshed his army on the
plain that he might not expose them to battle whilst fatigued; and when
the enemy attempted to renew their march, he pursued and stopped them.
They were obliged to pitch their camp sooner than they had intended, for
there were mountains at a small distance; and difficult and narrow roads
awaited them about five miles off. They retired behind these mountains
that they might avoid Caesar's cavalry, and, placing parties in the
narrow roads, stop the progress of his army and lead their own forces
across the Ebro without danger or apprehension. This it was their
interest to attempt and to effect by any means possible; but, fatigued
by the skirmishes all day, and by the labour of their march, they
deferred it till the following day: Caesar likewise encamped on the next
hill.

LXVI.--About midnight a few of their men who had gone some distance from
the camp to fetch water, being taken by our horse, Caesar is informed by
them that the generals of the enemy were drawing their troops out of the
camp without noise. Upon this information Caesar ordered the signal to
be given and the military shout to be raised for packing up the baggage.
When they heard the shout, being afraid lest they should be stopped in
the night and obliged to engage under their baggage, or lest they should
be confined in the narrow roads by Caesar's horse, they put a stop to
their march and kept their forces in their camp. The next day Petreius
went out privately with a few horse to reconnoitre the country. A
similar movement was made from Caesar's camp. Lucius Decidius Saxa was
detached with a small party to explore the nature of the country. Each
returned with the same account to his camp, that there was a level road
for the next five miles, that there then succeeded a rough and
mountainous country. Whichever should first obtain possession of the
defiles would have no trouble in preventing the other's progress.

LXVII.--There was a debate in the council between Afranius and Petreius,
and the time of marching was the subject. The majority were of opinion
that they should begin their march at night, "for they might reach the
defiles before they should be discovered." Others, because a shout had
been raised the night before in Caesar's camp, used this as an argument
that they could not leave the camp unnoticed: "that Caesar's cavalry
were patrolling the whole night, and that all the ways and roads were
beset; that battles at night ought to be avoided, because in civil
dissension, a soldier once daunted is more apt to consult his fears than
his oath; that the daylight raised a strong sense of shame in the eyes
of all, and that the presence of the tribunes and centurions had the
same effect: by these things the soldiers would be re strained and awed
to their duty. Wherefore they should, by all means, attempt to force
their way by day; for, though a trifling loss might be sustained, yet
the post which they desired might be secured with safety to the main
body of the army." This opinion prevailed in the council, and the next
day, at the dawn, they resolved to set forward.

LXVIII.--Caesar, having taken a view of the country, the moment the sky
began to grow white, led his forces from the camp and marched at the
head of his army by a long circuit, keeping to no regular road; for the
road which led to the Ebro and Octogesa was occupied by the enemy's
camp, which lay in Caesar's way. His soldiers were obliged to cross
extensive and difficult valleys. Craggy cliffs, in several places,
interrupted their march, insomuch that their arms had to be handed to
one another, and the soldiers were forced to perform a great part of
their march unarmed, and were lifted up the rocks by each other. But not
a man murmured at the fatigue, because they imagined that there would be
a period to all their toils if they could cut off the enemy from the
Ebro and intercept their convoys.

LXIX.--At first, Afranius's soldiers ran in high spirits from their camp
to look at us, and in contumelious language upbraided us, "that we were
forced, for want of necessary subsistence, to run away, and return to
Ilerda." For our route was different from what we proposed, and we
appeared to be going a contrary way. But their generals applauded their
own prudence in keeping within their camp, and it was a strong
confirmation of their opinion, that they saw we marched without waggons
or baggage, which made them confident that we could not long endure
want. But when they saw our army gradually wheel to the right, and
observed our van was already passing the line of their camp, there was
nobody so stupid, or averse to fatigue, as not to think it necessary to
march from the camp immediately, and oppose us. The cry to arms was
raised, and all the army, except a few which were left to guard the
camp, set out and marched the direct road to the Ebro.

LXX.--The contest depended entirely on despatch, which should first get
possession of the defile and the mountain. The difficulty of the roads
delayed Caesar's army, but his cavalry pursuing Afranius's forces,
retarded their march. However, the affair was necessarily reduced to
this point, with respect to Afranius's men, that if they first gained
the mountains, which they desired, they would themselves avoid all
danger, but could not save the baggage of their whole army, nor the
cohorts which they had left behind in the camps, to which, being
intercepted by Caesar's army, by no means could assistance be given.
Caesar first accomplished the march, and having found a plain behind
large rocks, drew up his army there in order of battle and facing the
enemy. Afranius, perceiving that his rear was galled by our cavalry, and
seeing the enemy before him, having come to a hill, made a halt on it.
Thence he detached four cohorts of Spanish light infantry to the highest
mountain which was in view: to this he ordered them to hasten with all
expedition, and to take possession of it, with the intention of going to
the same place with all his forces, then altering his route, and
crossing the hills to Octogesa. As the Spaniards were making towards it
in an oblique direction, Caesar's horse espied them and attacked them,
nor were they able to withstand the charge of the cavalry even for a
moment, but were all surrounded and cut to pieces in the sight of the
two armies.

LXXI.--There was now an opportunity for managing affairs successfully,
nor did it escape Caesar, that an army daunted at suffering such a loss
before their eyes, could not stand, especially as they were surrounded
by our horse, and the engagement would take place on even and open
ground. To this he was importuned on all sides. The lieutenants,
centurions, and tribunes, gathered round him, and begged "that he would
not hesitate to begin the battle: that the hearts of all the soldiers
were very anxious for it: that Afranius's men had by several
circumstances betrayed signs of fear; in that they had not assisted
their party; in that they had not quitted the hill; in that they did not
sustain the charge of our cavalry, but crowding their standards into one
place, did not observe either rank or order. But if he had any
apprehensions from the disadvantage of the ground, that an opportunity
would be given him of coming to battle in some other place: for that
Afranius must certainly come down, and would not be able to remain there
for want of water."

LXXII.--Caesar had conceived hopes of ending the affair without an
engagement, or without striking a blow, because he had cut off the
enemy's supplies. Why should he hazard the loss of any of his men, even
in a successful battle? Why should he expose soldiers to be wounded; who
had deserved so well of him? Why, in short, should he tempt fortune?
especially when it was as much a general's duty to conquer by tactics,
as by the sword. Besides, he was moved with compassion for those
citizens, who, he foresaw, must fall: and he had rather gain his object
without any loss or injury to them. This resolution of Caesar was not
generally approved of; but the soldiers openly declared to each other,
that since such an opportunity of victory was let pass, they would not
come to an engagement, even when Caesar should wish it. He persevered
however in his resolution, and retired a little from that place to abate
the enemy's fears. Petreius and Afranius, having got this opportunity,
retired to their camp. Caesar, having disposed parties on the mountains,
and cut off all access to the Ebro, fortified his camp as close to the
enemy as he could.

LXXIII.--The day following, the generals of his opponents, being alarmed
that they had lost all prospect of supplies, and of access to the Ebro,
consulted as to what other course they should take. There were two
roads, one to Ilerda, if they chose to return, the other to Tarraco, if
they should march to it. Whilst they were deliberating on these matters,
intelligence was brought them that their watering parties were attacked
by our horse: upon which information, they dispose several parties of
horse and auxiliary foot along the road, and intermix some legionary
cohorts, and begin to throw up a rampart from the camp to the water,
that they might be able to procure water within their lines, both
without fear, and without a guard. Petreius and Afranius divided this
task between themselves, and went in person to some distance from their
camp for the purpose of seeing it accomplished.

LXXIV.--The soldiers having obtained by their absence a free opportunity
of conversing with each other, came out in great numbers, and inquired
each for whatever acquaintance or fellow citizen he had in our camp, and
invited him to him. First they returned them general thanks for sparing
them the day before, when they were greatly terrified, and acknowledged
that they were alive through their kindness; then they inquired about
the honour of our general, and whether they could with safety entrust
themselves to him; and declared their sorrow that they had not done so
in the beginning, and that they had taken up arms against their
relations and kinsmen. Encouraged by these conferences, they desired the
general's parole for the lives of Petreius and Afranius, that they might
not appear guilty of a crime, in having betrayed their generals. When
they were assured of obtaining their demands, they promised that they
would immediately remove their standards, and sent centurions of the
first rank as deputies to treat with Caesar about a peace. In the
meantime some of them invite their acquaintances, and bring them to
their camp, others are brought away by their friends, so that the two
camps seemed to be united into one, and several of the tribunes and
centurions came to Caesar, and paid their respects to him. The same was
done by some of the nobility of Spain, whom they summoned to their
assistance, and kept in their camp as hostages. They inquired after
their acquaintance and friends, by whom each might have the means of
being recommended to Caesar. Even Afranius's son, a young man,
endeavoured by means of Sulpitius the lieutenant, to make terms for his
own and his father's life. Every place was filled with mirth and
congratulations; in the one army, because they thought they had escaped
so impending danger; in the other, because they thought they had
completed so important a matter without blows; and Caesar, in every
man's judgment, reaped the advantage of his former lenity, and his
conduct was applauded by all.

LXXV.--When these circumstances were announced to Afranius, he left the
work which he had begun, and returned to his camp determined, as it
appeared, whatever should be the event to bear it with an even and
steady mind. Petreius did not neglect himself; he armed his domestics;
with them and the praetorian cohort of Spaniards, and a few foreign
horse, his dependants, whom he commonly kept near him to guard his
person, he suddenly flew to the rampart, interrupted the conferences of
the soldiers, drove our men from the camp, and put to death as many as
he caught. The rest formed into a body, and, being alarmed by the
unexpected danger, wrapped their left arms in their cloaks, and drew
their swords, and in this manner, depending on the nearness of their
camp, defended themselves against the Spaniards, and the horse, and made
good their retreat to the camp, where they were protected by the
cohorts, which were on guard.

LXXVI.--Petreius, after accomplishing this, went round every maniple,
calling the soldiers by their names and entreating with tears, that they
would not give up him and their absent general Pompey, as a sacrifice to
the vengeance of their enemies. Immediately they ran in crowds to the
general's pavilion, when he required them all to take an oath that they
would not desert nor betray the army nor the generals, nor form any
design distinct from the general interest. He himself swore first to the
tenor of those words, and obliged Afranius to take the same oath. The
tribunes and centurions followed their example; the soldiers were
brought out by centuries, and took the same oath. They gave orders, that
whoever had any of Caesar's soldiers should produce them; as soon as
they were produced, they put them to death publicly in the praetorium,
but most of them concealed those that they had entertained, and let them
out at night over the rampart. Thus the terror raised by the generals,
the cruelty of the punishments, the new obligation of an oath, removed
all hopes of surrender for the present, changed the soldiers' minds, and
reduced matters to the former state of war.

LXXVII.--Caesar ordered the enemy's soldiers, who had come into his camp
to hold a conference, to be searched for with the strictest diligence,
and sent back. But of the tribunes and centurions, several voluntarily
remained with him, and he afterwards treated them with great respect.
The centurions he promoted to higher ranks, and conferred on the Roman
knights the honour of tribunes.

LXXVIII.--Afranius's men were distressed in foraging, and procured water
with difficulty. The legionary soldiers had a tolerable supply of corn,
because they had been ordered to bring from Ilerda sufficient to last
twenty-two days; the Spanish and auxiliary forces had none, for they had
but few opportunities of procuring any, and their bodies were not
accustomed to bear burdens; and therefore a great number of them came
over to Caesar every day. Their affairs were under these difficulties;
but of the two schemes proposed, the most expedient seemed to be to
return to Ilerda, because they had left some corn there; and there they
hoped to decide on a plan for their future conduct. Tarraco lay at a
greater distance; and in such a space they knew affairs might admit of
many changes. Their design having met with approbation, they set out
from their camp. Caesar having sent forward his cavalry, to annoy and
retard their rear, followed close after with his legions. Not a moment
passed in which their rear was not engaged with our horse.

LXXIX.--Their manner of fighting was this: the light cohorts closed
their rear, and frequently made a stand on the level grounds. If they
had a mountain to ascend, the very nature of the place readily secured
them from any danger; for the advanced guards, from the rising grounds,
protected the rest in their ascent. When they approached a valley or
declivity, and the advanced men could not impart assistance to the
tardy, our horse threw their darts at them from the rising grounds with
advantage; then their affairs were in a perilous situation; the only
plan left was, that whenever they came near such places, they should
give orders to the legions to halt, and by a violent effort repulse our
horse; and these being forced to give way, they should suddenly, with
the utmost speed, run all together down to the valley, and having passed
it, should face about again on the next hill. For so far were they from
deriving any assistance from their horse (of which they had a large
number), that they were obliged to receive them into the centre of their
army, and themselves protect them, as they were daunted by former
battles. And on their march no one could quit the line without being
taken by Caesar's horse.

LXXX.--Whilst skirmishes were fought in this manner, they advanced but
slowly and gradually, and frequently halted to help their rear, as then
happened. For having advanced four miles, and being very much harassed
by our horse, they took post on a high mountain, and there entrenched
themselves on the front only, facing the enemy; and did not take their
baggage off their cattle. When they perceived that Caesar's camp was
pitched, and the tents fixed up, and his horse sent out to forage, they
suddenly rushed out about twelve o'clock the same day, and, having hopes
that we should be delayed by the absence of our horse, they began to
march, which Caesar perceiving, followed them with the legions that
remained. He left a few cohorts to guard his baggage, and ordered the
foragers to be called home at the tenth hour, and the horse to follow
him. The horse shortly returned to their daily duty on march, and
charged the rear so vigorously, that they almost forced them to fly; and
several privates and some centurions were killed. The main body of
Caesar's army was at hand, and universal ruin threatened them.

LXXXI.--Then indeed, not having opportunity either to choose a
convenient position for their camp, or to march forward, they were
obliged to halt, and to encamp at a distance from water, and on ground
naturally unfavourable. But for the reasons already given, Caesar did
not attack them, nor suffer a tent to be pitched that day, that his men
might be the readier to pursue them whether they attempted to run off by
night or by day. Observing the defect in their position, they spent the
whole night in extending their works, and turn their camp to ours. The
next day, at dawn, they do the same, and spend the whole day in that
manner, but in proportion as they advanced their works, and extended
their camp, they were farther distant from the water; and one evil was
remedied by another. The first night, no one went out for water. The
next day, they left a guard in the camp, and led out all their forces to
water: but not a person was sent to look for forage. Caesar was more
desirous that they should be humbled by these means, and forced to come
to terms, than decide the contest by battle. Yet he endeavoured to
surround them with a wall and trench, that he might be able to check
their most sudden sally, to which he imagined that they must have
recourse. Hereupon, urged by want of fodder, that they might be the
readier for a march, they killed all their baggage cattle.

LXXXII.--In this work, and the deliberations on it, two days were spent.
By the third day a considerable part of Caesar's works was finished. To
interrupt his progress, they drew out their legions about the eighth
hour, by a certain signal, and placed them in order of battle before
their camp. Caesar calling his legions off from their work, and ordering
the horse to hold themselves in readiness, marshalled his army: for to
appear to decline an engagement contrary to the opinion of the soldiers
and the general voice, would have been attended with great disadvantage.
But for the reasons already known, he was dissuaded from wishing to
engage, and the more especially, because the short space between the
camps, even if the enemy were put to flight, would not contribute much
to a decisive victory; for the two camps were not distant from each
other above two thousand feet. Two parts of this were occupied by the
armies, and one third left for the soldiers to charge and make their
attack. If a battle should be begun, the nearness of the camps would
afford a ready retreat to the conquered party in the flight. For this
reason Caesar had resolved to make resistance, if they attacked him, but
not to be the first to provoke the battle.

LXXXIII.--Afranius's five legions were drawn up in two lines, the
auxiliary cohorts formed the third line, and acted as reserves. Caesar
had three lines, four cohorts out of each of the five legions formed the
first line. Three more from each legion followed them, as reserves: and
three others were behind these. The slingers and archers were stationed
in the centre of the line; the cavalry closed the flanks. The hostile
armies being arranged in this manner, each seemed determined to adhere
to his first intention: Caesar not to hazard a battle, unless forced to
it; Afranius to interrupt Caesar's works. However, the matter was
deferred, and both armies kept under arms till sunset; when they both
returned to their camp. The next day Caesar prepared to finish the works
which he had begun. The enemy attempted to pass the river Segre by a
ford. Caesar, having perceived this, sent some light-armed Germans and a
party of horse across the river, and disposed several parties along the
banks to guard them.

LXXXIV.--At length, beset on all sides, their cattle having been four
days without fodder, and having no water, wood, or corn, they beg a
conference; and that, if possible, in a place remote from the soldiers.
When this was refused by Caesar, but a public interview offered if they
chose it, Afranius's son was given as a hostage to Caesar. They met in
the place appointed by Caesar. In the hearing of both armies, Afranius
spoke thus: "That Caesar ought not to be displeased either with him or
his soldiers, for wishing to preserve their attachment to their general,
Cneius Pompey. That they had now sufficiently discharged their duty to
him, and had suffered punishment enough, in having endured the want of
every necessary: but now, pent up almost like wild beasts, they were
prevented from procuring water, and prevented from walking abroad; and
were not able to bear the bodily pain or the mental disgrace: but
confessed themselves vanquished: and begged and entreated, if there was
any room left for mercy, that they should not be necessitated to suffer
the most severe penalties." These sentiments were delivered in the most
submissive and humble language.

LXXXV.--Caesar replied, "That either to complain or sue for mercy became
no man less than him: for that every other person had done their duty:
himself, in having declined to engage on favourable terms, in an
advantageous situation and time, that all things tending to a peace
might be totally unembarrassed: his army, in having preserved and
protected the men whom they had in their power, notwithstanding the
injuries which they had received, and the murder of their comrades; and
even Afranius's soldiers, who of themselves treated about concluding a
peace, by which they thought that they would secure the lives of all.
Thus, that the parties on both sides inclined to mercy: that the
generals only were averse to peace: that they paid no regard to the laws
either of conference or truce; and had most inhumanly put to death
ignorant persons, who were deceived by a conference: that therefore,
they had met that fate which usually befalls men from excessive
obstinacy and arrogance; and were obliged to have recourse, and most
earnestly desire that which they had shortly before disdained. That for
his part, he would not avail himself of their present humiliation, or
his present advantage, to require terms by which his power might be
increased, but only that those armies, which they had maintained for so
many years to oppose him, should be disbanded: for six legions had been
sent into Spain, and a seventh raised there, and many and powerful
fleets provided, and generals of great military experience sent to
command them, for no other purpose than to oppose him; that none of
these measures were adopted to keep the Spains in peace, or for the use
of the province, which, from the length of the peace, stood in need of
no such aid; that all these things were long since designed against him:
that against him a new sort of government was established, that the same
person should be at the gates of Rome, to direct the affairs of the
city; and though absent, have the government of two most warlike
provinces for so many years: that against him the laws of the
magistrates had been altered; that the late praetors and consuls should
not be sent to govern the provinces as had been the constant custom, but
persons approved of and chosen by a faction. That against him the excuse
of age was not admitted: but persons of tried experience in former wars
were called up to take the command of the armies, that with respect to
him only, the routine was not observed which had been allowed to all
generals, that, after a successful war, they should return home and
disband their armies, if not with some mark of honour, at least without
disgrace: that he had submitted to all these things patiently, and would
still submit to them: nor did he now desire to take their army from them
and keep it to himself (which, however, would not be a difficult
matter), but only that they should not have it to employ against him:
and therefore, as he said before, let them quit the provinces, and
disband their army. If this was complied with, he would injure no
person; that these were the last and only conditions of peace."

LXXXVI.--It was very acceptable and agreeable to Afranius's soldiers, as
might be easily known from their signs of joy, that they who expected
some injury after this defeat, should obtain without solicitation the
reward of a dismissal. For when a debate was introduced about the place
and time of their dismissal, they all began to express, both by words
and signs, from the rampart where they stood, that they should be
discharged immediately: for although every security might be given that
they would be disbanded, still the matter would be uncertain, if it was
deferred to a future day. After a short debate on either side, it was
brought to this issue: that those who had any settlement or possession
in Spain, should be immediately discharged: the rest at the river Var.
Caesar gave security that they should receive no damage, and that no
person should be obliged against his inclination to take the military
oath under him.

LXXXVII.--Caesar promised to supply them with corn from the present
time, till they arrived at the river Var. He further adds, that whatever
any of them lost in the war, which was in the possession of his
soldiers, should be restored to those that lost them. To his soldiers he
made a recompense in money for those things, a just valuation being
made. Whatever disputes Afranius's soldiers had afterwards amongst
themselves, they voluntarily submitted to Caesar's decision. Afranius
and Petreius, when pay was demanded by the legions, a sedition almost
breaking out, asserted that the time had not yet come, and required that
Caesar should take cognizance of it: and both parties were content with
his decision. About a third part of their army being dismissed in two
days, Caesar ordered two of his legions to go before, the rest to follow
the vanquished enemy: that they should encamp at a small distance from
each other. The execution of this business he gave in charge to Quintus
Fufius Kalenus, one of his lieutenants. According to his directions,
they marched from Spain to the river Var, and there the rest of the army
was disbanded.



BOOK II

I.--Whilst these things were going forward in Spain, Caius Trebonius,
Caesar's lieutenant, who had been left to conduct the assault of
Massilia, began to raise a mound, vineae, and turrets against the town,
on two sides: one of which was next the harbour and docks, the other on
that part where there is a passage from Gaul and Spain to that sea which
forces itself up the mouth of the Rhone. For Massilia is washed almost
on three sides by the sea, the remaining fourth part is the only side
which has access by land. A part even of this space, which reaches to
the fortress, being fortified by the nature of the country, and a very
deep valley, required a long and difficult siege. To accomplish these
works, Caius Trebonius sends for a great quantity of carriages and men
from the whole Province, and orders hurdles and materials to be
furnished. These things being provided, he raised a mound eighty feet in
height.

II.--But so great a store of everything necessary for a war had been a
long time before laid up in the town, and so great a number of engines,
that no vineae made of hurdles could withstand their force. For poles
twelve feet in length, pointed with iron, and these too shot from very
large engines, sank into the ground through four rows of hurdles.
Therefore the arches of the vineae were covered over with beams a foot
thick, fastened together, and under this the materials of the agger were
handed from one to another. Before this was carried a testudo sixty feet
long, for levelling the ground, made also of very strong timber, and
covered over with every thing that was capable of protecting it against
the fire and stones thrown by the enemy. But the greatness of the works,
the height of the wall and towers, and the multitude of engines retarded
the progress of our works. Besides, frequent sallies were made from the
town by the Albici, and fire was thrown on our mound and turrets. These
our men easily repulsed, and, doing considerable damage to those who
sallied, beat them back into the town.

III.--In the meantime, Lucius Nasidius, being sent by Cneius Pompey with
a fleet of sixteen sail, a few of which had beaks of brass, to the
assistance of Lucius Domitius and the Massilians, passed the straits of
Sicily without the knowledge or expectation of Curio, and, putting with
his fleet into Messana, and making the nobles and senate take flight
with the sudden terror, carried off one of their ships out of dock.
Having joined this to his other ships, he made good his voyage to
Massilia, and, having sent in a galley privately, acquaints Domitius and
the Massilians of his arrival, and earnestly encourages them to hazard
another battle with Brutus's fleet with the addition of his aid.

IV.--The Massilians, since their former loss, had brought the same
number of old ships from the docks, and had repaired and fitted them out
with great industry: they had a large supply of seamen and pilots. They
had got several fishing-smacks, and covered them over, that the seamen
might be secure against darts: these they filled with archers and
engines. With a fleet thus appointed, encouraged by the entreaties and
tears of all the old men, matrons, and virgins to succour the state in
this hour of distress, they went on board with no less spirit and
confidence than they had fought before. For it happens, from a common
infirmity of human nature, that we are more flushed with confidence, or
more vehemently alarmed at things unseen, concealed, and unknown, as was
the case then. For the arrival of Lucius Nasidius had filled the state
with the most sanguine hopes and wishes. Having got a fair wind, they
sailed out of port and went to Nasidius to Taurois, which is a fort
belonging to the Massilians, and there ranged their fleet and again
encouraged each other to engage, and communicated their plan of
operation. The command of the right division was given to the
Massilians, that of the left to Nasidius.

V.--Brutus sailed to the same place with an augmented fleet: for to
those made by Caesar at Arelas were added six ships taken from the
Massilians, which he had refitted since the last battle and had
furnished with every necessary. Accordingly, having encouraged his men
to despise a vanquished people whom they had conquered when yet
unbroken, he advanced against them full of confidence and spirit. From
Trebonius's camp and all the higher grounds it was easy to see into the
town--how all the youth which remained in it, and all persons of more
advanced years, with their wives and children, and the public guards,
were either extending their hands from the wall to the heavens, or were
repairing to the temples of the immortal gods, and, prostrating
themselves before their images, were entreating them to grant them
victory. Nor was there a single person who did not imagine that his
future fortune depended on the issue of that day; for the choice of
their youth and the most respectable of every age, being expressly
invited and solicited, had gone on board the fleet, that if any adverse
fate should befall them they might see that nothing was left for them to
attempt, and, if they proved victorious, they might have hopes of
preserving the city, either by their internal resources or by foreign
assistance.

VI-.-When the battle was begun, no effort of valour was wanting to the
Massilians, but, mindful of the instructions which they had a little
before received from their friends, they fought with such spirit as if
they supposed that they would never have another opportunity to attempt
a defence, and as if they believed that those whose lives should be
endangered in the battle would not long precede the fate of the rest of
the citizens, who, if the city was taken, must undergo the same fortune
of war. Our ships being at some distance from each other, room was
allowed both for the skill of their pilots and the manoeuvring of their
ships; and if at any time ours, gaining an advantage by casting the iron
hooks on board their ships, grappled with them, from all parts they
assisted those who were distressed. Nor, after being joined by the
Albici, did they decline coming to close engagement, nor were they much
inferior to our men in valour. At the same time, showers of darts,
thrown from a distance from the lesser ships, suddenly inflicted several
wounds on our men when off their guard and otherwise engaged; and two of
their three-decked galleys, having descried the ship of Decimus Brutus,
which could be easily distinguished by its flag, rowed up against him
with great violence from opposite sides: but Brutus, seeing into their
designs, by the swiftness of his ship extricated himself with such
address as to get clear, though only by a moment. From the velocity of
their motion they struck against each other with such violence that they
were both excessively injured by the shock; the beak, indeed, of one of
them being broken off, the whole ship was ready to founder, which
circumstance being observed, the ships of Brutus's fleet, which were
nearest that station, attack them when in this disorder and sink them
both.

VII.--But Nasidius's ships were of no use, and soon left the fight; for
the sight of their country, or the entreaties of their relations, did
not urge them to run a desperate risk of their lives. Therefore, of the
number of the ships not one was lost: of the fleet of the Massilians
five were sunk, four taken, and one ran off with Nasidius: all that
escaped made the best of their way to Hither Spain, but one of the rest
was sent forward to Massilia for the purpose of bearing this
intelligence, and when it came near the city, the whole people crowded
out to hear the tidings, and on being informed of the event, were so
oppressed with grief, that one would have imagined that the city had
been taken by an enemy at the same moment. The Massilians, however,
began to make the necessary preparations for the defence of their city
with unwearied energy.

VIII.--The legionary soldiers who had the management of the works on the
right side observed, from the frequent sallies of the enemy, that it
might prove a great protection to them to build a turret of brick under
the wall for a fort and place of refuge, which they at first built low
and small, [to guard them] against sudden attacks. To it they retreated,
and from it they made defence if any superior force attacked them; and
from it they sallied out either to repel or pursue the enemy. It
extended thirty feet on every side, and the thickness of the walls was
five feet. But afterwards, as experience is the best master in
everything on which the wit of man is employed, it was found that it
might be of considerable service if it was raised to the usual height of
turrets, which was effected in the following manner.

IX.-When the turret was raised to the height for flooring, they laid it
on the walls in such a manner that the ends of the joists were covered
by the outer face of the wall, that nothing should project to which the
enemy's fire might adhere. They, moreover, built over the joists with
small bricks as high as the protection of the plutei and vineae
permitted them; and on that place they laid two beams across, angle-ways,
at a small distance from the outer walls, to support the rafters
which were to cover the turret, and on the beams they laid joists across
in a direct line, and on these they fastened down planks. These joists
they made somewhat longer, to project beyond the outside of the wall,
that they might serve to hang a curtain on them to defend and repel all
blows whilst they were building the walls between that and the next
floor, and the floor of this story they faced with bricks and mortar,
that the enemy's fire might do them no damage; and on this they spread
mattresses, lest the weapons thrown from engines should break through
the flooring, or stones from catapults should batter the brickwork.
They, moreover, made three mats of cable ropes, each of them the length
of the turret walls, and four feet broad, and, hanging them round the
turret on the three sides which faced the enemy, fastened them to the
projecting joists. For this was the only sort of defence which, they had
learned by experience in other places, could not be pierced by darts or
engines. But when that part of the turret which was completed was
protected and secured against every attempt of the enemy, they removed
the plutei to other works. They began to suspend gradually, and raise by
screws from the first-floor, the entire roof of the turret, and then
they elevated it as high as the length of the mats allowed. Hid and
secured within these coverings, they built up the walls with bricks, and
again, by another turn of the screw, cleared a place for themselves to
proceed with the building; and, when they thought it time to lay another
floor, they laid the ends of the beams, covered in by the outer bricks
in like manner as in the first story, and from that story they again
raised the uppermost floor and the mat-work. In this manner, securely
and without a blow or danger, they raised it six stories high, and in
laying the materials left loop-holes in such places as they thought
proper for working their engines.

X.--When they were confident that they could protect the works which lay
around from this turret, they resolved to build a musculus, sixty feet
long, of timber, two feet square, and to extend it from the brick tower
to the enemy's tower and wall. This was the form of it: two beams of
equal length were laid on the ground, at the distance of four feet from
each other; and in them were fastened small pillars, five feet high,
which were joined together by braces, with a gentle slope, on which the
timber which they must place to support the roof of the musculus should
be laid: upon this were laid beams, two feet square, bound with iron
plates and nails. To the upper covering of the musculus and the upper
beams, they fastened laths, four fingers square, to support the tiles
which were to cover the musculus. The roof being thus sloped and laid
over in rows in the same manner as the joists were laid on the braces,
the musculus was covered with tiles and mortar, to secure it against
fire, which might be thrown from the wall. Over the tiles hides are
spread, to prevent the water let in on them by spouts from dissolving
the cement of the bricks. Again, the hides were covered over with
mattresses, that they might not be destroyed by fire or stones. The
soldiers under the protection of the vineae, finish this whole work to
the very tower, and suddenly, before the enemy were aware of it, moved
it forward by naval machinery, by putting rollers under it, close up to
the enemy's turret, so that it even touched the building.

XI.--The townsmen, affrighted at this unexpected stroke, bring forward
with levers the largest stones they can procure; and pitching them from
the wall, roll them down on the musculus. The strength of the timber
withstood the shock; and whatever fell on it slid off, on account of the
sloping roof. When they perceived this, they altered their plan and set
fire to barrels, filled with resin and tar, and rolled them down from
the wall on the musculus. As soon as they fell on it, they slid off
again, and were removed from its side by long poles and forks. In the
meantime, the soldiers, under cover of the musculus, were looting out
with crowbars the lowest stones of the enemy's turret, with which the
foundation was laid. The musculus was defended by darts, thrown from
engines by our men from the brick tower, and the enemy were beaten off
from the wall and turrets; nor was a fair opportunity of defending the
walls given them. At length several stones being picked away from the
foundation of that turret next the musculus, part of it fell down
suddenly, and the rest, as if following it, leaned forward.

XII.--Hereupon, the enemy, distressed at the sudden fall of the turret,
surprised at the unforeseen calamity, awed by the wrath of the gods, and
dreading the pillage of their city, rush all together out of the gate
unarmed, with their temples bound with fillets, and suppliantly stretch
out their hands to the officers and the army. At this uncommon
occurrence, the whole progress of the war was stopped, and the soldiers,
turning away from the battle, ran eagerly to hear and listen to them.
When the enemy came up to the commanders and the army, they all fell
down at their feet, and besought them "to wait till Caesar's arrival;
they saw that their city was taken, our works completed, and their tower
undermined, therefore they desisted from a defence; that no obstacle
could arise, to prevent their being instantly plundered at a beck, as
soon as he arrived, if they refused to submit to his orders." They
inform them that, "if the turret had entirely fallen down, the soldiers
could not be withheld from forcing into the town and sacking it, in
hopes of getting spoil." These and several other arguments to the same
effect were delivered, as they were a people of great learning, with
great pathos and lamentations.

XIII.--The lieutenants, moved with compassion, draw off the soldiers
from the work, desist from the assault, and leave sentinels on the
works. A sort of a truce having been made through compassion for the
besieged, the arrival of Caesar is anxiously awaited; not a dart was
thrown from the walls or by our men, but all remit their care and
diligence, as if the business was at an end. For Caesar had given
Trebonius strict charge not to suffer the town to be taken by storm,
lest the soldiers, too much irritated both by abhorrence of their
revolt, by the contempt shown to them, and by their long labour, should
put to the sword all the grown-up inhabitants, as they threatened to do.
And it was with difficulty that they were then restrained from breaking
into the town, and they were much displeased, because they imagined that
they were prevented by Trebonius from taking possession of it.

XIV.--But the enemy, destitute of all honour, only waited a time and
opportunity for fraud and treachery. And after an interval of some days,
when our men were careless and negligent, on a sudden, at noon, when
some were dispersed, and others indulging themselves in rest on the very
works, after the fatigue of the day, and their arms were all laid by and
covered up, they sallied out from the gates, and, the wind being high
and favourable to them, they set fire to our works; and the wind spread
it in such a manner that, in the same instant, the agger, plutei,
testudo, tower, and engines all caught the flames and were consumed
before we could conceive how it had occurred. Our men, alarmed at such
an unexpected turn of fortune, lay hold on such arms as they could find.
Some rush from the camp; an attack is made on the enemy: but they were
prevented, by arrows and engines from the walls, from pursuing them when
they fled. They retired to their walls, and there, without fear, set the
musculus and brick tower on fire. Thus, by the perfidy of the enemy and
the violence of the storm, the labour of many months was destroyed in a
moment. The Massilians made the same attempt the next day, having got
such another storm. They sallied out against the other tower and agger,
and fought with more confidence. But as our men had on the former
occasion given up all thoughts of a contest, so, warned by the event of
the preceding day, they had made every preparation for a defence.
Accordingly, they slew several, and forced the rest to retreat into the
town without effecting their design.

XV.--Trebonius began to provide and repair what had been destroyed, with
much greater zeal on the part of the soldiers; for when they saw that
their extraordinary pains and preparations had an unfortunate issue,
they were fired with indignation that, in consequence of the impious
violation of the truce, their valour should be held in derision. There
was no place left them from which the materials for their mound could be
fetched, in consequence of all the timber, far and wide, in the
territories of the Massilians, having been cut down and carried away;
they began therefore to make an agger of a new construction, never heard
of before, of two walls of brick, each six feet thick, and to lay floors
over them of almost the same breadth with the agger, made of timber. But
wherever the space between the walls, or the weakness of the timber,
seemed to require it, pillars were placed underneath and traversed beams
laid on to strengthen the work, and the space which was floored was
covered over with hurdles, and the hurdles plastered over with mortar.
The soldiers, covered overhead by the floor, on the right and left by
the wall, and in the front by the mantlets, carried whatever materials
were necessary for the building without danger: the business was soon
finished--the loss of their laborious work was soon repaired by the
dexterity and fortitude of the soldiers. Gates for making sallies were
left in the wall in such places as they thought proper.

XVI.--But when the enemy perceived that those works, which they had
hoped could not be replaced without a great length of time, were put
into so thorough repair by a few days' labour and diligence, that there
was no room for perfidy or sallies, and that no means were left them by
which they could either hurt the men by resistance or the works by fire,
and when they found by former examples that their town could be
surrounded with a wall and turrets on every part by which it was
accessible by land, in such a manner that they could not have room to
stand on their own fortifications, because our works were built almost
on the top of their walls by our army, and darts could be thrown from
our hands, and when they perceived that all advantage arising from their
engines, on which they had built great hopes, was totally lost, and that
though they had an opportunity of fighting with us on equal terms from
walls and turrets, they could perceive that they were not equal to our
men in bravery, they had recourse to the same proposals of surrender as
before.

XVII.--In Further Spain, Marcus Varro, in the beginning of the
disturbances, when he heard of the circumstances which took place in
Italy, being diffident of Pompey's success, used to speak in a very
friendly manner of Caesar. That though, being pre-engaged to Cneius
Pompey in quality of lieutenant, he was bound in honour to him, that,
nevertheless, there existed a very intimate tie between him and Caesar;
that he was not ignorant of what was the duty of a lieutenant, who bore
an office of trust; nor of his own strength, nor of the disposition of
the whole province to Caesar. These sentiments he constantly expressed
in his ordinary conversation, and did not attach himself to either
party. But afterwards, when he found that Caesar was detained before
Massilia, that the forces of Petreius had effected a junction with the
army of Afranius, that considerable reinforcements had come to their
assistance, that there were great hopes and expectations, and heard that
the whole Hither province had entered into a confederacy, and of the
difficulties to which Caesar was reduced afterwards at Ilerda for want
of provisions, and Afranius wrote to him a fuller and more exaggerated
account of these matters, he began to regulate his movements by those of
fortune.

XVIII.--He made levies throughout the province; and, having completed
his two legions, he added to them about thirty auxiliary cohorts: he
collected a large quantity of corn to send partly to the Massilians,
partly to Afranius and Petreius. He commanded the inhabitants of Gades
to build ten ships of war; besides, he took care that several others
should be built in Spain. He removed all the money and ornaments from
the temple of Hercules to the town of Gades, and sent six cohorts
thither from the province to guard them, and gave the command of the
town of Gades to Caius Gallonius, a Roman knight, and friend of
Domitius, who had come thither sent by Domitius to recover an estate for
him; and he deposited all the arms, both public and private, in
Gallonius's house. He himself [Varro] made severe harangues against
Caesar. He often pronounced from his tribunal that Caesar had fought
several unsuccessful battles, and that a great number of his men had
deserted to Afranius. That he had these accounts from undoubted
messengers, and authority on which he could rely. By these means he
terrified the Roman citizens of that province, and obliged them to
promise him for the service of the state one hundred and ninety thousand
sesterces, twenty thousand pounds weight of silver, and a hundred and
twenty thousand bushels of wheat. He laid heavier burdens on those
states which he thought were friendly disposed to Caesar, and billeted
troops on them; he passed judgment against some private persons, and
condemned to confiscation the properties of those who had spoken or made
orations against the republic, and forced the whole province to take an
oath of allegiance to him and Pompey. Being informed of all that
happened in Hither Spain, he prepared for war. This was his plan of
operations. He was to retire with his two legions to Gades, and to lay
up all the shipping and provisions there. For he had been informed that
the whole province was inclined to favour Caesar's party. He thought
that the war might be easily protracted in an island, if he was provided
with corn and shipping. Caesar, although called back to Italy by many
and important matters, yet had determined to leave no dregs of war
behind him in Spain, because he knew that Pompey had many dependants and
clients in the Hither province.

XIX.--Having therefore sent two legions into Further Spain under the
command of Quintus Cassius, tribune of the people; he himself advances
with six hundred horse by forced marches, and issues a proclamation,
appointing a day on which the magistrates and nobility of all the states
should attend him at Corduba. This proclamation being published through
the whole province, there was not a state that did not send a part of
their senate to Corduba, at the appointed time; and not a Roman citizen
of any note but appeared that day. At the same time the senate at
Corduba shut the gates of their own accord against Varro, and posted
guards and sentinels on the wall and in the turrets, and detained two
cohorts (called Colonicae, which had come there accidentally), for the
defence of the town. About the same time the people of Carmona, which is
by far the strongest state in the whole province, of themselves drove
out of the town the cohorts, and shut the gates against them, although
three cohorts had been detached by Varro to garrison the citadel.

XX.--But Varro was in greater haste on this account to reach Gades with
his legion as soon as possible, lest he should be stopped either on his
march or on crossing over to the island. The affection of the province
to Caesar proved so great and so favourable, that he received a letter
from Gades, before he was far advanced on his march: that as soon as the
nobility of Gades heard of Caesar's proclamation, they had combined with
the tribune of the cohorts, which were in garrison there, to drive
Gallonius out of the town, and to secure the city and island for Caesar.
That having agreed on the design they had sent notice to Gallonius, to
quit Gades of his own accord whilst he could do it with safety; if he
did not, they would take measures for themselves; that for fear of this
Gallonius had been induced to quit the town. When this was known, one of
Varro's two legions, which was called Vernacula, carried off the colours
from Varro's camp, he himself standing by and looking on, and retired to
Hispalis, and took post in the market and public places without doing
any injury, and the Roman citizens residing there approved so highly of
this act, that every one most earnestly offered to entertain them in
their houses. When Varro, terrified at these things, having altered his
route, proposed going to Italica, he was informed by his friends that
the gates were shut against him. Then indeed, when intercepted from
every road, he sends word to Caesar that he was ready to deliver up the
legion which he commanded. He sends to him Sextus Caesar, and orders him
to deliver it up to him. Varro, having delivered up the legion, went to
Caesar to Corduba, and having laid before him the public accounts,
handed over to him most faithfully whatever money he had, and told him
what quantity of corn and shipping he had, and where.

XXI.--Caesar made a public oration at Corduba, in which he returned
thanks to all severally: to the Roman citizens, because they had been
zealous to keep the town in their own power; to the Spaniards, for
having driven out the garrison; to the Gaditani, for having defeated the
attempts of his enemies, and asserted their own liberty; to the Tribunes
and Centurions who had gone there as a guard, for having by their valour
confirmed them in their purpose. He remitted the tax which the Roman
citizens had promised to Varro for the public use: he restored their
goods to those who he was informed had incurred that penalty by speaking
too freely, having given public and private rewards to some: he filled
the rest with flattering hopes of his future intentions; and having
stayed two days at Corduba, he set out for Gades: he ordered the money
and ornaments which had been carried away from the temple of Hercules,
and lodged in the houses of private persons, to be replaced in the
temple. He made Quintus Cassius governor of the province, and assigned
him four legions. He himself, with those ships which Marcus Varro had
built, and others which the Gaditani had built by Varro's orders,
arrived in a few days at Tarraco, where ambassadors from the greatest
part of the nearer province waited his arrival. Having in the same
manner conferred marks of honour both publicly and privately on some
states, he left Tarraco, and went thence by land to Narbo, and thence to
Massilia. There he was informed that a law was passed for creating a
dictator, and that he had been nominated dictator by Marcus Lepidus the
praetor.

XXII.--The Massilians, wearied out by misfortunes of every sort, reduced
to the lowest ebb for want of corn, conquered in two engagements at sea,
defeated in their frequent sallies, and struggling moreover with a fatal
pestilence, from their long confinement and change of victuals (for they
all subsisted on old millet and damaged barley, which they had formerly
provided and laid up in the public stores against an emergency of this
kind), their turret being demolished, a great part of their wall having
given way, and despairing of any aid, either from the provinces or their
armies, for these they had heard had fallen into Caesar's power,
resolved to surrender now without dissimulation. But a few days before,
Lucius Domitius, having discovered the intention of the Massilians, and
having procured three ships, two of which he gave up to his friends,
went on board the third himself, having got a brisk wind, put out to
sea. Some ships, which by Brutus's orders were constantly cruising near
the port, having espied him, weighed anchor, and pursued him. But of
these, the ship on board of which he was, persevered itself, and
continuing its flight, and by the aid of the wind got out of sight: the
other two, affrighted by the approach of our galleys, put back again
into the harbour. The Massilians conveyed their arms and engines out of
the town, as they were ordered: brought their ships out of the port and
docks, and delivered up the money in their treasury. When these affairs
were despatched, Caesar, sparing the town more out of regard to their
renown and antiquity than to any claim they could lay to his favour,
left two legions in garrison there, sent the rest to Italy, and set out
himself for Rome.

XXIII.--About the same time Caius Curio, having sailed from Sicily to
Africa, and from the first despising the forces of Publius Attius Varus,
transported only two of the four legions which he had received from
Caesar, and five hundred horse, and having spent two days and three
nights on the voyage, arrived at a place called Aquilaria, which is
about twenty-two miles distant from Clupea, and in the summer season has
a convenient harbour, and is enclosed by two projecting promontories.
Lucius Caesar, the son, who was waiting his arrival near Clupea with ten
ships which had been taken near Utica in a war with the pirates, and
which Publius Attius had had repaired for this war, frightened at the
number of our ships, fled the sea, and running his three-decked covered
galley on the nearest shore, left her there and made his escape by land
to Adrumetum. Caius Considius Longus, with a garrison of one legion,
guarded this town. The rest of Caesar's fleet, after his flight, retired
to Adrumetum. Marcus Rufus, the quaestor, pursued him with twelve ships,
which Curio had brought from Sicily as convoy to the merchantmen, and
seeing a ship left on the shore, he brought her off by a towing rope,
and returned with his fleet to Curio.

XXIV.--Curio detached Marcus before with the fleet to Utica, and marched
thither with his army. Having advanced two days, he came to the river
Bagrada, and there left Caius Caninius Rebilus, the lieutenant, with the
legions; and went forward himself with the horse to view the Cornelian
camp, because that was reckoned a very eligible position for encamping.
It is a straight ridge, projecting into the sea, steep and rough on both
sides, but the ascent is more gentle on that part which lies opposite
Utica. It is not more than a mile distant from Utica in a direct line.
But on this road there is a spring, to which the sea comes up, and
overflows; an extensive morass is thereby formed; and if a person would
avoid it, he must make a circuit of six miles to reach the town.

XXV.--Having examined this place, Curio got a view of Varus's camp,
joining the wall and town, at the gate called Bellica, well fortified by
its natural situation, on one side by the town itself, on the other by a
theatre which is before the town, the approaches to the town being
rendered difficult and narrow by the very extensive out-buildings of
that structure. At the same time he observed the roads very full of
carriages and cattle which they were conveying from the country into the
town on the sudden alarm. He sent his cavalry after them to plunder them
and get the spoil. And at the same time Varus had detached as a guard
for them six hundred Numidian horse, and four hundred foot, which king
Juba had sent to Utica as auxiliaries a few days before. There was a
friendship subsisting between his [Juba's] father and Pompey, and a feud
between him and Curio, because he, when a tribune of the people, had
proposed a law, in which he endeavoured to make public property of the
kingdom of Juba. The horse engaged; but the Numidians were not able to
stand our first charge; but a hundred and twenty being killed, the rest
retreated into their camp near the town. In the meantime, on the arrival
of his men-of-war, Curio ordered proclamation to be made to the merchant
ships, which lay at anchor before Utica, in number about two hundred,
that he would treat as enemies all that did not set sail immediately for
the Cornelian camp. As soon as the proclamation was made, in an instant
they all weighed anchor and left Utica, and repaired to the place
commanded them. This circumstance furnished the army with plenty of
everything.

XXVI.--After these transactions, Curio returned to his camp at Bagrada;
and by a general shout of the whole army was saluted imperator. The next
day he led his army to Utica, and encamped near the town. Before the
works of the camp were finished, the horse upon guard brought him word
that a large supply of horse and foot sent by king Juba were on their
march to Utica, and at the same time a cloud of dust was observed, and
in a moment the front of the line was in sight. Curio, surprised at the
suddenness of the affair, sent on the horse to receive their first
charge, and detain them. He immediately called off his legions from the
work, and put them in battle array. The horse began the battle: and
before the legions could be completely marshalled and take their ground,
the king's entire forces being thrown into disorder and confusion,
because they had marched without any order, and were under no
apprehensions, betake themselves to flight: almost all the enemy's horse
being safe, because they made a speedy retreat into the town along the
shore, Caesar's soldiers slay a great number of their infantry.

XXVII.--The next night two Marsian centurions, with twenty-two men
belonging to the companies, deserted from Curio's camp to Attius Varus.
They, whether they uttered the sentiments which they really entertained,
or wished to gratify Varus (for what we wish we readily give credit to,
and what we think ourselves, we hope is the opinion of other men),
assured him, that the minds of the whole army were disaffected to Curio,
that it was very expedient that the armies should be brought in view of
each other, and an opportunity of a conference be given. Induced by
their opinion, Varus the next day led his troops out of the camp: Curio
did so in like manner, and with only one small valley between them, each
drew up his forces.

XXVIII.--In Varus's army there was one Sextus Quintilius Varus who, as
we have mentioned before, was at Corfinium. When Caesar gave him his
liberty, he went over to Africa; now, Curio had transported to Africa
those legions which Caesar had received under his command a short time
before at Corfinium: so that the officers and companies were still the
same, excepting the change of a few centurions. Quintilius, making this
a pretext for addressing them, began to go round Curio's lines, and to
entreat the soldiers "not to lose all recollection of the oath which
they took first to Domitius and to him their quaestor, nor bear arms
against those who had shared the same fortune, and endured the same
hardships in a siege, nor fight for those by whom they had been
opprobriously called deserters." To this he added a few words by way of
encouragement, what they might expect from his own liberality, if they
should follow him and Attius. On the delivery of this speech, no
intimation of their future conduct is given by Curio's army, and thus
both generals led back their troops to their camp.

XXIX.--However, a great and general fear spread through Curio's camp,
for it is soon increased by the various discourses of men. For every one
formed an opinion of his own; and to what he had heard from others,
added his own apprehensions. When this had spread from a single author
to several persons, and was handed from one another, there appeared to
be many authors for such sentiments as these: ["That it was a civil war;
that they were men; and therefore that it was lawful for them to act
freely, and follow which party they pleased." These were the legions
which a short time before had belonged to the enemy; for the custom of
offering free towns to those who joined the opposite party had changed
Caesar's kindness. For the harshest expressions of the soldiers in
general did not proceed from the Marsi and Peligni, as those which
passed in the tents the night before; and some of their fellow soldiers
heard them with displeasure. Some additions were also made to them by
those who wished to be thought more zealous in their duty.]

XXX.--For these reasons, having called a council, Curio began to
deliberate on the general welfare. There were some opinions, which
advised by all means an attempt to be made, and an attack on Varus's
camp; for when such sentiments prevailed among the soldiers, they
thought idleness was improper. In short, they said, "that it was better
bravely to try the hazard of war in a battle, than to be deserted and
surrounded by their own troops, and forced to submit to the greatest
cruelties." There were some who gave their opinion, that they ought to
withdraw at the third watch to the Cornelian camp; that by a longer
interval of time the soldiers might be brought to a proper way of
thinking; and also, that if any misfortune should befall them, they
might have a safer and readier retreat to Sicily, from the great number
of their ships.

XXXI.--Curio, censuring both measures, said, "that the one was as
deficient in spirit, as the other exceeded in it: that the latter
advised a shameful flight, and the former recommended us to engage at a
great disadvantage. For on what, says he, can we rely that we can storm
a camp, fortified both by nature and art? Or, indeed, what advantage do
we gain if we give over the assault, after having suffered considerable
loss; as if success did not acquire for a general the affection of his
army, and misfortune their hatred? But what does a change of camp imply
but a shameful flight, and universal despair, and the alienation of the
army? For neither ought the obedient to suspect that they are
distrusted, nor the insolent to know that we fear them; because our
fears augment the licentiousness of the latter, and diminish the zeal of
the former. But if, says he, we were convinced of the truth of the
reports of the disaffection of the army (which I indeed am confident are
either altogether groundless, or at least less than they are supposed to
be), how much better to conceal and hide our suspicions of it, than by
our conduct confirm it? Ought not the defects of an army to be as
carefully concealed as the wounds in our bodies, lest we should increase
the enemy's hopes? but they moreover advise us to set out at midnight,
in order, I suppose, that those who attempt to do wrong may have a
fairer opportunity; for conduct of this kind is restrained either by
shame or fear, to the display of which the night is most adverse.
Wherefore, I am neither so rash as to give my opinion that we ought to
attack their camp without hopes of succeeding; nor so influenced by fear
as to despond: and I imagine that every expedient ought first to be
tried; and I am in a great degree confident that I shall form the same
opinion as yourselves on this matter."

XXXII.--Having broken up the council he called the soldiers together,
and reminded them "what advantage Caesar had derived from their zeal at
Corfinium; how by their good offices and influence he had brought over a
great part of Italy to his interest. For, says he, all the municipal
towns afterwards imitated you and your conduct; nor was it without
reason that Caesar judged so favourably, and the enemy so harshly of
you. For Pompey, though beaten in no engagement, yet was obliged to
shift his ground, and leave Italy, from the precedent established by
your conduct. Caesar committed me, whom he considered his dearest
friend, and the provinces of Sicily and Africa, without which he was not
able to protect Rome or Italy, to your protection. There are some here
present who encourage you to revolt from us; for what can they wish for
more, than at once to ruin us, and to involve you in a heinous crime? or
what baser opinions could they in their resentment entertain of you,
than that you would betray those who acknowledged themselves indebted to
you for everything, and put yourselves in the power of those who think
they have been ruined by you? Have you not heard of Caesar's exploits in
Spain? that he routed two armies, conquered two generals, recovered two
provinces, and effected all this within forty days after he came in
sight of the enemy? Can those who were not able to stand against him
whilst they were uninjured resist him when they are ruined? Will you,
who took part with Caesar whilst victory was uncertain, take part with
the conquered enemy when the fortune of the war is decided, and when you
ought to reap the reward of your services? For they say that they have
been deserted and betrayed by you, and remind you of a former oath. But
did you desert Lucius Domitius, or did Lucius Domitius desert you? Did
he not, when you were ready to submit to the greatest difficulties, cast
you off? Did he not, without your privacy, endeavour to effect his own
escape? When you were betrayed by him, were you not preserved by
Caesar's generosity? And how could he think you bound by your oath to
him, when, after having thrown up the ensigns of power, and abdicated
his government, he became a private person, and a captive in another's
power? A new obligation is left upon you, that you should disregard the
oath, by which you are at present bound; and have respect only to that
which was invalidated by the surrender of your general, and his
diminution of rank. But I suppose, although you are pleased with Caesar,
you are offended with me; however I shall not boast of my services to
you, which still are inferior to my own wishes or your expectations.
But, however, soldiers have ever looked for the rewards of labour at the
conclusion of a war; and what the issue of it is likely to be, not even
you can doubt. But why should I omit to mention my own diligence and
good fortune, and to what a happy crisis affairs are now arrived? Are
you sorry that I transported the army safe and entire, without the loss
of a single ship? That on my arrival, in the very first attack, I routed
the enemy's fleet? That twice in two days I defeated the enemy's horse?
That I carried out of the very harbour and bay, two hundred of the
enemy's victuallers, and reduced them to that situation that they can
receive no supplies either by land or sea? Will you divorce yourselves
from this fortune and these generals; and prefer the disgrace of
Corfinium, the defeat of Italy, the surrender of both Spains, and the
prestige of the African war? I, for my part, wished to be called a
soldier of Caesar's; you honoured me with the title of Imperator. If you
repent your bounty, I give it back to you; restore to me my former name
that you may not appear to have conferred the honour on me as a
reproach."

XXXIII.--The soldiers, being affected by this oration, frequently
attempted to interrupt him whilst he was speaking, so that they appeared
to bear with excessive anguish the suspicion of treachery, and when he
was leaving the assembly they unanimously besought him to be of good
spirits, and not hesitate to engage the enemy and put their fidelity and
courage to a trial. As the wishes and opinions of all were changed by
this act, Curio, with the general consent, determined, whenever
opportunity offered, to hazard a battle. The next day he led out his
forces and ranged them in order of battle on the same ground where they
had been posted the preceding day; nor did Attius Varus hesitate to draw
out his men, that, if any occasion should offer, either to tamper with
our men or to engage on equal terms, he might not miss the opportunity.

XXXIV.-There lay between the two armies a valley, as already mentioned,
not very deep, but of a difficult and steep ascent. Each was waiting
till the enemy's forces should to attempt to pass it, that they might
engage with the advantage of the ground. At the same time, on the left
wing, the entire cavalry of Publius Attius, and several light-armed
infantry intermixed with them, were perceived descending into the
valley. Against them Curio detached his cavalry and two cohorts of the
Marrucini, whose first charge the enemy's horse were unable to stand,
but, setting spurs to their horses, fled back to their friends: the
light-infantry being deserted by those who had come out along with them,
were surrounded and cut to pieces by our men. Varus's whole army, facing
that way, saw their men flee and cut down. Upon which Rebilus, one of
Caesar's lieutenants, whom Curio had brought with him from Sicily
knowing that he had great experience in military matters, cried out,
"You see the enemy are daunted, Curio! why do you hesitate to take
advantage of the opportunity?" Curio, having merely "expressed this,
that the soldiers should keep in mind the professions which they had
made to him the day before," then ordered them to follow him, and ran
far before them all. The valley was so difficult of ascent that the
foremost men could not struggle up it unless assisted by those behind.
But the minds of Attius's soldiers being prepossessed with fear and the
flight and slaughter of their men, never thought of opposing us; and
they all imagined that they were already surrounded by our horse, and,
therefore, before a dart could be thrown or our men come near them,
Varus's whole army turned their backs and retreated to their camp.

XXXV.-In this flight one Fabius, a Pelignian and common soldier in
Curio's army, pursuing the enemy's rear, with a loud voice shouted to
Varus by his name, and often called him, so that he seemed to be one of
his soldiers, who wished to speak to him and give him advice. When
Varus, after being repeatedly called, stopped and looked at him, and
inquired who he was and what he wanted, he made a blow with his sword at
his naked shoulder and was very near killing Varus, but he escaped the
danger by raising his shield to ward off the blow. Fabius was surrounded
by the soldiers near him and cut to pieces; and by the multitude and
crowds of those that fled, the gates of the camps were thronged and the
passage stopped, and a greater number perished in that place without a
stroke than in the battle and flight. Nor were we far from driving them
from this camp; and some of them ran straightway to the town without
halting. But both the nature of the ground and the strength of the
fortifications prevented our access to the camp; for Curio's soldiers,
marching out to battle, were without those things which were requisite
for storming a camp. Curio, therefore, led his army back to the camp,
with all his troops safe except Fabius. Of the enemy about six hundred
were killed and a thousand wounded, all of whom, after Curio's return,
and several more under pretext of their wounds, but in fact through
fear, withdrew from the camp into the town, which Varus perceiving and
knowing the terror of his army, leaving a trumpeter in his camp and a
few tents for show, at the third watch led back his army quietly into
the town.

XXXVI.--The next day Curio resolved to besiege Utica, and to draw lines
about it. In the town there was a multitude of people, ignorant of war,
owing to the length of the peace; some of them Uticans, very well
inclined to Caesar, for his favours to them; the Roman population was
composed of persons differing widely in their sentiments. The terror
occasioned by former battles was very great; and therefore they openly
talked of surrendering, and argued with Attius that he should not suffer
the fortune of them all to be ruined by his obstinacy. Whilst these
things were in agitation, couriers, who had been sent forward, arrived
from king Juba, with the intelligence that he was on his march, with
considerable forces, and encouraged them to protect and defend their
city, a circumstance which greatly comforted their desponding hearts.

XXXVII.--The same intelligence was brought to Curio; but for some time
he could not give credit to it, because he had so great confidence in
his own good fortune. And at this time Caesar's success in Spain was
announced in Africa by messages and letters. Being elated by all these
things, he imagined that the king would not dare to attempt anything
against him. But when he found out, from undoubted authority, that his
forces were less than twenty miles distant from Utica, abandoning his
works, he retired to the Cornelian camp. Here he began to lay in corn
and wood, and to fortify his camp, and immediately despatched orders to
Sicily, that his two legions and the remainder of his cavalry should be
sent to him. His camp was well adapted for protracting a war, from the
nature and strength of the situation, from its proximity to the sea, and
the abundance of water and salt, of which a great quantity had been
stored up from the neighbouring salt-pits. Timber could not fail him
from the number of trees, nor corn, with which the lands abounded.
Wherefore, with the general consent, Curio determined to wait for the
rest of his forces, and protract the war.

XXXVIII.--This plan being settled, and his conduct approved of, he is
informed by some deserters from the town that Juba had stayed behind in
his own kingdom, being called home by a neighbouring war, and a dispute
with the people of Leptis; and that Sabura, his commander-in-chief, who
had been sent with a small force, was drawing near to Utica. Curio
rashly believing this information, altered his design, and resolved to
hazard a battle. His youth, his spirits, his former good fortune and
confidence of success, contributed much to confirm this resolution.
Induced by these motives, early in the night he sent all his cavalry to
the enemy's camp near the river Bagrada, of which Sabura, of whom we
have already spoken, was the commander. But the king was coming after
them with all his forces, and was posted at a distance of six miles
behind Sabura. The horse that were sent perform their march that night,
and attack the enemy unawares and unexpectedly; for the Numidians, after
the usual barbarous custom, encamped here and there without any
regularity. The cavalry having attacked them, when sunk in sleep and
dispersed, killed a great number of them; many were frightened and ran
away. After which the horse returned to Curio, and brought some
prisoners with them.

XXXIX.--Curio had set out at the fourth watch with all his forces,
except five cohorts which he left to guard the camp. Having advanced six
miles, he met the horse, heard what had happened, and inquired from the
captives who commanded the camp at Bagrada. They replied Sabura. Through
eagerness to perform his journey, he neglected to make further
inquiries, but looking back to the company next him, "Don't you see,
soldiers," says he, "that the answer of the prisoners corresponds with
the account of the deserters, that the king is not with him, and that he
sent only a small force which was not able to withstand a few horse?
Hasten then to spoil, to glory; that we may now begin to think of
rewarding you, and returning you thanks." The achievements of the horse
were great in themselves, especially if their small number be compared
with the vast host of Numidians. However, the account was enlarged by
themselves, as men are naturally inclined to boast of their own merit.
Besides, many spoils were produced; the men and horses that were taken
were brought into their sight, that they might imagine that every moment
of time which intervened was a delay to their conquest. By this means
the hopes of Curio were seconded by the ardour of the soldiers. He
ordered the horse to follow him, and hastened his march, that he might
attack them as soon as possible, while in consternation after their
flight. But the horse, fatigued by the expedition of the preceding
night, were not able to keep up with him, but fell behind in different
places. Even this did not abate Curio's hopes.

XL.--Juba, being informed by Sabura of the battle in the night, sent to
his relief two thousand Spanish and Gallic horse, which he was
accustomed to keep near him to guard his person, and that part of his
infantry on which he had the greatest dependence, and he himself
followed slowly after with the rest of his forces and forty elephants,
suspecting that as Curio had sent his horse before, he himself would
follow them. Sabura drew up his army, both horse and foot, and commanded
them to give way gradually and retreat through the pretence of fear;
that when it was necessary he would give them the signal for battle, and
such orders as he found circumstances required. Curio, as his idea of
their present behaviour was calculated to confirm his former hopes,
imagined that the enemy were running away, and led his army from the
rising grounds down to the plain.

XLI.--And when he had advanced from this place about sixteen miles, his
army being exhausted with the fatigue, he halted. Sabura gave his men
the signal, marshalled his army, and began to go around his ranks and
encourage them. But he made use of the foot only for show; and sent the
horse to the charge: Curio was not deficient in skill, and encouraged
his men to rest all their hopes in their valour. Neither were the
soldiers, though wearied, nor the horse, though few and exhausted with
fatigue, deficient in ardour to engage, and courage: but the latter were
in number but two hundred: the rest had dropped behind on the march.
Wherever they charged they forced the enemy to give ground, but they
were not able to pursue them far when they fled, or to press their
horses too severely. Besides, the enemy's cavalry began to surround us
on both wings and to trample down our rear. When any cohorts ran forward
out of the line, the Numidians, being fresh, by their speed avoided our
charge, and surrounded ours when they attempted to return to their post,
and cut them off from the main body. So that it did not appear safe
either to keep their ground and maintain their ranks, or to issue from
the line, and run the risk. The enemy's troops were frequently
reinforced by assistance sent from Juba; strength began to fail our men
through fatigue; and those who had been wounded could neither quit the
field nor retire to a place of safety, because the whole field was
surrounded by the enemy's cavalry. Therefore, despairing of their own
safety, as men usually do in the last moment of their lives, they either
lamented their unhappy deaths, or recommended their parents to the
survivors, if fortune should save any from the impending danger. All
were full of fear and grief.

XLII.--When Curio perceived that in the general consternation neither
his exhortations nor entreaties were attended to, imagining that the
only hope of escaping in their deplorable situation was to gain the
nearest hills, he ordered the colours to be borne that way. But a party
of horse, that had been sent by Sabura, had already got possession of
them. Now indeed our men were reduced to extreme despair: and some of
them were killed by the cavalry in attempting to escape: some fell to
the ground unhurt. Cneius Domitius, commander of the cavalry, standing
round Curio with a small party of horse, urged Curio to endeavour to
escape by flight, and to hasten to his camp; and assured him that he
would not forsake him. But Curio declared that he would never more
appear in Caesar's sight, after losing the army which had been committed
by Caesar to his charge, and accordingly fought till he was killed. Very
few of the horse escaped from that battle, but those who had stayed
behind to refresh their horses having perceived at a distance the defeat
of the whole army, retired in safety to their camp.

XLIII.--The soldiers were all killed to a man. Marcus Rufus, the
quaestor, who was left behind in the camp by Curio, having got
intelligence of these things, encouraged his men not to be disheartened.
They beg and entreat to be transported to Sicily. He consented, and
ordered the masters of the ships to have all the boats brought close to
the shore early in the evening. But so great was the terror in general
that some said that Juba's forces were marching up, others that Varus
was hastening with his legions, and that they already saw the dust
raised by their coming; of which not one circumstance had happened:
others suspected that the enemy's fleet would immediately be upon them.
Therefore, in the general consternation, every man consulted his own
safety. Those who were on board of the fleet, were in a hurry to set
sail, and their flight hastened the masters of the ships of burden. A
few small fishing boats attended their duty and his orders. But as the
shores were crowded, so great was the struggle to determine who of such
a vast number should first get on board, that some of the vessels sank
with the weight of the multitude, and the fears of the rest delayed them
from coming to the shore.

XLIV.--From which circumstances it happened that a few foot and aged
men, that could prevail either through interest or pity, or who were
able to swim to the ships, were taken on board, and landed safe in
Sicily. The rest of the troops sent their centurions as deputies to
Varus at night, and surrendered themselves to him. But Juba, the next
day having spied their cohorts before the town, claimed them as his
booty, and ordered a great part of them to be put to the sword; a few he
selected and sent home to his own realm. Although Varus complained that
his honour was insulted by Juba, yet he dare not oppose him: Juba rode
on horseback into the town, attended by several senators, amongst whom
were Servius Sulpicius and Licinius Damasippus, and in a few days
arranged and ordered what he would have done in Utica, and in a few days
more returned to his own kingdom, with all his forces.



BOOK III

I.--Julius Caesar, holding the election as dictator, was himself
appointed consul with Publius Servilius; for this was the year in which
it was permitted by the laws that he should be chosen consul. This
business being ended, as credit was beginning to fail in Italy, and the
debts could not be paid, he determined that arbitrators should be
appointed: and that they should make an estimate of the possessions and
properties [of the debtors], how much they were worth before the war,
and that they should be handed over in payment to the creditors. This he
thought the most likely method to remove and abate the apprehension of
an abolition of debt, the usual consequence of civil wars and
dissensions, and to support the credit of the debtors. He likewise
restored to their former condition (the praetors and tribunes first
submitting the question to the people) some persons condemned for
bribery at the elections, by virtue of Pompey's law, at the time when
Pompey kept his legions quartered in the city (these trials were
finished in a single day, one judge hearing the merits, and another
pronouncing the sentences), because they had offered their service to
him in the beginning of the civil war, if he chose to accept them;
setting the same value on them as if he had accepted them, because they
had put themselves in his power. For he had determined that they ought
to be restored, rather by the judgment of the people, than appear
admitted to it by his bounty: that he might neither appear ungrateful in
repaying an obligation, nor arrogant in depriving the people of their
prerogative of exercising this bounty.

II.--In accomplishing these things, and celebrating the Latin festival,
and holding all the elections, he spent eleven days; and having resigned
the dictatorship, set out from the city, and went to Brundisium, where
he had ordered twelve legions and all his cavalry to meet him. But he
scarcely found as many ships as would be sufficient to transport fifteen
thousand legionary soldiers and five hundred horse. This [the scarcity
of shipping] was the only thing that prevented Caesar from putting a
speedy conclusion to the war. And even these troops embarked very short
of their number, because several had fallen in so many wars in Gaul, and
the long march from Spain had lessened their number very much, and a
severe autumn in Apulia and the district about Brundisium, after the
very wholesome countries of Spain and Gaul, had impaired the health of
the whole army.

III.--Pompey having got a year's respite to provide forces, during which
he was not engaged in war, nor employed by an enemy, had collected a
numerous fleet from Asia, and the Cyclades, from Corcyra, Athens,
Pontus, Bithynia, Syria, Cilicia, Phoenicia, and Egypt, and had given
directions that a great number should be built in every other place. He
had exacted a large sum of money from Asia, Syria, and all the kings,
dynasts, tetrarchs, and free states of Achaia; and had obliged the
corporations of those provinces, of which he himself had the government,
to count down to him a large sum.

IV.--He had made up nine legions of Roman citizens; five from Italy,
which he had brought with him; one veteran legion from Sicily, which
being composed of two, he called the Gemella; one from Crete and
Macedonia, of veterans who had been discharged by their former generals,
and had settled in those provinces; two from Asia, which had been levied
by the activity of Lentulus. Besides he had distributed among his
legions a considerable number, by way of recruits, from Thessaly,
Boeotia, Achaia, and Epirus: with his legions he also intermixed the
soldiers taken from Caius Antonius. Besides these, he expected two
legions from Syria, with Scipio; from Crete, Lacedaemon, Pontus, Syria,
and other states, he got about three thousand archers, six cohorts of
slingers, two thousand mercenary soldiers, and seven thousand horse; six
hundred of which, Deiotarus had brought from Gaul; Ariobarzanes, five
hundred from Cappadocia. Cotus had given him about the same number from
Thrace, and had sent his son Sadalis with them. From Macedonia there
were two hundred, of extraordinary valour, commanded by Rascipolis; five
hundred Gauls and Germans; Gabinius's troops from Alexandria, whom Aulus
Gabinius had left with king Ptolemy, to guard his person. Pompey, the
son, had brought in his fleet eight hundred, whom he had raised among
his own and his shepherds' slaves. Tarcundarius, Castor and Donilaus had
given three hundred from Gallograecia: one of these came himself, the
other sent his son. Two hundred were sent from Syria by Comagenus
Antiochus, whom Pompey rewarded amply. The most of them were archers. To
these were added Dardanians, and Bessians, some of them mercenaries;
others procured by power and influence: also, Macedonians, Thessalians,
and troops from other nations and states, which completed the number
which we mentioned before.

V.--He had laid in vast quantities of corn from Thessaly, Asia, Egypt,
Crete, Cyrene, and other countries. He had resolved to fix his winter
quarters at Dyrrachium, Apollonia, and the other sea-ports, to hinder
Caesar from passing the sea: and for this purpose had stationed his
fleet along the sea-coast. The Egyptian fleet was commanded by Pompey,
the son: the Asiatic, by Decimus Laelius, and Caius Triarius: the
Syrian, by Caius Cassius: the Rhodian, by Caius Marcellus, in
conjunction with Caius Coponius; and the Liburnian, and Achaian, by
Scribonius Libo, and Marcus Octavius. But Marcus Bibulus was appointed
commander-in-chief of the whole maritime department, and regulated every
matter. The chief direction rested upon him.

VI.--When Caesar came to Brundisium, he made a speech to the soldiers:
"That since they were now almost arrived at the termination of their
toils and dangers, they should patiently submit to leave their slaves
and baggage in Italy, and to embark without luggage, that a greater
number of men might be put on board: that they might expect everything
from victory and his liberality." They cried out with one voice, "he
might give what orders he pleased, that they would cheerfully fulfil
them." He accordingly set sail the fourth day of January, with seven
legions on board, as already remarked. The next day he reached land,
between the Ceraunian rocks and other dangerous places; meeting with a
safe road for his shipping to ride in, and dreading all other ports
which he imagined were in possession of the enemy, he landed his men at
a place called Pharsalus, without the loss of a single vessel.

VII.--Lucretius Vespillo and Minutius Rufus were at Oricum, with
eighteen Asiatic ships, which were given into their charge by the orders
of Decimus Laelius: Marcus Bibulus at Corcyra, with a hundred and ten
ships. But they had not the confidence to dare to move out of the
harbour; though Caesar had brought only twelve ships as a convoy, only
four of which had decks; nor did Bibulus, his fleet being disordered and
his seamen dispersed, come up in time: for Caesar was seen at the
continent before any account whatsoever of his approach had reached
those regions.

VIII.--Caesar, having landed his soldiers, sent back his ships the same
night to Brundisium, to transport the rest of his legions and cavalry.
The charge of this business was committed to lieutenant Fufius Kalenus,
with orders to be expeditious in transporting the legions. But the ships
having put to sea too late, and not having taken advantage of the night
breeze, fell a sacrifice on their return. For Bibulus, at Corcyra, being
informed of Caesar's approach, hoped to fall in with some part of our
ships, with their cargoes, but found them empty; and having taken about
thirty, vented on them his rage at his own remissness, and set them all
on fire: and, with the same flames, he destroyed the mariners and
masters of the vessels, hoping by the severity of the punishment to
deter the rest. Having accomplished this affair, he filled all the
harbours and shores from Salona to Oricum with his fleets. Having
disposed his guard with great care, he lay on board himself in the depth
of winter, declining no fatigue or duty, and not waiting for
reinforcements, in hopes that he might come within Caesar's reach.

IX.--But after the departure of the Liburnian fleet, Marcus Octavius
sailed from Illyricum with what ships he had to Salona; and having
spirited up the Dalmatians, and other barbarous nations, he drew Issa
off from its connection with Caesar; but not being able to prevail with
the council of Salona, either by promises or menaces, he resolved to
storm the town. But it was well fortified by its natural situation, and
a hill. The Roman citizens built wooden towers, the better to secure it;
but when they were unable to resist, on account of the smallness of
their numbers, being weakened by several wounds, they stooped to the
last resource, and set at liberty all the slaves old enough to bear
arms; and cutting the hair off the women's heads, made ropes for their
engines. Octavius, being informed of their determination, surrounded the
town with five encampments, and began to press them at once with a siege
and storm. They were determined to endure every hardship, and their
greatest distress was the want of corn. They, therefore, sent deputies
to Caesar, and begged a supply from him; all other inconveniences they
bore by their own resources, as well as they could: and after a long
interval, when the length of the siege had made Octavius's troops more
remiss than usual, having got an opportunity at noon, when the enemy
were dispersed, they disposed their wives and children on the walls, to
keep up the appearance of their usual attention; and forming themselves
into one body, with the slaves whom they had lately enfranchised, they
made an attack on Octavius's nearest camp, and having forced that,
attacked the second with the same fury; and then the third and the
fourth, and then the other, and beat them from them all: and having
killed a great number, obliged the rest and Octavius himself to fly for
refuge to their ships. This put an end to the blockade. Winter was now
approaching, and Octavius, despairing of capturing the town, after
sustaining such considerable losses, withdrew to Pompey, to Dyrrachium.

X.--We have mentioned that Vibullius Rufus, an officer of Pompey's, had
fallen twice into Caesar's power; first at Corfinium, and afterwards in
Spain. Caesar thought him a proper person, on account of his favours
conferred on him, to send with proposals to Pompey: and he knew that he
had an influence over Pompey. This was the substance of his proposals:
"That it was the duty of both, to put an end to their obstinacy, and
forbear hostilities, and not tempt fortune any further; that sufficient
loss had been suffered on both sides, to serve as a lesson and
instruction to them, to render them apprehensive of future calamities,
by Pompey, in having been driven out of Italy, and having lost Sicily,
Sardinia, and the two Spains, and one hundred and thirty cohorts of
Roman citizens, in Italy and Spain: by himself, in the death of Curio,
and the loss of so great an army in Africa, and the surrender of his
soldiers in Corcyra. Wherefore, they should have pity on themselves, and
the republic: for, from their own misfortunes, they had sufficient
experience of what fortune can effect in war. That this was the only
time to treat of peace; when each had confidence in his own strength,
and both seemed on an equal footing. Since, if fortune showed ever so
little favour to either, he who thought himself superior, would not
submit to terms of accommodation; nor would he be content with an equal
division, when he might expect to obtain the whole. That, as they could
not agree before, the terms of peace ought to be submitted to the senate
and people in Rome. That in the meantime, it ought to content the
republic and themselves, if they both immediately took oath in a public
assembly, that they would disband their forces within the three
following days. That having divested themselves of the arms and
auxiliaries, on which they placed their present confidence, they must
both of necessity acquiesce in the decision of the people and senate. To
give Pompey the fuller assurance of his intentions, he would dismiss all
his forces on land, even his garrisons.

XI.--Vibullius, having received this commission from Caesar, thought it
no less necessary to give Pompey notice of Caesar's sudden approach,
that he might adopt such plans as the circumstance required, than to
inform him of Caesar's message; and therefore continuing his journey by
night as well as by day, and taking fresh horses for despatch, he posted
away to Pompey, to inform him that Caesar was marching towards him with
all his forces. Pompey was at this time in Candavia, and was on his
march from Macedonia to his winter quarters in Apollonia and Dyrrachium;
but surprised at the unexpected news, he determined to go to Apollonia
by speedy marches, to prevent Caesar from becoming master of all the
maritime states. But as soon as Caesar had landed his troops, he set off
the same day for Oricum: when he arrived there, Lucius Torquatus, who
was governor of the town by Pompey's appointment, and had a garrison of
Parthinians in it, endeavoured to shut the gates and defend the town,
and ordered the Greeks to man the walls, and to take arms. But as they
refused to fight against the power of the Roman people, and as the
citizens made a spontaneous attempt to admit Caesar, despairing of any
assistance, he threw open the gates, and surrendered himself and the
town to Caesar, and was preserved safe from injury by him.

XII.--Having taken Oricum, Caesar marched without making any delay to
Apollonia. Staberius the governor, hearing of his approach, began to
bring water into the citadel, and to fortify it, and to demand hostages
of the town's people. But they refuse to give any, or to shut their
gates against the consul, or to take upon them to judge contrary to what
all Italy and the Roman people had judged. As soon as he knew their
inclinations, he made his escape privately. The inhabitants of Apollonia
sent ambassadors to Caesar, and gave him admission into their town.
Their example was followed by the inhabitants of Bullis, Amantia, and
the other neighbouring states, and all Epirus: and they sent ambassadors
to Caesar, and promised to obey his commands.

XIII.--But Pompey having received information of the transactions at
Oricum and Apollonia, began to be alarmed for Dyrrachium, and
endeavoured to reach it, marching day and night. As soon as it was said
that Caesar was approaching, such a panic fell upon Pompey's army,
because in his haste he had made no distinction between night and day,
and had marched without intermission, that they almost every man
deserted their colours in Epirus and the neighbouring countries; several
threw down their arms, and their march had the appearance of a flight.
But when Pompey had halted near Dyrrachium, and had given orders for
measuring out the ground for his camp, his army even yet continuing in
their fright, Labienus first stepped forward and swore that he would
never desert him, and would share whatever fate fortune should assign to
him. The other lieutenants took the same oath, and the tribunes and
centurions followed their example: and the whole army swore in like
manner. Caesar, finding the road to Dyrrachium already in the possession
of Pompey, was in no great haste, but encamped by the river Apsus, in
the territory of Apollonia, that the states which had deserved his
support might be certain of protection from his out-guards and forts;
and there he resolved to wait the arrival of his other legions from
Italy, and to winter in tents. Pompey did the same; and pitching his
camp on the other side of the river Apsus, collected there all his
troops and auxiliaries.

XIV.--Kalenus, having put the legions and cavalry on board at
Brundisium, as Caesar had directed him, as far as the number of his
ships allowed, weighed anchor: and having sailed a little distance from
port, received a letter from Caesar, in which he was informed, that all
the ports and the whole shore was occupied by the enemy's fleet: on
receiving this information he returned into the harbour, and recalled
all the vessels. One of them, which continued the voyage and did not
obey Kalenus's command, because it carried no troops, but was private
property, bore away for Oricum, and was taken by Bibulus, who spared
neither slaves nor free men, nor even children; but put all to the
sword. Thus the safety of the whole army depended on a very short space
of time and a great casualty.

XV.--Bibulus, as has been observed before, lay with his fleet near
Oricum, and as he debarred Caesar of the liberty of the sea and
harbours, so he was deprived of all intercourse with the country by
land; for the whole shore was occupied by parties disposed in different
places by Caesar. And he was not allowed to get either wood or water, or
even anchor near the land. He was reduced to great difficulties, and
distressed with extreme scarcity of every necessary; insomuch that he
was obliged to bring, in transports from Corcyra, not only provisions,
but even wood and water; and it once happened that, meeting with violent
storms, they were forced to catch the dew by night which fell on the
hides that covered their decks; yet all these difficulties they bore
patiently and without repining, and thought they ought not to leave the
shores and harbours free from blockade. But when they were suffering
under the distress which I have mentioned, and Libo had joined Bibulus,
they both called from on ship-board to Marcus Acilius and Statius
Marcus, the lieutenants, one of whom commanded the town, the other the
guards on the coast, that they wished to speak to Caesar on affairs of
importance, if permission should be granted them. They add something
further to strengthen the impression that they intended to treat about
an accommodation. In the meantime they requested a truce, and obtained
it from them; for what they proposed seemed to be of importance, and it
was well known that Caesar desired it above all things, and it was
imagined that some advantage would be derived from Bibulus's proposals.

XVI.--Caesar having set out with one legion to gain possession of the
more remote states, and to provide corn, of which he had but a small
quantity, was at this time at Buthrotum, opposite to Corcyra. There
receiving Acilius and Marcus's letters, informing him of Libo's and
Bibulus's demands, he left his legion behind him, and returned himself
to Oricum. When he arrived, they were invited to a conference. Libo came
and made an apology for Bibulus, "that he was a man of strong passion,
and had a private quarrel against Caesar, contracted when he was aedile
and praetor; that for this reason he had avoided the conference, lest
affairs of the utmost importance and advantage might be impeded by the
warmth of his temper. That it now was and ever had been Pompey's most
earnest wish, that they should be reconciled, and lay down their arms;
but they were not authorized to treat on that subject, because they
resigned the whole management of the war, and all other matters, to
Pompey, by order of the council. But when they were acquainted with
Caesar's demands, they would transmit them to Pompey, who would conclude
all of himself by their persuasions. In the meantime, let the truce be
continued till the messengers could return from him; and let no injury
be done on either side." To this he added a few words of the cause for
which they fought, and of his own forces and resources.

XVII.--To this, Caesar did not then think proper to make any reply, nor
do we now think it worth recording. But Caesar required "that he should
be allowed to send commissioners to Pompey, who should suffer no
personal injury; and that either they should grant it, or should take
his commissioners in charge, and convey them to Pompey. That as to the
truce, the war in its present state was so divided, that they by their
fleet deprived him of his shipping and auxiliaries; while he prevented
them from the use of the land and fresh water; and if they wished that
this restraint should be removed from them, they should relinquish their
blockade of the seas, but if they retained the one, he in like manner
would retain the other; that nevertheless, the treaty of accommodation
might still be carried on, though these points were not conceded, and
that they need not be an impediment to it." They would neither receive
Caesar's commissioners, nor guarantee their safety, but referred the
whole to Pompey. They urged and struggled eagerly to gain the one point
respecting a truce. But when Caesar perceived that they had proposed the
conference merely to avoid present danger and distress, but that they
offered no hopes or terms of peace, he applied his thoughts to the
prosecution of the war.

XVIII.--Bibulus, being prevented from landing for several days, and
being seized with a violent distemper from the cold and fatigue, as he
could neither be cured on board, nor was willing to desert the charge
which he had taken upon him, was unable to bear up against the violence
of the disease. On his death, the sole command devolved on no single
individual, but each admiral managed his own division separately, and at
his own discretion. Vibullius, as soon as the alarm, which Caesar's
unexpected arrival had raised, was over, began again to deliver Caesar's
message in the presence of Libo, Lucius Lucceius, and Theophanes, to
whom Pompey used to communicate his most confidential secrets. He had
scarcely entered on the subject when Pompey interrupted him, and forbade
him to proceed. "What need," says he, "have I of life or Rome, if the
world shall think I enjoy them by the bounty of Caesar; an opinion which
can never be removed whilst it shall be thought that I have been brought
back by him to Italy, from which I set out." After the conclusion of the
war, Caesar was informed of these expressions by some persons who were
present at the conversation. He attempted, however, by other means to
bring about a negotiation of peace.

XIX.--Between Pompey's and Caesar's camp there was only the river Apsus,
and the soldiers frequently conversed with each other; and by a private
arrangement among themselves, no weapons were thrown during their
conferences. Caesar sent Publius Vatinius, one of his lieutenants, to
the bank of the river, to make such proposals as should appear most
conducive to peace; and to cry out frequently with a loud voice
[asking], "Are citizens permitted to send deputies to citizens to treat
of peace? a concession which had been made even to fugitives on the
Pyrenean mountains, and to robbers, especially when by so doing they
would prevent citizens from fighting against citizens." Having spoken
much in humble language, as became a man pleading for his own and the
general safety, and being listened to with silence by the soldiers of
both armies, he received an answer from the enemy's party that Aulus
Varro proposed coming the next day to a conference, and that deputies
from both sides might come without danger, and explain their wishes, and
accordingly a fixed time was appointed for the interview. When the
deputies met the next day, a great multitude from both sides assembled,
and the expectations of every person concerning this subject were raised
very high, and their minds seemed to be eagerly disposed for peace.
Titus Labienus walked forward from the crowd, and in submissive terms
began to speak of peace, and to argue with Vatinius. But their
conversation was suddenly interrupted by darts thrown from all sides,
from which Vatinius escaped by being protected by the arms of the
soldiers. However, several were wounded; and among them Cornelius
Balbus, Marcus Plotius, and Lucius Tiburtius, centurions, and some
privates; hereupon Labienus exclaimed, "Forbear, then, to speak any more
about an accommodation, for we can have no peace unless we carry
Caesar's head back with us."

XX.--At the same time in Rome, Marcus Caelius Rufus, one of the
praetors, having undertaken the cause of the debtors, on entering into
his office, fixed his tribunal near the bench of Caius Trebonius, the
city praetor, and promised if any person appealed to him in regard to
the valuation and payment of debts made by arbitration, as appointed by
Caesar when in Rome, that he would relieve them. But it happened, from
the justice of Trebonius's decrees and his humanity (for he thought that
in such dangerous times justice should be administered with moderation
and compassion), that not one could be found who would offer himself the
first to lodge an appeal. For to plead poverty, to complain of his own
private calamities, or the general distresses of the times, or to assert
the difficulty of setting the goods to sale, is the behaviour of a man
even of a moderate temper; but to retain their possessions entire, and
at the same time acknowledge themselves in debt, what sort of spirit,
and what impudence would it not have argued! Therefore nobody was found
so unreasonable as to make such demands. But Caelius proved more severe
to those very persons for whose advantage it had been designed; and
starting from this beginning, in order that he might not appear to have
engaged in so dishonourable an affair without effecting something, he
promulgated a law, that all debts should be discharged in six equal
payments, of six months each, without interest.

XXI.--When Servilius, the consul, and the other magistrates opposed him,
and he himself effected less than he expected, in order to raise the
passions of the people, he dropped it, and promulgated two others; one,
by which he remitted the annual rents of the houses to the tenants, the
other, an act of insolvency: upon which the mob made an assault on Caius
Trebonius, and having wounded several persons, drove him from his
tribunal. The consul Servilius informed the senate of his proceedings,
who passed a decree that Caelius should be removed from the management
of the republic. Upon this decree, the consul forbade him the senate;
and when he was attempting to harangue the people, turned him out of the
rostrum. Stung with the ignominy and with resentment, he pretended in
public that he would go to Caesar, but privately sent messengers to
Milo, who had murdered Clodius, and had been condemned for it; and
having invited him into Italy, because he had engaged the remains of the
gladiators to his interest, by making them supple presents, he joined
him, and sent him to Thurinum to tamper with the shepherds. When he
himself was on his road to Casilinum, at the same time that his military
standards and arms were seized at Capua, his slaves seen at Naples, and
the design of betraying the town discovered: his plots being revealed,
and Capua shut against him, being apprehensive of danger, because the
Roman citizens residing there had armed themselves, and thought he ought
to be treated as an enemy to the state, he abandoned his first design,
and changed his route.

XXII.--Milo in the meantime despatched letters to the free towns,
purporting that he acted as he did by the orders and commands of Pompey,
conveyed to him by Bibulus: and he endeavoured to engage in his interest
all persons whom he imagined were under difficulties by reason of their
debts. But not being able to prevail with them, he set at liberty some
slaves from the work-houses, and began to assault Cosa in the district
of Thurinum. There having received a blow of a stone thrown from the
wall of the town which was commanded by Quintus Pedius with one legion,
he died of it; and Caelius having set out, as he pretended for Caesar,
went to Thurii, where he was put to death as he was tampering with some
of the freemen of the town, and was offering money to Caesar's Gallic
and Spanish horse, which he had sent there to strengthen the garrison.
And thus these mighty beginnings, which had embroiled Italy, and kept
the magistrates employed, found a speedy and happy issue.

XXIII.--Libo having sailed from Oricum, with a fleet of fifty ships,
which he commanded, came to Brundisium, and seized an island, which lies
opposite to the harbour; judging it better to guard that place, which
was our only pass to sea, than to keep all the shores and ports blocked
up by a fleet. By his sudden arrival, he fell in with some of our
transports, and set them on fire, and carried off one laden with corn;
he struck great terror into our men, and having in the night landed a
party of soldiers and archers, he beat our guard of horse from their
station, and gained so much by the advantage of situation, that he
despatched letters to Pompey, that if he pleased he might order the rest
of the ships to be hauled upon shore and repaired; for that with his own
fleet he could prevent Caesar from receiving his auxiliaries.

XXIV.--Antonius was at this time at Brundisium, and relying on the
valour of his troops, covered about sixty of the long-boats belonging to
the men-of-war with penthouses and bulwarks of hurdles, and put on board
them select soldiers; and disposed them separately along the shore: and
under the pretext of keeping the seamen in exercise, he ordered two
three-banked galleys, which he had built at Brundisium, to row to the
mouth of the port. When Libo saw them advancing boldly towards him, he
sent five four-banked galleys against them, in hopes of intercepting
them. When these came near our ships, our veteran soldiers retreated
within the harbour. The enemy, urged by their eagerness to capture them,
pursued them unguardedly; for instantly the boats of Antonius, on a
certain signal, rowed with great violence from all parts against the
enemy; and at the first charge took one of the four-banked galleys, with
the seamen and marines, and forced the rest to flee disgracefully. In
addition to this loss, they were prevented from getting water by the
horse which Antonius had disposed along the sea-coast. Libo, vexed at
the distress and disgrace, departed from Brundisium, and abandoned the
blockade.

XXV.--Several months had now elapsed, and winter was almost gone, and
Caesar's legions and shipping were not coming to him from Brundisium,
and he imagined that some opportunities had been neglected, for the
winds had at least been often favourable, and he thought that he must
trust to them at last. And the longer it was deferred, the more eager
were those who commanded Pompey's fleet to guard the coast, and were
more confident of preventing our getting assistance: they receive
frequent reproofs from Pompey by letter, that as they had not prevented
Caesar's arrival at the first, they should at least stop the remainder
of his army: and they were expecting that the season for transporting
troops would become more unfavourable every day, as the winds grew
calmer. Caesar, feeling some trouble on this account, wrote in severe
terms to his officers at Brundisium, [and gave them orders] that as soon
as they found the wind to answer, they should not let the opportunity of
setting sail pass by, if they were even to steer their course to the
shore of Apollonia: because there they might run their ships on ground.
That these parts principally were left unguarded by the enemy's fleet,
because they dare not venture too far from the harbour.

XXVI.--They [his officers], exerting boldness and courage, aided by the
instructions of Marcus Antonius, and Fufius Kalenus, and animated by the
soldiers strongly encouraging them, and declining no danger for Caesar's
safety, having got a southerly wind, weighed anchor, and the next day
were carried past Apollonia and Dyrrachium, and being seen from the
continent, Quintus Coponius, who commanded the Rhodian fleet at
Dyrrachium, put out of the port with his ships; and when they had almost
come up with us, in consequence of the breeze dying away, the south wind
sprang up afresh, and rescued us. However, he did not desist from his
attempt, but hoped by the labour and perseverance of his seamen to be
able to bear up against the violence of the storm; and although we were
carried beyond Dyrrachium, by the violence of the wind, he nevertheless
continued to chase us. Our men, taking advantage of fortune's kindness,
for they were still afraid of being attacked by the enemy's fleet, if
the wind abated, having come near a port, called Nymphaeum, about three
miles beyond Lissus, put into it (this port is protected from a
south-west wind, but is not secure against a south wind); and thought less
danger was to be apprehended from the storm than from the enemy. But as
soon as they were within the port, the south wind, which had blown for
two days, by extraordinary good luck veered round to the south-west.

XXVII.--Here one might observe the sudden turns of fortune. We who, a
moment before, were alarmed for ourselves, were safely lodged in a very
secure harbour: and they who had threatened ruin to our fleet, were
forced to be uneasy on their own account: and thus, by a change of
circumstances, the storm protected our ships, and damaged the Rhodian
fleet to such a degree, that all their decked ships, sixteen in number,
foundered, without exception, and were wrecked: and of the prodigious
number of seamen and soldiers, some lost their lives by being dashed
against the rocks, others were taken by our men: but Caesar sent them
all safe home.

XXVIII.--Two of our ships, that had not kept up with the rest, being
overtaken by the night, and not knowing what port the rest had made to,
came to an anchor opposite Lissus. Otacilius Crassus, who commanded
Pompey's fleet, detached after them several barges and small craft, and
attempted to take them. At the same time, he treated with them about
capitulating, and promised them their lives if they would surrender. One
of them carried two hundred and twenty recruits, the other was manned
with somewhat less than two hundred veterans. Here it might be seen what
security men derive from a resolute spirit. For the recruits, frightened
at the number of vessels, and fatigued with the rolling of the sea; and
with sea-sickness, surrendered to Otacilius, after having first received
his oath, that the enemy would not injure them; but as soon as they were
brought before him, contrary to the obligation of his oath, they were
inhumanly put to death in his presence. But the soldiers of the veteran
legion, who had also struggled, not only with the inclemency of the
weather, but by labouring at the pump, thought it their duty to remit
nothing of their former valour: and having protracted the beginning of
the night in settling the terms, under pretence of surrendering, they
obliged the pilot to run the ship aground: and having got a convenient
place on the shore, they spent the rest of the night there, and at
daybreak, when Otacilius had sent against them a party of the horse, who
guarded that part of the coast, to the number of four hundred, besides
some armed men, who had followed them from the garrison, they made a
brave defence, and having killed some of them, retreated in safety to
our army.

XXIX.--After this action, the Roman citizens, who resided at Lissus, a
town which Caesar had before assigned them, and had carefully fortified,
received Antony into their town, and gave him every assistance.
Otacilius, apprehensive for his own safety, escaped out of the town, and
went to Pompey. All his forces, whose number amounted to three veteran
legions, and one of recruits, and about eight hundred horse, being
landed, Antony sent most of his ships back to Italy, to transport the
remainder of the soldiers and horse. The pontons, which are a sort of
Gallic ships, he left at Lissus with this object, that if Pompey,
imagining Italy defenceless, should transport his army thither (and this
notion was spread among the common people), Caesar might have some means
of pursuing him; and he sent messengers to him with great despatch, to
inform him in what part of the country he had landed his army, and what
number of troops he had brought over with him.

XXX.--Caesar and Pompey received this intelligence almost at the same
time; for they had seen the ships sail past Apollonia and Dyrrachium.
They directed their march after them by land; but at first they were
ignorant to what part they had been carried; but when they were informed
of it, they each adopted a different plan; Caesar, to form a junction
with Antonius as soon as possible, Pompey, to oppose Antonius's forces
on their march to Caesar, and, if possible, to fall upon them
unexpectedly from ambush. And the same day they both led out their
armies from their winter encampment along the river Apsus; Pompey,
privately by night; Caesar, openly by day. But Caesar had to march a
longer circuit up the river to find a ford. Pompey's route being easy,
because he was not obliged to cross the river, he advanced rapidly and
by forced marches against Antonius, and being informed of his approach,
chose a convenient situation, where he posted his forces; and kept his
men close within camp, and forbade fires to be kindled, that his arrival
might be the more secret. An account of this was immediately carried to
Antonius by the Greeks. He despatched messengers to Caesar, and confined
himself in his camp for one day. The next day Caesar came up with him.
On learning his arrival, Pompey, to prevent his being hemmed in between
two armies, quitted his position, and went with all his forces to
Asparagium, in the territory of Dyrrachium, and there encamped in a
convenient situation.

XXXI.--During these times, Scipio, though he had sustained some losses
near mount Amanus, had assumed to himself the title of imperator, after
which he demanded large sums of money from the states and princes. He
had also exacted from the tax-gatherers two years' rents that they owed;
and enjoined them to lend him the amount of the next year, and demanded
a supply of horse from the whole province. When they were collected,
leaving behind him his neighbouring enemies, the Parthians (who shortly
before had killed Marcus Crassus, the imperator, and had kept Marcus
Bibulus besieged), he drew his legions and cavalry out of Syria; and
when he came into the province, which was under great anxiety and fear
of the Parthian war, and heard some declarations of the soldiers, "That
they would march against an enemy, if he would lead them on; but would
never bear arms against a countryman and consul"; he drew off his
legions to winter quarters to Pergamus, and the most wealthy cities, and
made them rich presents: and in order to attach them more firmly to his
interest, permitted them to plunder the cities.

XXXII.--In the meantime, the money which had been demanded from the
province at large, was most rigorously exacted. Besides, many new
imposts of different kinds were devised to gratify his avarice. A tax of
so much a head was laid on every slave and child. Columns, doors, corn,
soldiers, sailors, arms, engines, and carriages, were made subject to a
duty. Wherever a name could be found for anything, it was deemed a
sufficient reason for levying money on it. Officers were appointed to
collect it, not only in the cities, but in almost every village and
fort: and whosoever of them acted with the greatest rigour and
inhumanity, was esteemed the best man, and best citizen. The province
was overrun with bailiffs and officers, and crowded with overseers and
tax-gatherers; who, besides the duties imposed, exacted a gratuity for
themselves; for they asserted, that being expelled from their own homes
and countries, they stood in need of every necessary; endeavouring by a
plausible pretence to colour the most infamous conduct. To this was
added the most exorbitant interest, as usually happens in times of war;
the whole sums being called in, on which occasion they alleged that the
delay of a single day was a donation. Therefore, in those two years, the
debt of the province was doubled: but notwithstanding, taxes were
exacted, not only from the Roman citizens, but from every corporation
and every state. And they said that these were loans, exacted by the
senate's decree. The taxes of the ensuing year were demanded beforehand
as a loan from the collectors, as on their first appointment.

XXXIII.--Moreover, Scipio ordered the money formerly lodged in the
temple of Diana at Ephesus, to be taken out with the statues of that
goddess which remained there. When Scipio came to the temple, letters
were delivered to him from Pompey, in the presence of several senators,
whom he had called upon to attend him; [informing him] that Caesar had
crossed the sea with his legions; that Scipio should hasten to him with
his army, and postpone all other business. As soon as he received the
letter, he dismissed his attendants, and began to prepare for his
journey to Macedonia; and a few days after set out. This circumstance
saved the money at Ephesus.

XXXIV.--Caesar, having effected a junction with Antonius's army, and
having drawn his legion out of Oricum, which he had left there to guard
the coast, thought he ought to sound the inclination of the provinces,
and march farther into the country; and when ambassadors came to him
from Thessaly and Aetolia, to engage that the states in those countries
would obey his orders, if he sent a garrison to protect them, he
despatched Lucius Cassius Longinus, with the twenty-seventh, a legion
composed of young soldiers, and two hundred horse, to Thessaly: and
Caius Calvisius Sabinus, with five cohorts, and a small party of horse,
into Aetolia. He recommended them to be especially careful to provide
corn, because those regions were nearest to him. He ordered Cneius
Domitius Calvinus to march into Macedonia with two legions, the eleventh
and twelfth, and five hundred horse; from which province, Menedemus, the
principal man of those regions, on that side which is called the Free,
having come as ambassador, assured him of the most devoted affection of
all his subjects.

XXXV.--Of these Calvisius, on his first arrival in Aetolia, being very
kindly received, dislodged the enemy's garrisons in Calydon and
Naupactus, and made himself master of the whole country. Cassius went to
Thessaly with his legion. As there were two factions there, he found the
citizens divided in their inclinations. Hegasaretus, a man of
established power, favoured Pompey's interest. Petreius, a young man of
a most noble family, warmly supported Caesar with his own and his
friends' influence.

XXXVI.--At the same time, Domitius arrived in Macedonia: and when
numerous embassies had begun to wait on him from many of the states,
news was brought that Scipio was approaching with his legions, which
occasioned various opinions and reports; for in strange events, rumour
generally goes before. Without making any delay in any part of
Macedonia, he marched with great haste against Domitius; and when he was
come within about twenty miles of him, wheeled on a sudden towards
Cassius Longinus in Thessaly. He effected this with such celerity, that
news of his march and arrival came together; for to render his march
expeditious, he left the baggage of his legions behind him at the river
Haliacmon, which divides Macedonia from Thessaly, under the care of
Marcus Favonius, with a guard of eight cohorts, and ordered him to build
a strong fort there. At the same time, Cotus's cavalry, which used to
infest the neighbourhood of Macedonia, flew to attack Cassius's camp, at
which Cassius being alarmed, and having received information of Scipio's
approach, and seen the horse, which he imagined to be Scipio's, he
betook himself to the mountains that environ Thessaly, and thence began
to make his route towards Ambracia. But when Scipio was hastening to
pursue him, despatches overtook him from Favonius, that Domitius was
marching against him with his legions, and that he could not maintain
the garrison over which he was appointed, without Scipio's assistance.
On receipt of these despatches, Scipio changed his designs and his
route, desisted from his pursuit of Cassius, and hastened to relieve
Favonius. Accordingly, continuing his march day and night, he came to
him so opportunely, that the dust raised by Domitius's army, and
Scipio's advanced guard, were observed at the same instant. Thus, the
vigilance of Domitius saved Cassius, and the expedition of Scipio,
Favonius.

XXXVII--Scipio, having stayed for two days in his camp, along the river
Haliacmon, which ran between him and Domitius's camp, on the third day,
at dawn, led his army across a ford, and having made a regular
encampment the day following, drew up his forces in front of his camp.
Domitius thought he ought not to show any reluctance, but should draw
out his forces and hazard a battle. But as there was a plain six miles
in breadth between the two camps, he posted his army before Scipio's
camp; while the latter persevered in not quitting his entrenchment.
However, Domitius with difficulty restrained his men, and prevented
their beginning a battle; the more so as a rivulet with steep banks,
joining Scipio's camp, retarded the progress of our men. When Scipio
perceived the eagerness and alacrity of our troops to engage, suspecting
that he should be obliged the next day, either to fight, against his
inclination, or to incur great disgrace by keeping within his camp,
though he had come with high expectation, yet by advancing rashly, made
a shameful end; and at night crossed the river, without even giving the
signal for breaking up the camp, and returned to the ground from which
he came, and there encamped near the river, on an elevated situation.
After a few days, he placed a party of horse in ambush in the night,
where our men had usually gone to forage for several days before. And
when Quintus Varus, commander of Domitius's horse, came there as usual,
they suddenly rushed from their ambush. But our men bravely supported
their charge, and returned quickly every man to his own rank, and in
their turn, made a general charge on the enemy: and having killed about
eighty of them, and put the rest to flight, retreated to their camp with
the loss of only two men.

XXXVIII.--After these transactions, Domitius, hoping to allure Scipio to
a battle, pretended to be obliged to change his position through want of
corn, and having given the signal for decamping, advanced about three
miles, and posted his army and cavalry in a convenient place, concealed
from the enemy's view. Scipio being in readiness to pursue him, detached
his cavalry and a considerable number of light infantry to explore
Domitius's route. When they had marched a short way, and their foremost
troops were within reach of our ambush, their suspicions being raised by
the neighing of the horses, they began to retreat: and the rest who
followed them, observing with what speed they retreated, made a halt.
Our men, perceiving that the enemy had discovered their plot, and
thinking it in vain to wait for any more, having got two troops in their
power, intercepted them. Among them was Marcus Opimius, general of the
horse, but he made his escape: they either killed or took prisoners all
the rest of these two troops, and brought them to Domitius.

XXXIX.--Caesar, having drawn his garrisons out of the sea-ports, as
before mentioned, left three cohorts at Oricum to protect the town, and
committed to them the charge of his ships of war, which he had
transported from Italy. Acilius, as lieutenant-general, had the charge
of this duty and the command of the town; he drew the ships into the
inner part of the harbour, behind the town, and fastened them to the
shore, and sank a merchant-ship in the mouth of the harbour to block it
up; and near it he fixed another at anchor, on which he raised a turret,
and faced it to the entrance of the port, and filled it with soldiers,
and ordered them to keep guard against any sudden attack.

XL.--Cneius, Pompey's son, who commanded the Egyptian fleet, having got
intelligence of these things, came to Oricum, and weighed up the ship,
that had been sunk, with a windlass, and by straining at it with several
ropes, and attacked the other which had been placed by Acilius to watch
the port with several ships, on which he had raised very high turrets,
so that fighting as it were from an eminence, and sending fresh men
constantly to relieve the fatigued, and at the same time attempting the
town on all sides by land, with ladders and his fleet, in order to
divide the force of his enemies, he overpowered our men by fatigue, and
the immense number of darts, and took the ship, having beat off the men
who were put on board to defend it, who, however, made their escape in
small boats; and at the same time he seized a natural mole on the
opposite side, which almost formed an island over against the town. He
carried over land, into the inner part of the harbour, four galleys, by
putting rollers under them, and driving them on with levers. Then
attacking on both sides the ships of war which were moored to the shore,
and were not manned, he carried off four of them, and set the rest on
fire. After despatching this business, he left Decimus Laelius, whom he
had taken away from the command of the Asiatic fleet, to hinder
provisions from being brought into the town from Biblis and Amantia, and
went himself to Lissus, where he attacked thirty merchantmen, left
within the port by Antonius, and set them on fire. He attempted to storm
Lissus, but being delayed three days by the vigorous defence of the
Roman citizens who belonged to that district, and of the soldiers which
Caesar had sent to keep garrison there, and having lost a few men in the
assault, he returned without effecting his object.

XLI.--As soon as Caesar heard that Pompey was at Asparagium, he set out
for that place with his army, and having taken the capital of the
Parthinians on his march, where there was a garrison of Pompey's, he
reached Pompey in Macedonia, on the third day, and encamped beside him;
and the day following, having drawn out all his forces before his camp,
he offered Pompey battle. But perceiving that he kept within his
trenches, he led his army back to his camp, and thought of pursuing some
other plan. Accordingly, the day following, he set out with all his
forces by a long circuit, through a difficult and narrow road to
Dyrrachium; hoping, either that Pompey would be compelled to follow him
to Dyrrachium, or that his communication with it might be cut off,
because he had deposited there all his provisions and mat['e]riel of
war. And so it happened; for Pompey, at first not knowing his design,
because he imagined he had taken a route in a different direction from
that country, thought that the scarcity of provisions had obliged him to
shift his quarters; but having afterwards got true intelligence from his
scouts, he decamped the day following, hoping to prevent him by taking a
shorter road; which Caesar suspecting might happen, encouraged his
troops to submit cheerfully to the fatigue, and having halted a very
small part of the night, he arrived early in the morning at Dyrrachium,
when the van of Pompey's army was visible at a distance, and there he
encamped.

XLII.--Pompey, being cut off from Dyrrachium, as he was unable to effect
his purpose, took a new resolution, and entrenched himself strongly on a
rising ground, which is called Petra, where ships of a small size can
come in, and be sheltered from some winds. Here he ordered a part of his
men-of-war to attend him, and corn and provisions to be brought from
Asia, and from all the countries of which he kept possession. Caesar,
imagining that the war would be protracted to too great a length, and
despairing of his convoys from Italy, because all the coasts were
guarded with great diligence by Pompey's adherents; and because his own
fleets, which he had built during the winter, in Sicily, Gaul, and
Italy, were detained; sent Lucius Canuleius into Epirus to procure corn;
and because these countries were too remote, he fixed granaries in
certain places, and regulated the carriage of the corn for the
neighbouring states. He likewise gave directions that search should be
made for whatever corn was in Lissus, the country of the Parthini, and
all the places of strength. The quantity was very small, both from the
nature of the land (for the country is rough and mountainous, and the
people commonly import what grain they use); and because Pompey had
foreseen what would happen, and some days before had plundered the
Parthini, and having ravaged and dug up their houses, carried off all
the corn, which he collected by means of his horse.

XLIII.--Caesar, on being informed of these transactions, pursued
measures suggested by the nature of the country. For round Pompey's
camps there were several high and rough hills. These he first of all
occupied with guards, and raised strong forts on them. Then drawing a
fortification from one fort to another, as the nature of each position
allowed, he began to draw a line of circumvallation round Pompey; with
these views; as he had but a small quantity of corn, and Pompey was
strong in cavalry, that he might furnish his army with corn and other
necessaries from all sides with less danger: secondly, to prevent Pompey
from foraging, and thereby render his horse ineffectual in the
operations of the war; and thirdly, to lessen his reputation, on which
he saw he depended greatly, among foreign nations, when a report should
have spread throughout the world that he was blockaded by Caesar, and
dare not hazard a battle.

XLIV.--Neither was Pompey willing to leave the sea and Dyrrachium,
because he had lodged his mat['e]riel there, his weapons, arms, and
engines; and supplied his army with corn from it by his ships: nor was
he able to put a stop to Caesar's works without hazarding a battle,
which at that time he had determined not to do. Nothing was left but to
adopt the last resource, namely, to possess himself of as many hills as
he could, and cover as great an extent of country as possible with his
troops, and divide Caesar's forces as much as possible; and so it
happened: for having raised twenty-four forts, and taken in a compass of
fifteen miles, he got forage in this space, and within this circuit
there were several fields lately sown, in which the cattle might feed in
the meantime. And as our men, who had completed their works by drawing
lines of communication from one fort to another, were afraid that
Pompey's men would sally out from some part, and attack us in the rear;
so the enemy were making a continued fortification in a circuit within
ours to prevent us from breaking in on any side, or surrounding them on
the rear. But they completed their works first; both because they had a
greater number of men, and because they had a smaller compass to
enclose. When Caesar attempted to gain any place, though Pompey had
resolved not to oppose him with his whole force or to come to a general
engagement; yet he detached to particular places slingers and archers,
with which his army abounded, and several of our men were wounded, and
filled with great dread of the arrows; and almost all the soldiers made
coats or coverings for themselves of hair cloths, tarpaulins, or raw
hides to defend them against the weapons.

XLV.--In seizing the posts, each exerted his utmost power: Caesar, to
confine Pompey within as narrow a compass as possible; Pompey, to occupy
as many hills as he could in as large a circuit as possible, and several
skirmishes were fought in consequence of it. In one of these, when
Caesar's ninth legion had gained a certain post, and had begun to
fortify it; Pompey possessed himself of a hill near to and opposite the
same place, and endeavoured to annoy the men while at work; and as the
approach on one side was almost level, he first surrounded it with
archers and slingers, and afterwards by detaching a strong party of
light infantry, and using his engines, he stopped our works: and it was
no easy matter for our men at once to defend themselves, and to proceed
with their fortifications. When Caesar perceived that his troops were
wounded from all sides, he determined to retreat and give up the post;
his retreat was down a precipice, on which account they pushed on with
more spirit, and would not allow us to retire, because they imagined
that we resigned the place through fear. It is reported that Pompey said
that day in triumph to his friends about him, "That he would consent to
be accounted a general of no experience, if Caesar's legions effected a
retreat without considerable loss from that ground into which they had
rashly advanced."

XLVI.--Caesar, being uneasy about the retreat of his soldiers, ordered
hurdles to be carried to the further side of the hill, and to be placed
opposite to the enemy, and behind them a trench of a moderate breadth to
be sunk by his soldiers under shelter of the hurdles: and the ground to
be made as difficult as possible. He himself disposed slingers in
convenient places to cover our men in their retreat. These things being
completed, he ordered his legions to file off. Pompey's men insultingly
and boldly pursued and chased us, levelling the hurdles that were thrown
up in the front of our works, in order to pass over the trench. Which as
soon as Caesar perceived, being afraid that his men would appear not to
retreat, but to be repulsed, and that greater loss might be sustained,
when his men were almost half way down the hill, he encouraged them by
Antonius, who commanded that legion, ordered the signal of battle to be
sounded, and a charge to be made on the enemy. The soldiers of the ninth
legion suddenly closing their files threw their javelins, and advancing
impetuously from the low ground up the steep, drove Pompey's men
precipitately before them, and obliged them to turn their backs; but
their retreat was greatly impeded by the hurdles that lay in a long line
before them, and the pallisadoes which were in their way, and the
trenches that were sunk. But our men being contented to retreat without
injury, having killed several of the enemy, and lost but five of their
own, very quietly retired, and having seized some other hills somewhat
on this side of that place, completed their fortifications.

XLVII.--This method of conducting a war was new and unusual, as well on
account of the number of forts, the extent and greatness of the works,
and the manner of attack and defence, as on account of other
circumstances. For all who have attempted to besiege any person, have
attacked the enemy when they were frightened or weak, or after a defeat;
or have been kept in fear of some attack, when they themselves have had
a superior force both of foot and horse. Besides, the usual design of a
siege is to cut off the enemy's supplies. On the contrary, Caesar, with
an inferior force, was enclosing troops sound and unhurt, and who had
abundance of all things. For there arrived every day a prodigious number
of ships, which brought them provisions: nor could the wind blow from
any point that would not be favourable to some of them. Whereas, Caesar,
having consumed all the corn far and near, was in very great distress,
but his soldiers bore all with uncommon patience. For they remembered
that they lay under the same difficulties last year in Spain, and yet by
labour and patience had concluded a dangerous war. They recollected too
that they had suffered an alarming scarcity at Alesia, and a much
greater at Avaricum, and yet had returned victorious over mighty
nations. They refused neither barley nor pulse when offered them, and
they held in great esteem cattle, of which they got great quantities
from Epirus.

XLVIII.--There was a sort of root, called chara, discovered by the
troops which served under Valerius. This they mixed up with milk, and it
greatly contributed to relieve their want. They made it into a sort of
bread. They had great plenty of it: loaves made of this, when Pompey's
men upbraided ours with want, they frequently threw among them to damp
their hopes.

XLIX.--The corn was now beginning to ripen, and their hope supported
their want, as they were confident of having abundance in a short time.
And there were frequently heard declarations of the soldiers on guard,
in discourse with each other, that they would rather live on the bark of
the trees, than let Pompey escape from their hands. For they were often
told by deserters, that they could scarcely maintain their horses, and
that their other cattle was dead: that they themselves were not in good
health from their confinement within so narrow a compass, from the
noisome smell, the number of carcasses, and the constant fatigue to
them, being men unaccustomed to work, and labouring under a great want
of water. For Caesar had either turned the course of all the rivers and
streams which ran to the sea, or had dammed them up with strong works.
And as the country was mountainous, and the valleys narrow at the
bottom, he enclosed them with piles sunk in the ground, and heaped up
mould against them to keep in the water. They were therefore obliged to
search for low and marshy grounds, and to sink wells, and they had this
labour in addition to their daily works. And even these springs were at
a considerable distance from some of their posts, and soon dried up with
the heat. But Caesar's army enjoyed perfect health and abundance of
water, and had plenty of all sorts of provisions except corn; and they
had a prospect of better times approaching, and saw greater hopes laid
before them by the ripening of the grain.

L.--In this new kind of war, new methods of managing it were invented by
both generals. Pompey's men, perceiving by our fires at night, at what
part of the works our cohorts were on guard, coming silently upon them
discharged their arrows at random among the whole multitude, and
instantly retired to their camp: as a remedy against which our men were
taught by experience to light their fires in one place, and keep guard
in another.

 * * * * *

LI.--In the meantime, Publius Sylla, whom Caesar at his departure had
left governor of his camp, came up with two legions to assist the
cohort; upon whose arrival Pompey's forces were easily repulsed. Nor did
they stand the sight and charge of our men, and the foremost falling,
the rest turned their backs and quitted the field. But Sylla called our
men in from the pursuit, lest their ardour should carry them too far,
but most people imagine, that if he had consented to a vigorous pursuit,
the war might have been ended that day. His conduct however does not
appear to deserve censure; for the duties of a lieutenant-general and of
a commander-in-chief are very different; the one is bound to act
entirely according to his instructions, the other to regulate his
conduct without control, as occasion requires. Sylla, being deputed by
Caesar to take care of the camp, and having rescued his men, was
satisfied with that, and did not desire to hazard a battle (although
this circumstance might probably have had a successful issue), that he
might not be thought to have assumed the part of the general. One
circumstance laid the Pompeians under great difficulty in making good a
retreat: for they had advanced from disadvantageous ground, and were
posted on the top of a hill. If they attempted to retire down the steep,
they dreaded the pursuit of our men from the rising ground, and there
was but a short time till sunset: for in hopes of completing the
business, they had protracted the battle almost till night. Taking
therefore measures suited to their exigency, and to the shortness of the
time, Pompey possessed himself of an eminence, at such a distance from
our fort, that no weapon discharged from an engine could reach him. Here
he took up a position, and fortified it, and kept all his forces there.

LII.--At the same time, there were engagements in two other places; for
Pompey had attacked several forts at once, in order to divide our
forces; that no relief might be sent from the neighbouring posts. In one
place, Volcatius Tullus sustained the charge of a legion with three
cohorts, and beat them off the field. In another, the Germans, having
sallied over our fortifications, slew several of the enemy, and
retreated safe to our camp.

LIII.--Thus six engagements having happened in one day, three at
Dyrrachium, and three at the fortifications, when a computation was made
of the number of slain, we found that about two thousand fell on
Pompey's side, several of them volunteer veterans and centurions. Among
them was Valerius, the son of Lucius Flaccus, who as praetor had
formerly had the government of Asia, and six military standards were
taken. Of our men, not more than twenty were missing in all the action.
But in the fort, not a single soldier escaped without a wound; and in
one cohort, four centurions lost their eyes. And being desirous to
produce testimony of the fatigue they underwent, and the danger they
sustained, they counted to Caesar about thirty thousand arrows which had
been thrown into the fort; and in the shield of the centurion Scaeva,
which was brought to him, were found two hundred and thirty holes. In
reward for this man's services both to himself and the republic, Caesar
presented to him two hundred thousand pieces of copper money, and
declared him promoted from the eighth to the first centurion. For it
appeared that the fort had been in a great measure saved by his
exertions; and he afterwards very amply rewarded the cohorts with double
pay, corn, clothing, and other military honours.

LIV.--Pompey, having made great additions to his works in the night, the
following days built turrets, and having carried his works fifteen feet
high, faced that part of his camp with mantlets; and after an interval
of five days, taking advantage of a second cloudy night, he barricaded
all the gates of his camp to hinder a pursuit, and about midnight
quietly marched off his army, and retreated to his old fortifications.

LV.--Aetolia, Acarnania, and Amphilochis, being reduced, as we have
related, by Cassius Longinus, and Calvisius Sabinus, Caesar thought he
ought to attempt the conquest of Achaia, and to advance farther into the
country. Accordingly, he detached Fufius thither, and ordered Quintus
Sabinus and Cassius to join him with their cohorts. Upon notice of their
approach, Rutilius Lupus, who commanded in Achaia, under Pompey, began
to fortify the Isthmus, to prevent Fufius from coming into Achaia.
Kalenus recovered Delphi, Thebes, and Orchomenus, by a voluntary
submission of those states. Some he subdued by force, the rest he
endeavoured to win over to Caesar's interest, by sending deputies round
to them. In these things, principally, Fufius was employed.

LVI.--Every day afterwards, Caesar drew up his army on a level ground,
and offered Pompey battle, and led his legions almost close to Pompey's
camp; and his front line was at no greater distance from the rampart
than that no weapons from their engines could reach it. But Pompey, to
save his credit and reputation with the world, drew out his legions, but
so close to his camp that his rear lines might touch the rampart, and
that his whole army, when drawn up, might be protected by the darts
discharged from it.

LVII.--Whilst these things were going forward in Achaia and at
Dyrrachium, and when it was certainly known that Scipio was arrived in
Macedonia, Caesar, never losing sight of his first intention, sends
Clodius to him, an intimate friend to both, whom Caesar, on the
introduction and recommendation of Pompey, had admitted into the number
of his acquaintance. To this man he gave letters and instructions to
Pompey, the substance of which was as follows: "That he had made every
effort towards peace, and imputed the ill success of those efforts to
the fault of those whom he had employed to conduct those negotiations:
because they were afraid to carry his proposals to Pompey at an improper
time. That Scipio had such authority, that he could not only freely
explain what conduct met his approbation, but even in some degree
enforce his advice, and govern him [Pompey] if he persisted in error;
that he commanded an army independent of Pompey, so that besides his
authority, he had strength to compel; and if he did so, all men would be
indebted to him for the quiet of Italy, the peace of the provinces, and
the preservation of the empire." These proposals Clodius made to him,
and for some days at the first appeared to have met with a favourable
reception, but afterwards was not admitted to an audience; for Scipio
being reprimanded by Favonius, as we found afterwards when the war was
ended, and the negotiation having miscarried, Clodius returned to
Caesar.

LVIII.--Caesar, that he might the more easily keep Pompey's horse
enclosed within Dyrrachium, and prevent them from foraging, fortified
the two narrow passes already mentioned with strong works, and erected
forts at them. Pompey perceiving that he derived no advantage from his
cavalry, after a few days had them conveyed back to his camp by sea.
Fodder was so exceedingly scarce that he was obliged to feed his horses
upon leaves stripped off the trees, or the tender roots of reeds
pounded. For the corn which had been sown within the lines was already
consumed, and they would be obliged to supply themselves with fodder
from Corcyra and Acarnania, over a long tract of sea; and as the
quantity of that fell short, to increase it by mixing barley with it,
and by these methods support their cavalry. But when not only the barley
and fodder in these parts were consumed, and the herbs cut away, when
the leaves too were not to be found on the trees, the horses being
almost starved, Pompey thought he ought to make some attempt by a sally.

LIX.--In the number of Caesar's cavalry were two Allobrogians, brothers,
named Roscillus and Aegus, the sons of Abducillus, who for several years
possessed the chief power in his own state; men of singular valour,
whose gallant services Caesar had found very useful in all his wars in
Gaul. To them, for these reasons, he had committed the offices of
greatest honour in their own country, and took care to have them chosen
into the senate at an unusual age, and had bestowed on them lands taken
from the enemy, and large pecuniary rewards, and from being needy had
made them affluent. Their valour had not only procured them Caesar's
esteem, but they were beloved by the whole army. But presuming on
Caesar's friendship, and elated with the arrogance natural to a foolish
and barbarous people, they despised their countrymen, defrauded their
cavalry of their pay, and applied all the plunder to their own use.
Displeased at this conduct, their soldiers went in a body to Caesar, and
openly complained of their ill usage; and to their other charges added,
that false musters were given in to Caesar, and the surcharged pay
applied to their own use.

LX.--Caesar, not thinking it a proper time to call them to account, and
willing to pardon many faults, on account of their valour, deferred the
whole matter, and gave them a private rebuke, for having made a traffic
of their troops, and advised them to expect everything from his
friendship, and by his past favours to measure their future hopes. This,
however, gave them great offence, and made them contemptible in the eyes
of the whole army. Of this they became sensible, as well from the
reproaches of others, as from the judgment of their own minds, and a
consciousness of guilt. Prompted then by shame, and perhaps imagining
that they were not liberated from trial, but reserved to a future day,
they resolved to break off from us, to put their fortune to a new
hazard, and to make trial of new connections. And having conferred with
a few of their clients, to whom they could venture to entrust so base an
action, they first attempted to assassinate Caius Volusenus, general of
the horse (as was discovered at the end of the war), that they might
appear to have fled to Pompey after conferring an important service on
him. But when that appeared too difficult to put in execution, and no
opportunity offered to accomplish it, they borrowed all the money they
could, as if they designed to make satisfaction and restitution for what
they had defrauded: and having purchased a great number of horses, they
deserted to Pompey along with those whom they had engaged in their plot.

LXI.--As they were persons nobly descended and of liberal education, and
had come with a great retinue, and several cattle, and were reckoned men
of courage, and had been in great esteem with Caesar, and as it was a
new and uncommon event, Pompey carried them round all his works, and
made an ostentatious show of them, for till that day, not a soldier,
either horse or foot, had deserted from Caesar to Pompey, though there
were desertions almost every day from Pompey to Caesar: but more
commonly among the soldiers levied in Epirus and Aetolia, and in those
countries which were in Caesar's possession. But the brothers, having
been acquainted with all things, either what was incomplete in our
works, or what appeared to the best judges of military matters to be
deficient, the particular times, the distance of places, and the various
attention of the guards, according to the different temper and character
of the officer who commanded the different posts, gave an exact account
of all to Pompey.

LXII.--Upon receiving this intelligence, Pompey, who had already formed
the design of attempting a sally, as before mentioned, ordered the
soldiers to make ozier coverings for their helmets, and to provide
fascines. These things being prepared, he embarked on board small boats
and row galleys by night, a considerable number of light infantry and
archers, with all their fascines, and immediately after midnight, he
marched sixty cohorts drafted from the greater camp and the outposts, to
that part of our works which extended towards the sea, and were at the
farthest distance from Caesar's greater camp. To the same place he sent
the ships, which he had freighted with the fascines and light-armed
troops; and all the ships of war that lay at Dyrrachium; and to each he
gave particular instructions: at this part of the lines Caesar had
posted Lentulus Marcellinus, the quaestor, with the ninth legion, and as
he was not in a good state of health, Fulvius Costhumus was sent to
assist him in the command.

LXIII.--At this place, fronting the enemy, there was a ditch fifteen
feet wide, and a rampart ten feet high, and the top of the rampart was
ten feet in breadth. At an interval of six hundred feet from that there
was another rampart turned the contrary way, with the works lower. For
some days before, Caesar, apprehending that our men might be surrounded
by sea, had made a double rampart there, that if he should be attacked
on both sides, he might have the means in defending himself. But the
extent of the lines, and the incessant labour for so many days, because
he had enclosed a circuit of seventeen miles with his works, did not
allow time to finish them. Therefore the transverse rampart which should
make a communication between the other two, was not yet completed. This
circumstance was known to Pompey, being told to him by the Allobrogian
deserters, and proved of great disadvantage to us. For when our cohorts
of the ninth legion were on guard by the sea-side, Pompey's army arrived
suddenly by break of day, and their approach was a surprise to our men,
and at the same time, the soldiers that came by sea cast their darts on
the front rampart; and the ditches were filled with fascines: and the
legionary soldiers terrified those that defended the inner rampart, by
applying the scaling ladders, and by engines and weapons of all sorts,
and a vast multitude of archers poured round upon them from every side.
Besides, the coverings of oziers, which they had laid over their
helmets, were a great security to them against the blows of stones which
were the only weapons that our soldiers had. And therefore, when our men
were oppressed in every manner, and were scarcely able to make
resistance, the defect in our works was observed, and Pompey's soldiers,
landing between the two ramparts, where the work was unfinished,
attacked our men in the rear, and having beat them from both sides of
the fortification, obliged them to flee.

LXIV.--Marcellinus, being informed of this disorder, detached some
cohorts to the relief of our men, who seeing them flee from the camp,
were neither able to persuade them to rally at their approach, nor
themselves to sustain the enemy's charge. And in like manner, whatever
additional assistance was sent, was infected by the fears of the
defeated, and increased the terror and danger. For retreat was prevented
by the multitude of the fugitives. In that battle, when the eagle-bearer
was dangerously wounded, and began to grow weak, having got sight of our
horse, he said to them, "This eagle have I defended with the greatest
care for many years, at the hazard of my life, and now in my last
moments restore it to Caesar with the same fidelity. Do not, I conjure
you, suffer a dishonour to be sustained in the field, which never before
happened to Caesar's army, but deliver it safe into his hands." By this
accident the eagle was preserved, but all the centurions of the first
cohorts were killed, except the principal.

LXV.--And now the Pompeians, after great havoc of our troops, were
approaching Marcellinus's camp, and had struck no small terror into the
rest of the cohorts, when Marcus Antonius, who commanded the nearest
fort, being informed of what had happened, was observed descending from
the rising ground with twelve cohorts. His arrival checked the
Pompeians, and encouraged our men to recover from their extreme
affright. And shortly after, Caesar having got notice by the smoke from
all the forts, which was the usual signal on such occasions, drafted off
some cohorts from the outposts, and went to the scene of action. And
having there learnt the loss he had sustained, and perceiving that
Pompey had forced our works, and had encamped along the coast, so that
he was at liberty to forage, and had a communication with his shipping,
he altered his plan for conducting the war, as his design had not
succeeded, and ordered a strong encampment to be made near Pompey.

LXVI.--When this work was finished, Caesar's scouts observed that some
cohorts, which to them appeared like a legion, were retired behind the
wood, and were on their march to the old camp. The situation of the two
camps was as follows: a few days before, when Caesar's ninth legion had
opposed a party of Pompey's troops, and were endeavouring to enclose
them, Caesar's troops formed a camp in that place. This camp joined a
certain wood, and was not above four hundred paces distant from the sea.
Afterwards, changing his design for certain reasons, Caesar removed his
camp to a small distance beyond that place; and after a few days, Pompey
took possession of it, and added more extensive works, leaving the inner
rampart standing, as he intended to keep several legions there. By this
means, the lesser camp included within the greater, answered the purpose
of a fort and citadel. He had also carried an entrenchment from the left
angle of the camp to the river, about four hundred paces, that his
soldiers might have more liberty and less danger in fetching water. But
he too, changing his design for reasons not necessary to be mentioned,
abandoned the place. In this condition the camp remained for several
days, the works being all entire.

LXVII.--Caesar's scouts brought him word that the standard of a legion
was carried to this place. That the same thing was seen he was assured
by those in the higher forts. This place was half a mile distant from
Pompey's new camp. Caesar, hoping to surprise this legion, and anxious
to repair the loss sustained that day, left two cohorts employed in the
works to make an appearance of entrenching himself, and by a different
route, as privately as he could, with his other cohorts amounting to
thirty-three, among which was the ninth legion, which had lost so many
centurions, and whose privates were greatly reduced in number, he
marched in two lines against Pompey's legion and his lesser camp. Nor
did this first opinion deceive him. For he reached the place before
Pompey could have notice of it; and though the works were strong, yet
having made the attack with the left wing, which he commanded in person,
he obliged the Pompeians to quit the rampart in disorder. A barricade
had been raised before the gates, at which a short contest was
maintained, our men endeavouring to force their way in, and the enemy to
defend the camp; Titus Pulcio, by whose means we have related that Caius
Antonius's army was betrayed, defending them with singular courage. But
the valour of our men prevailed, and having cut down the barricade, they
first forced the greater camp, and after that the fort which was
enclosed within it: and as the legion on its repulse had retired to
this, they slew several defending themselves there.

LXVIII.--But Fortune, who exerts a powerful influence as well in other
matters, as especially in war, effects great changes from trifling
causes, as happened at this time. For the cohorts on Caesar's right
wing, through ignorance of the place, followed the direction of that
rampart, which ran along from the camp to the river, whilst they were in
search of a gate, and imagined that it belonged to the camp. But when
they found that it led to the river, and that nobody opposed them, they
immediately climbed over the rampart, and were followed by all our
cavalry.

LXIX.--In the meantime Pompey, by the great delay which this occasioned,
being informed of what had happened, marched with the fifth legion,
which he called away from their work to support his party; and at the
same time his cavalry were advancing up to ours, and an army in order of
battle was seen at a distance by our men who had taken possession of the
camp, and the face of affairs was suddenly changed. For Pompey's legion,
encouraged by the hope of speedy support, attempted to make a stand at
the Decuman gate, and made a bold charge on our men. Caesar's cavalry,
who had mounted the rampart by a narrow breach, being apprehensive of
their retreat, were the first to flee. The right wing, which had been
separated from the left, observing the terror of the cavalry, to prevent
their being overpowered within the lines, were endeavouring to retreat
by the same way as they burst in; and most of them, lest they should be
engaged in the narrow passes, threw themselves down a rampart ten feet
high into the trenches; and the first being trodden to death, the rest
procured their safety and escaped over their bodies. The soldiers of the
left wing, perceiving from the rampart that Pompey was advancing, and
their own friends fleeing, being afraid that they should be enclosed
between the two ramparts, as they had an enemy both within and without,
strove to secure their retreat the same way they came. All was disorder,
consternation, and flight; insomuch that, when Caesar laid hold of the
colours of those who were running away, and desired them to stand, some
left their horses behind, and continued to run in the same manner;
others through fear even threw away their colours, nor did a single man
face about.

LXX.--In this calamity, the following favourable circumstance occurred
to prevent the ruin of our whole army, viz., that Pompey suspecting an
ambuscade (because, as I suppose, the success had far exceeded his
hopes, as he had seen his men a moment before fleeing from the camp),
durst not for some time approach the fortification; and that his horse
were retarded from pursuing, because the passes and gates were in
possession of Caesar's soldiers. Thus a trifling circumstance proved of
great importance to each party; for the rampart drawn from the camp to
the river, interrupted the progress and certainty of Caesar's victory,
after he had forced Pompey's camp. The same thing, by retarding the
rapidity of the enemy's pursuit, preserved our army.

LXXI.--In the two actions of this day, Caesar lost nine hundred and
sixty rank and file, several Roman knights of distinction, Felginas
Tuticanus Gallus, a senator's son; Caius Felginas from Placentia; Aulus
Gravius from Puteoli; Marcus Sacrativir from Capua; and thirty-two
military tribunes and centurions. But the greatest part of all these
perished without a wound, being trodden to death in the trenches, on the
ramparts and banks of the river by reason of the terror and flight of
their own men. Pompey, after this battle, was saluted Imperator; this
title he retained, and allowed himself to be addressed by it afterwards.
But neither in his letters to the senate, nor in the fasces, did he use
the laurel as a mark of honour. But Labienus, having obtained his
consent that the prisoners should be delivered up to him, had them all
brought out, as it appeared, to make a show of them, and that Pompey
might place a greater confidence in him who was a deserter; and calling
them fellow soldiers, and asking them in the most insulting manner
whether it was usual with veterans to flee, ordered them to be put to
death in the sight of the whole army.

LXXII.-Pompey's party were so elated with confidence and spirit at this
success, that they thought no more of the method of conducting the war,
but thought that they were already conquerors. They did not consider
that the smallness of our numbers, and the disadvantage of the place and
the confined nature of the ground occasioned by their having first
possessed themselves of the camp, and the double danger both from within
and without the fortifications, and the separation of the army into two
parts, so that the one could not give relief to the other, were the
cause of our defeat. They did not consider, in addition, that the
contest was not decided by a vigorous attack, nor a regular battle; and
that our men had suffered greater loss from their numbers and want of
room, than they had sustained from the enemy. In fine, they did not
reflect on the common casualties of war; how trifling causes, either
from groundless suspicions, sudden affright, or religious scruples, have
oftentimes been productive of considerable losses; how often an army has
been unsuccessful either by the misconduct of the general, or the
oversight of a tribune; but as if they had proved victorious by their
valour, and as if no change could ever take place, they published the
success of the day throughout the world by reports and letters.

LXXIII.--Caesar, disappointed in his first intentions, resolved to
change the whole plan of his operations. Accordingly, he at once called
in all out-posts, gave over the siege, and collecting his army into one
place, addressed his soldiers and encouraged them "not to be troubled at
what had happened, nor to be dismayed at it, but to weigh their many
successful engagements against one disappointment, and that, too, a
trifling one. That they ought to be grateful to Fortune, through whose
favour they had recovered Italy without the effusion of blood; through
whose favour they had subdued the two Spains, though protected by a most
warlike people under the command of the most skilful and experienced
generals: through whose favour they had reduced to submission the
neighbouring states that abounded with corn: in fine, that they ought to
remember with what success they had been all transported safe through
blockading fleets of the enemy, which possessed not only the ports, but
even the coasts: that if all their attempts were not crowned with
success, the defects of Fortune must be supplied by industry; and
whatever loss had been sustained, ought to be attributed rather to her
caprices than to any faults in him: that he had chosen a safe ground for
the engagement, that he had possessed himself of the enemy's camp; that
he had beaten them out, and overcome them when they offered resistance;
but whether their own terror or some mistake, or whether Fortune herself
had interrupted a victory almost secured and certain, they ought all now
to use their utmost efforts to repair by their valour the loss which had
been incurred; if they did so, their misfortunes would turn to their
advantage, as it happened at Gergovia, and those who feared to face the
enemy would be the first to offer themselves to battle.

LXXIV.--Having concluded his speech, he disgraced some standard-bearers,
and reduced them to the ranks; for the whole army was seized with such
grief at their loss, and with such an ardent desire of repairing their
disgrace, that not a man required the command of his tribune or
centurion, but they imposed each on himself severer labours than usual
as a punishment, and at the same time were so inflamed with eagerness to
meet the enemy, that the officers of the first rank, sensibly affected
at their entreaties, were of opinion that they ought to continue in
their present posts, and commit their fate to the hazard of a battle.
But, on the other hand, Caesar could not place sufficient confidence in
men so lately thrown into consternation, and thought he ought to allow
them time to recover their dejected spirits; and having abandoned his
works, he was apprehensive of being distressed for want of corn.

LXXV.--Accordingly, suffering no time to intervene but what was
necessary for a proper attention to be paid to the sick and wounded, he
sent on all his baggage privately in the beginning of the night from his
camp to Apollonia, and ordered them not to halt till they had performed
their journey; and he detached one legion with them as a convoy. This
affair being concluded, having retained only two legions in his camp; he
marched the rest of his army out at three o'clock in the morning by
several gates, and sent them forward by the same route; and in a short
space after, that the military practice might be preserved, and his
march known as late as possible, he ordered the signal for decamping to
be given; and setting out immediately, and following the rear of his own
army, he was soon out of sight of the camp. Nor did Pompey, as soon as
he had notice of his design, make any delay to pursue him; but with a
view to surprise them whilst encumbered with baggage on their march, and
not yet recovered from their fright, he led his army out of his camp,
and sent his cavalry on to retard our rear; but was not able to come up
with them, because Caesar had got far before him, and marched without
baggage. But when we reached the river Genusus, the banks being steep,
their horse overtook our rear, and detained them by bringing them to
action. To oppose whom, Caesar sent his horse, and intermixed with them
about four hundred of his advanced light troops, who attacked their
horse with such success, that having routed them all, and killed
several, they returned without any loss to the main body.

LXXVI.--Having performed the exact march which he had proposed that day,
and having led his army over the river Genusus, Caesar posted himself in
his old camp opposite Asparagium; and kept his soldiers close within the
entrenchments; and ordered the horse, who had been sent out under
pretence of foraging, to retire immediately into the camp, through the
Decuman gate. Pompey, in like manner, having completed the same day's
march, took post in his old camp at Asparagium; and his soldiers, as
they had no work (the fortifications being entire), made long
excursions, some to collect wood and forage; others, invited by the
nearness of the former camp, laid up their arms in their tents, and
quitted the entrenchments in order to bring what they had left behind
them, because the design of marching being adopted in a hurry, they had
left a considerable part of their waggons and luggage behind. Being thus
incapable of pursuing, as Caesar had foreseen, about noon he gave the
signal for marching, led out his army, and doubling that day's march, he
advanced eight miles beyond Pompey's camp; who could not pursue him,
because his troops were dispersed.

LXXVII.--The next day Caesar sent his baggage forward early in the
night, and marched off himself immediately after the fourth watch: that
if he should be under the necessity of risking an engagement, he might
meet a sudden attack with an army free from incumbrance. He did so for
several days successively, by which means he was enabled to effect his
march over the deepest rivers, and through the most intricate roads
without any loss. For Pompey, after the first day's delay, and the
fatigue which he endured for some days in vain, though he exerted
himself by forced marches, and was anxious to overtake us, who had got
the start of him, on the fourth day desisted from the pursuit, and
determined to follow other measures.

LXXVIII.--Caesar was obliged to go to Apollonia, to lodge his wounded,
pay his army, confirm his friends, and leave garrisons in the towns. But
for these matters, he allowed no more time than was necessary for a
person in haste. And being apprehensive for Domitius, lest he should be
surprised by Pompey's arrival, he hastened with all speed and
earnestness to join him; for he planned the operations of the whole
campaign on these principles: that if Pompey should march after him, he
would be drawn off from the sea, and from those forces which he had
provided in Dyrrachium, and separated from his corn and magazines, and
be obliged to carry on the war on equal terms; but if he crossed over
into Italy, Caesar, having effected a junction with Domitius, would
march through Illyricum to the relief of Italy; but if he endeavoured to
storm Apollonia and Oricum, and exclude him from the whole coast, he
hoped, by besieging Scipio, to oblige him, of necessity, to come to his
assistance. Accordingly, Caesar despatching couriers, writes to
Domitius, and acquaints him with his wishes on the subject: and having
stationed a garrison of four cohorts at Apollonia, one at Lissus, and
three at Oricum, besides those who were sick of their wounds, he set
forward on his march through Epirus and Acarnania. Pompey, also,
guessing at Caesar's design, determined to hasten to Scipio, that if
Caesar should march in that direction, he might be ready to relieve him;
but that if Caesar should be unwilling to quit the sea-coast and
Corcyra, because he expected legions and cavalry from Italy, he himself
might fall on Domitius with all his forces.

LXXIX.--For these reasons, each of them studied despatch, that he might
succour his friends, and not miss an opportunity of surprising his
enemies. But Caesar's engagements at Apolloma had carried him aside from
the direct road. Pompey had taken the short road to Macedonia, through
Candavia. To this was added another unexpected disadvantage, that
Domitius, who for several days had been encamped opposite Scipio, had
quitted that post for the sake of provisions, and had marched to
Heraclea Sentica, a city subject to Candavia; so that fortune herself
seemed to throw him in Pompey's way. Of this, Caesar was ignorant up to
this time. Letters likewise being sent by Pompey through all the
provinces and states, with an account of the action at Dyrrachium, very
much enlarged and exaggerated beyond the real facts, a rumour had been
circulated, that Caesar had been defeated and forced to flee, and had
lost almost all his forces. These reports had made the roads dangerous,
and drawn off some states from his alliance: whence it happened, that
the messengers despatched by Caesar, by several different roads to
Domitius, and by Domitius to Caesar, were not able by any means to
accomplish their journey. But the Allobroges, who were in the retinue of
Aegus and Roscillus, and who had deserted to Pompey, having met on the
road a scouting party of Domitius; either from old acquaintance, because
they had served together in Gaul, or elated with vain glory, gave them
an account of all that had happened, and informed them of Caesar's
departure, and Pompey's arrival. Domitius, who was scarce four hours'
march distant, having got intelligence from these, by the courtesy of
the enemy, avoided the danger, and met Caesar coming to join him at
Aeginium, a town on the confines of and opposite to Thessaly.

LXXX.--The two armies being united, Caesar marched to Gomphi, which is
the first town of Thessaly on the road from Epirus. Now, the
Thessalians, a few months before, had of themselves sent ambassadors to
Caesar, offering him the free use of everything in their power, and
requesting a garrison for their protection. But the report, already
spoken of, of the battle at Dyrrachium, which it had exaggerated in many
particulars, had arrived before him. In consequence of which,
Androsthenes, the praetor of Thessaly, as he preferred to be the
companion of Pompey's victory, rather than Caesar's associate in his
misfortunes, collected all the people, both slaves and freemen, from the
country into the town and shut the gates, and despatched messengers to
Scipio and Pompey "to come to his relief, that he could depend on the
strength of the town, if succour was speedily sent; but that it could
not withstand a long siege." Scipio, as soon as he received advice of
the departure of the armies from Dyrrachium, had marched with his
legions to Larissa: Pompey was not yet arrived near Thessaly. Caesar
having fortified his camp, ordered scaling ladders and pent-houses to be
made for a sudden assault, and hurdles to be provided. As soon as they
were ready, he exhorted his soldiers, and told them of what advantage it
would be to assist them with all sorts of necessaries if they made
themselves masters of a rich and plentiful town: and, at the same time,
to strike terror into other states by the example of this, and to effect
this with speed, before auxiliaries could arrive. Accordingly, taking
advantage of the unusual ardour of the soldiers, he began his assault on
the town at a little after three o'clock on the very day on which he
arrived, and took it, though defended with very high walls, before
sunset, and gave it up to his army to plunder, and immediately decamped
from before it, and marched to Metropolis, with such rapidity as to
outstrip any messenger or rumour of the taking of Gomphi.

LXXXI.--The inhabitants of Metropolis, at first influenced by the same
rumours, followed the same measures, shut the gates and manned their
walls. But when they were made acquainted with the fate of the city of
Gomphi by some prisoners, whom Caesar had ordered to be brought up to
the walls, they threw open their gates. As he preserved them with the
greatest care, there was not a state in Thessaly (except Larissa, which
was awed by a strong army of Scipio's), but on comparing the fate of the
inhabitants of Metropolis with the severe treatment of Gomphi, gave
admission to Caesar, and obeyed his orders. Having chosen a position
convenient for procuring corn, which was now almost ripe on the ground,
he determined there to wait Pompey's arrival, and to make it the centre
of all his warlike operations.

LXXXII.--Pompey arrived in Thessaly a few days after, and having
harangued the combined army, returned thanks to his own men, and
exhorted Scipio's soldiers, that as the victory was now secured, they
should endeavour to merit a part of the rewards and booty. And receiving
all the legions into one camp, he shared his honours with Scipio,
ordered the trumpet to be sounded at his tent, and a pavilion to be
erected for him. The forces of Pompey being thus augmented, and two such
powerful armies united, their former expectations were confirmed, and
their hopes of victory so much increased, that whatever time intervened
was considered as so much delay to their return into Italy: and whenever
Pompey acted with slowness and caution, they used to exclaim, that it
was the business only of a single day, but that he had a passion for
power, and was delighted in having persons of consular and praetorian
rank in the number of his slaves. And they now began to dispute openly
about rewards and priesthoods, and disposed of the consulate for several
years to come. Others put in their claims for the houses and properties
of all who were in Caesar's camp, and in that council there was a warm
debate, whether Lucius Hirrus, who had been sent by Pompey against the
Parthians, should be admitted a candidate for the praetorship in his
absence at the next election; his friends imploring Pompey's honour to
fulfil the engagements which he had made to him at his departure, that
he might not seem deceived through his authority: whilst others,
embarked in equal labour and danger, pleaded that no individual ought to
have a preference before all the rest.

LXXXIII.--Already Domitius, Scipio, and Lentulus Spinthur, in their
daily quarrels about Caesar's priesthood, openly abused each other in
the most scurrilous language. Lentulus urging the respect due to his
age, Domitius boasting his interest in the city and his dignity, and
Scipio presuming on his alliance with Pompey. Attius Rufus charged
Lucius Afranius before Pompey with betraying the army in the action that
happened in Spain, and Lucius Domitius declared in the council that it
was his wish that, when the war should be ended, three billets should be
given to all the senators who had taken part with them in the war, and
that they should pass sentence on every single person who had stayed
behind at Rome, or who had been within Pompey's garrisons and had not
contributed their assistance in the military operations; that by the
first billet they should-have power to acquit, by the second to pass
sentence of death, and by the third to impose a pecuniary fine. In
short, Pompey's whole army talked of nothing but the honours or sums of
money which were to be their rewards, or of vengeance on their enemies;
and never considered how they were to defeat their enemies, but in what
manner they should use their victory.

LXXXIV.--Corn being provided, and his soldiers refreshed, and a
sufficient time having elapsed since the engagement at Dyrrachium, when
Caesar thought he had sufficiently sounded the disposition of his
troops, he thought that he ought to try whether Pompey had any intention
or inclination to come to a battle. Accordingly he led his troops out of
the camp, and ranged them in order of battle, at first on their own
ground, and at a small distance from Pompey's camp: but afterwards for
several days in succession he advanced from his own camp, and led them
up to the hills on which Pompey's troops were posted, which conduct
inspired his army every day with fresh courage. However he adhered to
his former purpose respecting his cavalry, for as he was by many degrees
inferior in number, he selected the youngest and most active of the
advanced guard, and desired them to fight intermixed with the horse, and
they by constant practice acquired experience in this kind of battle. By
these means it was brought to pass that a thousand of his horse would
dare, even on open ground, to stand against seven thousand of Pompey's,
if occasion required, and would not be much terrified by their number.
For even on one of those days he was successful in a cavalry action, and
killed one of the two Allobrogians who had deserted to Pompey, as we
before observed, and several others.

LXXXV.--Pompey, because he was encamped on a hill, drew up his army at
the very foot of it, ever in expectation, as may be conjectured, that
Caesar would expose himself to this disadvantageous situation. Caesar,
seeing no likelihood of being able to bring Pompey to an action, judged
it the most expedient method of conducting the war, to decamp from that
post, and to be always in motion: with this hope, that by shifting his
camp and removing from place to place, he might be more conveniently
supplied with corn, and also, that by being in motion he might get some
opportunity of forcing them to battle, and might by constant marches
harass Pompey's army, which was not accustomed to fatigue. These matters
being settled, when the signal for marching was given, and the tents
struck, it was observed that shortly before, contrary to his daily
practice, Pompey's army had advanced farther than usual from his
entrenchments, so that it appeared possible to come to an action on
equal ground. Then Caesar addressed himself to his soldiers, when they
were at the gates of the camp, ready to march out. "We must defer," says
he, "our march at present, and set our thoughts on battle, which has
been our constant wish; let us then meet the foe with resolute souls. We
shall not hereafter easily find such an opportunity." He immediately
marched out at the head of his troops.

LXXXVI.--Pompey also, as was afterward known, at the unanimous
solicitation of his friends, had determined to try the fate of a battle.
For he had even declared in council a few days before that, before the
battalions came to battle, Caesar's army would be put to the rout. When
most people expressed their surprise at it, "I know," says he, "that I
promise a thing almost incredible; but hear the plan on which I proceed,
that you may march to battle with more confidence and resolution. I have
persuaded our cavalry, and they have engaged to execute it, as soon as
the two armies have met, to attack Caesar's right wing on the flank, and
enclosing their army on the rear, throw them into disorder, and put them
to the rout, before we shall throw a weapon against the enemy. By this
means we shall put an end to the war, without endangering the legions,
and almost without a blow. Nor is this a difficult matter, as we far
outnumber them in cavalry." At the same time he gave them notice to be
ready for battle on the day following, and since the opportunity which
they had so often wished for was now arrived, not to disappoint the
opinion generally entertained of their experience and valour.

LXXXVII.--After him Labienus spoke, as well to express his contempt of
Caesar's forces, as to extol Pompey's scheme with the highest encomiums.
"Think not, Pompey," says he, "that this is the army which conquered
Gaul and Germany; I was present at all those battles and do not speak at
random on a subject to which I am a stranger: a very small part of that
army now remains, great numbers lost their lives, as must necessarily
happen in so many battles, many fell victims to the autumnal pestilence
in Italy, many returned home, and many were left behind on the
continent. Have you not heard that the cohorts at Brundisium are
composed of invalids? The forces which you now behold, have been
recruited by levies lately made in Hither Spain, and the greater part
from the colonies beyond the Po; moreover, the flower of the forces
perished in the two engagements at Dyrrachium." Having so said, he took
an oath, never to return to his camp unless victorious; and he
encouraged the rest to do the like. Pompey applauded his proposal, and
took the same oath; nor did any person present hesitate to take it.
After this had passed in the council they broke up full of hopes and
joy, and in imagination anticipated victory; because they thought that
in a matter of such importance, no groundless assertion could be made by
a general of such experience.

LXXXVIII.--When Caesar had approached near Pompey's camp, he observed
that his army was drawn up in the following manner:--On the left wing
were the two legions delivered over by Caesar at the beginning of the
disputes in compliance with the senate's decree, one of which was called
the first, the other the third. Here Pompey commanded in person. Scipio
with the Syrian legions commanded the centre. The Cilician legion in
conjunction with the Spanish cohorts, which we said were brought over by
Afranius, were disposed on the right wing. These Pompey considered his
steadiest troops. The rest he had interspersed between the centre and
the wing, and he had a hundred and ten complete cohorts; these amounted
to forty-five thousand men. He had besides two cohorts of volunteers,
who having received favours from him in former wars, flocked to his
standard: these were dispersed through his whole army. The seven
remaining cohorts he had disposed to protect his camp, and the
neighbouring forts. His right wing was secured by a river with steep
banks; for which reason he placed all his cavalry, archers, and
slingers, on his left wing.

LXXXIX.--Caesar, observing his former custom, had placed the tenth
legion on the right, the ninth on the left, although it was very much
weakened by the battles at Dyrrachium. He placed the eighth legion so
close to the ninth, as to almost make one of the two, and ordered them
to support one another. He drew up on the field eighty cohorts, making a
total of twenty-two thousand men. He left two cohorts to guard the camp.
He gave the command of the left wing to Antonius, of the right to P.
Sulla, and of the centre to Cn. Domitius: he himself took his post
opposite Pompey. At the same time, fearing, from the disposition of the
enemy which we have previously mentioned, lest his right wing might be
surrounded by their numerous cavalry, he rapidly drafted a single cohort
from each of the legions composing the third line, formed of them a
fourth line, and opposed them to Pompey's cavalry, and, acquainting them
with his wishes, admonished them that the success of that day depended
on their courage. At the same time he ordered the third line, and the
entire army not to charge without his command: that he would give the
signal whenever he wished them to do so.

XC.--When he was exhorting his army to battle, according to the military
custom, and spoke to them of the favours that they had constantly
received from him, he took especial care to remind them "that he could
call his soldiers to witness the earnestness with which he had sought
peace, the efforts that he had made by Vatinius to gain a conference
[with Labienus], and likewise by Claudius to treat with Scipio, in what
manner he had exerted himself at Oricum, to gain permission from Libo to
send ambassadors; that he had been always reluctant to shed the blood of
his soldiers, and did not wish to deprive the republic of one or other
of her armies." After delivering this speech, he gave by a trumpet the
signal to his soldiers, who were eagerly demanding it, and were very
impatient for the onset.

XCI.--There was in Caesar's army a volunteer of the name of Crastinus,
who the year before had been first centurion of the tenth legion, a man
of pre-eminent bravery. He, when the signal was given, says, "Follow me,
my old comrades, and display such exertions in behalf of your general as
you have determined to do: this is our last battle, and when it shall be
won, he will recover his dignity, and we our liberty." At the same time
he looked back to Caesar, and said, "General, I will act in such a
manner to-day, that you will feel grateful tome living or dead." After
uttering these words he charged first on the right wing, and about one
hundred and twenty chosen volunteers of the same century followed.

XCII.--There was so much space left between the two lines, as sufficed
for the onset of the hostile armies: but Pompey had ordered his soldiers
to await Caesar's attack, and not to advance from their position, or
suffer their line to be put into disorder. And he is said to have done
this by the advice of Caius Triarius, that the impetuosity of the charge
of Caesar's soldiers might be checked, and their line broken, and that
Pompey's troops remaining in their ranks, might attack them while in
disorder; and he thought that the javelins would fall with less force if
the soldiers were kept in their ground, than if they met them in their
course; at the same time he trusted that Caesar's soldiers, after
running over double the usual ground, would become weary and exhausted
by the fatigue. But to me Pompey seems to have acted without sufficient
reason: for there is a certain impetuosity of spirit and an alacrity
implanted by nature in the hearts of all men, which is inflamed by a
desire to meet the foe. This a general should endeavour not to repress,
but to increase; nor was it a vain institution of our ancestors, that
the trumpets should sound on all sides, and a general shout be raised;
by which they imagined that the enemy were struck with terror, and their
own army inspired with courage.

XCIII.--But our men, when the signal was given, rushed forward with
their javelins ready to be launched, but perceiving that Pompey's men
did not run to meet their charge, having acquired experience by custom,
and being practised in former battles, they of their own accord
repressed their speed, and halted almost midway, that they might not
come up with the enemy when their strength was exhausted, and after a
short respite they again renewed their course, and threw their javelins,
and instantly drew their swords, as Caesar had ordered them. Nor did
Pompey's men fail in this crisis, for they received our javelins, stood
our charge, and maintained their ranks: and having launched their
javelins, had recourse to their swords. At the same time Pompey's horse,
according to their orders, rushed out at once from his left wing, and
his whole host of archers poured after them. Our cavalry did not
withstand their charge: but gave ground a little, upon which Pompey's
horse pressed them more vigorously, and began to file off in troops, and
flank our army. When Caesar perceived this, he gave the signal to his
fourth line, which he had formed of the six cohorts. They instantly
rushed forward and charged Pompey's horse with such fury, that not a man
of them stood; but all wheeling about, not only quitted their post, but
galloped forward to seek a refuge in the highest mountains. By their
retreat the archers and slingers, being left destitute and defenceless,
were all cut to pieces. The cohorts, pursuing their success, wheeled
about upon Pompey's left wing, whilst his infantry still continued to
make battle, and attacked them in the rear.

XCIV.--At the same time Caesar ordered his third line to advance, which
till then had not been engaged, but had kept their post. Thus, new and
fresh troops having come to the assistance of the fatigued, and others
having made an attack on their rear, Pompey's men were not able to
maintain their ground, but all fled, nor was Caesar deceived in his
opinion that the victory, as he had declared in his speech to his
soldiers, must have its beginning from those six cohorts which he had
placed as a fourth line to oppose the horse. For by them the cavalry
were routed; by them the archers and slingers were cut to pieces; by
them the left wing of Pompey's army was surrounded, and obliged to be
the first to flee. But when Pompey saw his cavalry routed, and that part
of his army on which he reposed his greatest hopes thrown into
confusion, despairing of the rest, he quitted the field, and retreated
straightway on horseback to his camp, and calling to the centurions,
whom he had placed to guard the praetorian gate, with a loud voice, that
the soldiers might hear: "Secure the camp," says he, "defend it with
diligence, if any danger should threaten it; I will visit the other
gates, and encourage the guards of the camp." Having thus said, he
retired into his tent in utter despair, yet anxiously waiting the issue.

XCV.--Caesar having forced the Pompeians to flee into their
entrenchment, and thinking that he ought not to allow them any respite
to recover from their fright, exhorted his soldiers to take advantage of
fortune's kindness, and to attack the camp. Though they were fatigued by
the intense heat, for the battle had continued till mid-day, yet, being
prepared to undergo any labour, they cheerfully obeyed his command. The
camp was bravely defended by the cohorts which had been left to guard
it, but with much more spirit by the Thracians and foreign auxiliaries.
For the soldiers who had fled for refuge to it from the field of battle,
affrighted and exhausted by fatigue, having thrown away their arms and
military standards, had their thoughts more engaged on their further
escape than on the defence of the camp. Nor could the troops who were
posted on the battlements long withstand the immense number of our
darts, but fainting under their wounds, quitted the place, and under the
conduct of their centurions and tribunes, fled, without stopping, to the
high mountains which joined the camp.

XCVI.--In Pompey's camp you might see arbours in which tables were laid,
a large quantity of plate set out, the floors of the tents covered with
fresh sods, the tents of Lucius Lentulus and others shaded with ivy, and
many other things which were proofs of excessive luxury, and a
confidence of victory, so that it might readily be inferred that they
had no apprehensions of the issue of the day, as they indulged
themselves in unnecessary pleasures, and yet upbraided with luxury
Caesar's army, distressed and suffering troops, who had always been in
want of common necessaries. Pompey, as soon as our men had forced the
trenches, mounting his horse, and stripping off his general's habit,
went hastily out of the back gate of the camp, and galloped with all
speed to Larissa. Nor did he stop there, but with the same despatch
collecting a few of his flying troops, and halting neither day nor
night, he arrived at the sea-side, attended by only thirty horse, and
went on board a victualling barque, often complaining, as we have been
told, that he had been so deceived in his expectation, that he was
almost persuaded that he had been betrayed by those from whom he had
expected victory, as they began the flight.

XCVII.--Caesar having possessed himself of Pompey's camp, urged his
soldiers not to be too intent on plunder, and lose the opportunity of
completing their conquest. Having obtained their consent, he began to
draw lines round the mountain. The Pompeians distrusting the position,
as there was no water on the mountain, abandoned it, and all began to
retreat towards Larissa; which Caesar perceiving, divided his troops,
and ordering part of his legions to remain in Pompey's camp, sent back a
part to his own camp, and taking four legions with him, went by a
shorter road to intercept the enemy: and having marched six miles, drew
up his army. But the Pompeians observing this, took post on a mountain
whose foot was washed by a river. Caesar having encouraged his troops,
though they were greatly exhausted by incessant labour the whole day,
and night was now approaching, by throwing up works cut off the
communication between the river and the mountain, that the enemy might
not get water in the night. As soon as the work was finished, they sent
ambassadors to treat about a capitulation. A few senators who had
espoused that party, made their escape by night.

XCVIII.--At break of day, Caesar ordered all those who had taken post on
the mountain, to come down from the higher grounds into the plain, and
pile their arms. When they did this without refusal, and with
outstretched arms, prostrating themselves on the ground, with tears,
implored his mercy: he comforted them and bade them rise, and having
spoken a few words of his own clemency to alleviate their fears, he
pardoned them all, and gave orders to his soldiers that no injury should
be done to them, and nothing taken from them. Having used this
diligence, he ordered the legions in his camp to come and meet him, and
those which were, with him to take their turn of rest, and go back to
the camp; and the same day went to Larissa.

XCIX.--In that battle, no more than two hundred privates were missing,
but Caesar lost about thirty centurions, valiant officers. Crastinus,
also, of whom mention was made before, fighting most courageously, lost
his life by the wound of a sword in the mouth; nor was that false which
he declared when marching to battle: for Caesar entertained the highest
opinion of his behaviour in that battle, and thought him highly
deserving of his approbation. Of Pompey's army, there fell about fifteen
thousand; but upwards of twenty-four thousand were made prisoners: for
even the cohorts which were stationed in the forts, surrendered to
Sylla. Several others took shelter in the neighbouring states. One
hundred and eighty stands of colours, and nine eagles, were brought to
Caesar. Lucius Domitius, fleeing from the camp to the mountains, his
strength being exhausted by fatigue, was killed by the horse.

C.--About this time, Decimus Laelius arrived with his fleet at
Brundisium and in the same manner as Libo had done before, possessed
himself of an island opposite the harbour of Brundisium. In like manner,
Valimus, who was then governor of Brundisium, with a few decked barques,
endeavoured to entice Laelius's fleet, and took one five-benched galley
and two smaller vessels that had ventured farther than the rest into a
narrow part of the harbour: and likewise disposing the horse along the
shore, strove to prevent the enemy from procuring fresh water. But
Laelius having chosen a more convenient season of the year for his
expedition, supplied himself with water brought in transports from
Corcyra and Dyrrachium, and was not deterred from his purpose; and till
he had received advice of the battle in Thessaly, he could not be forced
either by the disgrace of losing his ships, or by the want of
necessaries, to quit the port and islands.

CI.--Much about the same time, Cassius arrived in Sicily with a fleet of
Syrians, Phoenicians, and Cilicians: and as Caesar's fleet was divided
into two parts, Publius Sulpicius the praetor commanding one division at
Vibo near the straits, Pomponius the other at Messana, Cassius got into
Messana with his fleet before Pomponius had notice of his arrival, and
having found him in disorder, without guards or discipline, and the wind
being high and favourable, he filled several transports with fir, pitch,
and tow, and other combustibles, and sent them against Pomponius's
fleet, and set fire to all his ships, thirty-five in number, twenty of
which were armed with beaks: and this action struck such terror, that
though there was a legion in garrison at Messana, the town with
difficulty held out, and had not the news of Caesar's victory been
brought at that instant by the horse stationed along the coast, it was
generally imagined that it would have been lost, but the town was
maintained till the news arrived very opportunely; and Cassius set sail
from thence to attack Sulpicius's fleet at Vibo, and our ships being
moored to the land, to strike the same terror, he acted in the same
manner as before. The wind being favourable, he sent into the port about
forty ships provided with combustibles, and the flame catching on both
sides, five ships were burnt to ashes. And when the fire began to spread
wider by the violence of the wind, the soldiers of the veteran legions,
who had been left to guard the fleet, being considered as invalids,
could not endure the disgrace, but of themselves went on board the ships
and weighed anchor, and having attacked Cassius's fleet, captured two
five-banked galleys, in one of which was Cassius himself; but he made
his escape by taking to a boat. Two three-banked galleys were taken
besides. Intelligence was shortly after received of the action in
Thessaly, so well authenticated, that the Pompeians themselves gave
credit to it; for they had hitherto believed it a fiction of Caesar's
lieutenants and friends. Upon which intelligence Cassius departed with
his fleet from that coast.

CII.--Caesar thought he ought to postpone all business and pursue
Pompey, whithersoever he should retreat; that he might not be able to
provide fresh forces, and renew the war; he therefore marched on every
day, as far as his cavalry were able to advance, and ordered one legion
to follow him by shorter journeys. A proclamation was issued by Pompey
at Amphipolis, that all the young men of that province, Grecians and
Roman citizens, should take the military oath; but whether he issued it
with an intention of preventing suspicion, and to conceal as long as
possible his design of fleeing farther, or to endeavour to keep
possession of Macedonia by new levies, if nobody pursued him, it is
impossible to judge. He lay at anchor one night, and calling together
his friends in Amphipolis, and collecting a sum of money for his
necessary expenses, upon advice of Caesar's approach, set sail from that
place, and arrived in a few days at Mitylene. Here he was detained two
days, and having added a few galleys to his fleet he went to Cilicia,
and thence to Cyprus. There he is informed that, by the consent of all
the inhabitants of Antioch and Roman citizens who traded there, the
castle had been seized to shut him out of the town; and that messengers
had been despatched to all those who were reported to have taken refuge
in the neighbouring states, that they should not come to Antioch; that
if they did that, it would be attended with imminent danger to their
lives. The same thing had happened to Lucius Lentulus, who had been
consul the year before, and to Publius Lentulus a consular senator, and
to several others at Rhodes, who having followed Pompey in his flight,
and arrived at the island, were not admitted into the town or port; and
having received a message to leave that neighbourhood, set sail much
against their will; for the rumour of Caesar's approach had now reached
those states.

CIII.--Pompey, being informed of these proceedings, laid aside his
design of going to Syria, and having taken the public money from the
farmers of the revenue, and borrowed more from some private friends, and
having put on board his ships a large quantity of brass for military
purposes, and two thousand armed men, whom he partly selected from the
slaves of the tax farmers, and partly collected from the merchants, and
such persons as each of his friends thought fit on this occasion, he
sailed for Pelusium. It happened that king Ptolemy, a minor, was there
with a considerable army, engaged in war with his sister Cleopatra, whom
a few months before, by the assistance of his relations and friends, he
had expelled from the kingdom; and her camp lay at a small distance from
his. To him Pompey applied to be permitted to take refuge in Alexandria,
and to be protected in his calamity by his powerful assistance, in
consideration of the friendship and amity which had subsisted between
his father and him. But Pompey's deputies having executed their
commission, began to converse with less restraint with the king's
troops, and to advise them to act with friendship to Pompey, and not to
think meanly of his bad fortune. In Ptolemy's army were several of
Pompey's soldiers, of whom Gabinius had received the command in Syria,
and had brought them over to Alexandria, and at the conclusion of the
war had left with Ptolemy the father of the young king.

CIV.--The king's friends, who were regents of the kingdom during the
minority, being informed of these things, either induced by fear, as
they afterwards declared, lest Pompey should corrupt the king's army,
and seize on Alexandria and Egypt; or despising his bad fortune, as in
adversity friends commonly change to enemies, in public gave a
favourable answer to his deputies, and desired him to come to the king;
but secretly laid a plot against him, and despatched Achillas, captain
of the king's guards, a man of singular boldness, and Lucius Septimius a
military tribune to assassinate him. Being kindly addressed by them, and
deluded by an acquaintance with Septimius, because in the war with the
pirates the latter had commanded a company under him, he embarked in a
small boat with a few attendants, and was there murdered by Achillas and
Septimius. In like manner, Lucius Lentulus was seized by the king's
order, and put to death in prison.

CV.--When Caesar arrived in Asia, he found that Titus Ampius had
attempted to remove the money from the temple of Diana at Ephesus; and
for this purpose had convened all the senators in the province that he
might have them to attest the sum, but was interrupted by Caesar's
arrival, and had made his escape. Thus, on two occasions, Caesar saved
the money of Ephesus. It was also remarked at Elis, in the temple of
Minerva, upon calculating and enumerating the days, that on the very day
on which Caesar had gained his battle, the image of Victory which was
placed before Minerva, and faced her statue, turned about towards the
portal and entrance of the temple; and the same day, at Antioch in
Syria, such a shout of an army and sound of trumpets was twice heard,
that the citizens ran in arms to the walls. The same thing happened at
Ptolemais; a sound of drums too was heard at Pergamus, in the private
and retired parts of the temple, into which none but the priests are
allowed admission, and which the Greeks call Adyta (the inaccessible),
and likewise at Tralles, in the temple of Victory, in which there stood
a statue consecrated to Caesar; a palm-tree at that time was shown that
had sprouted up from the pavement, through the joints of the stones, and
shot up above the roof.

CVI.--After a few days' delay in Asia, Caesar, having heard that Pompey
had been seen in Cyprus, and conjecturing that he had directed his
course into Egypt, on account of his connection with that kingdom, set
out for Alexandria with two legions (one of which he ordered to follow
him from Thessaly, the other he called in from Achaia, from Fufius, the
lieutenant-general) and with eight hundred horse, ten ships of war from
Rhodes, and a few from Asia. These legions amounted but to three
thousand two hundred men; the rest, disabled by wounds received in
various battles, by fatigue and the length of their march, could not
follow him. But Caesar, relying on the fame of his exploits; did not
hesitate to set forward with a feeble force, and thought that he would
be secure in any place. At Alexandria he was informed of the death of
Pompey: and at his landing there, heard a cry among the soldiers whom
the king had left to garrison the town, and saw a crowd gathering
towards him, because the fasces were carried before him; for this the
whole multitude thought an infringement of the king's dignity. Though
this tumult was appeased, frequent disturbances were raised for several
days successively, by crowds of the populace, and a great many of his
soldiers were killed in all parts of the city.

CVIL--Having observed this, he ordered other legions to be brought to
him from Asia, which he had made up out of Pompey's soldiers; for he was
himself detained against his will, by the etesian winds, which are
totally unfavourable to persons on a voyage from Alexandria. In the
meantime, considering that the disputes of the princes belonged to the
jurisdiction of the Roman people, and of him as consul, and that it was
a duty more incumbent on him, as in his former consulate a league had
been made with Ptolemy the late king, under sanction both of a law, and
a decree of the senate, he signified that it was his pleasure, that king
Ptolemy, and his sister Cleopatra, should disband their armies, and
decide their disputes in his presence by justice, rather than by the
sword.

CVIII.--A eunuch named Pothinus, the boy's tutor, was regent of the
kingdom on account of his youthfulness. He at first began to complain
amongst his friends, and to express his indignation, that the king
should be summoned to plead his cause: but afterwards, having prevailed
on some of those whom he had made acquainted with his views to join him,
he secretly called the army away from Pelusium to Alexandria, and
appointed Achillas, already spoken of, commander-in-chief of the forces.
Him he encouraged and animated by promises both in his own and the
king's name, and instructed him both by letters and messages how he
should act. By the will of Ptolemy the father, the elder of his two sons
and the more advanced in years of his two daughters were declared his
heirs, and for the more effectual performance of his intention, in the
same will he conjured the Roman people by all the gods, and by the
league which he had entered into at Rome, to see his will executed. One
of the copies of his will was conveyed to Rome by his ambassadors to be
deposited in the treasury, but the public troubles preventing it, it was
lodged with Pompey: another was left sealed up, and kept at Alexandria.

CIX.--Whilst these things were debated before Caesar, and he was very
anxious to settle the royal disputes as a common friend and arbitrator;
news was brought on a sudden that the king's army and all his cavalry
were on their march to Alexandria. Caesar's forces were by no means so
strong that he could trust to them, if he had occasion to hazard a
battle without the town. His only resource was to keep within the town
in the most convenient places, and get information of Achillas's
designs. However he ordered his soldiers to repair to their arms; and
advised the king to send some of his friends, who had the greatest
influence, as deputies to Achillas and to signify his royal pleasure.
Dioscorides and Serapion, the persons sent by him, who had both been
ambassadors at Rome, and had been in great esteem with Ptolemy the
father, went to Achillas. But as soon as they appeared in his presence,
without hearing them, or learning the occasion of their coming, he
ordered them to be seized and put to death. One of them, after receiving
a wound, was taken up and carried off by his attendants as dead: the
other was killed on the spot. Upon this, Caesar took care to secure the
king's person, both supposing that the king's name would have great
influence with his subjects, and to give the war the appearance of the
scheme of a few desperate men, rather than of having been begun by the
king's consent.

CX.--The forces under Achillas did not seem despicable, either for
number, spirit, or military experience; for he had twenty thousand men
under arms. They consisted partly of Gabinius's soldiers, who were now
become habituated to the licentious mode of living at Alexandria, and
had forgotten the name and discipline of the Roman people, and had
married wives there, by whom the greatest part of them had children. To
these was added a collection of highwaymen and free-booters, from Syria,
and the province of Cilicia, and the adjacent countries. Besides several
convicts and transports had been collected: for at Alexandria all our
runaway slaves were sure of finding protection for their persons on the
condition that they should give in their names, and enlist as soldiers:
and if any of them was apprehended by his master, he was rescued by a
crowd of his fellow soldiers, who being involved in the same guilt,
repelled, at the hazard of their lives, every violence offered to any of
their body. These by a prescriptive privilege of the Alexandrian army,
used to demand the king's favourites to be put to death, pillage the
properties of the rich to increase their pay, invest the king's palace,
banish some from the kingdom, and recall others from exile. Besides
these, there were two thousand horse, who had acquired the skill of
veterans by being in several wars in Alexandria. These had restored
Ptolemy the father to his kingdom, had killed Bibulus's two sons; and
had been engaged in war with the Egyptians; such was their experience in
military affairs.

CXI.--Full of confidence in his troops, and despising the small number
of Caesar's soldiers, Achillas seized Alexandria, except that part of
the town which Caesar occupied with his troops. At first he attempted to
force the palace; but Caesar had disposed his cohorts through the
streets, and repelled his attack. At the same time there was an action
at the port: where the contest was maintained with the greatest
obstinacy. For the forces were divided, and the fight maintained in
several streets at once, and the enemy endeavoured to seize with a
strong party the ships of war; of which fifty had been sent to Pompey's
assistance, but after the battle in Thessaly had returned home. They
were all of either three or five banks of oars, well equipped and
appointed with every necessary for a voyage. Besides these, there were
twenty-two vessels with decks, which were usually kept at Alexandria, to
guard the port. If they made themselves masters of these, Caesar being
deprived of his fleet, they would have the command of the port and whole
sea, and could prevent him from procuring provisions and auxiliaries.
Accordingly that spirit was displayed, which ought to be displayed when
the one party saw that a speedy victory depended on the issue, and the
other their safety. But Caesar gained the day, and set fire to all those
ships, and to others which were in the docks, because he could not guard
so many places with so small a force; and immediately he conveyed some
troops to the Pharos by his ships.

CXIL--The Pharos is a tower on an island, of prodigious height, built
with amazing works, and takes its name from the island. This island
lying over against Alexandria forms a harbour; but on the upper side it
is connected with the town by a narrow way eight hundred paces in
length, made by piles sunk in the sea, and by a bridge. In this island
some of the Egyptians have houses, and a village as large as a town; and
whatever ships from any quarter, either through mistaking the channel,
or by the storm, have been driven from their course upon the coast, they
constantly plunder like pirates. And without the consent of those who
are masters of the Pharos, no vessels can enter the harbour, on account
of its narrowness. Caesar being greatly alarmed on this account, whilst
the enemy were engaged in battle, landed his soldiers, seized the
Pharos, and placed a garrison in it. By this means he gained this point,
that he could be supplied without danger with corn and auxiliaries: for
he sent to all the neighbouring countries, to demand supplies. In other
parts of the town, they fought so obstinately, that they quitted the
field with equal advantage, and neither were beaten (in consequence of
the narrowness of the passes); and a few being killed on both sides,
Caesar secured the most necessary posts, and fortified them in the
night. In this quarter of the town was a wing of the king's palace, in
which Caesar was lodged on his first arrival, and a theatre adjoining
the house which served as for citadel, and commanded an avenue to the
port and other docks. These fortifications he increased during the
succeeding days, that he might have them before him as a rampart, and
not be obliged to fight against his will. In the meantime Ptolemy's
younger daughter, hoping the throne would become vacant, made her escape
from the palace to Achillas, and assisted him in prosecuting the war.
But they soon quarrelled about the command, which circumstance enlarged
the presents to the soldiers, for each endeavoured by great sacrifices
to secure their affection. Whilst the enemy was thus employed, Pothinus,
tutor to the young king, and regent of the kingdom, who was in Caesar's
part of the town, sent messengers to Achillas, and encouraged him not to
desist from his enterprise, nor to despair of success; but his
messengers being discovered and apprehended, he was put to death by
Caesar. Such was the commencement of the Alexandrian war.



       *       *       *       *       *


INDEX

N.B. The numerals refer to the book, the figures to the chapter. G.
stands for the Gallic War, C. for the Civil.

Acarn[=a]n[)i]a, a region of Greece, _Carnia_

Acco, prince of the Sen[)o]nes, his conduct on Caesar's approach, G. vi.
4; condemned in a council of the Gauls, vi. 44

Achaia, sometimes taken for all Greece, but most commonly for a part of
it only; in Peloponnesus, _Romania alta_

Achillas, captain of Ptolemy's guards, sent to kill Pompey, C. iii. 104;
appointed by Pothinus commander of all the Egyptian forces, _ibid_. 108;
heads an army of twenty thousand veteran troops, _ibid_. 110

Acilla, or Achilla, or Acholla. There were two cities in Africa of this
name, one inland, the other on the coast. The modern name of the latter
is _Elalia_

Acilius, Caesar's lieutenant, C. iii. 15

Act[)i]um, a promontory of Epirus, now called the _Cape of Tigalo_,
famous for a naval victory gained near it, by Augustus, over M. Antony

Act[)i]us, a Pelignian, one of Pompey's followers, taken by Caesar, and
dismissed in safety, C. i. 18

Act[)i]us Rufus accuses L. Apanius of treachery, C. iii. 83

Act[)i]us Varus prevents Tubero from landing in Africa, C. i. 31; his
forces, C. ii. 23; his camp, _ibid_. 25; engages Curio, _ibid_. 34; his
danger, defeat, and stratagem, _ibid_. 35

Adcant[)u]annus sallies upon Crassus at the head of a chosen body of
troops, G. iii. 22

Add[)u]a, the _Adda_, a river that rises in the Alps, and, separating
the duchy of Milan from the state of Venice, falls into the Po above
Cremona

Adriatic Sea, the _Gulf of Venice_, at the extremity of which that city
is situated

Adrum[=e]tum, a town in Africa, _Mahometta_; held by Considius Longus
with a garrison of one legion, C. ii. 23

Aduat[)u]uci (in some editions Atuatici), descendants of the Teutones
and Cimbri, G. ii. 29; they furnish twenty-nine thousand men to the
general confederacy of Gaul, _ibid_. 4; Caesar obliges them to submit,
_ibid_. 29

Aed[)u]i, the _Autunois_, a people of Gaul, near _Autun_, in the country
now called _Lower Burgundy_; they complain to Caesar of the ravages
committed in their territories by the Helvetii, G. i. 11; join in a
petition against Ariovistus, _ibid_. 33; at the head of one of the two
leading factions of Gaul, G. vi. 12; Caesar quiets an intestine
commotion among them, C. vii. 33; they revolt from the Romans, G. vii.
54; their law concerning magistrates, _ibid_. 33; their clients, i. 31;
vii. 75

Aeg[=e]an Sea, the _Archipelago_, a part of the Mediterranean which lies
between Greece, Asia Minor, and the Isle of Crete

Aeg[=i]n[)i]um, a town of Thessaly; Domitius joins Caesar near that
place, C. iii. 79

Aegus and Roscillus, their perfidious behaviour towards Caesar, C. iii.
59, 60

Aegyptus, _Egypt,_ an extensive country of Africa, bounded on the west
by part of Marmarica and the deserts of Lybia, on the north by the
Mediterranean, on the east by the Sinus Arabicus, and a line drawn from
Arsino[)e] to Rhinocolura, and on the south by Aethiopia. Egypt,
properly so called, may be described as consisting of the long and
narrow valley which follows the course of the Nile from Syene
(_Assooan_) to _Cairo,_ near the site of the ancient Memphis. The name
by which this country is known to Europeans comes from the Greeks, some
of whose writers inform us that it received this appellation from
Aegyptus, son of Belus, it having been previously called Aeria. In the
Hebrew scriptures it is called Mitsraim, and also Matsor and Harets
Cham; of these names, however, the first is the one most commonly
employed

Aemilia Via, a Roman road in Italy, from Rimini to Aquileia, and from
Pisa to Dertona

Aet[=o]lia, a country of Greece, _Despotato;_ recovered from Pompey by
the partisans of Caesar, C. iii. 35

Afr[=a]nius, Pompey's lieutenant, his exploits in conjunction with
Petreius, C. i. 38; resolves to carry the war into Celtiberia, _ibid_.
61; surrenders to Caesar, _ibid_. 84

Afr[)i]ca, one of the four great continents into which the earth is
divided; the name seems to have been originally applied by the Romans to
the country around Carthage, the first part of the continent with which
they became acquainted, and is said to have been derived from a small
Carthaginian district on the northern coast, called _Frigi._ Hence, even
when the name had become applied to the whole continent, there still
remained in Roman geography the district of Africa Proper, on the
Mediterranean coast, corresponding to the modem kingdom of _Tunis,_ with
part of that of _Tripoli_

Agend[)i]cum, a city of the Senones, _Sens_; Caesar quarters four
legions there, G. vi. 44; Labienus leaves his baggage in it under a
guard of new levies, and sets out for Lutetia, G. vii. 57

Alba, a town of Latium, in Italy, _Albano_; Domitius levies troops in
that neighbourhood, C. i. 15

Alb[=i]ci, a people of Gaul, unknown; some make them the same with the
_Vivarois_; taken into the service of the Marseillians, C. i. 34

Albis, the _Elbe,_ a large and noble river in Germany, which has its
source in the Giant's Mountains in Silesia, on the confines of Bohemia,
and passing through Bohemia, Upper and Lower Saxony, falls into the
North Sea at Ritzbuttel, about sixty miles below Hamburg

Alces, a species of animals somewhat resembling an elk, to be found in
the Hercynian forests, C. vi. 27

Alemanni, or Alamanni, a name assumed by a confederacy of German tribes,
situated between the Neckar and the Upper Rhine, who united to resist
the encroachments of the Roman power. According to Mannert, they derived
their origin from the shattered remains of the army of Ariovistus
retired, after the defeat and death of their leader, to the mountainous
country of the Upper Rhine. After their overthrow by Clovis, king of the
Salian Franks, they ceased to exist as one nation, and were dispersed
over Gaul, Switzerland, and Nether Italy. From them L'Allemagne, the
French name for Germany, is derived

Alemannia, the country inhabited by the Alemanni

Alesia, or Alexia, a town of the Mandubians, _Alise_; Caesar shuts up
Vercingetorix there, C. vii. 68; surrounds it with lines of
circumvallation and contravallation, _ibid_. 69, 72; obliges it to
surrender, _ibid_. 89

Alexandr[=i]a, a city of Egypt, _Scanderia_. It was built by Alexander
the Great, 330 years before Christ; Caesar pursues Pompey thither, C.
iii. 106

Aliso, by some supposed to be the town now called _Iselburg_; or,
according to Junius, _Wesel_, in the duchy of Cleves, but more probably
_Elsen_

Allier (El[=a]ver), Caesar eludes the vigilance of Vercingetorix, and by
an artifice passes that river, G. vii. 35

All[)o]br[)o]ges, an ancient people of Gallia Transalp[=i]na, who
inhabited the country which is now called _Dauphiny, Savoy,_ and
_Piedmont_. The name, Allobroges, means highlanders, and is derived from
Al, "high," and Broga, "land." They are supposed to be disaffected to
the Romans, G. i. 6; complain to Caesar of the ravages of the
Helvetians, _ibid_. 11

Alps, a ridge of high mountains, which separates France and Germany from
Italy. That part of them which separates Dauphiny from Piedmont was
called the Cottian Alps. Their name is derived from their height, Alp
being an old Celtic appellation for "a lofty mountain"; Caesar crosses
them with five legions, G. i. 10; sends Galba to open a free passage
over them to the Roman merchants, G. iii. 1

Alsati[)a], a province of Germany, in the upper circle of the Rhine,
_Alsace_

Amagetobr[)i]a, a city of Gaul, unknown; famous for a defeat of the
Gauls there by Ariovistus, G. i. 31

Amant[)i]a, a town in Macedonia, _Porto Raguseo_; it submits to Caesar,
and sends ambassadors to know his pleasure, C. iii. 12

Am[=a]nus, a mountain of Syria, _Alma Daghy,_ near which Scipio sustains
some losses, C. iii. 31

Am[=a]ni Pylae, or Am[=a]nicae Portae, _Straits of Scanderona_

Ambarri, a people of Gaul, uncertain; they complain to Caesar of the
ravages committed in their territories by the Helvetii, G. i. 11

Ambialites, a people of Gaul, of _Lamballe in Bretagne_. Others take the
word to be only a different name for the Ambiani; they join in a
confederacy with the Veneti against Caesar, G. iii. 9

Ambi[=a]ni, or Ambianenses, the people of _Amiens;_ they furnish ten
thousand men to the general confederacy of the Belgians against Caesar,
G. ii. 4; sue for peace, and submit themselves to Caesar's pleasure, G.
ii. 15

Ambi[=a]num, a city of Belgium, _Amiens_

Amb[)i]b[)a]ri, a people of Gaul, inhabiting _Ambie_, in Normandy
Amb[)i][)o]rix, his artful speech to Sabinus and Cotta, G. v. 27; Caesar
marches against him, G. vi. 249. Ravages and lays waste his territories,
_ibid_. 34; endeavours in vain to get him into his hands, _ibid_. 43

Ambivar[)e]ti, a people of Gaul, the _Vivarais_. They are ordered to
furnish their contingent for raising the siege of Alesia, G. vii. 75

Ambivar[=i]ti, an ancient people of _Brabant_, between the Rhine and the
Maese; the German cavalry sent to forage among them, G. iv. 9

Ambr[)a]c[)i]a, a city of Epirus, _Arta_; Cassius directs his march
thither, C. iii. 36

Ambrones, an ancient people, who lived in the country which is now
called the _Canton of Bern_, in Switzerland

Amph[)i]l[)o]chia, a region of Epirus, _Anfilocha_. Its inhabitants
reduced by Cassius Longinus, C. iii. 55

Amph[)i]p[)o]lis, a city of Macedonia, _Cristopoli_, or _Emboli_. An
edict in Pompey's name published there, C. iii. 102

Anartes, a people of Germany, _Walachians_, _Servians_, or _Bulgarians_,
bordering upon the Hercynian Forest, G. vi. 25

Anas, a river of Spain, the _Guadiana_, or _Rio Roydera_, bounding that
part of Spain under the government of Petreius, C. i. 38

Anc[)a]l[=i]tes, a people of Britain, of the hundred of _Henley_, in
Oxfordshire; they send ambassadors to Caesar with an offer of
submission, G. v. 21

Anch[)i][)a]los, a city of Thrace, near the Euxine Sea, now called
_Kenkis_

Ancibarii, or Ansivarii, an ancient people of Lower Germany, of and
about the town of _Ansestaet_, or _Amslim_

Anc[=o]na, _Ancona_, a city of Italy, on the coast of Pisenum. It is
supposed to derive its name from the Greek word [Greek: agkon], an angle
or elbow, on account of the angular form of the promontory on which it
is built. The foundation of Ancona is ascribed by Strabo to some
Syracusans, who were fleeing from the tyranny of Dionysius. Livy speaks
of it as a naval station of great importance in the wars of Rome with
the Illyrians. We find it occupied by Caesar (C. i. 2) shortly after
crossing the Rubicon; Caesar takes possession of it with a garrison of
one cohort, C. i. 11

Andes, _Angers_, in France, the capital of the duchy of Anjou

Andes, a people of Gaul, the ancient inhabitants of the duchy of Anjou;
Caesar puts his troops into winter quarters among them, G. ii. 35

Andomad[=u]num Ling[)o]num, a large and ancient city of Champagne, at
the source of the river Marne, _Langres_

Anglesey (Mona), an island situated between Britain and Ireland, where
the night, during the winter, is said to be a month long, G. v. 13

Angrivarii, an ancient people of Lower Germany, who dwelt between the
Ems and the Weser, below the Lippe

Ansivarii, see _Ancibarii_

Antioch[=i]a, _Antachia_, an ancient and famous city, once the capital
of Syria, or rather of the East. It is situate on two rivers, the
Orontes and the Phaspar, not far from the Mediterranean; refuses to
admit the fugitives after the battle of Pharsalia, C. iii. 102

Ant[=o]nius (Mark Antony), Caesar's lieutenant, G. vii. i i; quaestor,
G. viii. 2; governor of Brundusium, C. iii. 24; his standing for that
priesthood, G. vii. 50; obliges Libo to raise the siege of Brundusium,
C. iii. 24; and in conjunction with Kalenus transports Caesar's troops
to Greece, _ibid_. 26

Apam[=e]a, _Apami_, a city of Bithynia, built by Nicomedes, the son of
Prusias

Apennine Mountains, a large chain of mountains, branching off from the
Maritime Alps, in the neighbourhood of Genoa, running diagonally from
the Ligurian Gulf to the Adriatic, in the vicinity of Ancona; from which
it continues nearly parallel with the latter gulf, as far as the
promontory of Garg[=a]nus, and again inclines to Mare Inf[)e]rum, till
it finally terminates in the promontory of Leucopetra, near Rhegium. The
etymology of the name given to these mountains must be traced to the
Celtic, and appears to combine two terms of that language nearly
synonymous, Alp, or Ap, "a high mountain," and Penn, "a summit"

Apoll[=o]n[)i]a, a city of Macedonia, _Piergo_. Pompey resolves to
winter there, C. iii. 5; Caesar makes himself master of it, _ibid_. iii.
12

Appia Via, the Appian road which led from Rome to Campania, and from the
sea to Brundusium. It was made, as Livy informs us, by the censor,
Appius Caecus, A.U.C. 442, and was, in the first instance, only laid
down as far as Capua, a distance of about 125 miles. It was subsequently
carried on to Beneventum, and finally to Brundusium. According to
Eustace (_Classical Tour_, vol. iii.), such parts of the Appian Way as
have escaped destruction, as at _Fondi_ and _Mola_, show few traces of
wear and decay after a duration of two thousand years

Apsus, a river of Macedonia, the _Aspro_. Caesar and Pompey encamp over
against each other on the banks of that river, C. iii. 13

Apulia, a region of Italy, _la Puglia_. Pompey quarters there the
legions sent by Caesar, C. i. 14

Aquil[=a]ria, a town of Africa, near Clupea. Pompey quarters there the
legions sent by Caesar, C. i. 14; Curio arrives there with the troops
designed against Africa. C. ii. 23

Aquileia, formerly a famous and considerable city of Italy, not far from
the Adriatic, now little more than a heap of ruins, _Aquilegia_. Caesar
draws together the troops quartered there, G. i. 10

Aquitania, a third part of ancient Gaul, now containing _Guienne_,
_Gascony_, etc.

Aquit[=a]ni, the Aquitanians reduced under the power of the Romans by
Crassus, G. iii. 20-22; very expert in the art of mining, _ibid_. 21

Arar, or Araris, a river of Gaul, the Sa[^o]ne; the Helvetians receive a
considerable check in passing this river, G. i. 12

Arduenna Silva, the forest of _Ardenne_, in France, reaching from the
Rhine to the city of Tournay, in the low countries; Indutiom[)a]rus
conceals in it the infirm and aged, G. v. 3; Caesar crosses it in quest
of Ambiorix, G. vi. 29

Arecomici Volcae, Caesar plants garrisons among them, G. vii. 7

Arel[=a]te, or Arel[=a]tum, or Arelas, a city of Gaul, _Arles_. Caesar
orders twelve galleys to be built there, C. i. 36

Ar[)i]m[)i]num, a city of Italy, _Rimini_; Caesar having sounded the
disposition of his troops, marches thither, C. i. 8

Ar[)i][)o]vistus, king of the Germans, his tyrannical conduct towards
the Gauls, G. i. 31; Caesar sends ambassadors to him demanding an
interview, _ibid_. 34; he is defeated and driven entirely out of Gaul,
_ibid_. 52

Arles, see _Arelate_

Arm[)e]n[)i]a, a country of Asia, divided into the greater or lesser,
and now called _Turcomania_

Armorici, the ancient people of Armorica, a part of Gallia Celtica, now
_Bretagne_; they assemble in great numbers to attack L. Roscius in his
winter quarters, G. v. 53

Arr[=e]t[)i]um, a city of Etruria, in Italy, _Arezzo_; Antony sent
thither with five cohorts, C. i. 10

Arverni, an ancient people of France, on the Loire, whose chief city was
Arvernum, now _Clermont_, the capital of _Auvergne_; suddenly invaded,
and their territories ravaged by Caesar, G. vii. 8

Asculum, a town of Italy, _Ascoli_; Caesar takes possession of it, C. i.
16

Asparagium, a town in Macedonia, unknown; Pompey encamps near it with
all his forces, C. iii. 30

Astigi, or Astingi, a people of Andalusia, in Spain

Athens, one of the most ancient and noble cities of Greece, the capital
of Attica. It produced some of the most distinguished statesmen,
orators, and poets that the world ever saw, and its sculptors and
painters have been rarely rivalled, never surpassed. No city on the
earth has ever exercised an equal influence on the educated men of all
ages. It contributes to fit out a fleet for Pompey, C. iii. 3

Atreb[)a]tes, an ancient people of Gaul, who lived in that part of the
Netherlands which is now called _Artois_; they furnish fifteen thousand
men to the general confederacy of Gaul, G. ii. 4

Attica, a country of Greece, between Achaia and Macedonia, famous on
account of its capital, Athens

Attuarii, a people of ancient Germany, who inhabited between the Maese
and the Rhine, whose country is now a part of the duchy of _Gueldes_

Atuatuca, a strong castle, where Caesar deposited all his baggage, on
setting out in pursuit of Ambiorix, G. vi. 32; the Germans unexpectedly
attack it, _ibid_. 35

Augustod[=u]num, _Autun_, a very ancient city of Burgundy, on the river
Arroux

Aulerci Eburovices, a people of Gaul, in the country of _Evreux_, in
Normandy

Aulerci Brannovices, a people of Gaul, _Morienne_

Aulerci Cenomanni, a people of Gaul, the country of _Maine_

Aulerci Diablintes, a people of Gaul, _le Perche_

Aulerci reduced by P. Crassus, G, ii. 34; massacre their senate, and
join Viridovix, G. iii. 17; Aulerci Brannovices ordered to furnish their
contingent to the relief of Alesia, G. vii. 7; Aulerci Cenomanni furnish
five thousand, _ibid_.; Aulerci Eburovices three thousand, _ibid_.

Ausci, a people of Gaul, those of _Auchs_ or _Aux_, in Gascony; they
submit to Crassus and send hostages, G. iii. 27

Auset[=a]ni, a people of Spain, under the Pyrenean mountains; they send
ambassadors to Caesar, with an offer of submission, C. i. 60

Aux[)i]mum, a town in Italy, _Osimo_, or _Osmo_; Caesar makes himself
master of it, C. i. 15

Av[=a]r[)i]cum, a city of Aquitaine, the capital of the Biturigians,
_Bourges_; besieged by Caesar, G. vii. 13; and at last taken by storm,
_ibid_. 31

Ax[)o]na, the river _Aisne_, Caesar crosses it in his march against the
Belgians, G. ii. 5, 6

Bac[=e]nis, a forest of ancient Germany, which parted the Suevi from the
Cherusci; by some supposed to be the Forests of _Thuringia_, by others
the _Black Forest_; the Suevians encamp at the entrance of that wood,
resolving there to await the approach of the Romans, G vi. 10

Bac[)u]lus, P. Sextius, his remarkable bravery, G. vi. 38

Baet[)i]ca, in the ancient geography, about a third part of Spain,
containing _Andalusia_, and a part of _Granada_

Bagr[)a]das, a river of Africa, near Ut[)i]ca, the _Begrada_; Curio
arrives with his army at that river, C. ii. 38

Bale[=a]res Ins[)u]lae, several islands in the Mediterranean Sea,
formerly so called, of which _Majorca_ and _Minorca_ are the chief; the
inhabitants famous for their dexterity in the use of the sling, G. ii. 7

Bat[)a]vi, the ancient inhabitants of the island of Batavia

Batavia, or Batavorum Insula, _Holland_, a part of which still retains
the name of _Betuwe_; formed by the Meuse and the Wal, G. iv. 10

Belgae, the inhabitants of Gallia Belgica. The original Belgae were
supposed to be of German extraction; but passing the Rhine, settled
themselves in Gaul. The name Belgae belongs to the Cymric language, in
which, under the form _Belgiaid_, the radical of which is _Belg_, it
signifies warlike; they are the most warlike people of Gaul, G. i. 1;
withstand the invasion of the Teutones and Cimbri, G. ii. 4; originally
of German extraction, _ibid_.; Caesar obliges them to decamp and return
to their several habitations, _ibid_. 11

Belgia, Belgium, or Gallia Belgica, the _Low Countries_, or
_Netherlands_

Bellocassi, or Velocasses, a people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of
_Bayeux_, in Normandy; they furnish three thousand men to the relief of
Alesia, G. vii. 75

Bell[)o]v[)a]ci, an ancient renowned people among the Belgae, inhabiting
the country now called _Beauvais_ in France; they furnish a hundred
thousand men to the general confederacy of Belgium, G. ii. 4; join in
the general defection under Vercingetorix, G. vii. 59; again take up
arms against Caesar, viii. 7; but are compelled to submit and sue for
pardon

Bergea, a city of Macedonia, now called _Veria_

Berones, see _Retones_

Bessi, a people of Thrace, _Bessarabia_; they make part of Pompey's
army, C. iii. 4

Bethuria, a region of Hispania Lusitanica, _Estremadura_

Bibracte, a town of Burgundy, now called _Autun_, the capital of the
Aedui; Caesar, distressed for want of corn, marches thither to obtain a
supply, G. i. 23

Bibrax, a town of Rheims, _Braine_, or _Bresne_; attacked with great
fury by the confederate Belgians, G. ii. 6

Bibr[)o]ci, a people of Britain; according to Camden, _the hundred of
Bray_, in Berkshire; they send ambassadors to Caesar to sue for peace,
G. v. 21

Bib[)u]lus burns thirty of Caesar's ships, C. iii. 8; his hatred of
Caesar, _ibid_. 8, 16; his cruelty towards the prisoners that fell into
his hands, _ibid_. 14; his death, _ibid_. 18; death of his two sons,
_ibid_. 110

Bigerriones, a people of Gaul, inhabiting the country now called
_Bigorre,_ in Gascony; they surrender and give hostages to Crassus, G.
iii. 27

Bithynia, a country of Asia Minor, adjoining to Troas, over against
Thrace, _Becsangial_

Bit[:u]r[)i]ges, a people of Guienne, in France, of the country of
_Berry;_ they join with the Arverni in the general defection under
Vercingetorix, G. vii. 5

Boeotia, a country in Greece; separated from Attica by Mount Citheron.
It had formerly several other names and was famous for its capital,
Thebes; it is now called _Stramulipa_

Boii, an ancient people of Germany who, passing the Rhine, settled in
Gaul, the _Bourbonnois;_ they join with the Helvetians in their
expedition against Gaul, G. i. 5; attack the Romans in flank, _ibid_.
25; Caesar allows them to settle among the Aeduans, _ibid_. 28

Bor[=a]ni, an ancient people of Germany, supposed by some to be the same
as the Burii

Bosphor[=a]ni, a people bordering upon the Euxine Sea, _the Tartars_

Bosph[)o]rus, two straits of the sea so called, one Bosphorus Thracius,
now the _Straits of Constantinople;_ the other Bosphorus Climerius, now
the _Straits of Caffa_

Brannov[=i]ces, the people of _Morienne,_ in France

Brannovii furnished their contingent to the relief of Alesia, C. vii. 75

Bratuspant[)i]um, a city of Gaul, belonging to the Bellov[)a]ci,
_Beauvais;_ it submits, and obtains pardon from Caesar, G. ii. 13

Bridge built by Caesar over the Rhine described, G. iv. 7

Br[)i]tannia, Caesar's expedition thither, G. iv. 20; description of the
coast, 23; the Romans land in spite of the vigorous opposition of the
islanders, 26; the Britons send ambassadors to Caesar to desire a peace,
which they obtain on delivery of hostages, 27; they break the peace on
hearing that Caesar's fleet was destroyed by a storm, and set upon the
Roman foragers, 30; their manner of fighting in chariots; they fall upon
the Roman camp, but are repulsed, and petition again for peace, which
Caesar grants them, 33-35; Caesar passes over into their island a second
time, v. 8; drives them from the woods where they had taken refuge, 9;
describes their manners and way of living, 12; defeats them in several
encounters, 15-21; grants them a peace, on their giving hostages, and
agreeing to pay a yearly tribute, 22

Brundusium, a city of Italy, _Brindisi._ By the Greeks it was called
[Greek: Brentesion], which in the Messapian language signified a stag's
head, from the resemblance which its different harbours and creeks bore
to that object; Pompey retires thither with his forces, C. i. 24; Caesar
lays siege to it, 26; Pompey escapes from it by sea, upon which it
immediately surrenders to Caesar, 28; Libo blocks up the port with a
fleet, C. iii. 24; but by the valour of Antony is obliged to retire,
_ibid_.

Brutii, a people of Italy, _the Calabrians._ They were said to be
runaway slaves and shepherds of the Lucanians, who, after concealing
themselves for a time, became at last numerous enough to attack their
masters, and succeeded at length in gaining their independence. Their
very name is said to indicate that they were revolted slaves: [Greek:
Brettious gar kalousi apostatas], says Strabo, speaking of the Lucanians

Br[=u]tus, appointed to command the fleet in the war against the people
of Vannes, G. iii. 11; engages and defeats at sea the Venetians, 14; and
also the people of Marseilles, C. i. 58; engages them a second time with
the same good fortune, ii. 3

Bullis, a town in Macedonia, unknown; it sends ambassadors to Caesar
with an offer of submission, C. iii. 12

Buthr[=o]tum, a city of Epirus, _Butrinto,_ or _Botronto_

Byzantium, an ancient city of Thrace, called at different times Ligos,
Nova Roma, and now _Constantinople_

Cabill[=o]num, a city of ancient Gaul, _Chalons sur Sa[^o]ne_

Cad[=e]tes, a people of Gaul, unknown

Cadurci, a people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of _Quercy_

Caeraesi, a people of Belgic Gaul, inhabiting the country round Namur;
they join in the general confederacy of Belgium against Caesar, G. i. 4

Caesar, hastens towards Gaul, C. i. 7; refuses the Helvetians a passage
through the Roman province, _ibid_.; his answer to their ambassadors,
14; defeats and sends them back into their own country, 25-27; sends
ambassadors to Ariovistus, 34; calls a council of war: his speech, 40;
begins his march, 41; his speech to Ariovistus, 43; totally routs the
Germans, and obliges them to repass the Rhine, 53; his war with the
Belgians, ii. 2; reduces the Suessi[)o]nes and Bellov[)a]ci, 12, 13; his
prodigious slaughter of the Nervians, 20-27; obliges the Atuatici to
submit, 32; prepares for the war against the Venetians, iii. 9; defeats
them in a naval engagement, and totally subdues them, 14, 15; is obliged
to put his army into winter quarters, before he can complete the
reduction of the Menapians and Morini, 29; marches to find out the
Germans; his answer to their ambassadors, iv. 8; attacks them in their
camp and routs them, 14, 15; crosses the Rhine, and returns to Gaul, 17
--19; his expedition into Britain described, 22; refits his navy, 31;
comes to the assistance of his foragers whom the Britons had attacked,
34; returns to Gaul, 36; gives orders for building a navy, v. 1; his
preparations for a second expedition into Britain, 2; marches into the
country of Treves to prevent a rebellion, 3; marches to Port Itius, and
invites all the princes of Gaul to meet him there, 5; sets sail for
Britain, 8; describes the country and customs of the inhabitants, 12;
fords the river Thames, and puts Cassivellaunus, the leader of the
Britons, to flight, 18; imposes a tribute upon the Britons and returns
into Gaul, 23; routs the Nervians, and relieves Cicero, 51; resolves to
winter in Gaul, 53; his second expedition into Germany, vi. 9; his
description of the manners of the Gauls and Germans, 13; his return into
Gaul, and vigorous prosecution of the war against Ambiorix, 27; crosses
the mountains of the Cevennes in the midst of winter, and arrives at
Auvergne, which submits, vii. 8; takes and sacks Genabum, 11; takes
Noviodunum, and marches from thence to Avaricum, 12; his works before
Alesia, 69; withstands all the attacks of the Gauls, and obliges the
place to surrender, 89; marches into the country of the Biturigians, and
compels them to submit, viii. 2; demands Guturvatus, who is delivered up
and put to death, 38; marches to besiege Uxellodunum, 39; cuts off the
hands of the besieged at Uxellodunum, 44; marches to Corfinium, and
besieges it, C. i. 16, which in a short time surrenders, 22; he marches
through Abruzzo, and great part of the kingdom of Naples, 23; his
arrival at Brundusium, and blockade of the haven, 24; commits the siege
of Marseilles to the case of Brutus and Trebonius, 36; his expedition to
Spain, 37; his speech to Afranius, 85; comes to Marseilles, which
surrenders. C. ii. 22; takes Oricum, iii. 8; marches to Dyrrhachium to
cut off Pompey's communication with that place, 41; sends Canuleius into
Epirus for corn, 42; besieges Pompey in his camp, his reasons for it,
43; encloses Pompey's works within his fortifications: a skirmish
between them, 45; his army reduced to great straits for want of
provisions, 47; offers Pompey battle, which he declines, 56; sends
Clodius to Scipio, to treat about a peace, whose endeavours prove
ineffectual, 57; joins Domitius, storms and takes the town of Gomphis in
Thessaly, in four hours' time, 80; gains a complete victory over Pompey
in the battle of Pharsalia, 93; summons Ptolemy and Cleopatra to attend
him, 107; burns the Alexandrian fleet, 111

Caesar[=e]a, the chief city of Cappadocia

Caesia Sylva, the _Caesian_ Forest, supposed to be a part of the
Hercynian Forest, about the duchy of Cleves and Westphalia

Calagurritani, a people of Hispania Tarraconensis, inhabiting the
province of _Calahorra;_ send ambassadors to Caesar with an offer of
submission, C. i. 60

Cal[)e]tes, an ancient people of Belgic Gaul, inhabiting the country
called _Le Pais de Caulx,_ in Normandy, betwixt the Seine and the sea;
they furnish ten thousand men in the general revolt of Belgium, G. ii. 4

Cal[)y]don, a city of Aetolia, _Ayton,_ C. iii. 35

C[)a]m[)e]r[=i]num, a city of Umbria, in Italy, _Camarino_

Camp[=a]n[)i]a, the most pleasant part of Italy, in the kingdom of
Naples, now called _Terra di Lavoro_

Campi Can[=i]ni, a place in the Milanese, in Italy, not far from
Belizona

Campi Catalaunici, supposed to be the large plain which begins about two
miles from Chalons sur Marne

Cam[=u]l[)o]g[=e]nus appointed commander-in-chief by the Parisians, G.
vii. 57; obliges Labienus to decamp from before Paris, _ibid.;_ is
slain, 62

Cadav[)i]a, a country of Macedonia, _Canovia_

Caninefates, an ancient people of the lower part of Germany, near
Batavia, occupying the country in which Gorckum, on the Maese, in South
Holland, now is

Can[=i]nius sets Duracius at liberty, who had been shut up in Limonum by
Dumnacus, G. viii. 26; pursues Drapes, 30; lays siege to Uxellodunum, 33

Cant[)a]bri, the Cantabrians, an ancient warlike people of Spain,
properly of the provinces of _Guipuscoa_ and _Biscay_; they are obliged
by Afranius to furnish a supply of troops, C. i. 38

Cantium, a part of England, _the county of Kent_

C[)a]nus[=i]um, a city of Apulia, in Italy, _Canosa_. The splendid
remains of antiquity discovered among the ruins of Canosa, together with
its coins, establish the Grecian origin of the place

Cappadocia, a large country in Asia Minor, upon the Euxine Sea

Capr[)e]a, _Capri_, an island on the coast of Campania

Cap[)u]a, _Capha_, a city in the kingdom of Naples, in the Provincia di
Lavoro

C[)a]r[)a]les, a city of Sardinia, _Cagliari_

C[)a]r[)a]l[)i]t[=a]ni, the people of _Cagliari_, in Sardinia; they
declare against Pompey, and expel Cotta with his garrison, C. i. 30

Carc[)a]so, a city of Gaul, _Carcassone_

Carm[=o]na, a town of Hispania Baetica, _Carmone_; declares for Caesar,
and expels the enemy's garrison, C. ii. 19

Carni, an ancient people, inhabiting a part of Noricum, whose country is
still called _Carniola_

Carn[=u]tes, an ancient people of France, inhabiting the territory now
called _Chartres_; Caesar quarters some troops among them, G. ii. 35;
they openly assassinate Tasgetins, G. v. 25; send ambassadors to Caesar
and submit, vi. 4; offer to be the first in taking up alms against the
Romans, vii. 2; attack the Biturigians, but are dispersed and put to
flight by Caesar. viii. 5

Carpi, an ancient people near the Danube

Cassandr[)e]a, a city of Macedonia, _Cassandria_

Cassi, a people of ancient Britain, _the hundred of Caishow_, in
_Hertfordshire_; they send ambassadors and submit to Caesar, G. v. 21

Caesil[=i]num, a town in Italy, _Castelluzzo_

Cassivellaunus, chosen commander-in-chief of the confederate Britons, G.
v. 11; endeavours in vain to stop the course of Caesar's conquests, 18;
is obliged to submit, and accept Caesar's terms, 22

Cassius, Pompey's lieutenant, burns Caesar's fleet in Sicily, C. iii.
101

Castellum Menapiorum, _Kessel_, a town in Brabant, on the river Neerse,
not far from the Maese

Cast[)i]cus, the son of Catam['a]ntaledes, solicited by Orgetorix to
invade the liberty of his country, G. i. 3

Castra Posthumiana, a town in Hispania Baetica, _Castro el Rio_

Castra Vetera, an ancient city in Lower Germany, in the duchy of Cleves;
some say where _Santon_, others where _Byrthon_ now is

Castulonensis Saltus, a city of Hispania Tarraconensis, _Castona la
Vieja_

Cativulcus takes up arms against the Romans at the instigation of
Indutiomarus, G. v. 24; poisons himself, vi. 31

Cato of Utica, the source of his hatred to Caesar, C. i. 4; made praetor
of Sicily, prepares for war, and abdicates his province, 30

Catur[)i]ges, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of
_Embrun_, or _Ambrun_, or _Chagres_; oppose Caesar's passage over the
Alps, G. i. 10

Cavalry, their institution and manner of fighting among the Germans, G.
i. 48, iv. 2

Cavarillus taken and brought before Caesar, G. vii. 62

Cavarinus, the Senones attempt to assassinate him, G. v. 54; Caesar
orders him to attend him with the cavalry of the Senones, vi. 5

Cebenna Mons, the mountains of the _Cevennes_, in Gaul, separating the
Helvians from Auvergne

Celeja, a city of Noricum Mediterraneum, now _Cilley_

Celtae, a people of Thrace, about the mountains of Rhodope and Haemus

Celtae, an ancient people of Gaul, in that part called Gallia Comata,
between the Garumna (_Garonne_) and Sequana (_Seine_), from whom that
country was likewise called Gallia Celtica. They were the most powerful
of the three great nations that inhabited Gaul, and are supposed to be
the original inhabitants of that extensive country. It is generally
supposed that they called themselves _Gail_, or _Gael_, out of which
name the Greeks formed their [Greek: Keltai], and the Romans Galli.
Some, however, deduce the name from the Gaelic "_Ceilt,_" an inhabitant
of the forest

Celt[)i]b[=e]ri, an ancient people of Spain, descended from the Celtae,
who settled about the River Iberus, or _Ebro_, from whom the country was
called Celtiberia, now _Arragon_; Afranius obliges them to furnish a
supply of troops, C. i. 38

Celtillus, the father of Vercingetorix, assassinated by the Arverni, G.
vii. 4

Cenimagni, or Iceni, an ancient people of Britain, inhabiting the
counties of _Suffolk, Norfolk, Cambridgeshire_, and _Huntingdonshire_

Cenis Mons, that part of the Alps which separates Savoy from Piedmont

Cenni, an ancient people of Celtic extraction

Cenom[=a]ni, a people of Gallia Celtica, in the country now called _Le
Manseau_, adjoining to that of the Insubres

Centr[=o]nes, an ancient people of Flanders, about the city of
_Courtray_, dependent on the Nervians

Centr[=o]nes, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of
Tarantaise

Cerauni Montes, Mountains of Epirus, _Monti di Chimera_

Cerc[=i]na, an island on the coast of Africa, _Chercara, Cercare_

Cevennes, mountains of, Caesar passes them in the midst of winter,
though covered with snow six feet deep, G. vii. 8

Chara, a root which served to support Caesar's army in extreme
necessity, C. iii. 48; manner of preparing it, _ibid_.

Chariots, manner of fighting with them among the Britons, G. iv. 33;
dexterity of the British charioteers, _ibid_.

Cherron[=e]sus, a peninsula of Africa, near Alexandria

Cherson[=e]sus Cimbr[=i]ca, a peninsula on the Baltic, now _Jutland_,
part of _Holstein, Ditmarsh_, and _Sleswic_

Cherusci, a great and warlike people of ancient Germany, between the
Elbe and the Weser, about the country now called _Mansfield_, part of
the duchy of _Brunswick_, and the dioceses of _Hildesheim_ and
_Halberstadt_. The Cherusci, under the command of Arminius (Hermann),
lured the unfortunate Varus into the wilds of the Saltus Teutoburgiensis
(Tutinger Wold), where they massacred him and his whole army. They were
afterwards defeated by Germanicus, who, on his march through the forest
so fatal to his countrymen, found the bones of the legions where they
had been left to blanch by their barbarian conqueror.--See Tacitus's
account of the March of the Roman Legions through the German forests,
_Annals,_ b. i. c. 71

Cicero, Quintus, attacked in his winter quarters by Ambi[)o]rix, G. v.
39; informs Caesar of his distress, who marches to relieve him, 46;
attacked unexpectedly by the Sigambri, who are nevertheless obliged to
retire, vi. 36

Cimbri, _the Jutlanders,_ a very ancient northern people, who inhabited
Chersonesus Cimbrica

Cing[)e]t[)o]rix, the leader of one of the factions among the Treviri,
and firmly attached to Caesar, G. v. 3; declared a public enemy, and his
goods confiscated by Indutiom[)a]rus, 56

Cing[)u]lum, a town of Pic[=e]num, in Italy, _Cingoli_

Cleopatra, engaged in a war with her brother Ptolemy, C. iii. 103

Clod[)i]us sent by Caesar to Scipio, to treat about a peace, but without
effect, C. iii. 90

Cocas[=a]tes, a people of Gaul, according to some the _Bazadois_

Caelius Rufus raises a sedition in Rome, C. iii. 20; is expelled that
city, then joins with Milo, 21; he is killed, 22

C[)o]imbra, an ancient city of Portugal, once destroyed, but now
rebuilt, on the river _Mendego_

Colchis, a country in Asia, near Pontus, including the present
_Mingrelia_ and _Georgia_

Com[=a]na Pont[)i]ca, a city of Asia Minor, _Com,_ or, _Tabachzan_

Com[=a]na of Cappadocia, _Arminacha_

Comius sent by Caesar into Britain to dispose the British states to
submit, G. iv. 21; persuades the Bellov[)a]ci to furnish their
contingent to the relief of Alesia, vii. 76; his distrust of the Romans,
occasioned by an attempt to assassinate him, viii. 23; harasses the
Romans greatly, and intercepts their convoys, 47; attacks Volusenus
Quadratus, and runs him through the thigh, 48; submits to Antony, on
condition of not appearing in the presence of any Roman, _ibid_.

Compsa, a city of Italy, _Conza,_ or _Consa_

Concordia, an ancient city of the province of _Triuli,_ in Italy, now in
ruins

Condr[=u]si, or Condr[=u]s[=o]nes, an ancient people of Belgium,
dependent on the Treviri, whose country is now called _Condrotz_,
between Liege and Namur

Conetod[=u]nus heads the Carnutes in their revolt from the Romans, and
the massacre at Genabum, G. vii. 3

Confluens Mosae et Rheni, the confluence of the Meuse and Rhine, or the
point where the Meuse joins the Vahalis, or Waal, which little river
branches out from the Rhine

Convictolit[=a]nis, a division on his account among the Aeduans, C. vii.
32; Caesar confirms his election to the supreme magistracy, 33; he
persuades Litavicus and his brothers to rebel, 37

Corc[=y]ra, an island of Epirus, _Corfu_

Cord[)u]ba, a city of Hispania Baetica, _Cordova;_ Caesar summons the
leading men of the several states of Spain to attend him there, C. ii.
19; transactions of that assembly, 21

Corf[=i]n[)i]um, a town belonging to the Peligni, in Italy, _St.
Pelino,_ al. _Penlina;_ Caesar lays siege to it, C. i. 16; and obliges
it to surrender, 24

Corinth, a famous and rich city of Achaia, in Greece, in the middle of
the Isthmus going into Peloponnesus

Corneli[=a]na Castra, a city of Africa, between Carthage and Utica

Correus, general of the Bellov[)a]ci, with six thousand foot, and a
thousand horse, lies in ambush for the Roman foragers, and attacks the
Roman cavalry with a small party, but is routed and killed, G. viii. 19

Cors[)i]ca, a considerable island in the Mediterranean Sea, near
Sardinia, which still retains its name

Cosanum, a city of Calabria, in Italy, _Cassano_

Cotta, L. Aurunculeius, dissents from Sabinus in relation to the advice
given them by Ambiorix, G. v. 28; his behaviour when attacked by the
Gauls, 33; is slain, with the great part of his men, after a brave
resistance, 37

Cotuatus and Conetodunus massacre all the Roman merchants at Genabum, G.
vii. 3

Cotus, a division on his account among the Aeduans, G. vii. 32; obliged
to desist from his pretensions to the supreme magistracy, 33

Crassus, P., his expedition into Aquitaine, G. iii. 20; reduces the
Sotiates, 22; and other states, obliging them to give hostages, 27

Crast[)i]nus, his character, and courage at the battle of Pharsalia, C.
iii. 91; where he is killed, 99

Cr[)e]m[=o]na, an ancient city of Gallia Cisalpina, which retains its
name to this day, and is the metropolis of the _Cremonese_, in Italy

Crete, one of the noblest islands in the Mediterranean Sea, now called
_Candia_

Critognatus, his extraordinary speech and proposal to the garrison of
Alesia, G. vii. 77

Curio obliges Cato to abandon the defence of Cicily, C. i. 30; sails for
Africa, and successfully attacks Varus, ii. 25; his speech to revive the
courage of his men, 32; defeats Varus, 34; giving too easy credit to a
piece of false intelligence, is cut off with his whole army, 42

Curiosol[=i]tae, a people of Gaul, inhabiting _Cornoualle,_ in Bretagne

Cycl[)a]des, islands in the Aegean Sea, _L'Isole dell' Archipelago_

Cyprus, an island in the Mediterranean Sea, between Syria and Cilicia,
_Cipro_

Cyr[=e]ne, an ancient and once a fine city of Africa, situate over
against Matapan, the most southern cape of Morea, _Cairoan_

Cyz[=i]cus, Atraki, formerly one of the largest cities of Asia Minor, in
an island of the same name, in the Black Sea

Dacia, an ancient country of Scythia, beyond the Danube, containing part
of _Hungary, Transylvania, Walachia,_ and _Moldavia_

Dalm[=a]tia, a part of Illyricum, now called _Sclavonia_, lying between
Croatia, Bosnia, Servia, and the Adriatic Gulf

D[=a]n[)u]b[)i]us, the largest river in Europe, which rises in the Black
Forest, and after flowing through that country, Bavaria, Austria,
Hungary, Servia, Bulgaria, Moldavia, and Bessarabia, receiving in its
course a great number of noted rivers, some say sixty, and 120 minor
streams, falls into the Black or Euxine Sea, in two arms

Dard[=a]nia, the ancient name of a country in Upper Moesia, which became
afterwards a part of Dacia; _Rascia_, and part of _Servia_

Dec[=e]tia, a town in Gaul,_Decise_, on the Loire

Delphi, a city of Achaia, _Delpho_, al. _Salona_

Delta, a very considerable province of Egypt, at the mouth of the Nile,
_Errif_

Diablintes, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country called _Le
Perche_; al. _Diableres_, in Bretagne; al. _Lintes_ of Brabant; al.
_Lendoul_, over against Britain

Divit[)i][)a]cus, the Aeduan, his attachment to the Romans and Caesar,
G. i. 19; Caesar, for his sake, pardons his brother Dumnorix, _ibid_.;
he complains to Caesar, in behalf of the rest of the Gauls, of the
cruelty of Ariovistus, 31; marches against the Bellov[)a]ci create a
diversion in favour of Caesar, ii. 10; intercedes for the Bellov[)a]ci,
and obtains their pardon from Caesar, 14; goes to Rome to implore aid of
the senate, but without effect, vi. 12

Domitius Ahenobarbus, besieged by Caesar in Corfinium, writes to Pompey
for assistance, C. i. 15; seized by his own troops, who offer to deliver
him up to Caesar, 20; Caesar's generous behaviour towards him, 23; he
enters Marseilles, and is entrusted with the supreme command, 36; is
defeated in a sea fight by Decimus Brutus, 58; escapes with great
difficulty a little before the surrender of Marseilles, ii. 22

Domitius Calvinus, sent by Caesar into Macedonia, comes very opportunely
to the relief of Cassius Longinus, C. iii. 34; gains several advantages
over Scipio, 32

Drapes, in conjunction with Luterius, seizes Uxellodunum, G. viii. 30;
his camp stormed, and himself made prisoner, 29; he starves himself, 44

Druids, priests so called, greatly esteemed in Gaul, and possessed of
many valuable privileges, G. vi. 13

D[=u]bis, a river of Burgundy, _Le Doux_

Dumn[)a]cus besieges Duracius in Limonum, G. viii. 26; is defeated by
Fabius, 27

Dumn[)o]rix, the brother of Divitiacus, his character, G. i. 15;
persuades the noblemen of Gaul not to go with Caesar into Britain, v. 5;
deserts, and is killed for his obstinacy, 6

Duracius besieged in Limonum by Dumnacus, general of the Andes, G. viii.
26

Durocort[=o]rum, a city of Gaul, _Rheims_

D[)y]rrh[)a]ch[)i]um, a city of Macedonia, _Durazzo, Drazzi_; Caesar
endeavours to enclose Pompey within his lines near that place, C. iii.
41

Ebur[=o]nes, an ancient people of Germany, inhabiting part of the
country, now the bishopric of _Liege_, and the county of _Namur_. Caesar
takes severe vengeance on them for their perfidy, G. vi. 34, 35

Eb[=u]r[)o]v[=i]ces, a people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of
_Evreux_, in Normandy; they massacre their senate, and join with
Viridovix, G. iii. 17

Egypt, see _Aegypt_

El[=a]ver, a river of Gaul, the _Allier_

Eleut[=e]ti Cadurci, a branch of the Cadurci, in Aquitania. They are
called in many editions Eleutheri Cadurci, but incorrectly, since
Eleutheri is a term of Greek origin, and besides could hardly be applied
to a Gallic tribe like the Eleuteti, who, in place of being free [Greek:
eleutheroi], seem to have been clients of the Arverni; they furnish
troops to the relief of Alesia, G. vii. 75

Elis, a city of Peloponnesus, _Belvidere_

Elus[=a]tes, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of
_Euse_, in Gascony

Eph[)e]sus, an ancient and celebrated city of Asia Minor, _Efeso_; the
temple of Diana there in danger of being stripped, G. iii. 32

Epidaurus, a maritime city of Dalmatia, _Ragusa_

Ep[=i]rus, a country in Greece, between Macedonia, Achaia, and the
Ionian Sea, by some now called _Albania inferior_

Eporedorix, treacherously revolts from Caesar, G. vii. 54

Essui, a people of Gaul; the word seems to be a corruption from Aedui,
C. v. 24

Etesian winds detain Caesar at Alexandria, which involves him in a new
war, C. iii. 107

Eusubii, corrupted from _Unelli_, or _Lexovii_, properly the people of
_Lisieux_, in Normandy

Fabius, C., one of Caesar's lieutenants, sent into Spain, with three
legions, C. i. 37; builds two bridges over the Segre for the convenience
of foraging, 40

Fanum, a city of Umbria in Italy, _Fano_, C. i. 11

Fortune, her wonderful power and influence on matters of war, G. vi. 30

Faesulae, _Fiesoli_, an ancient city of Italy, in the duchy of Florence,
anciently one of the twelve considerable cities of Etruria.

Flavum, anciently reckoned the eastern mouth of the Rhine, now called
the _Ulie_, and is a passage out of the Zuyder Sea into the North Sea

Gab[)a]li, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country of
_Givaudan_. Their chief city was Anduitum, now _Mende_, G. vii. 64; they
join the general confederacy of Vercingetorix, and give hostages to
Luterius, G. vii. 7

Gadit[=a]ni, the people of Gades, C. ii. 18

Gal[=a]tia, a country in Asia Minor, lying between Cappadocia, Pontus,
and Paphlagonia, now called _Chiangare_

Galba Sergius, sent against the Nantuates, Veragrians, and Seduni, G.
iii. 1; the barbarians attack his camp unexpectedly, but are repulsed
with great loss, iii. 6

Galli, the Gauls, the people of ancient Gaul, now _France_; their
country preferable to that of the Germans, G. i. 31; their manner of
attacking towns, ii.6; of greater stature than the Romans, 30; quick and
hasty in their resolves, iii.8; forward in undertaking wars, but soon
fainting under misfortunes, 19; their manners, chiefs, druids,
discipline, cavalry, religion, origin, marriages, and funerals, vi.13;
their country geographically described, i.1

Gall[=i]a, the ancient and renowned country of Gaul, now _France_. It
was divided by the Romans into--

Gallia Cisalpina, Tonsa, or Togata, now _Lombardy_, between the Alps and
the river Rubicon: and--

Gallia Transalpina, or Com[=a]ta, comprehending _France, Holland, the
Netherlands_: and farther subdivided into--

Gallia Belg[)i]ca, now a part of _Lower Germany_, and the _Netherlands_,
with _Picardy_; divided by Augustus into Belgica and Germania__ and the
latter into Prima and Secunda

Gallia Celt[)i]ca, now _France_ properly so called, divided by Augustus
into Lugdun[=e]nsis, and Rothomagensis

Gallia Aquitan[)i]ca, now _Gascony_; divided by Augustus into Prima,
Secunda, and Tertia: and--

Gallia Narbonensis, or Bracc[=a]ta, now _Languedoc, Dauphiny_, and
_Provence_

Gallograecia, a country of Asia Minor, the same as _Galatia_

Gar[=i]tes, a people of Gaul, inhabiting the country now called _Gavre,
Gavaraan_

Garoceli, or Graioc[)e]li, an ancient people of Gaul, about _Mount
Genis_, or _Mount Genevre_ others place them in the _Val de Gorienne_;
they oppose Caesar's passage over the Alps, G. i. 10

Garumna, the _Garonne_, one of the largest rivers of France, which,
rising in the Pyrenees, flows through Guienne, forms the vast Bay of
Garonne, and falls, by two mouths, into the British Seas. The Garonne is
navigable as far as _Toulouse_, and communicates with the Mediterranean
by means of the great canal, G. i. 1

Garumni, an ancient people of Gaul, in the neighbourhood of the
_Garonne_, G. iii. 27

Geld[=u]ra, a fortress of the Ubii, on the Rhine, not improbably the
present village of _Gelb_, on that river eleven German miles from
N[=e]us

Gen[)a]bum, _Orleans_, an ancient town in Gaul, famous for the massacre
of the Roman citizens committed there by the Carn[=u]tes

Gen[=e]va, a city of Savoy, now a free republic, upon the borders of
Helvetia, where the Rhone issues from the Lake Lemanus, anciently a city
of the Allobr[)o]ges

Gen[=u]sus, a river of Macedonia, uncertain

Gerg[=o]via, the name of two cities in ancient Gaul, the one belonging
to the Boii, the other to the Arverni. The latter was the only Gallic
city which baffled the attacks of Caesar

Gerg[=o]via of the Averni, Vercingetorix expelled thence by Gobanitio,
G. vii. 4; the Romans attacking it eagerly, are repulsed with great
slaughter, 50

Gerg[=o]via of the Boii, besieged in vain by Vercingetorix, G. vii. 9

Germania, _Germany_, one of the largest countries of Europe, and the
mother of those nations which, on the fall of the Roman empire,
conquered all the rest. The name appears to be derived from _wer_, war,
and _man_, a man, and signifies the country of warlike men

Germans, habituated from their infancy to arms, G. i. 36; their manner
of training their cavalry, 48; their superstition 50; defeated by
Caesar, 53; their manners, religion, vi. 23; their huge stature and
strength, G. i. 39

G[=e]tae, an ancient people of Scythia, who inhabited betwixt Moesia and
Dacia, on each side of the Danube. Some think their country the same
with the present _Walachia_, or _Moldavia_

Getulia, a province in the kingdom of Morocco, in Barbary

Gomphi, a town in Thessaly, _Gonfi_, refusing to open its gates to
Caesar, is stormed and taken, C. iii. 80

Gord[=u]ni, a people of Belgium, the ancient inhabitants of _Ghent_,
according to others of _Courtray_; they join with Ambiorix in his attack
of Cicero's camp, G. v. 39

Got[=i]ni, an ancient people of Germany, who were driven out of their
country by Maroboduus  Graecia, _Greece,_ a large part of Europe, called
by the Turks _Rom[=e]lia,_ containing many countries, provinces, and
islands, once the nursery of arts, learning, and sciences

Graioc[)e]li, see _Garoceli_

Grudii, the inhabitants about _Louvaine,_ or, according to some, about
_Bruges;_ they join with Ambiorix in his attack of Cicero's camp, G. v.
39

Gugerni, a people of ancient Germany, who dwelt on the right banks of
the Rhine, between the Ubii and the Batavi

Gutt[=o]nes, or Gyth[=o]nes, an ancient people of Germany, inhabiting
about the Vistula

Haemus, a mountain dividing Moesia and Thrace, _Argentaro_

Haliacmon, a river of Macedonia, uncertain; Scipio leaves Favonius with
orders to build a fort on that river, C. iii. 36

Har[=u]des, or Har[=u]di, a people of Gallia Celtica, supposed to have
been originally Germans: and by some to have inhabited the country about
_Constance_ Helv[=e]tia, _Switzerland,_ now divided into thirteen
cantons

Helv[=e]tii, _the Helvetians, or Switzers,_ ancient inhabitants of the
country of _Switzerland;_ the most warlike people of Gaul, G. i. 1;
their design of abandoning their own country, 2; attacked with
considerable loss near the river Sa[^o]ne, 12; vanquished and obliged to
return home by Caesar, 26

Helvii, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country now possessed
by the _Vivarois;_ Caesar marches into their territories, G. vii. 7

Heracl[=e]a, a city of Thrace, on the Euxine Sea, _Pantiro_

Heracl[=e]a Sent[)i]ca, a town in Macedonia, _Chesia_

Hercynia Silva, _the Hercinian Forest,_ the largest forest of ancient
Germany, being reckoned by Caesar to have been sixty days' journey in
length, and nine in breadth. Many parts of it have been since cut down,
and many are yet remaining; of which, among others, is that called the
_Black Forest;_ its prodigious extent, G. vi. 4

Hermand[=u]ri, an ancient people of Germany, particularly in the country
now called _Misnia,_ in Upper Saxony; though they possessed a much
larger tract of land, according to some, all _Bohemia_

Hermin[)i]us Mons, a mountain of _Lusitania, Monte Arm[)i]no;_ according
to others, _Monte della Strella_

Her[)u]li, an ancient northern people, who came first out of Scandavia,
but afterwards inhabited the country now called _Mecklenburg_ in Lower
Saxony, towards the Baltic

Hibernia, _Ireland,_ a considerable island to the west of Great Britain,
G. v. 13

Hisp[=a]n[)i]a, Spain, one of the most considerable kingdoms of Europe,
divided by the ancients into Tarraconensis, Baetica, and Lusitania. This
name appears to be derived from the Phoenician _Saphan,_ a rabbit, vast
numbers of these animals being found there by the Phoenician colonists

Ib[=e]rus, a river of Hispania Tarraconensis, the _Ebro,_ C. i. 60

Iccius, or Itius Portus, a seaport town of ancient Gaul; _Boulogne,_ or,
according to others, _Calais_

Ig[)i]l[)i]um, an island in the Tuscan Sea, _il Giglio, l'Isle du Lys_

Ig[)u]v[)i]um, a city of Umbria in Italy, _Gubio;_ it forsakes Pompey,
and submits to Caesar, C. i. 12

Illurgavonenses, a people of Hispania Tarraconensis, near the Iberus;
they submit to Caesar, and supply him with corn, C. i. 60

Illurgis, a town of Hispania Baetica, _Illera_

Induti[)o]m[)a]rus, at the head of a considerable faction among the
Treviri, G. v. 3; endeavouring to make himself master of Labienus's
camp, is repulsed and slain, 53

Is[)a]ra, the _Is[`e]re,_ a river of France, which rises in Savoy, and
falls into the Rhone above Valance

Isauria, a province anciently of Asia Minor, now a part of _Caramania,_
and subject to the Turks

Issa (an island of the Adriatic Sea, _Lissa_), revolts from Caesar at
the instigation of Octavius, C. iii. 9

Ister, that part of the Danube which passed by Illyricum

Istr[)i]a, a country now in Italy, under the Venetians, bordering on
Illyricum, so called from the river Ister

Istr[)o]p[)o]lis, a city of Lower Moesia, near the south entrance of the
Danube, _Prostraviza_

It[)a]l[)i]a, _Italy,_ one of the most famous countries in Europe, once
the seat of the Roman empire, now under several princes, and free
commonwealths

It[)a]l[)i]ca, a city of Hispania Baetica, _Servila la Veja;_ according
to others, _Alcala del Rio;_ shuts its gates against Varro, C. ii. 20

Itius Portus, Caesar embarks there for Britain, G. v. 5

It[=u]raea, a country of Palestine, _Sacar_

Jacet[=a]ni, or Lacet[=a]ni, a people of Spain, near the Pyrenean
Mountains; revolt from Afranius and submit to Caesar, C. i. 60

Jadert[=i]ni, a people so called from their capital Jadera, a city of
Illyricum, _Zara_

Juba, king of Numidia, strongly attached to Pompey, C. ii. 25; advances
with a large army to the relief of Utica, 36; detaches a part of his
troops to sustain Sabura, 40; defeats Cario, ii. 42; his cruelty, ii. 44

J[=u]ra, a mountain in Gallia Belgica, which separated the Sequani from
the Helvetians, most of which is now called _Mount St. Claude._ The name
appears to be derived from the Celtic, _jou-rag,_ which signifies the
"domain of God;" the boundary of the Helvetians towards the Sequani, G.
i. 2

Labi[=e]nus, one of Caesar's lieutenants, is attacked in his camp, G. v.
58, vi. 6; his stratagem, G. vii. 60; battle with the Gauls, G. vii. 59;
is solicited by Caesar's enemies to join their party, G. viii. 52; built
the town of Cingulum, C. i. 15; swears to follow Pompey, C. iii. 13; his
dispute with Valerius about a peace, C. iii. 19; his cruelty towards
Caesar's followers, C. iii. 71; flatters Pompey, C. iii. 87

Lacus B[)e]n[=a]cus, _Lago di Guardo,_ situated in the north of Italy,
between Verona, Brescia, and Trent

Lacus Lem[)a]nus, the lake upon which Geneva stands, formed by the River
Rhone, between _Switzerland_ to the north, and Savoy to the south,
commonly called the _Lake of Geneva_, G. i. 2, 8

Larin[=a]tes, the people of Larinum, a city of Italy, _Larino_; C. i. 23

Larissa, the principal city of Thessaly, a province of Macedonia, on the
river Peneo

L[)a]t[=i]ni, the inhabitants of Latium, an ancient part of Italy,
whence the Latin tongue is so called

Lat[=o]br[)i]gi, a people of Gallia Belgica, between the Allobroges and
Helvetii, in the country called _Lausanne_; abandon their country, G. i.
5; return, G. i. 28; their number, G. i. 29

Lemnos, an island in the Aegean Sea, now called _Stalimane_

Lemov[=i]ces, an ancient people of Gaul, _le Limosin_, G. vii. 4

Lemov[=i]ces Armorici, the people of _St. Paul de Leon_

Lenium, a town in Lusitania, unknown

Lent[)u]lus Marcellinus, the quaestor, one of Caesar's followers, C.
iii. 62

Lentulus and Marcellus, the consuls, Caesar's enemies, G. viii. 50;
leave Rome through fear of Caesar, C. i. 14

Lenunc[)u]li, fishing-boats, C. ii. 43

Lepontii, a people of the Alps, near the valley of _Leventini_, G. iv.
10

Leuci, a people of Gallia Belgica, where now Lorrain is, well skilled in
darting. Their chief city is now called _Toul_, G. i. 40

Lev[)a]ci, a people of Brabant, not far from Louvain, whose chief town
is now called _Leew_; dependants on the Nervii, G. v. 39

Lex, law of the Aedui respecting the election of magistrates, G. vii. 33

Lex, Julian law, C. ii. 14

Lex, the Pompeian law respecting bribery, C. iii. 1

Lex, two Caelian laws, C. iii. 20, 21

Lexovii, an ancient people of Gaul, _Lisieux_ in Normandy, G. iii. 11,
17

Liberty of the Gauls, G. iii. 8; the desire of, G. v. 27; the sweetness
of, G. iii. 10; the incitement to, G. vii. 76; C. i. 47

Libo, praefect of Pompey's fleet, C. iii. 5; converses with Caesar at
Oricum, C. iii. 16; takes possession of the Island at Brundisium, C.
iii. 23; threatens the partisans of Caesar, C. iii. 24; withdraws from
Brundisium, _ibid_.

Liburni, an ancient people of Illyricum, inhabiting part of the present
_Croatia_

Liger, or Ligeris, the _Loire_; one of the greatest and most celebrated
rivers of France, said to receive one hundred and twelve rivers in its
course; it rises in Velay, and falls into the Bay of Aquitain, below
Nantz, G. iii. 5

Lig[)u]ria, a part of ancient Italy, extending from the Apennines to the
Tuscan Sea, containing _Ferrara_, and the territories of _Genoa_

Limo, or Lim[=o]num, a city of ancient Gaul, _Poitiers_

Ling[)o]nes, a people of Gallia Belgica, inhabiting in and about
_Langres_, in Champagne, G. i. 26, 40

Liscus, one of the Aedui, accuses Dumnorix to Caesar, G. i. 16, 17

Lissus, an ancient city of Macedonia, _Alessio_

Litavicus, one of the Aedui, G. vii. 37; his treachery and flight, G.
vii. 38

Lucani, an ancient people of Italy, inhabiting the country now called
_Basilicate_

Luceria, an ancient city of Italy, _Lucera_

Lucretius Vespillo, one of Pompey's followers, C. iii. 7

Lucterius or Laterius, one of the Cadurci, vii. 5, 7

Lusit[=a]nia, _Portugal_, a kingdom on the west of Spain, formerly a
part of it

Lusitanians, light-armed troops, C. i. 48

Lutetia, _Paris_, an ancient and famous city, now the capital of all
France, on the river _Seine_

Lygii, an ancient people of Upper Germany, who inhabited the country now
called _Silesia_, and on the borders of _Poland_

M[)a]c[)e]d[=o]nia, a large country, of great antiquity and fame,
containing several provinces, now under the Turks

Macedonian cavalry among Pompey's troops, C. iii. 4

Mae[=o]tis Palus, a vast lake in the north part of Scythia, now called
_Marbianco_, or _Mare della Tana_. It is about six hundred miles in
compass, and the river Tanais disembogues itself into it

Maget[)o]br[)i]a, or Amagetobria, a city of Gaul, near which Ariovistus
defeated the combined forces of the Gauls. It is supposed to correspond
to the modern _Moigte de Broie_, near the village of _Pontailler_

Mandub[)i]i, an ancient people of Gaul, _l'Anxois_, in Burgundy; their
famine and misery, G. vii. 78

Mandubratius, a Briton, G. v. 20

Marcellus, Caesar's enemy, G. viii 53

Marcius Crispus, is sent for a protection to the inhabitants of Thabena

Marcomanni, a nation of the Suevi, whom Cluverius places between the
Rhine, the Danube and the Neckar; who settled, however, under
Maroboduus, in _Bohemia_ and _Moravia_. The name Marcomanni signifies
border-men. Germans, G. i. 51

Marruc[=i]ni, an ancient people of Italy, inhabiting the country now
called _Abruzzo_, C. i. 23; ii. 34

Mars, G. vi. 17

Marsi, an ancient people of Italy inhabiting the country now called
_Ducato de Marsi_, C. ii. 27

Massilia, _Marseilles_, a large and flourishing city of Provence, in
France, on the Mediterranean, said to be very ancient, and, according to
some, built by the Phoenicians, but as Justin will have it, by the
Phocaeans, in the time of Tarquinius, king of Rome

Massilienses, the inhabitants of Marseilles, C. i. 34-36

Matisco, an ancient city of Gaul, _Mascon_, G. vii. 90

Matr[)o]na, a river in Gaul, the _Marne_, G. i. 1

Mauritania, _Barbary_, an extensive region of Africa, divided into M.
Caesariensis, Tingitana, and Sitofensis

Mediomatr[=i]ces, a people of Lorrain, on the Moselle, about the city of
_Mentz_, G. iv. 10

Mediterranean Sea, the first discovered sea in the world, still very
famous, and much frequented, which breaks in from the Atlantic Ocean,
between Spain and Africa, by the straits of Gibraltar, or Hercules'
Pillar, the _ne plus ultra_ of the ancients

Meldae, according to some the people of _Meaux_; but more probably
corrupted from _Belgae_

Melodunum, an ancient city of Gaul, upon the Seine, above Paris,
_Melun_, G. vii. 58, 60

Menapii, an ancient people of Gallia Belgica, who inhabited on both
sides of the Rhine. Some take them for the inhabitants of _Cleves_, and
others of _Antwerp, Ghent_, etc., G. ii. 4; iii. 9

Menedemus, C. iii. 34

Mercurius, G. v. 17

Mes[)o]p[)o]t[=a]mia, a large country in the middle of Asia, between the
Tigris and the Euphrates, _Diarbeck_

Mess[=a]na, an ancient and celebrated city of Sicily, still known by the
name of _Messina_, C. iii. 101

M[)e]taurus, a river of Umbria, now called _Metoro_, in the duchy of
Urbino

Metios[=e]dum, an ancient city of Gaul, on the Seine, below Paris,
_Corbeil_, G. vii. 61

Metr[)o]p[)o]lis, a city of Thessaly, between Pharsalus and Gomphi, C.
iii. 11

Milo, C. iii. 21

Minerva, G. vi. 12

Minutius Rufus, C. iii. 7

Mitylene, a city of Lesbos, _Metelin_

Moesia, a country of Europe, and a province of the ancient Illyricum,
bordering on Pannonia, divided into the Upper, containing _Bosnia_ and
_Servia_, and the Lower, called _Bulgaria_

Mona, in Caesar, the Isle of _Man_; in Ptolemy, _Anglesey_, G. v. 13

Mor[)i]ni, an ancient people of the Low Countries, who probably
inhabited on the present coast of _Bologne_, on the confines of
_Picardy_ and _Artois_, because Caesar observes that from their country
was the nearest passage to Britain, G. ii. 4

Moritasgus, G. v. 54

Mosa, the _Maess_, or _Meuse_, a large river of Gallia Belgica, which
falls into the German Ocean below the Briel, G. iv. 10

Mosella, the _Moselle_, a river which, running through Lorrain, passes
by Triers and falls unto the Rhine at Coblentz, famous for the vines
growing in the neighbourhood of it

Mysia, a country of Asia Minor, not far from the Hellespont, divided
Into Major and Minor

Nabathaei, an ancient people of Arabia, uncertain

Nann[=e]tes, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country about
_Nantes_, G. iii. 9

Nantu[=a]tes, an ancient people of the north part of Savoy, whose
country is now called _Le Chablais_, G. iii. 1

Narbo, _Narbonne_, an ancient Roman city in Languedoc, in France, said
to be built a hundred and thirty-eight years before the birth of Christ,
G. iii. 20

Narisci, the ancient people of the country now called _Nortgow_, in
Germany, the capital of which is the famous city of Nuremburg

Nasua, the brother of Cimberius, and commander of the hundred cantons of
the Suevi, who encamped on the banks of the Rhine with the intention of
crossing that river, G. i. 37

Naupactus, an ancient and considerable city of Aetolia, now called
_Lepanto_, C. iii. 35

Nem[=e]tes, a people of ancient Germany, about the city of Spire, on the
Rhine, G. i. 51

Nemetocenna, a town of Belgium, not known for certain; according to
some, _Arras_, G. viii, 47

Neocaesarea, the capital of Ponts, on the river Licus, now called
_Tocat_

Nervii, an ancient people of _Gallia Belgica_, thought to have dwelt in
the now diocese of _Cambray_. They attacked Caesar on his march, and
fought until they were almost annihilated, G. ii. 17

Nessus, or Nestus, a river is Thrace, _Nesto_ Nicaea, a city of
Bithynia, now called _Isnick_, famous for the first general council,
anno 324, against Arianism

Nit[=o]br[)i]ges, an ancient people of Gaul, whose territory lay on
either side of the Garonne, and corresponded to the modern Agennois, in
the department of Lot-et-Garonne. Their capital was Agrimum, now
_Agen_, G. vii. 7, 31, 46, 75

Noreia, a city on the borders of Illyricum, in the province of Styria,
near the modern village of Newmarket, about nine German miles from
Aquileia, G. i. 5

N[=o]r[)i]cae Alpes, that part of the Alps which were in, or bordering
upon, Noricum

N[=o]r[)i]cum, anciently a large country, and now comprehending a great
part of _Austria, Styria, Carinthia_, part of _Tyrol, Bavaria_, etc.,
and divided into Noricum Mediterraneum and Ripense. It was first
conquered by the Romans under Tiberius, in the reign of Augustus, and
was celebrated for its mineral treasures, especially iron

N[)o]v[)i][)o]d[=u]num Belgarum, an ancient city of Belgic Gaul, now
called _Noyon_

N[)o]v[)i][)o]d[=u]num Bitur[)i]gum, _Neuvy_, or _Neufvy_, G. vii. 12

N[)o]v[)i][)o]d[=u]num Aeduorum, _Nevers_, G. vii. 55

N[)o]v[)i][)o]d[=u]num Suessionum, _Soissons, al. Noyon_, G. ii. 12

N[)o]v[)i]om[=a]gum, _Spire_, an ancient city of Germany, in the now
upper circle of the Rhine, and on that river

Numantia, a celebrated city of ancient Spain, famous for a gallant
resistance against the Romans, in a siege of fourteen years; _Almasan_

Numeius, G. i. 7

Num[)i]dae, the inhabitants of, G. ii. 7

Numid[)i]a, an ancient and celebrated kingdom of Africa, bordering on
Mauritania; _Algiers, Tunis, Tripoli_, etc.

N[=y]mphaeum, a promontory of Illyricum, exposed to the south wind, and
distant about three miles from Lissus, _Alessio_, C. iii. 26

Oc[)e]lum, a town situated among the Cottian Alps, Usseau in Piedmont,
G. i. 10

Octavius, C. iii. 9

Octod[=u]rus, a town belonging to the Veragrians, among the Pennine
Alps, now _Martigny_ in the Valois, G. iii. 1  Octog[=e]sa, a city of
Hispania Tarraconensis, _Mequinenza_, C. i. 61

Ollovico, G. vii. 31

Orch[)o]m[)e]nus, a town in Boeotia, _Orcomeno_, C. iii. 5 5

Orcynia, the name given by Greek writers to the Hercynian forest

Orget[=o]rix, G. i. 2, 3

Or[)i]cum, a town in Epirus, _Orco, or Orcha_, C. iii. 11, 12

Osc[=e]nses, the people of Osca, a town in Hispania Tarraconensis, now
_Huescar_, C. i. 60

Os[=i]sm[)i]i, an ancient people of Gaul, one of the Gentes Armoricae.
Their country occupied part of Neodron Brittany; capital Vorganium,
afterwards Osismii, and now _Korbez_. In this territory also stood
Brivatas Portus, now _Brest_, G. i. 34

Otacilii, C. iii. 28

Padua, the _Po_, the largest river in Italy, which rises in Piedmont,
and dividing Lombardy into two parts, falls into the Adriatic Sea, by
many mouths; south of Venice

Paem[=a]ni, an ancient people of Gallia Belgica; according to some,
those of _Luxemburg_; according to others, the people of _Pemont_, near
the Black Forest, in part of the modern _Lugen_, G. ii. 4

P[)a]laeste, a town in Epirus, near Oricurn

Pann[=o]n[)i]a, a very large country in the ancient division of Europe,
divided into the Upper and Lower, and comprehended betwixt Illyricum,
the Danube, and the mountains Cethi

P[)a]ris[)i]i, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country now
called the _Isle of France_. Their capital was Lutetia, afterwards
Parisii, now _Paris_, G. vi. 3

P[=a]rth[)i]a, a country in Asia, lying between Media, Caramania, and
the Hyreanian Sea

Parthians at war with Rome, C. iii. 31

P[=a]rth[=i]ni, a people of Macedonia; their chief city taken by storm,
C. iii. 41

P[=e]l[=i]gni, a people of Italy in Abruzzo, C. i. 15

P[)e]l[)o]ponn[=e]sus, the _Morea_, a famous, large, and fruitful
peninsula of Greece, now belonging to the Venetians

P[=e]l[=u]s[)i]um, an ancient and celebrated city of Egypt, _Belbais_;
Pompey goes to it, C. iii. 103; taken by Mithridates

P[=e]rg[)a]mus, an ancient and famous city of Mysia, _Pergamo_

Per[)i]nthus, a city of Thrace, about a day's journey west of
Constantinople, now in a decaying condition, and called _Heraclea_

P[=e]rs[)i]a, one of the largest, most ancient and celebrated kingdoms
of Asia

P[=e]tra, an ancient city of Macedonia, uncertain

Petreius, one of Pompey's lieutenants, C. i. 38

P[=e]tr[)o]g[)o]r[)i]i, a country in Gaul, east of the mouth of the
Garumna; their chief city was Vesuna, afterwards Petrocorii, now
_Perigueux_, the capital of Perigord

Pe[=u]c[=i]ni, the inhabitants of the islands of Peuce, in one of the
mouths of the Danube

Ph[=a]rs[=a]l[)i]a, a part of Thessaly, famous for the battle between
Caesar and Pompey, which decided the fate of the Roman commonwealth

Pharus, an isle facing the port of Alexandria in ancient Egypt; _Farion_

Phasis, a large river in Colchis, now called _Fasso_, which flows into
the Euxine Sea

Ph[)i]lippi, a city of Macedonia, on the confines of Thrace, _Filippo_

Ph[)i]l[=i]pp[)o]p[)o]lis, a city of Thrace, near the river Hebrus,
_Filippopoli_

Phr[)y]g[)i]a, two countries in Asia Minor, one called Major, the other
Minor

P[=i]c[=e]num, an ancient district of Italy, lying eastward of Umbria;
_the March of Ancona_; according to others, _Piscara_

P[=i]cti, _Picts_, an ancient barbarous northern people, who by
inter-marriages became, in course of time, one nation with the Scots; but
are originally supposed to have come out of Denmark or Scythia, to the
Isles of Orkney, and from thence into Scotland

P[=i]ct[)o]nes, an ancient people of Gaul, along the southern bank of
the Liger, or Loire. Their capital was Limonum, afterwards Pictones, now
_Paitross_, in the department _de la Vienne_, G. iii. 11

Pir[=u]stae, an ancient people of Dalmatia, Illyricum, on the confines
of Pannonia. They are the same as the Pyraci of Pliny (H. N. iii. 22),
G. v. i

P[)i]saurum, a city of Umbria in Italy, _Pisaro_

Piso, an Aquitanian, slain, G. iv. 12

Placentia, an ancient city of Gallia Cisalpina, near the Po, now the
metropolis of the duchy of _Piacenza_, which name it also bears

Pleum[)o]si, an ancient people of Gallia Belgica, subject to the
Nervians, and inhabiting near _Tournay_

Pompey, at first friendly to Caesar, G. vi. 1; subsequently estranged,
G. viii. 53; could not bear an equal his authority, power, and
influence, C. i. 61; sends ambassadors to Caesar, C. i. 8, 10; always
received great respect from Caesar, C. i. 8; Caesar desires to bring him
to an engagement, C. iii. 66; his unfortunate flight, C. iii. 15, 94,
102; his death, C. iii. 6, 7.

Pomponius, C. iii. 101

Pontus Eux[=i]nus, the _Euxine,_ or _Black Sea_, from the Aegean along
the Hellespont, to the Maeotic Lake, between Europe and Asia

Posth[)u]m[)i][=a]na Castra, an ancient town in Hispania Baetica, now
called _Castro el Rio_

Pothinus, king Ptolemy's tutor, C. iii. 108; his death, C. iii. 112

Praeciani, an ancient people of Gaul, _Precius_; they surrendered to the
Romans, G. iii. 27

Provincia Rom[=a]na, or Romanorum, one of the southern provinces of
France, the first the Romans conquered and brought into the form of a
province, whence it obtained its name; which it still in some degree
retains, being called at this day _Provence_. It extended from the
Pyrenees to the Alps, along the coast. _Provence_ is only part of the
ancient Provincia, which in its full extent included the departments of
Pyr['e]n['e]es-Orientales, l'Arri[`e]ge, Aude[**Note: misprint "Ande" in
the original], Haute Garonne, Tarn, Herault, Gard, Vaucluse, Bouches-du-
Rh[^o]ne, Var, Basses-Alpes, Hautes-Alpes, La Dr[^o]me, l'Is[`e]re,
l'Ain

Prusa, or Prusas, _Bursa_, a city of Bithynia, at the foot of Olympus,
built by Hannibal

Ptolemaeius, Caesar interferes between him and Cleopatra, C. iii. 107;
his father's will, C. iii. 108; Caesar takes the royal youth into his
power, C. iii. 109

Pt[)o]l[)e]m[=a]is, an ancient city of Africa, _St. Jean d'Acre_

Publius Attius Varus, one of Pompey's generals, C. ii. 23  Pyrenaei
Montes, the _Pyrenees_, or _Pyrenean mountains_, one of the largest
chains of mountains in Europe, which divide Spain from France, running
from east to west eighty-five leagues in length. The name is derived
from the _Celtic Pyren_ or _Pyrn_, a high mountain, hence also Brenner,
in the Tyrol

Ravenna, a very ancient city of Italy, near the coast of the Adriatic
Gulf, which still retains its ancient name. In the decline of the Roman
empire, it was sometimes the seat of the emperors of the West; as it was
likewise of the Visi-Gothic kingdom, C. i. 5

Raur[=a]ci, a people of ancient Germany, near the Helvetii, who
inhabited near where _Basle_ in Switzerland now is; they unite with the
Helvetii, and leave home, G. i. 5, 29

Rebilus, one of Caesar's lieutenants, a man of great military
experience, C. ii. 34

Remi, the people of _Rheims_, a very ancient, fine, and populous city of
France, in the province of Champagne, on the river Vesle; surrender to
Caesar, G. ii. 3; their influence and power with Caesar, G. v. 54; vi.
64; they fall into an ambuscade of the Bellovaci, G. viii. 12

Rh[-e][)d]ones, an ancient people of Gaul inhabiting about _Rennes,_ in
Bretagne; they surrender to the Romans, G. ii. 34

Rhaetia, the country of the _Grisons,_ on the Alps, near the Hercynian
Forest

Rhenus, the _Rhine,_ a large and famous river in Germany, which it
formerly divided from Gaul. It springs out of the Rhaetian Alps, in the
western borders of Switzerland, and the northern of the Grisons, from
two springs which unite near Coire, and falls into the Meuse and the
German Ocean, by two mouths, whence Virgil calls it Rhenus bicornis. It
passes through Lacus Brigantinus, or the Lake of Constance, and Lacus
Acronius or the Lake of Zell, and then continues its westerly direction
to Basle (Basiliae). It then bends northward, and separates Germany from
France, and further down Germany from Belgium. At Schenk the Rhine sends
off its left-hand branch, the Vahalis (Waal), by a western course to
join the Mosa or Meuse. The Rhine then flows on a few miles, and again
separates into two branches--the one to the right called the Flevo, or
Felvus, or Flevum--now the Yssel, and the other called the Helium, now
the _Leek_. The latter joins the Mosa above Rotterdam. The Yssel was
first connected with the Rhine by the canal of Drusus. It passed through
the small lake of Flevo before reaching the sea which became expanded
into what is now called the Zuyder Zee by increase of water through the
Yssel from the Rhine. The whole course of the Rhine is nine hundred
miles, of which six hundred and thirty are navigable from Basle to the
sea.--G. iv. 10, 16, 17; vi. 9, etc.; description of it, G. iv. 10

Rh[)o]d[)a]nus, the _Rhone_, one of the most celebrated rivers of
France, which rises from a double spring in Mont de la Fourche, a part
of the Alps, on the borders of Switzerland, near the springs of the
Rhine. It passes through the Lacus Lemanus, Lake of Geneva, and flows
with a swift and rapid current in a southern direction into the Sinus
Gallicus, or Gulf of Lyons. Its whole course is about four hundred miles

Rhod[)o]pe, a famous mountain of Thrace, now called _Valiza_

Rh[)o]dus, Rhodes, a celebrated island in the Mediterranean, upon the
coast of Asia Minor, over against Caria

Rhynd[)a]gus, a river of Mysia in Asia, which falls into the Propontis

R[)o]ma, _Rome_, once the seat of the Roman empire, and the capital of
the then known world, now the immediate capital of Camagna di Roma only,
on the river Tiber, and the papal seat; generally supposed to have been
built by Romulus, in the first year of the seventh Olympiad, B.C. 753

Roscillus and Aegus, brothers belonging to the Allobroges, revolt from
Caesar to Pompey, C. iii. 59

Roxol[-a]ni, a people of Scythia Europaea, bordering upon the Alani;
their country, anciently called Roxolonia, is now _Red Russia_

R[)u]t[-e]ni, an ancient people of Gaul, to the north-west of the Volcae
Arecomici, occupying the district now called Le Rauergne. Their capital
was Segodunum, afterwards Ruteni, now Rhodes, G. i. 45; vii. 7, etc.

S[=a]bis, _the Sambre_, a river of the Low Countries, which rises in
Picardy, and falls into the Meuse at Namur, G. ii. 16, 18; vi. 33

Sabura, general of king Juba, C. ii. 38; his stratagem against Curio, C.
ii. 40; his death, C. ii. 95

Sadales, the son of king Cotys, brings forces to Pompey, C. iii. 4

Salassii, an ancient city of Piedmont, whose chief town was where now
_Aosta_ is situate

Salluvii, _Sallyes_, a people of Gallia Narbonensis, about where _Aix_
now is

Sal[=o]na, an ancient city of Dalmatia, and a Roman colony; the place
where Dioclesian was born, and whither he retreated, after he had
resigned the imperial dignity

S[=a]lsus, a river of Hispania Baetica, _Rio Salado_, or _Guadajos_

S[)a]m[)a]r[:o]br[=i]va, _Amiens_, an ancient city of Gallia Belgica,
enlarged and beautified by the emperor Antoninus Pius, now Amicus, the
chief city of Picardy, on the river Somme; assembly of the, Gauls held
there, G. v. 24

S[=a]nt[)o]nes, the ancient inhabitants of _Guienne_, or _Xantoigne_, G.
i. 10

S[=a]rd[)i]n[)i]a, a large island in the Mediterranean, which in the
time of the Romans had forty-two cities, it now belongs to the Duke of
Savoy, with the title of king

S[=a]rm[=a]t[)i]a, a very large northern country, divided into Sarmatia
Asiatica, containing _Tartary, Petigora, Circassia_, and the country of
the _Morduitae_; and Sarmatia Europaea, containing _Russia_, part of
_Poland, Prussia_, and _Lithuania_

Savus, the _Save_, a large river which rises in Upper Carniola, and
falls into the Danube at Belgrade

Scaeva, one of Caesar's centurions, displays remarkable valour, C. iii.
5 3; his shield is pierced in two hundred and thirty places

Sc[=a]ldis, the _Scheld_, a noted river in the Low Countries, which
rises in Picardy, and washing several of the principal cities of
Flanders and Brabant in its course, falls into the German Ocean by two
mouths, one retaining its own name, and the other called the _Honte_.
Its whole course does not exceed a hundred and twenty miles. G. vi. 33

Scandinav[)i]a, anciently a vast northern peninsula, containing what is
yet called _Schonen_, anciently Scania, belonging to _Denmark_; and part
of _Sweden_, _Norway_, and _Lapland_

Scipio, his opinion of Pompey and Caesar, C. i. 1, 21; his flight, C.
iii. 37

S[)e]d[=u]l[)i]us, general of the Lemovices; his death, G. vii. 38

S[=e]d[=u]ni, a people of Gaul, to the south-east of the Lake of Geneva,
occupying the upper part of the Valais. Their chief town was Civitus
Sedunorum, now _Sion_, G. iii. i

S[=e]d[=u]s[)i]i, an ancient people of Germany, on the borders of
Suabia, G. i. 51

S[=e]gni, an ancient German nation, neighbours of the Condrusi,
_Zulpich_

S[=e]g[=o]nt[)i][=a]ci, a people of ancient Britain, inhabiting about
Holshot, in Hampshire, G. v. 21

Segovia, a city of Hispania Baetica, _Sagovia la Menos_

S[)e]g[=u]s[)i][=a]ni, a people of Gallia Celtica, about where _Lionois
Forest_ is now situate

Sen[)o]nes, an ancient nation of the Celtae, inhabiting the country
about the _Senonois_, in Gaul

Sequ[)a]na, the _Seine_, one of the principal rivers of France, which
rising in the duchy of Burgundy, not far from a town of the same name,
and running through Paris, and by Rouen, forms at Candebec a great arm
of the sea

Sequ[)a]ni, an ancient people of Gallia Belgica, inhabiting the country
now called the _Franche Comt['e]_, or the _Upper Burgundy_; they bring
the Germans into Gaul, G. vi. 12; lose the chief power, _ibid_.

Servilius the consul, C. iii. 21

S[=e]s[=u]v[)i]i, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting about _Seez_;
they surrender to the Romans, G. ii. 34

Sextus Bibaculus, sick in the camp, G. vi. 38; fights bravely against
the enemy, _ibid_.

Sextus Caesar, C. ii. 20

Sextus, Quintilius Varus, qaestor, C. i. 23; C. ii. 28

Sib[=u]z[=a]tes, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting the country
around the _Adour_; they surrender to the Romans, G. iii. 27

Sicil[)i]a, _Sicily_, a large island in the Tyrrhene Sea, at the
south-west point of Italy, formerly called the storehouse of the Roman
empire, it was the first province the Romans possessed out of Italy,
C. i. 30

S[)i]c[)o]ris, a river in Catalonia, the _Segre_

S[)i]g[)a]mbri, or S[)i]c[)a]mbri, an ancient people of Lower Germany,
between the Maese and the Rhine, where _Cuelderland_ is; though by some
placed on the banks of the Maine, G. iv. 18

Silicensis, a river of Hispania Baetica, _Rio de las Algamidas_. Others
think it a corruption from _Singuli_

Sinuessa, a city of Campania, not far from the Save, an ancient Roman
colony, now in a ruinous condition; _Rocca di Mondragon['e]_

Soldurii, G. iii. 22

S[)o]t[)i][=a]tes, or Sontiates, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting
the country about _Aire_; conquered by Caesar Aquillus, G. iii. 20, 21

Sp[=a]rta, a city of Peloponnesus, now called _Mucithra_, said to be as
ancient as the days of the patriarch Jacob

Spolet[)i]um, _Spoleto_, a city of great antiquity, of Umbria, in Italy,
the capital of a duchy of the same name, on the river Tesino, where are
yet some stately ruins of ancient Roman and Gothic edifices

Statius Marcus, one of Caesar's lieutenants, C. iii. i 5

S[)u][=e]ss[)i][=o]nes, an ancient people of Gaul, _les Soissanois_; a
kindred tribe with the Remi, G. ii. 3; surrender to Caesar, G. iii. 13

Su[=e]vi, an ancient, great, and warlike people of Germany, who
possessed the greatest part of it, from the Rhine to the Elbe, but
afterwards removed from the northern parts, and settled about the
Danube; and some marched into Spain, where they established a kingdom,
the greatest nation in Germany, G. i. 37, 51, 54; hold a levy against
the Romans, G. iv. 19; the Germans say that not even the gods are a
match for them, G. iii. 7; the Ubii pay them tribute, G. iv. 4

S[=u]lmo, an ancient city of Italy, _Sulmona_; its inhabitants declare
in favour of Caesar, C. i. 18

Sulpicius, one of Caesar's lieutenants, stationed among the Aedui, C. i.
74

Supplications decreed in favour of Caesar on several occasions, G. ii.
15; _ibid_. 35; iv. 38

Suras, one of the Aeduan nobles, taken prisoner, G. viii. 45

Sylla, though a most merciless tyrant, left to the tribunes the right of
giving protection, C. i. 5, 73

Syrac[=u]sae, _Saragusa_, once one of the noblest cities of Sicily, said
to have been built by Archias, a Corinthian, about seven hundred years
before Christ. The Romans besieged and took it during the second Punic
war, on which occasion the great Archimedes was killed

S[=y]rtes, _the Deserts of Barbary_; also two dangerous sandy gulfs in
the Mediterranean, upon the coast of Barbary, in Africa, called the one
Syrtis Magna, now the _Gulf of Sidra_; the other Syrtis Parva, now the
_Gulf of Capes_

T[)a]m[)e]sis, the _Thames_, a celebrated and well-known river of Great
Britain; Caesar crosses it, G. v. 18

Tan[)a]is, the _Don_, a very large river in Scythia, dividing Asia from
Europe. It rises in the province of Resan, in Russia, and flowing
through Crim-Tartary, runs into the Maeotic Lake, near a city of the
same name, now in ruins

T[=a]rb[=e]lli, a people of ancient Gaul, near the Pyrenees, inhabiting
about _Ays_ and _Bayonne_, in the country of _Labourd_; they surrender
to Crassus, G. iii. 27

Tarcundarius Castor, assists Pompey with three hundred cavalry, C. iii.
4

Tarr[)a]c[=i]na, an ancient city of Italy, which still retains the same
name

T[=a]rr[)a]co, _Tarragona_, a city of Spain, which in ancient time gave
name to that part of it called Hispania Tarraconensis; by some said to
be built by the Scipios, though others say before the Roman conquest,
and that they only enlarged it. It stands on the mouth of the river
Tulcis, now _el Fracoli_, with a small haven on the Mediterranean; its
inhabitants desert to Caesar, C. i. 21, 60

Tar[=u]s[=a]tes, an ancient people of Gaul, uncertain; according to
some, _le Teursan_; they surrender to the Romans, G. iii. 13, 23, 27

Tasg[=e]t[)i]us, chief of the Carnutes, slain by his countrymen, G. v.
25

Taur[=o]is, a fortress of the inhabitants of Massilia

Taurus, an island in the Adriatic Sea, unknown

Taurus Mons, the largest mountain in all Asia, extending from the Indian
to the Aegean Seas, called by different names in different countries,
viz., Imaus, Caucasus, Caspius, Cerausius, and in Scripture, Ar[)a]rat.
Herbert says it is fifty English miles over, and 1500 long

Taximagulus, one of the four kings or princes that reigned over Kent, G.
v. 22

Tect[)o]s[)a]ges, a branch of the Volcae, G. vi. 24

Tegea, a city of Africa, unknown

Tenchth[)e]ri, a people of ancient Germany, bordering on the Rhine, near
_Overyssel_; they and the Usip[)e]tes arrive at the banks of the Rhine,
iv. 4; cross that river by a stratagem, _ibid_.; are defeated with great
slaughter, _ibid_. 15

Tergeste, a Roman colony, its inhabitants in the north of Italy cut off
by an incursion, G. viii. 24

Terni, an ancient Roman colony, on the river Nare, twelve miles from
Spol[=e]tum

Teutomatus, king of the Nitobriges, G. vii. 31

Teut[)o]nes, or Teutoni, an ancient people bordering on the Cimbri, the
common ancient name for all the Germans, whence they yet call themselves
_Teutsche_, and their country _Teutschland_; they are repelled from the
territories of the Belgae, G. ii. 4

Thebae, Thebes, a city of Boeotia, in Greece, said to have been built by
Cadmus, destroyed by Alexander the Great, but rebuilt, and now known by
the name of _Stives_; occupied by Kalenus, C. iii. 55

Therm[)o]pylae, a famous pass on the great mountain Oeta, leading into
Phocis, in Achaia, now called _Bocca di Lupa_

Thessaly, a country of Greece, formerly a great part of Macedonia, now
called _Janna_; in conjunction with Aetolia, sends ambassadors to
Caesar, C. iii. 34; reduced by Caesar, _ibid_. 81

Thessalon[=i]ca, a chief city of Macedonia, now called _Salonichi_

Thracia, a large country of Europe, eastward from Macedonia, commonly
called _Romania_, bounded by the Euxine and Aegean Seas

Th[=u]r[=i]i, or T[=u]r[=i]i, an ancient people of Italy, _Torre
Brodogneto_

Tigur[=i]nus Pagus, one of the four districts into which the Helvetii
were divided according to Caesar, the ancient inhabitants of the canton
of _Zurich_ in Switzerland, cut to pieces by Caesar, G. i. 12

Titus Ampius attempts sacrilege, but is prevented, C. iii. 105

Tol[=o]sa, _Thoulouse_, a city of Aquitaine, of great antiquity, the
capital of Languedoc, on the Garonne

Toxandri, an ancient people of the Low Countries, about _Breda_, and
_Gertruydenburgh_; but according to some, of the diocese of _Liege_

Tralles, an ancient city of Lydia in, Asia Minor, _Chara_, C. iii. 105

Trebonius, one of Caesar's lieutenants, C. i. 36; torn down from the
tribunal, C. iii. 21; shows remarkable industry in repairing the works,
C. ii. 14; and humanity, C. iii. 20

Trev[)i]ri, the people of _Treves_, or _Triers_, a very ancient city of
Lower Germany, on the Moselle, said to have been built by Trebetas, the
brother of Ninus. It was made a Roman colony in the time of Augustus,
and became afterwards the most famous city of Gallia Belgica. It was for
some time the seat of the western empire, but it is now only the seat of
the ecclesiastical elector named from it, G. i. 37; surpass the rest of
the Gauls in cavalry, G. ii. 24; solicit the Germans to assist them
against the Romans, G. v. 2, 55; their bravery, G. viii. 25; their
defeat, G. vi. 8, vii. 63

Tr[)i]b[)o]ci, or Tr[)i]b[)o]ces, a people of ancient Germany,
inhabiting the country of _Alsace_, G. i. 51

Tribunes of the soldiers and centurions desert to Caesar, C. i. 5

Tribunes (of the people) flee to Caesar, C. i. 5

Trin[)o]bantes, a people of ancient Britain, inhabitants of the counties
of _Middlesex_ and _Hertfordshire_, G. v. 20

Troja, _Troy_, a city of Phrygia, in Asia Minor, near Mount _Ida_,
destroyed by the Greeks, after a ten years' siege

Tubero is prevented by Attius Varus from landing on the African coast,
G. i. 31

Tulingi, an ancient people of Germany, who inhabited about where now
_Stulingen_ in Switzerland is; border on the Helvetii, G. i. 5

Tungri, an ancient people inhabiting about where Tongres, in Liege, now
is

Tur[=o]nes, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting about _Tours_

Tusc[)i], or Hetrusci, the inhabitants of _Tuscany_, a very large and
considerable region of Italy, anciently called Tyrrh[=e]nia, and Etruria

Ubii, an ancient people of Lower Germany, who inhabited about where
_Cologne_ and the duchy of _Juliers_ now are. They seek protection from
the Romans against the Suevi, G. iv. 3; tributary to the Suevi, _ibid_.;
declare in favour of Caesar, G. iv. 9, 14

Ulcilles Hirrus, one of Pompey's officers, C. i. 15

Ulla, or Ulia, a town in Hispania Baetica, in regard to whose situation
geographers are not agreed; some making it _Monte Major_, others
_Vaena_, others _Vilia_

Umbria, a large country of Italy, on both sides of the Apennines

Unelli, an ancient people of Gaul, uncertain, G. ii. 34

Urbigenus, one of the cantons of the Helvetii, G. i. 27

Usip[)e]tes, an ancient people of Germany, who frequently changed their
habitation

Usita, a town unknown

Uxellod[=u]num, a town in Gaul, whose situation is not known; according
to some, _Ussoldun_ besieged and stormed, G. viii. 32

Vah[)a]lis, the _Waal_, the middle branch of the Rhine, which, passing
by Nim[)e]guen, falls into the Meuse, above Gorcum, G. iv. 10

Valerius Flaccus, one of Caesar's lieutenants, C. i. 30; his death, C.
iii. 5 3

Val[=e]t[)i][)a]cus, the brother of Cotus, G. vii. 32

Vangi[)o]nes, an ancient people of Germany, about the city of _Worms_,
G. i. 51

V[=a]r[=e]nus, a centurion, his bravery, G. v. 44

Varro, one of Pompey's lieutenants, C. i. 38; his feelings towards
Caesar, C. ii. 17; his cohorts driven out by the inhabitants of Carmona,
C. ii. 19; his surrender, C. ii. 20

V[=a]rus, the _Var_, a river of Italy, that flows into the Mediterranean
Sea, C. i. 87

Varus, one of Pompey's lieutenants, is afraid to oppose Juba. C. ii. 44;
his flight, C. ii. 34

Vatinius, one of Caesar's followers, C. iii. 100

V[)e]launi, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting about _Velai_

Vellaunod[=u]num, a town in Gaul, about which geographers are much
divided; some making it _Auxerre_, others _Chasteau Landon_, others
_Villeneuve_ in Lorraine, others _Veron_. It surrenders, G. vii. 11

Velocasses, an ancient people of Normandy, about _Rouen_, G. ii. 4

V[)e]n[)e]ti, this name was anciently given as well to the _Venetians_
as to the people of _Vannes_, in Bretagne, in Gaul, for which last it
stands in Caesar. They were powerful by sea, G. iii. 1; their senate is
put to death by Caesar, G. iii. 16; they are completely defeated,
_ibid_. 15; and surrender, _ibid_. 16

Veragri, a people of Gallia Lugdunensls, whose chief town was Aguanum,
now _St. Maurice_, G. iii. 1

Verb[)i]g[)e]nus, or Urb[)i]g[)e]nus Pagus, a nation or canton of the
Helvetians, inhabiting the country in the neighbourhood of _Orbe_

Vercelli Campi, the _Plains of Vercellae_, famous for a victory the
Romans obtained there over the Cimbri. The city of that name is in
Piedmont on the river Sesia, on the borders of the duchy of Milan

Vercingetorix, the son of Celtillus, receives the title of king from his
followers, G. vii. 4; his plans, G. vii. 8; is accused of treachery, G.
vii. 20; his acts, G. vii. 8; surrenders to Caesar, G. vii. 82

Vergasillaunus, the Arvernian, one of the Gallic leaders, G. vii. 76;
taken prisoner, G. vii. 88

Vergobr[)e]tus, the name given to the chief magistrate among the Aedui,
G. i. 16

V[)e]r[)u]doct[)i]us, one of the Helvetian embassy who request
permission from Caesar to pass through the province, G. i. 7

Veromand[)u]i, a people of Gallia Belgica, whose country, now a part of
Picardy, is still called _Vermandois_

Ver[=o]na, a city of Lombardy, the capital of a province of the same
name, on the river Adige, said to have been built by the Gauls two
hundred and eighty-two years before Christ. It has yet several remains
of antiquity

Vertico, one of the Nervii. He was in Cicero's camp when it was attacked
by the Eburones, and prevailed on a slave to carry a letter to Caesar
communicating that information, G. v. 49

Vertiscus, general of the Remi, G. viii. 12

Vesontio, _Besan[,c]on_, the capital of the Sequani, now the chief city
of Burgundy, G. i. 38

Vett[=o]nes, a people of Spain, inhabiting the province of
_Estremadura_, C. i. 38

Vibo, a town in Italy, not far from the Sicilian Straits, _Bibona_

Vibullius Rufus, one of Pompey's followers, C. i. 15

Vienna, a city of Narbonese Gaul, _Vienne in Dauphiny_, G. vii. 9

Vindel[)i]ci, an ancient people of Germany, inhabitants of the country
of Vindelicia, otherwise called Raetia secunda

Viridomarus, a nobleman among the Aedui, G. vii. 38

Viridorix, king of the Unelli, G. iii. 17

Vist[)u]la, the _Weichsel_, a famous river of Poland, which rises in the
Carpathian mountains, in Upper Silesia, and falls into the Baltic, not
far from Dantzic, by three mouths

Visurgis, the _Weser_, a river of Lower Germany, which rises in
Franconia, and, among other places of note, passing by Bremen, falls
into the German Ocean, not far from the mouth of the Elbe, between that
and the Ems

V[)o]c[=a]tes, a people of Gaul, on the confines of the Lapurdenses, G.
iii. 23

Vocis, the king of the Norici, G. i. 58

V[)o]contii, an ancient people of Gaul, inhabiting about _Die_, in
Dauphiny, and _Vaison_ in the county of Venisse

Vog[)e]sus Mons, the mountain of _Vauge_ in Lorrain, or, according to
others, _de Faucilles_, G. iv. 10

Volcae Arecom[)i]ci, and Tectosages, an ancient people of Gaul,
inhabiting the _Upper_ and _Lower Languedoc_

Volcae, a powerful Gallic tribe, divided into two branches, the
Tectosages and Arecomici, G. vii. 7

Volcatius Tullus, one of Caesar's partisans, C. iii. 52





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of "De Bello Gallico" and Other
Commentaries, by Caius Julius Caesar

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DE BELLO GALLICO ***

***** This file should be named 10657.txt or 10657.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.net/1/0/6/5/10657/

Produced by Stan Goodman, Ted Garvin, Carol David and PG Distributed
Proofreaders


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS," WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Each eBook is in a subdirectory of the same number as the eBook's
eBook number, often in several formats including plain vanilla ASCII,
compressed (zipped), HTML and others.

Corrected EDITIONS of our eBooks replace the old file and take over
the old filename and etext number.  The replaced older file is renamed.
VERSIONS based on separate sources are treated as new eBooks receiving
new filenames and etext numbers.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

EBooks posted prior to November 2003, with eBook numbers BELOW #10000,
are filed in directories based on their release date.  If you want to
download any of these eBooks directly, rather than using the regular
search system you may utilize the following addresses and just
download by the etext year.

     http://www.gutenberg.net/etext06

    (Or /etext 05, 04, 03, 02, 01, 00, 99,
     98, 97, 96, 95, 94, 93, 92, 92, 91 or 90)

EBooks posted since November 2003, with etext numbers OVER #10000, are
filed in a different way.  The year of a release date is no longer part
of the directory path.  The path is based on the etext number (which is
identical to the filename).  The path to the file is made up of single
digits corresponding to all but the last digit in the filename.  For
example an eBook of filename 10234 would be found at:

     http://www.gutenberg.net/1/0/2/3/10234

or filename 24689 would be found at:
     http://www.gutenberg.net/2/4/6/8/24689

An alternative method of locating eBooks:
     http://www.gutenberg.net/GUTINDEX.ALL

Project Gutenberg's The Radio Amateur's Hand Book, by A. Frederick Collins

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Radio Amateur's Hand Book

Author: A. Frederick Collins

Posting Date: March 21, 2013 [EBook #6934]
Release Date: November, 2004
First Posted: February 13, 2003

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE RADIO AMATEUR'S HAND BOOK ***




Produced by Alan Millar and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team.








[Transcriber's Note: The illustrations have been included with
another version of this work. The image files have been named
in a straightforward manner that corresponds to the numbering in
the text; thus, Illustration 7 is included as file "fig007.png",
while Illustration (A) 22 is included as file "fig022a.png".]






THE RADIO AMATEUR'S HAND BOOK

[Illustration: A. Frederick Collins, Inventor of the Wireless
Telephone, 1899. Awarded Gold Medal for same, Alaska Yukon Pacific
Exposition, 1909.]




THE RADIO AMATEUR'S HAND BOOK

A Complete, Authentic and Informative Work on Wireless Telegraphy and
Telephony

BY

A. FREDERICK COLLINS

Inventor of the Wireless Telephone 1899; Historian of Wireless
1901-1910; Author of "Wireless Telegraphy" 1905





TO

WILLIAM MARCONI

INVENTOR OF THE WIRELESS TELEGRAPH




INTRODUCTION


Before delving into the mysteries of receiving and sending messages
without wires, a word as to the history of the art and its present day
applications may be of service. While popular interest in the subject
has gone forward by leaps and bounds within the last two or three
years, it has been a matter of scientific experiment for more than a
quarter of a century.

The wireless telegraph was invented by William Marconi, at Bologna,
Italy, in 1896, and in his first experiments he sent dot and dash
signals to a distance of 200 or 300 feet. The wireless telephone was
invented by the author of this book at Narberth, Penn., in 1899, and
in his first experiments the human voice was transmitted to a distance
of three blocks.

The first vital experiments that led up to the invention of the
wireless telegraph were made by Heinrich Hertz, of Germany, in 1888
when he showed that the spark of an induction coil set up electric
oscillations in an open circuit, and that the energy of these waves
was, in turn, sent out in the form of electric waves. He also showed
how they could be received at a distance by means of a ring detector,
which he called a _resonator_

In 1890, Edward Branly, of France, showed that metal filings in a tube
cohered when electric waves acted on them, and this device he termed a
_radio conductor_; this was improved upon by Sir Oliver Lodge, who
called it a coherer. In 1895, Alexander Popoff, of Russia, constructed
a receiving set for the study of atmospheric electricity, and this
arrangement was the earliest on record of the use of a detector
connected with an aerial and the earth.

Marconi was the first to connect an aerial to one side of a spark gap
and a ground to the other side of it. He used an induction coil to
energize the spark gap, and a telegraph key in the primary circuit to
break up the current into signals. Adding a Morse register, which
printed the dot and dash messages on a tape, to the Popoff receptor he
produced the first system for sending and receiving wireless telegraph
messages.

[Illustration: Collins' Wireless Telephone Exhibited at the Madison
Square Garden, October 1908.]

After Marconi had shown the world how to telegraph without connecting
wires it would seem, on first thought, to be an easy matter to
telephone without wires, but not so, for the electric spark sets up
damped and periodic oscillations and these cannot be used for
transmitting speech. Instead, the oscillations must be of constant
amplitude and continuous. That a direct current arc light transforms a
part of its energy into electric oscillations was shown by Firth and
Rogers, of England, in 1893.

The author was the first to connect an arc lamp with an aerial and a
ground, and to use a microphone transmitter to modulate the sustained
oscillations so set up. The receiving apparatus consisted of a
variable contact, known as a _pill-box_ detector, which Sir Oliver
Lodge had devised, and to this was connected an Ericsson telephone
receiver, then the most sensitive made. A later improvement for
setting up sustained oscillations was the author's _rotating
oscillation arc_.

Since those memorable days of more than two decades ago, wonderful
advances have been made in both of these methods of transmitting
intelligence, and the end is as yet nowhere in sight. Twelve or
fifteen years ago the boys began to get fun out of listening-in to
what the ship and shore stations were sending and, further, they began
to do a little sending on their own account. These youngsters, who
caused the professional operators many a pang, were the first wireless
amateurs, and among them experts were developed who are foremost in
the practice of the art today.

Away back there, the spark coil and the arc lamp were the only known
means for setting up oscillations at the sending end, while the
electrolytic and crystal detectors were the only available means for
the amateur to receive them. As it was next to impossible for a boy to
get a current having a high enough voltage for operating an
oscillation arc lamp, wireless telephony was out of the question for
him, so he had to stick to the spark coil transmitter which needed
only a battery current to energize it, and this, of course, limited
him to sending Morse signals. As the electrolytic detector was
cumbersome and required a liquid, the crystal detector which came into
being shortly after was just as sensitive and soon displaced the
former, even as this had displaced the coherer.

A few years ahead of these amateurs, that is to say in 1905, J. A.
Fleming, of England, invented the vacuum tube detector, but ten more
years elapsed before it was perfected to a point where it could
compete with the crystal detector. Then its use became general and
workers everywhere sought to, and did improve it. Further, they found
that the vacuum tube would not only act as a detector, but that if
energized by a direct current of high voltage it would set up
sustained oscillations like the arc lamp, and the value of sustained
oscillations for wireless telegraphy as well as wireless telephony had
already been discovered.

The fact that the vacuum tube oscillator requires no adjustment of its
elements, that its initial cost is much less than the oscillation arc,
besides other considerations, is the reason that it popularized
wireless telephony; and because continuous waves have many advantages
over periodic oscillations is the reason the vacuum tube oscillator is
replacing the spark coil as a wireless telegraph transmitter.
Moreover, by using a number of large tubes in parallel, powerful
oscillations can be set up and, hence, the waves sent out are radiated
to enormous distances.

While oscillator tubes were being experimented with in the research
laboratories of the General Electric, the Westinghouse, the Radio
Corporation of America, and other big companies, all the youthful
amateurs in the country had learned that by using a vacuum tube as a
detector they could easily get messages 500 miles away. The use of
these tubes as amplifiers also made it possible to employ a loud
speaker, so that a room, a hall, or an out-of-door audience could hear
clearly and distinctly everything that was being sent out.

The boy amateur had only to let father or mother listen-in, and they
were duly impressed when he told them they were getting it from KDKA
(the Pittsburgh station of the Westinghouse Co.), for was not
Pittsburgh 500 miles away! And so they, too, became enthusiastic
wireless amateurs. This new interest of the grown-ups was at once met
not only by the manufacturers of apparatus with complete receiving and
sending sets, but also by the big companies which began broadcasting
regular programs consisting of music and talks on all sorts of
interesting subjects.

This is the wireless, or radio, as the average amateur knows it today.
But it is by no means the limit of its possibilities. On the contrary,
we are just beginning to realize what it may mean to the human race.
The Government is now utilizing it to send out weather, crop and
market reports. Foreign trade conditions are being reported. The Naval
Observatory at Arlington is wirelessing time signals.

Department stores are beginning to issue programs and advertise by
radio! Cities are also taking up such programs, and they will
doubtless be included soon among the regular privileges of the
tax-payers. Politicians address their constituents. Preachers reach
the stay-at-homes. Great singers thrill thousands instead of hundreds.
Soon it will be possible to hear the finest musical programs,
entertainers, and orators, without budging from one's easy chair.

In the World War wireless proved of inestimable value. Airplanes,
instead of flying aimlessly, kept in constant touch with headquarters.
Bodies of troops moved alertly and intelligently. Ships at sea talked
freely, over hundreds of miles. Scouts reported. Everywhere its
invisible aid was invoked.

In time of peace, however, it has proved and will prove the greatest
servant of mankind. Wireless messages now go daily from continent to
continent, and soon will go around the world with the same facility.
Ships in distress at sea can summon aid. Vessels everywhere get the
day's news, even to baseball scores. Daily new tasks are being
assigned this tireless, wireless messenger.

Messages have been sent and received by moving trains, the Lackawanna
and the Rock Island railroads being pioneers in this field. Messages
have also been received by automobiles, and one inventor has
successfully demonstrated a motor car controlled entirely by wireless.
This method of communication is being employed more and more by
newspapers. It is also of great service in reporting forest fires.

Colleges are beginning to take up the subject, some of the first being
Tufts College, Hunter College, Princeton, Yale, Harvard, and Columbia,
which have regularly organized departments for students in wireless.

Instead of the unwieldy and formidable looking apparatus of a short
time ago, experimenters are now vying with each other in making small
or novel equipment. Portable sets of all sorts are being fashioned,
from one which will go into an ordinary suitcase, to one so small it
will easily slip into a Brownie camera. One receiver depicted in a
newspaper was one inch square! Another was a ring for the finger, with
a setting one inch by five-eighths of an inch, and an umbrella as a
"ground." Walking sets with receivers fastened to one's belt are also
common. Daily new novelties and marvels are announced.

Meanwhile, the radio amateur to whom this book is addressed may have
his share in the joys of wireless. To get all of these good things out
of the ether one does not need a rod or a gun--only a copper wire made
fast at either end and a receiving set of some kind. If you are a
sheer beginner, then you must be very careful in buying your
apparatus, for since the great wave of popularity has washed wireless
into the hearts of the people, numerous companies have sprung up and
some of these are selling the veriest kinds of junk.

And how, you may ask, are you going to be able to know the good from
the indifferent and bad sets? By buying a make of a firm with an
established reputation. I have given a few offhand at the end of this
book. Obviously there are many others of merit--so many, indeed, that
it would be quite impossible to get them all in such a list, but these
will serve as a guide until you can choose intelligently for yourself.

A. F. C.




CONTENTS


CHAPTER

I. HOW TO BEGIN WIRELESS

Kinds of Wireless Systems--Parts of a Wireless System--The Easiest Way
to Start--About Aerial Wire Systems--About the Receiving
Apparatus--About Transmitting Stations--Kinds of Transmitters--The
Spark Gap Wireless Telegraph Transmitter--The Vacuum Table Telegraph
Transmitter--The Wireless Telephone Transmitter.

II. PUTTING UP YOUR AERIAL

Kinds of Aerial Wire Systems--How to Put Up a Cheap Receiving
Aerial--A Two-wire Aerial--Connecting in the Ground--How to Put up a
Good Aerial--An Inexpensive Good Aerial--The Best Aerial That Can be
Made--Assembling the Aerial--Making a Good Ground.

III. SIMPLE TELEGRAPH AND TELEPHONE RECEIVING SETS

Assembled Wireless Receiving Sets--Assembling Your Own Receiving
Set--The Crystal Detector--The Tuning Coil--The Loose Coupled Tuning
Coil--Fixed and Variable Condensers--About Telephone Receivers--
Connecting Up the Parts--Receiving Set No. 2--Adjusting the No. 1
Set--The Tuning Coil--Adjusting the No. 2 Set.

IV. SIMPLE TELEGRAPH SENDING SETS

A Cheap Transmitting Set (No. 1)--The Spark Coil--The Battery--The
Telegraph Key--The Spark Gap--The Tuning Coil--The High-tension
Condenser--A Better Transmitting Set (No. 2)--The Alternating Current
Transformer--The Wireless Key--The Spark Gap--The High-tension
Condenser--The Oscillation Transformer--Connecting Up the
Apparatus--For Direct Current--How to Adjust Your Transmitter. Tuning
With a Hot Wire Ammeter--To Send Out a 200-meter Wave Length--The Use
of the Aerial Switch--Aerial Switch for a Complete Sending and
Receiving Set--Connecting in the Lightning Switch.

V. ELECTRICITY SIMPLY EXPLAINED

Electricity at Rest and in Motion--The Electric Current and its
Circuit--Current and the Ampere--Resistance and the Ohm--What Ohm's
Law Is--What the Watt and Kilowatt Are--Electromagnetic
Induction--Mutual Induction--High-frequency Currents--Constants of an
Oscillation Circuit--What Capacitance Is--What Inductance Is--What
Resistance Is--The Effect of Capacitance.

VI. HOW THE TRANSMITTING AND RECEIVING SETS WORK

How Transmitting Set No. 1 Works--The Battery and Spark Coil
Circuit--Changing the Primary Spark Coil Current Into Secondary
Currents--What Ratio of Transformation Means--The Secondary Spark Coil
Circuit--The Closed Oscillation Circuit--How Transmitting Set No. 2
Works--With Alternating Current--With Direct Current--The Rotary Spark
Gap--The Quenched Spark Gap--The Oscillation Transformer--How
Receiving Set No. 1 Works--How Receiving Set No. 2 Works.

VII. MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL TUNING

Damped and Sustained Mechanical Vibrations--Damped and Sustained
Oscillations--About Mechanical Tuning--About Electric Tuning.

VIII. A SIMPLE VACUUM TUBE DETECTOR RECEIVING SET

Assembled Vacuum Tube Receiving Set--A Simple Vacuum Tube Receiving
Set--The Vacuum Tube Detector--Three Electrode Vacuum Tube
Detector--The Dry Cell and Storage Batteries--The Filament
Rheostat--Assembling the Parts--Connecting Up the Parts--Adjusting the
Vacuum Tube Detector Receiving Set.

IX. VACUUM TUBE AMPLIFIER RECEIVING SETS

A Grid Leak Amplifier Receiving Set. With Crystal Detector--The Fixed
Resistance Unit, or Grid Leak--Assembling the Parts for a Crystal
Detector Set--Connecting up the Parts for a Crystal Detector--A Grid
Leak Amplifying Receiving Set With Vacuum Tube Detector--A Radio
Frequency Transformer Amplifying Receiving Set--An Audio Frequency
Transformer Amplifying Receiving Set--A Six Step Amplifier Receiving
Set with a Loop Aerial--How to Prevent Howling.

X. REGENERATIVE AMPLIFICATION RECEIVING SETS

The Simplest Type of Regenerative Receiving Set--With Loose Coupled
Tuning Coil--Connecting Up the Parts--An Efficient Regenerative
Receiving Set. With Three Coil Loose Coupler--The A Battery
Potentiometer--The Parts and How to Connect Them Up--A Regenerative
Audio Frequency Amplifier--The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.

XI. SHORT WAVE REGENERATIVE RECEIVING SETS

A Short Wave Regenerative Receiver, with One Variometer and Three
Variable Condensers--The Variocoupler--The Variometer--Connecting Up
the Parts--Short Wave Regenerative Receiver with Two Variometers and
Two Variable Condensers--The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.

XII. INTERMEDIATE AND LONG WAVE REGENERATIVE RECEIVING SETS

Intermediate Wave Receiving Sets--Intermediate Wave Set With Loading
Coils--The Parts and How to Connect Them Up--An Intermediate Wave Set
with Variocoupler Inductance Coils--The Parts and How to Connect Them
Up--A Long Wave Receiving Set--The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.

XIII. HETERODYNE OR BEAT LONG WAVE TELEGRAPH RECEIVING SET

What the Heterodyne or Beat Method Is--The Autodyne or Self-heterodyne
Long Wave Receiving Set--The Parts and Connections of an Autodyne or
Self-heterodyne, Receiving Set--The Separate Heterodyne Long Wave
Receiving Set--The Parts and Connections of a Separate Heterodyne Long
Wave Receiving Set.

XIV. HEADPHONES AND LOUD SPEAKERS

Wireless Headphones--How a Bell Telephone Receiver is Made--How a
Wireless Headphone is Made--About Resistance, Turns of Wire and
Sensitivity of Headphones--The Impedance of Headphones--How the
Headphones Work--About Loud Speakers--The Simplest Type of Loud
Speaker--Another Simple Kind of Loud Speaker--A Third Kind of Simple
Loud Speaker--A Super Loud Speaker.

XV. OPERATION OF VACUUM TUBE RECEPTORS

What is Meant by Ionization--How Electrons are Separated from
Atoms--Action of the Two Electrode Vacuum Tube--How the Two Electrode
Tube Acts as a Detector--How the Three Electrode Tube Acts as a
Detector--How the Vacuum Tube Acts as an Amplifier--The Operation of a
Simple Vacuum Tube Receiving Set--Operation of a Regenerative Vacuum
Tube Receiving Set--Operation of Autodyne and Heterodyne Receiving
Sets--The Autodyne, or Self-Heterodyne Receiving Set--The Separate
Heterodyne Receiving Set.

XVI. CONTINUOUS WAVE TELEGRAPH TRANSMITTING SETS WITH DIRECT CURRENT

Sources of Current for Telegraph Transmitting Sets--An Experimental
Continuous Wave Telegraph Transmitter--The Apparatus You Need--The
Tuning Coil--The Condensers--The Aerial Ammeter--The Buzzer and Dry
Cell--The Telegraph Key--The Vacuum Tube Oscillator--The Storage
Battery--The Battery Rheostat--The Oscillation Choke Coil--Transmitter
Connectors--The Panel Cutout--Connecting Up the Transmitting
Apparatus--A 100-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter--The Apparatus You
Need--The Tuning Coil--The Aerial Condenser--The Aerial Ammeter--The
Grid and Blocking Condensers--The Key Circuit Apparatus--The 5 Watt
Oscillator Vacuum Tube--The Storage Battery and Rheostat--The Filament
Voltmeter--The Oscillation Choke Coil--The Motor-generator Set--The
Panel Cut-out--The Protective Condenser--Connecting Up the
Transmitting Apparatus--A 200-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter--A
500-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter--The Apparatus and Connections--
The 50-watt Vacuum Tube Oscillator--The Aerial Ammeter--The Grid Leak
Resistance--The Oscillation Choke Coil--The Filament Rheostat--The
Filament Storage Battery--The Protective Condenser--The
Motor-generator--A 1000-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.

XVII. CONTINUOUS WAVE TELEGRAPH TRANSMITTING SETS WITH ALTERNATING
CURRENT

A 100-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitting Set--The Apparatus
Required--The Choke Coils--The Milli-ammeter--The A. C. Power
Transformer--Connecting Up the Apparatus--A 200- to 500-mile C. W.
Telegraph Transmitting Set-A 500- to 1000-mile C. W. Telegraph
Transmitting Set--The Apparatus Required--The Alternating Current
Power Transformer-Connecting Up the Apparatus.

XVIII. WIRELESS TELEPHONE TRANSMITTING SETS WITH DIRECT AND
ALTERNATING CURRENTS

A Short Distance Wireless Telephone Transmitting Set--With 110-volt
Direct Lighting Current--The Apparatus You Need--The Microphone
Transmitter--Connecting Up the Apparatus--A 25- to 50-mile Wireless
Telephone Transmitter--With Direct Current Motor Generator--The
Apparatus You Need--The Telephone Induction Coil--The Microphone
Transformer--The Magnetic Modulator--How the Apparatus is Connected
Up--A 50- to 100-mile Wireless Telephone Transmitter--With Direct
Current Motor Generator--The Oscillation Choke Coil--The Plate and
Grid Circuit Reactance Coils--Connecting up the Apparatus--A 100- to
200-mile Wireless Telephone Transmitter--With Direct Current Motor
Generator--A 50- to 100-mile Wireless Telephone Transmitting Set--With
100-volt Alternating Current--The Apparatus You Need--The Vacuum Tube
Rectifier--The Filter Condensers--The Filter Reactance Coil--
Connecting Up the Apparatus--A 100- to 200-mile Wireless Telephone
Transmitting Set--With 110-volt Alternating Current--Apparatus
Required.

XIX. THE OPERATION OF VACUUM TUBE TRANSMITTERS

The Operation of the Vacuum Tube Oscillator--The Operation of C. W.
Telegraph Transmitters with Direct Current--Short Distance C. W.
Transmitter--The Operation of the Key Circuit--The Operation of C. W.
Telegraph Transmitting with Direct Current--The Operation of C. W.
Telegraph Transmitters with Alternating Current--With a Single
Oscillator Tube--Heating the Filament with Alternating Current--The
Operation of C. W. Telegraph Transmitters with Alternating Current--
With Two Oscillator Tubes--The Operation of Wireless Telephone
Transmitters with Direct Current--Short Distance Transmitter--The
Microphone Transmitter--The Operation of Wireless Telephone
Transmitters with Direct Current--Long Distance Transmitters--The
Operation of Microphone Modulators--The Induction Coil--The Microphone
Transformer--The Magnetic Modulator--Operation of the Vacuum Tube as a
Modulator--The Operation of Wireless Telephone Transmitters with
Alternating Current--The Operation of Rectifier Vacuum Tubes--The
Operation of Reactors and Condensers.

XX. HOW TO MAKE A RECEIVING SET FOR $5.00 OR LESS.

The Crystal Detector--The Tuning Coil--The Headphone--How to Mount the
Parts--The Condenser--How to Connect Up the Receptor.

APPENDIX

Useful Information--Glossary--Wireless Don'ts.




LIST OF FIGURES


Fig. 1.--Simple Receiving Set

Fig. 2.--Simple Transmitting Set

(A) Fig. 3.--Flat Top, or Horizontal Aerial

(B) Fig. 3.--Inclined Aerial

(A) Fig. 4.--Inverted L Aerial

(B) Fig. 4--T Aerial

Fig. 5.--Material for a Simple Aerial Wire System

(A) Fig. 6.--Single Wire Aerial for Receiving

(B) Fig. 6.--Receiving Aerial with Spark Gap Lightning Arrester

(C) Fig. 6.--Aerial with Lightning Switch

Fig. 7.--Two-wire Aerial

(A) Fig. 8.--Part of a Good Aerial

(B) Fig. 8.--The Spreaders

(A) Fig. 9.--The Middle Spreader

(B) Fig. 9.--One End of Aerial Complete

(C) Fig. 9.--The Leading in Spreader

(A) Fig. 10.--Cross Section of Crystal Detector

(B) Fig. 10.--The Crystal Detector Complete

(A) Fig. 11.--Schematic Diagram of a Double Slide Tuning Coil

(B) Fig. 11.--Double Slide Tuning Coil Complete

(A) Fig. 12.--Schematic Diagram of a Loose Coupler

(B) Fig. 12.--Loose Coupler Complete

(A) Fig. 13.--How a Fixed Receiving Condenser is Built up

(B) Fig. 13.--The Fixed Condenser Complete

(C) and (D) Fig. 13.--Variable Rotary Condenser

Fig. 14.--Pair of Wireless Headphones

(A) Fig. 15.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Receiving Set No. 1

(B) Fig. 15.--Wiring Diagram for Receiving Set No. 1

(A) Fig. 16.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Receiving Set No. 2

(B) Fig. 16.--Wiring Diagram for Receiving Set No. 2

Fig. 17.--Adjusting the Receiving Set

(A) and (B) Fig. 18.--Types of Spark Coils for Set No. 1

(C) Fig. 18.--Wiring Diagram of Spark Coil

Fig. 19.--Other Parts for Transmitting Set No. 1

(A) Fig. 20.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Sending Set No. 1

(B) Fig. 20.--Wiring of Diagram for Sending Set No. 1

Fig. 21.--Parts for Transmitting Set No. 2

(A) Fig. 22.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Sending Set No. 2

(B) Fig. 22.--Wiring Diagram for Sending Set No. 2

Fig. 23.--Using a 110-volt Direct Current with an Alternating current
Transformer

Fig. 24.--Principle of the Hot Wire Ammeter

Fig. 25.--Kinds of Aerial Switches

Fig. 26.--Wiring Diagram for a Complete Sending and Receiving Set No. 1

Fig. 27.--Wiring Diagram for Complete Sending and Receiving Set No. 2

Fig. 28.--Water Analogue for Electric Pressure

Fig. 29.--Water Analogues for Direct and Alternating Currents

Fig. 30.--How the Ammeter and Voltmeter are Used

Fig. 31.--Water Valve Analogue of Electric Resistance

(A) and (B) Fig. 32.--How an Electric Current is Changed into Magnetic
Lines of Force and These into an Electric Current

(C) and (D) Fig. 32.--How an Electric Current Sets up a Magnetic Field

Fig. 33.--The Effect of Resistance on the Discharge of an Electric
Current

Fig. 34.--Damped and Sustained Mechanical Vibrations

Fig. 35.--Damped and Sustained Electric Oscillations

Fig. 36.--Sound Wave and Electric Wave Tuned Senders and Receptors

Fig. 37.--Two Electrode Vacuum Tube Detectors

Fig. 38.--Three Electrode Vacuum Tube Detector and Battery Connections

Fig. 39.--A and B Batteries for Vacuum Tube Detectors

Fig. 40.--Rheostat for the A or Storage-battery Current

(A) Fig. 41.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Vacuum Tube Detector
Receiving Set

(B) Fig. 41.--Wiring Diagram of a Simple Vacuum Tube Receiving Set

Fig. 42.--Grid Leaks and How to Connect them Up

Fig. 43.--Crystal Detector Receiving Set with Vacuum Tube Amplifier
(Resistance Coupled)

(A) Fig. 44.--Vacuum Tube Detector Receiving Set with One Step
Amplifier (Resistance Coupled)

(B) Fig. 44.--Wiring Diagram for Using One A or Storage Battery with
an Amplifier and a Detector Tube

(A) Fig. 45.--Wiring Diagram for Radio Frequency Transformer
Amplifying Receiving Set

(B) Fig. 45.--Radio Frequency Transformer

(A) Fig. 46.--Audio Frequency Transformer

(B) Fig. 46.--Wiring Diagram for Audio Frequency Transformer
Amplifying Receiving Set. (With Vacuum Tube Detector and Two Step
Amplifier Tubes)

(A) Fig. 47.--Six Step Amplifier with Loop Aerial

(B) Fig. 47.--Efficient Regenerative Receiving Set (With Three Coil
Loose Coupler Tuner)

Fig. 48.--Simple Regenerative Receiving Set (With Loose Coupler Tuner)

(A) Fig. 49.--Diagram of Three Coil Loose Coupler

(B) Fig. 49.--Three Coil Loose Coupler Tuner

Fig. 50.--Honeycomb Inductance Coil

Fig. 51.--The Use of the Potentiometer

Fig. 52.--Regenerative Audio Frequency Amplifier Receiving Set

Fig. 53.--How the Vario Coupler is Made and Works

Fig. 54.--How the Variometer is Made and Works

Fig. 55.--Short Wave Regenerative Receiving Set (One Variometer
and Three Variable Condensers)

Fig. 56.--Short Wave Regenerative Receiving Set (Two Variometer
and Two Variable Condensers)

Fig. 57.--Wiring Diagram Showing Fixed Loading Coils for Intermediate
Wave Set

Fig. 58.--Wiring Digram of Intermediate Wave Receptor with One Vario
Coupler and 12 Section Bank-wound Inductance Coil

Fig. 59.--Wiring Diagram Showing Long Wave Receptor with Vario
Couplers and 8 Bank-wound Inductance Coils

Fig. 60.--Wiring Diagram of Long Wave Autodyne, or Self-heterodyne
Receptor (Compare with Fig. 77)

Fig. 61.--Wiring Diagram of Long Wave Separate Heterodyne Receiving
Set

Fig. 62.--Cross Section of Bell Telephone Receiver

Fig. 63.--Cross Section of Wireless Headphone

Fig. 64.--The Wireless Headphone

Fig. 65.--Arkay Loud Speaker

Fig. 66.--Amplitone Loud Speaker

Fig. 67.--Amplitron Loud Speaker

Fig. 68.--Magnavox Loud Speaker

Fig. 69.--Schematic Diagram of an Atom

Fig. 70.--Action of Two-electrode Vacuum Tube

(A) and (B) Fig. 71.--How a Two-electrode Tube Acts as Relay or a
Detector

(C) Fig. 71--Only the Positive Part of Oscillations Goes through the
Tube

(A) and (B) Fig. 72.--How the Positive and Negative Voltages of the
Oscillations Act on the Electrons

(C) Fig. 72.--How the Three-electrode Tube Acts as Detector and
Amplifier

(D) Fig. 72.--How the Oscillations Control the Flow of the Battery
Current through the Tube

Fig. 73.--How the Heterodyne Receptor Works

Fig. 74.--Separate Heterodyne Oscillator

(A) Fig. 75.--Apparatus for Experimental C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.

(B) Fig. 75.--Apparatus for Experimental C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.

Fig. 76.--Experimental C. W. Telegraph Transmitter

Fig. 77--Apparatus of 100-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter

Fig. 78.--5- to 50-watt C. W. Telegraph Transmitter (with a Single
Oscillation Tube)

Fig. 79.--200-mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter (with Two Tubes in
Parallel)

Fig. 80.--50-watt Oscillator Vacuum Tube

Fig. 81.--Alternating Current Power Transformer (for C. W. Telegraphy
and Wireless Telephony)

Fig. 82.--Wiring Diagram for 200- to 500-mile C. W. Telegraph
Transmitting Set. (With Alternating Current.)

Fig. 83--Wiring Diagram for 500- to 1000-mile C. W. Telegraph
Transmitter

Fig. 84.--Standard Microphone Transmitter

Fig. 85.--Wiring Diagram of Short Distance Wireless Telephone Set.
(Microphone in Aerial Wire.)

Fig. 86.--Telephone Induction Coil (used with Microphone Transmitter).

Fig. 87.--Microphone Transformer Used with Microphone Transmitter

Fig. 88.--Magnetic Modulator Used with Microphone Transmitter

(A) Fig. 89.--Wiring Diagram of 25--to 50-mile Wireless Telephone.
(Microphone Modulator Shunted Around Grid-leak Condenser)

(B) Fig. 89.--Microphone Modulator Connected in Aerial Wire

Fig. 90.--Wiring Diagram of 50- to 100-mile Wireless Telephone
Transmitting Set

Fig. 91.--Plate and Grid Circuit Reactor

Fig. 92.--Filter Reactor for Smoothing Out Rectified Currents

Fig. 93.--100- to 200-mile Wireless Telephone Transmitter

(A) and (B) Fig. 94.--Operation of Vacuum Tube Oscillators

(C) Fig. 94.--How a Direct Current Sets up Oscillations

Fig. 95.--Positive Voltage Only Sets up Oscillations

Fig. 96.--Rasco Baby Crystal Detector

Fig. 97.--How the Tuning Coil is Made

Fig. 98.--Mesco loop-ohm Head Set

Fig. 99.--Schematic Layout of the $5.00 Receiving Set

Fig. 100.--Wiring Diagram for the $5.00 Receiving Set




LIST OF ILLUSTRATIONS


A. Frederick Collins, Inventor of the Wireless Telephone, 1899.
  Awarded Gold Medal for same, Alaska Yukon Pacific Exposition, 1909

Collins' Wireless Telephone Exhibited at the Madison Square Garden,
  October, 1908

General Pershing "Listening-in"

The World's Largest Radio Receiving Station. Owned by the Radio
  Corporation of America at Rocky Point near Port Jefferson, L. I.

First Wireless College in the World, at Tufts College, Mass

Alexander Graham Bell, Inventor of the Telephone, now an ardent
  Radio Enthusiast

World's Largest Loud Speaker ever made. Installed in Lytle
  Park, Cincinnati, Ohio, to permit President Harding's
  Address at Point Pleasant, Ohio, during the Grant Centenary
  Celebration to be heard within a radius of one square

United States Naval High Power Station, Arlington, Va. General
  view of Power Room. At the left can be seen the Control
  Switchboards, and overhead, the great 30 K.W. Arc Transmitter
  with Accessories

The Transformer and Tuner of the World's Largest Radio Station.
  Owned by the Radio Corporation of America at Rocky Point
  near Port Jefferson, L. I.

Broadcasting Government Reports by Wireless from Washington.
  This shows Mr. Gale at work with his set in the Post Office
  Department

Wireless Receptor, the size of a Safety Match Box. A Youthful
  Genius in the person of Kenneth R. Hinman, who is only
  twelve years old, has made a Wireless Receiving Set that fits
  neatly into a Safety Match Box. With this Instrument and
  a Pair of Ordinary Receivers, he is able to catch not only
  Code Messages but the regular Broadcasting Programs from
  Stations Twenty and Thirty Miles Distant

Wireless Set made into a Ring, designed by Alfred G. Rinehart, of
  Elizabeth, New Jersey. This little Receptor is a Practical Set;
  it will receive Messages, Concerts, etc., measures 1" by 5/8" by
  7/8". An ordinary Umbrella is used as an Aerial




CHAPTER I

HOW TO BEGIN WIRELESS


In writing this book it is taken for granted that you are: _first_,
one of the several hundred thousand persons in the United States who
are interested in wireless telegraphy and telephony; _second_, that
you would like to install an apparatus in your home, and _third_, that
it is all new to you.

Now if you live in a city or town large enough to support an
electrical supply store, there you will find the necessary apparatus
on sale, and someone who can tell you what you want to know about it
and how it works. If you live away from the marts and hives of
industry you can send to various makers of wireless apparatus
[Footnote: A list of makers of wireless apparatus will be found in the
_Appendix_.] for their catalogues and price-lists and these will give
you much useful information. But in either case it is the better plan
for you to know before you start in to buy an outfit exactly what
apparatus you need to produce the result you have in mind, and this
you can gain in easy steps by reading this book.

Kinds of Wireless Systems.--There are two distinct kinds of wireless
systems and these are: the _wireless telegraph_ system, and the
_wireless telephone_ system. The difference between the wireless
telegraph and the wireless telephone is that the former transmits
messages by means of a _telegraph key_, and the latter transmits
conversation and music by means of a _microphone transmitter_. In
other words, the same difference exists between them in this respect
as between the Morse telegraph and the Bell telephone.

Parts of a Wireless System.--Every complete wireless station, whether
telegraph or telephone, consists of three chief separate and distinct
parts and these are: (a) the _aerial wire system_, or _antenna_ as it
is often called, (b) the _transmitter_, or _sender_, and (c) the
_receiver_, or, more properly, the _receptor_. The aerial wire is
precisely the same for either wireless telegraphy or wireless
telephony. The transmitter of a wireless telegraph set generally uses
a _spark gap_ for setting up the electric oscillations, while usually
for wireless telephony a _vacuum tube_ is employed for this purpose.
The receptor for wireless telegraphy and telephony is the same and may
include either a _crystal detector_ or a _vacuum tube detector_, as
will be explained presently.

The Easiest Way to Start.--First of all you must obtain a government
license to operate a sending set, but you do not need a license to put
up and use a receiving set, though you are required by law to keep
secret any messages which you may overhear. Since no license is needed
for a receiving set the easiest way to break into the wireless game is
to put up an aerial and hook up a receiving set to it; you can then
listen-in and hear what is going on in the all-pervading ether around
you, and you will soon find enough to make things highly entertaining.

Nearly all the big wireless companies have great stations fitted with
powerful telephone transmitters and at given hours of the day and
night they send out songs by popular singers, dance music by jazz
orchestras, fashion talks by and for the ladies, agricultural reports,
government weather forecasts and other interesting features. Then by
simply shifting the slide on your tuning coil you can often tune-in
someone who is sending _Morse_, that is, messages in the dot and dash
code, or, perhaps a friend who has a wireless telephone transmitter
and is talking. Of course, if you want to _talk back_ you must have a
wireless transmitter, either telegraphic or telephonic, and this is a
much more expensive part of the apparatus than the receptor, both in
its initial cost and in its operation. A wireless telegraph
transmitter is less costly than a wireless telephone transmitter and
it is a very good scheme for you to learn to send and receive
telegraphic messages.

At the present time, however, there are fifteen amateur receiving
stations in the United States to every sending station, so you can see
that the majority of wireless folks care more for listening in to the
broadcasting of news and music than to sending out messages on their
own account. The easiest way to begin wireless, then, is to put up an
aerial and hook up a receiving set to it.

About Aerial Wire Systems.--To the beginner who wants to install a
wireless station the aerial wire system usually looms up as the
biggest obstacle of all, and especially is this true if his house is
without a flag pole, or other elevation from which the aerial wire can
be conveniently suspended.

If you live in the congested part of a big city where there are no
yards and, particularly, if you live in a flat building or an
apartment house, you will have to string your aerial wire on the roof,
and to do this you should get the owner's, or agent's, permission.
This is usually an easy thing to do where you only intend to receive
messages, for one or two thin wires supported at either end of the
building are all that are needed. If for any reason you cannot put
your aerial on the roof then run a wire along the building outside of
your apartment, and, finally, if this is not feasible, connect your
receiver to a wire strung up in your room, or even to an iron or a
brass bed, and you can still get the near-by stations.

An important part of the aerial wire system is the _ground_, that is,
your receiving set must not only be connected with the aerial wire,
but with a wire that leads to and makes good contact with the moist
earth of the ground. Where a house or a building is piped for gas,
water or steam, it is easy to make a ground connection, for all you
have to do is to fasten the wire to one of the pipes with a clamp.
[Footnote: Pipes are often insulated from the ground, which makes them
useless for this purpose.] Where the house is isolated then a lot of
wires or a sheet of copper or of zinc must be buried in the ground at
a sufficient depth to insure their being kept moist.

About the Receiving Apparatus.--You can either buy the parts of the
receiving apparatus separate and hook them up yourself, or you can buy
the apparatus already assembled in a set which is, in the beginning,
perhaps, the better way.

The simplest receiving set consists of (1) a _detector_, (2) a _tuning
coil_, and (3) a _telephone receiver_ and these three pieces of
apparatus are, of course, connected together and are also connected to
the aerial and ground as the diagram in Fig. 1 clearly shows. There
are two chief kinds of detectors used at the present time and these
are: (a) the _crystal detector_, and (b) the _vacuum tube detector_.
The crystal detector is the cheapest and simplest, but it is not as
sensitive as the vacuum tube detector and it requires frequent
adjustment. A crystal detector can be used with or without a battery
while the vacuum tube detector requires two small batteries.

[Illustration: Fig. 1.--Simple Receiving Set.]

A tuning coil of the simplest kind consists of a single layer of
copper wire wound on a cylinder with an adjustable, or sliding,
contact, but for sharp tuning you need a _loose coupled tuning coil_.
Where a single coil tuner is used a _fixed_ condenser should be
connected around the telephone receivers. Where a loose coupled tuner
is employed you should have a variable condenser connected across the
_closed oscillation circuit_ and a _fixed condenser_ across the
telephone receivers.

When listening-in to distant stations the energy of the received
wireless waves is often so very feeble that in order to hear
distinctly an _amplifier_ must be used. To amplify the incoming sounds
a vacuum tube made like a detector is used and sometimes as many as
half-a-dozen of these tubes are connected in the receiving circuit, or
in _cascade_, as it is called, when the sounds are _amplified_, that
is magnified, many hundreds of times.

The telephone receiver of a receiving set is equally as important as
the detector. A single receiver can be used but a pair of receivers
connected with a head-band gives far better results. Then again the
higher the resistance of the receivers the more sensitive they often
are and those wound to as high a resistance as 3,200 ohms are made for
use with the best sets. To make the incoming signals, conversation or
music, audible to a room full of people instead of to just yourself
you must use what is called a _loud speaker_. In its simplest form
this consists of a metal cone like a megaphone to which is fitted a
telephone receiver.

About Transmitting Stations--Getting Your License.--If you are going
to install a wireless sending apparatus, either telegraphic or
telephonic, you will have to secure a government license for which no
fee or charge of any kind is made. There are three classes of licenses
issued to amateurs who want to operate transmitting stations and these
are: (1) the _restricted amateur license_, (2) the _general amateur
license_, and (3) the _special amateur license_.

If you are going to set up a transmitter within five nautical miles of
any naval wireless station then you will have to get a _restricted
amateur license_ which limits the current you use to half a _kilowatt_
[Footnote: A _Kilowatt_ is 1,000 _watts_. There are 746 watts in a
horsepower.] and the wave length you send out to 200 _meters_. Should
you live outside of the five-mile range of a navy station then you can
get a general amateur license and this permits you to use a current of
1 kilowatt, but you are likewise limited to a wave length of 200
meters. But if you can show that you are doing some special kind of
wireless work and not using your sending station for the mere pleasure
you are getting out of it you may be able to get a _special amateur
license_ which gives you the right to send out wave lengths up to 375
meters.

When you are ready to apply for your license write to the _Radio
Inspector_ of whichever one of the following districts you live in:

  First District..............Boston, Mass.
  Second   "    ..............New York City
  Third    "    ..............Baltimore, Md.
  Fourth   "    ..............Norfolk, Va.
  Fifth    "    ..............New Orleans, La.
  Sixth    "    ............. San Francisco, Cal.
  Seventh  "    ............. Seattle, Wash.
  Eighth   "    ............. Detroit, Mich.
  Ninth    "    ..............Chicago, Ill.

Kinds of Transmitters.--There are two general types of transmitters
used for sending out wireless messages and these are: (1) _wireless
telegraph_ transmitters, and (2) _wireless telephone_ transmitters.
Telegraph transmitters may use either: (a) a _jump-spark_, (b) an
_electric arc_, or (c) a _vacuum tube_ apparatus for sending out dot
and dash messages, while telephone transmitters may use either, (a) an
_electric arc_, or (b) a _vacuum tube_ for sending out vocal and
musical sounds. Amateurs generally use a _jump-spark_ for sending
wireless telegraph messages and the _vacuum tube_ for sending wireless
telephone messages.

The Spark Gap Wireless Telegraph Transmitter.--The simplest kind of a
wireless telegraph transmitter consists of: (1) a _source of direct or
alternating current_, (2) a _telegraph key_, (3) a _spark-coil_ or a
_transformer_, (4) a _spark gap_, (5) an _adjustable condenser_ and
(6) an _oscillation transformer_. Where _dry cells_ or a _storage
battery_ must be used to supply the current for energizing the
transmitter a spark-coil can be employed and these may be had in
various sizes from a little fellow which gives 1/4-inch spark up to a
larger one which gives a 6-inch spark. Where more energy is needed it
is better practice to use a transformer and this can be worked on an
alternating current of 110 volts, or if only a 110 volt direct current
is available then an _electrolytic interrupter_ must be used to make
and break the current. A simple transmitting set with an induction
coil is shown in Fig. 2.

[Illustration: Fig 2.--Simple Transmitting Set.]

A wireless key is made like an ordinary telegraph key except that
where large currents are to be used it is somewhat heavier and is
provided with large silver contact points. Spark gaps for amateur work
are usually of: (1) the _plain_ or _stationary type_, (2) the
_rotating type_, and (3) the _quenched gap_ type. The plain spark-gap
is more suitable for small spark-coil sets, and it is not so apt to
break down the transformer and condenser of the larger sets as the
rotary gap. The rotary gap on the other hand tends to prevent _arcing_
and so the break is quicker and there is less dragging of the spark.
The quenched gap is more efficient than either the plain or rotary gap
and moreover it is noiseless.

Condensers for spark telegraph transmitters can be ordinary Leyden
jars or glass plates coated with tin or copper foil and set into a
frame, or they can be built up of mica and sheet metal embedded in an
insulating composition. The glass plate condensers are the cheapest
and will serve your purpose well, especially if they are immersed in
oil. Tuning coils, sometimes called _transmitting inductances_ and
_oscillation transformers_, are of various types. The simplest kind is
a transmitting inductance which consists of 25 or 30 turns of copper
wire wound on an insulating tube or frame. An oscillation transformer
is a loose coupled tuning coil and it consists of a primary coil
formed of a number of turns of copper wire wound on a fixed insulating
support, and a secondary coil of about twice the number of turns of
copper wire which is likewise fixed in an insulating support, but the
coils are relatively movable. An _oscillation transformer_ (instead of
a _tuning coil_), is required by government regulations unless
_inductively coupled_.

The Vacuum Tube Telegraph Transmitter.--This consists of: (1) a
_source of direct or alternating current_, (2) a _telegraph key_, (3) a
_vacuum tube oscillator_, (4) a _tuning coil_, and (5) a _condenser_.
This kind of a transmitter sets up _sustained_ oscillations instead of
_periodic_ oscillations which are produced by a spark gap set. The
advantages of this kind of a system will be found explained in Chapter
XVI.

The Wireless Telephone Transmitter.--Because a jump-spark sets up
_periodic oscillations_, that is, the oscillations are discontinuous,
it cannot be used for wireless telephony. An electric arc or a vacuum
tube sets up _sustained_ oscillations, that is, oscillations which are
continuous. As it is far easier to keep the oscillations going with a
vacuum tube than it is with an arc the former means has all but
supplanted the latter for wireless telephone transmitters. The
apparatus required and the connections used for wireless telephone
sets will be described in later chapters.

Useful Information.--It would be wise for the reader to turn to the
Appendix, beginning with page 301 of this book, and familiarize
himself with the information there set down in tabular and graphic
form. For example, the first table gives abbreviations of electrical
terms which are in general use in all works dealing with the subject.
You will also find there brief definitions of electric and magnetic
units, which it would be well to commit to memory; or, at least, to
make so thoroughly your own that when any of these terms is mentioned,
you will know instantly what is being talked about.




CHAPTER II

PUTTING UP YOUR AERIAL


As inferred in the first chapter, an aerial for receiving does not
have to be nearly as well made or put up as one for sending. But this
does not mean that you can slipshod the construction and installation
of it, for however simple it is, the job must be done right and in
this case it is as easy to do it right as wrong.

To send wireless telegraph and telephone messages to the greatest
distances and to receive them as distinctly as possible from the
greatest distances you must use for your aerial (1) copper or aluminum
wire, (2) two or more wires, (3) have them the proper length, (4) have
them as high in the air as you can, (5) have them well apart from each
other, and (6) have them well insulated from their supports. If you
live in a flat building or an apartment house you can string your
aerial wires from one edge of the roof to the other and support them
by wooden stays as high above it as may be convenient.

Should you live in a detached house in the city you can usually get
your next-door neighbor to let you fasten one end of the aerial to his
house and this will give you a good stretch and a fairly high aerial.
In the country you can stretch your wires between the house and barn
or the windmill. From this you will see that no matter where you live
you can nearly always find ways and means of putting up an aerial that
will serve your needs without going to the expense of erecting a mast.

Kinds of Aerial Wire Systems.--An amateur wireless aerial can be
anywhere from 25 feet to 100 feet long and if you can get a stretch of
the latter length and a height of from 30 to 75 feet you will have one
with which you can receive a thousand miles or more and send out as
much energy as the government will allow you to send.

The kind of an aerial that gives the best results is one whose wire,
or wires, are _horizontal_, that is, parallel with the earth under it
as shown at A in Fig. 3. If only one end can be fixed to some elevated
support then you can secure the other end to a post in the ground, but
the slope of the aerial should not be more than 30 or 35 degrees from
the horizontal at most as shown at B.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 3.--Flat top, or Horizontal Aerial.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 3.--Inclined Aerial.]

The _leading-in wire_, that is, the wire that leads from and joins the
aerial wire with your sending and receiving set, can be connected to
the aerial anywhere it is most convenient to do so, but the best
results are had when it is connected to one end as shown at A in Fig.
4, in which case it is called an _inverted L aerial_, or when it is
connected to it at the middle as shown at B, when it is called a _T
aerial_. The leading-in wire must be carefully insulated from the
outside of the building and also where it passes through it to the
inside. This is done by means of an insulating tube known as a
_leading-in insulator_, or _bulkhead insulator_ as it is sometimes
called.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 4.--Inverted L Aerial.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 4.--T Aerial.]

As a protection against lightning burning out your instruments you can
use either: (1) an _air-gap lightning arrester,_ (2) a _vacuum tube
protector_, or (3) a _lightning switch_, which is better. Whichever
of these devices is used it is connected in between the aerial and an
outside ground wire so that a direct circuit to the earth will be
provided at all times except when you are sending or receiving. So
your aerial instead of being a menace really acts during an electrical
storm like a lightning rod and it is therefore a real protection. The
air-gap and vacuum tube lightning arresters are little devices that
can be used only where you are going to receive, while the lightning
switch must be used where you are going to send; indeed, in some
localities the _Fire Underwriters_ require a large lightning switch to
be used for receiving sets as well as sending sets.

How to Put Up a Cheap Receiving Aerial.--The kind of an aerial wire
system you put up will depend, chiefly, on two things, and these are:
(1) your pocketbook, and (2) the place where you live.

A Single Wire Aerial.--This is the simplest and cheapest kind of a
receiving aerial that can be put up. The first thing to do is to find
out the length of wire you need by measuring the span between the two
points of support; then add a sufficient length for the leading-in
wire and enough more to connect your receiving set with the radiator
or water pipe.

You can use any size of copper or aluminum wire that is not smaller
than _No. 16 Brown and Sharpe gauge._ When you buy the wire get also
the following material: (1) two _porcelain insulators_ as shown at A
in Fig. 5; (2) three or four _porcelain knob insulators_, see B; (3)
either (a) an _air gap lightning arrester,_ see C, or (b) a _lightning
switch_ see D; (4) a _leading-in porcelain tube insulator,_ see E, and
(5) a _ground clamp_, see F.

[Illustration: Fig. 5.--Material for a Simple Aerial Wire System.]

To make the aerial slip each end of the wire through a hole in each
insulator and twist it fast; next cut off and slip two more pieces of
wire through the other holes in the insulators and twist them fast and
then secure these to the supports at the ends of the building. Take
the piece you are going to use for the leading-in wire, twist it
around the aerial wire and solder it there when it will look like A in
Fig. 6. Now if you intend to use the _air gap lightning arrester_
fasten it to the wall of the building outside of your window, and
bring the leading-in wire from the aerial to the top binding post of
your arrester and keep it clear of everything as shown at B. If your
aerial is on the roof and you have to bring the leading-in wire over
the cornice or around a corner fix a porcelain knob insulator to the
one or the other and fasten the wire to it.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 6.--Single Wire Aerial for Receiving.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 6.--Receiving Aerial with Air Gap Lightning
Arrester.]

[Illustration: (C) Fig. 6.--Aerial with Lightning Switch.]

Next bore a hole through the frame of the window at a point nearest
your receiving set and push a porcelain tube 5/8 inch in diameter and
5 or 6 inches long, through it. Connect a length of wire to the top
post of the arrester or just above it to the wire, run this through
the leading-in insulator and connect it to the slider of your tuning
coil. Screw the end of a piece of heavy copper wire to the lower post
of the arrester and run it to the ground, on porcelain knobs if
necessary, and solder it to an iron rod or pipe which you have driven
into the earth. Finally connect the fixed terminal of your tuning coil
with the water pipe or radiator inside of the house by means of the
ground clamp as shown in the diagrammatic sketch at B in Fig. 6 and
you are ready to tune in.

If you want to use a lightning switch instead of the air-gap arrester
then fasten it to the outside wall instead of the latter and screw the
free end of the leading-in wire from the aerial to the middle post of
it as shown at C in Fig. 6. Run a wire from the top post through the
leading-in insulator and connect it with the slider of your tuning
coil. Next screw one end of a length of heavy copper wire to the lower
post of the aerial switch and run it to an iron pipe in the ground as
described above in connection with the spark-gap lightning arrester;
then connect the fixed terminal of your tuning coil with the radiator
or water pipe and your aerial wire system will be complete as shown at
C in Fig. 6.

A Two-wire Aerial.--An aerial with two wires will give better results
than a single wire and three wires are better than two, but you must
keep them well apart. To put up a two-wire aerial get (1) enough _No.
16_, or preferably _No. 14_, solid or stranded copper or aluminum
wire, (2) four porcelain insulators, see B in Fig. 5, and (3) two
sticks about 1 inch thick, 3 inches wide and 3 or 4 feet long, for the
_spreaders_, and bore 1/8-inch hole through each end of each one. Now
twist the ends of the wires to the insulators and then cut off four
pieces of wire about 6 feet long and run them through the holes in the
wood spreaders. Finally twist the ends of each pair of short wires to
the free ends of the insulators and then twist the free ends of the
wires together.

For the leading-in wire that goes to the lightning switch take two
lengths of wire and twist one end of each one around the aerial wires
and solder them there. Twist the short wire around the long wire and
solder this joint also when the aerial will look like Fig. 7. Bring
the free end of the leading-in wire down to the middle post of the
lightning switch and fasten it there and connect up the receiver to it
and the ground as described under the caption of _A Single Wire
Aerial_.

[Illustration: Fig. 7.--Two Wire Aerial.]

Connecting in the Ground.--If there is a gas or water system or a
steam-heating plant in your house you can make your ground connection
by clamping a ground clamp to the nearest pipe as has been previously
described. Connect a length of bare or insulated copper wire with it
and bring this up to the table on which you have your receiving set.
If there are no grounded pipes available then you will have to make a
good ground which we shall describe presently and lead the ground wire
from your receiving set out of the window and down to it.

How to Put Up a Good Aerial.--While you can use the cheap aerial
already described for a small spark-coil sending set you should have a
better insulated one for a 1/2 or a 1 kilowatt transformer set. The
cost for the materials for a good aerial is small and when properly
made and well insulated it will give results that are all out of
proportion to the cost of it.

An Inexpensive Good Aerial.--A far better aerial, because it is more
highly insulated, can be made by using _midget insulators_ instead of
the porcelain insulators described under the caption of _A Single Wire
Aerial_ and using a small _electrose leading-in insulator_ instead of
the porcelain bushing. This makes a good sending aerial for small sets
as well as a good receiving aerial.

The Best Aerial that Can Be Made.--To make this aerial get the
following material together: (1) enough _stranded or braided wire_ for
three or four lengths of parallel wires, according to the number you
want to use (2) six or eight _electrose ball insulators_, see B, Fig.
8; (3) two 5-inch or 10-inch _electrose strain insulators_, see C; (4)
six or eight _S-hooks_, see D; one large _withe_ with one eye for
middle of end spreader, see E; (6) two smaller _withes_ with one eye
each for end spreader, see E; (7) two still smaller _withes_, with two
eyes each for the ends of the end spreaders, see E (8) two _thimbles_,
see F, for 1/4-inch wire cable; (9) six or eight _hard rubber tubes_
or _bushings_ as shown at G; and (10) two _end spreaders_, see H; one
_middle spreader_, see I; and one _leading-in spreader_, see J.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 8--Part of a Good Aerial.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 8.--The Spreaders.]

For this aerial any one of a number of kinds of wire can be used and
among these are (a) _stranded copper wire;_ (b) _braided copper wire;_
(c) _stranded silicon bronze wire,_ and (d) _stranded phosphor bronze
wire_. Stranded and braided copper wire is very flexible as it is
formed of seven strands of fine wire twisted or braided together and
it is very good for short and light aerials. Silicon bronze wire is
stronger than copper wire and should be used where aerials are more
than 100 feet long, while phosphor bronze wire is the strongest aerial
wire made and is used for high grade aerials by the commercial
companies and the Government for their high-power stations.

The spreaders should be made of spruce, and should be 4 feet 10 inches
long for a three-wire aerial and 7 feet 1 inch long for a four-wire
aerial as the distance between the wires should be about 27 inches.
The end spreaders can be turned cylindrically but it makes a better
looking job if they taper from the middle to the ends. They should be
2-1/4 inches in diameter at the middle and 1-3/4 inches at the ends.
The middle spreader can be cylindrical and 2 inches in diameter. It
must have holes bored through it at equidistant points for the hard
rubber tubes; each of these should be 5/8 inch in diameter and have a
hole 5/32 inch in diameter through it for the aerial wire. The
leading-in spreader is also made of spruce and is 1-1/2 inches square
and 26 inches long. Bore three or four 5/8-inch holes at equidistant
points through this spreader and insert hard rubber tubes in them as
with the middle spreader.

Assembling the Aerial.--Begin by measuring off the length of each wire
to be used and see to it that all of them are of exactly the same
length. Now push the hard rubber insulators through the holes in the
middle spreader and thread the wires through the holes in the
insulators as shown at A in Fig 9.

Next twist the ends of each wire to the rings of the ball insulators
and then put the large withes on the middle of each of the end
spreaders; fix the other withes on the spreaders so that they will be
27 inches apart and fasten the ball insulators to the eyes in the
withes with the S-hooks. Now slip a thimble through the eye of one of
the long strain insulators, thread a length of stranded steel wire 1/4
inch in diameter through it and fasten the ends of it to the eyes in
the withes on the ends of the spreaders.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 9.--Middle Spreader.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 9.--One End of Aerial Complete.]

[Illustration: (C) Fig. 9.--Leading in Spreader.]

Finally fasten a 40-inch length of steel stranded wire to each of the
eyes of the withes on the middle of each of the spreaders, loop the
other end over the thimble and then wrap the end around the wires that
are fixed to the ends of the spreaders. One end of the aerial is shown
complete at B in Fig. 9, and from this you can see exactly how it is
assembled. Now cut off three or four pieces of wire 15 or 20 feet long
and twist and solder each one to one of the aerial wires; then slip
them through the hard rubber tubes in the leading-in spreader, bring
their free ends together as at C and twist and solder them to a length
of wire long enough to reach to your lightning switch or instruments.

Making a Good Ground.--Where you have to make a _ground_ you can do so
either by (1) burying sheets of zinc or copper in the moist earth; (2)
burying a number of wires in the moist earth, or (3) using a
_counterpoise_. To make a ground of the first kind take half a dozen
large sheets of copper or zinc, cut them into strips a foot wide,
solder them all together with other strips and bury them deeply in the
ground.

It is easier to make a wire ground, say of as many or more wires as
you have in your aerial and connect them together with cross wires. To
put such a ground in the earth you will have to use a plow to make the
furrows deep enough to insure them always being moist. In the
counterpoise ground you make up a system of wires exactly like your
aerial, that is, you insulate them just as carefully; then you support
them so that they will be as close to the ground as possible and yet
not touch it or anything else. This and the other two grounds just
described should be placed directly under the aerial wire if the best
results are to be had. In using a counterpoise you must bring the wire
from it up to and through another leading-in insulator to your
instruments.




CHAPTER III

SIMPLE TELEGRAPH AND TELEPHONE RECEIVING SETS


With a crystal detector receiving set you can receive either
telegraphic dots and dashes or telephonic speech and music. You can
buy a receiving set already assembled or you can buy the different
parts and assemble them yourself. An assembled set is less bother in
the beginning but if you like to experiment you can _hook up_, that
is, connect the separate parts together yourself and it is perhaps a
little cheaper to do it this way. Then again, by so doing you get a
lot of valuable experience in wireless work and an understanding of
the workings of wireless that you cannot get in any other way.

Assembled Wireless Receiving Sets.--The cheapest assembled receiving
set [Footnote: The Marvel, made by the Radio Mfg. Co., New York City.]
advertised is one in which the detector and tuning coil is mounted in
a box. It costs $15.00, and can be bought of dealers in electric
supplies generally.

This price also includes a crystal detector, an adjustable tuning
coil, a single telephone receiver with head-band and the wire,
porcelain insulators, lightning switch and ground clamp for the aerial
wire system. It will receive wireless telegraph and telephone messages
over a range of from 10 to 25 miles.

Another cheap unit receptor, that is, a complete wireless receiving
set already mounted which can be used with a single aerial is sold for
$25.00. [Footnote: The Aeriola Jr., made by the Westinghouse Company,
Pittsburgh, Pa.] This set includes a crystal detector, a variable
tuning coil, a fixed condenser and a pair of head telephone receivers.
It can also be used to receive either telegraph or telephone messages
from distances up to 25 miles. The aerial equipment is not included in
this price, but it can be bought for about $2.50 extra.

Assembling Your Own Receiving Set.--In this chapter we shall go only
into the apparatus used for two simple receiving sets, both of which
have a _crystal detector_. The first set includes a _double-slide
tuning coil_ and the second set employs a _loose-coupled tuning coil_,
or _loose coupler_, as it is called for short. For either set you can
use a pair of 2,000- or 3,000-ohm head phones.

[Illustration: original © Underwood and Underwood. General Pershing
Listening In.]

The Crystal Detector.--A crystal detector consists of: (1) _the
frame_, (2) _the crystal_, and (3) _the wire point_. There are any
number of different designs for frames, the idea being to provide a
device that will (a) hold the sensitive crystal firmly in place, and
yet permit of its removal, (b) to permit the _wire point_, or
_electrode_, to be moved in any direction so that the free point of it
can make contact with the most sensitive spot on the crystal and (c)
to vary the pressure of the wire on the crystal.

A simple detector frame is shown in the cross-section at A in Fig. 10;
the crystal, which may be _galena_, _silicon_ or _iron pyrites_, is
held securely in a holder while the _phosphor-bronze wire point_ which
makes contact with it, is fixed to one end of a threaded rod on the
other end of which is a knob. This rod screws into and through a
sleeve fixed to a ball that sets between two brass standards and this
permits an up and down or a side to side adjustment of the metal point
while the pressure of it on the crystal is regulated by the screw.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 10.--Cross Section of Crystal Detector.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 10.--The Crystal Detector Complete.]

A crystal of this kind is often enclosed in a glass cylinder and this
makes it retain its sensitiveness for a much longer time than if it
were exposed to dust and moisture. An upright type of this detector
can be bought for $2.25, while a horizontal type, as shown at B, can
be bought for $2.75. Galena is the crystal that is generally used,
for, while it is not quite as sensitive as silicon and iron pyrites,
it is easier to obtain a sensitive piece.

The Tuning Coil.--It is with the tuning coil that you _tune in_ and
_tune out_ different stations and this you do by sliding the contacts
to and fro over the turns of wire; in this way you vary the
_inductance_ and _capacitance_, that is, the _constants_ of the
receiving circuits and so make them receive _electric waves_, that is,
wireless waves, of different lengths.

The Double Slide Tuning Coil.--With this tuning coil you can receive
waves from any station up to 1,000 meters in length. One of the ends
of the coil of wire connects with the binding post marked _a_ in Fig.
11, and the other end connects with the other binding post marked _b_,
while one of the sliding contacts is connected to the binding post
_c_, and the _other sliding contact_ is connected with the binding
post _d_.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 11.--Schematic Diagram of Double Slide Tuning
Coil.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 11.--Double Slide Tuning Coil Complete.]

When connecting in the tuning coil, only the post _a_ or the post _b_
is used as may be most convenient, but the other end of the wire which
is connected to a post is left free; just bear this point in mind when
you come to connect the tuning coil up with the other parts of your
receiving set. The tuning coil is shown complete at B and it costs
$3.00 or $4.00. A _triple slide_ tuning coil constructed like the
double slide tuner just described, only with more turns of wire on it,
makes it possible to receive wave lengths up to 1,500 meters. It costs
about $6.00.

The Loose Coupled Tuning Coil.--With a _loose coupler_, as this kind
of a tuning coil is called for short, very _selective tuning_ is
possible, which means that you can tune in a station very sharply, and
it will receive any wave lengths according to size of coils. The
primary coil is wound on a fixed cylinder and its inductance is varied
by means of a sliding contact like the double slide tuning coil
described above. The secondary coil is wound on a cylinder that slides
in and out of the primary coil. The inductance of this coil is varied
by means of a switch that makes contact with the fixed points, each of
which is connected with every twentieth turn of wire as shown in the
diagram A in Fig. 12. The loose coupler, which is shown complete at B,
costs in the neighborhood of $8.00 or $10.00.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 12.--Schematic Diagram of Loose Coupler.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 12.--Loose Coupler Complete.]

Fixed and Variable Condensers.--You do not require a condenser for a
simple receiving set, but if you will connect a _fixed condenser_
across your headphones you will get better results, while a _variable
condenser_ connected in the _closed circuit of a direct coupled
receiving set_, that is, one where a double slide tuning coil is used,
makes it easy to tune very much more sharply; a variable condenser is
absolutely necessary where the circuits are _inductively coupled_,
that is, where a loose coupled tuner is used.

A fixed condenser consists of a number of sheets of paper with leaves
of tin-foil in between them and so built up that one end of every
other leaf of tin-foil projects from the opposite end of the paper as
shown at A in Fig. 13. The paper and tin-foil are then pressed
together and impregnated with an insulating compound. A fixed
condenser of the exact capacitance required for connecting across the
head phones is mounted in a base fitted with binding posts, as shown
at B, and costs 75 cents. (Paper ones 25 cents.)

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 13.--How a Fixed Receiving Condenser is Built
up.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 13.--The Fixed Condenser Complete.]

[Illustration: (C) and (D) Fig. 13.--The Variable Rotary Condenser.]

A variable condenser, see C, of the rotating type is formed of a set
of fixed semi-circular metal plates which are slightly separated from
each other and between these a similar set of movable semi-circular
metal plates is made to interleave; the latter are secured to a shaft
on the top end of which is a knob and by turning it the capacitance of
the condenser, and, hence, of the circuit in which it is connected, is
varied. This condenser, which is shown at D, is made in two sizes, the
smaller one being large enough for all ordinary wave lengths while the
larger one is for proportionately longer wave lengths. These
condensers cost $4.00 and $5.00 respectively.

About Telephone Receivers.--There are a number of makes of head
telephone receivers on the market that are designed especially for
wireless work. These phones are wound to _resistances_ of from 75
_ohms_ to 8,000 _ohms_, and cost from $1.25 for a receiver
without a cord or headband to $15.00 for a pair of phones with a cord
and head band. You can get a receiver wound to any resistance in
between the above values but for either of the simple receiving sets
such as described in this chapter you ought to have a pair wound to at
least 2,000 ohms and these will cost you about $5.00. A pair of head
phones of this type is shown in Fig. 14.

[Illustration: Fig. 14.--Pair of Wireless Head Phones.]

Connecting Up the Parts--Receiving Set No. 1.--For this set get (1) a
_crystal detector_, (2) a _two-slide tuning coil_, (3) a _fixed
condenser_, and (4) a pair of 2,000 ohm head phones. Mount the
detector on the right-hand side of a board and the tuning coil on the
left-hand side. Screw in two binding posts for the cord ends of the
telephone receivers at _a_ and _b_ as shown at A in Fig. 15. This done
connect one of the end binding posts of the tuning coil with the
ground wire and a post of one of the contact slides with the lightning
arrester or switch which leads to the aerial wire.

[Illustration: Fig. 15.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Receiving
Set No. 1.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 15.--Wiring Diagram for Receiving Set No. 1.]

Now connect the post of the other contact slide to one of the posts of
the detector and the other post of the latter with the binding post
_a_, then connect the binding post _b_ to the ground wire and solder
the joint. Next connect the ends of the telephone receiver cord to the
posts _a_ and _b_ and connect a fixed condenser also with these posts,
all of which are shown in the wiring diagram at B, and you are ready
to adjust the set for receiving.

Receiving Set No. 2.--Use the same kind of a detector and pair of head
phones as for _Set No. 1_, but get (1) a _loose coupled tuning coil_,
and (2) a _variable condenser_. Mount the loose coupler at the back of
a board on the left-hand side and the variable condenser on the
right-hand side. Then mount the detector in front of the variable
condenser and screw two binding posts, _a_ and _b_, in front of the
tuning coil as shown at A in Fig. 16.

[Illustration: Fig. 16.--Top view of Apparatus Layout for Receiving
Set No. 2.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 16.--Wiring Diagram for Receiving Set No. 2.]

Now connect the post of the sliding contact of the loose coupler with
the wire that runs to the lightning switch and thence to the aerial;
connect the post of the primary coil, which is the outside coil, with
the ground wire; then connect the binding post leading to the switch
of the secondary coil, which is the inside coil, with one of the posts
of the variable condenser, and finally, connect the post that is
joined to one end of the secondary coil with the other post of the
variable condenser.

This done, connect one of the posts of the condenser with one of the
posts of the detector, the other post of the detector with the binding
post _a_, and the post _b_ to the other post of the variable
condenser. Next connect a fixed condenser to the binding posts _a_ and
_b_ and then connect the telephone receivers to these same posts, all
of which is shown in the wiring diagram at B. You are now ready to
adjust the instruments. In making the connections use No. 16 or 18
insulated copper wire and scrape the ends clean where they go into the
binding posts. See, also, that all of the connections are tight and
where you have to cross the wires keep them apart by an inch or so and
always cross them at right angles.

Adjusting the No. 1 Set--The Detector.--The first thing to do is to
test the detector in order to find out if the point of the contact
wire is on a sensitive spot of the crystal. To do this you need a
_buzzer_, a _switch_ and a _dry cell_. An electric bell from which the
gong has been removed will do for the buzzer, but you can get one that
is made specially for the purpose, for 75 cents, which gives out a
clear, high-pitched note that sounds like a high-power station.

Connect one of the binding posts of the buzzer with one post of the
switch, the other post of the latter with the zinc post of the dry
cell and the carbon post of this to the other post of the buzzer. Then
connect the post of the buzzer that is joined to the vibrator, to the
ground wire as shown in the wiring diagram, Fig. 17. Now close the
switch of the buzzer circuit, put on your head phones, and move the
wire point of the detector to various spots on the crystal until you
hear the sparks made by the buzzer in your phones.

[Illustration: Fig. 17.--Adjusting the Receiving Set.]

Then vary the pressure of the point on the crystal until you hear the
sparks as loud as possible. After you have made the adjustment open
the switch and disconnect the buzzer wire from the ground wire of your
set. This done, be very careful not to jar the detector or you will
throw it out of adjustment and then you will have to do it all over
again. You are now ready to tune the set with the tuning coil and
listen in.

The Tuning Coil.--To tune this set move the slide A of the
double-slide tuner, see B in Fig. 15, over to the end of the coil that
is connected with the ground wire and the slide B near the opposite
end of the coil, that is, the one that has the free end. Now move the
slide A toward the B slide and when you hear the dots and dashes, or
speech or music, that is coming in as loud as you can move the B slide
toward the A slide until you hear still more loudly. A very few trials
on your part and you will be able to tune in or tune out any station
you can hear, if not too close or powerful.

[Illustration: original © Underwood and Underwood. The World's
Largest Radio Receiving Station. Owned by the Radio Corporation of
America at Rocky Point near Point Jefferson, L.I.]

Adjusting the No. 2 Set.--First adjust the crystal detector with the
buzzer set as described above with _Set No. 1,_ then turn the knob of
your variable condenser so that the movable plates are just half-way
in, pull the secondary coil of your loose-coupled tuner half way out;
turn the switch lever on it until it makes a contact with the middle
contact point and set the slider of the primary coil half way between
the ends.

Now listen in for telegraphic signals or telephonic speech or music;
when you hear one or the other slide the secondary coil in and out of
the primary coil until the sounds are loudest; now move the contact
switch over the points forth and back until the sounds are still
louder, then move the slider to and fro until the sounds are yet
louder and, finally, turn the knob of the condenser until the sounds
are clear and crisp. When you have done all of these things you have,
in the parlance of the wireless operator, _tuned in_ and you are ready
to receive whatever is being sent.




CHAPTER IV

SIMPLE TELEGRAPH SENDING SETS


A wireless telegraph transmitting set can be installed for a very
small amount of money provided you are content with one that has a
limited range. Larger and better instruments can, of course, be had
for more money, but however much you are willing to spend still you
are limited in your sending radius by the Government's rules and
regulations. The best way, and the cheapest in the end, to install a
telegraph set is to buy the separate parts and hook them up yourself.

The usual type of wireless telegraph transmitter employs a _disruptive
discharge,_ or _spark,_ as it is called, for setting up the
oscillating currents in the aerial wire system and this is the type of
apparatus described in this chapter. There are two ways to set up the
sparks and these are: (1) with an _induction coil,_ or _spark-coil,_
as it is commonly called, and (2) with an _alternating current
transformer_, or _power transformer_, as it is sometimes called. Where
you have to generate the current with a battery you must use a spark
coil, but if you have a 110-volt direct or alternating lighting
current in your home you can use a transformer which will give you
more power.

A Cheap Transmitting Set (No. 1).--For this set you will need: (1) a
_spark-coil_, (2) a _battery_ of dry cells, (3) a _telegraph key_, (4)
a _spark gap_, (5) a _high-tension condenser_, and (6) an _oscillation
transformer_. There are many different makes and styles of these parts
but in the last analysis all of them are built on the same underlying
bases and work on the same fundamental principles.

The Spark-Coil.--Spark coils for wireless work are made to give sparks
from 1/4 inch in length up to 6 inches in length, but as a spark coil
that gives less than a 1-inch spark has a very limited output it is
best to get a coil that gives at least a 1-inch spark, as this only
costs about $8.00, and if you can get a 2- or a 4-inch spark coil so
much the better. There are two general styles of spark coils used for
wireless and these are shown at A and B in Fig. 18.

[Illustration: (A) and (B) Fig. 18.--Types of Spark Coils for Set. No.
1.]

[Illustration: (C) Fig. 18.--Wiring Diagram of Spark Coil]

A spark coil of either style consists of (_a_) a soft _iron core_ on
which is wound (_b_) a couple of layers of heavy insulated wire and
this is called the _primary coil_, (_c_) while over this, but
insulated from it, is wound a large number of turns of very fine
insulated copper wire called the _secondary coil_; (d) an
_interrupter_, or _vibrator_, as it is commonly called, and, finally,
(e) a _condenser_. The core, primary and secondary coils form a unit
and these are set in a box or mounted on top of a hollow wooden base.
The condenser is placed in the bottom of the box, or on the base,
while the vibrator is mounted on one end of the box or on top of the
base, and it is the only part of the coil that needs adjusting.

The vibrator consists of a stiff, flat spring fixed at one end to the
box or base while it carries a piece of soft iron called an _armature_
on its free end and this sets close to one end of the soft iron core.
Insulated from this spring is a standard that carries an adjusting
screw on the small end of which is a platinum point and this makes
contact with a small platinum disk fixed to the spring. The condenser
is formed of alternate sheets of paper and tinfoil built up in the
same fashion as the receiving condenser described under the caption of
_Fixed and Variable Condensers_, in Chapter III.

The wiring diagram C shows how the spark coil is wired up. One of the
battery binding posts is connected with one end of the primary coil
while the other end of the latter which is wound on the soft iron core
connects with the spring of the vibrator. The other battery binding
post connects with the standard that supports the adjusting screw. The
condenser is shunted across the vibrator, that is, one end of the
condenser is connected with the spring and the other end of the
condenser is connected with the adjusting screw standard. The ends of
the secondary coil lead to two binding posts, which are usually placed
on top of the spark coil and it is to these that the spark gap is
connected.

The Battery.--This can be formed of dry cells or you can use a storage
battery to energize your coil. For all coils that give less than a
1-inch spark you should use 5 dry cells; for 1-and 2-inch spark coils
use 6 or 8 dry cells, and for 3 to 4-inch spark coils use 8 to 10 dry
cells. The way the dry cells are connected together to form a battery
will be shown presently. A dry cell is shown at A in Fig, 19.

[Illustration: Fig. 19.--Other parts for Transmitting Set No. 1]

The Telegraph Key.--You can use an ordinary Morse telegraph key for
the sending set and you can get one with a japanned iron base for
$1.50 (or better, one made of brass and which has 1/8-inch silver
contact points for $3.00. A key of the latter kind is shown at B).

The Spark gap.--It is in the _spark gap_ that the high tension spark
takes place. The apparatus in which the spark takes place is also
called the _spark gap_. It consists of a pair of zinc plugs, called
_electrodes_, fixed to the ends of a pair of threaded rods, with knobs
on the other ends, and these screw into and through a pair of
standards as shown at _c_. This is called a _fixed_, or _stationary
spark gap_ and costs about $1.00.

The Tuning Coil.--The _transmitting inductance_, or _sending tuning
coil_, consists of 20 to 30 turns of _No. 8 or 9_ hard drawn copper
wire wound on a slotted insulated form and mounted on a wooden base.
It is provided with _clips_ so that you can cut in and cut out as many
turns of wire as you wish and so tune the sending circuits to send out
whatever wave length you desire. It is shown at _d_, and costs about
$5.00. See also _Oscillation Transformer_, page 63 [Chapter IV].

The High Tension Condenser.--High tension condensers, that is,
condensers which will stand up under _high potentials_, or electric
pressures, can be bought in units or sections. These condensers are
made up of thin brass plates insulated with a special compound and
pressed into a compact form. The _capacitance_ [Footnote: This is the
capacity of the condenser.] of one section is enough for a
transmitting set using a spark coil that gives a 2 inch spark or less
and two sections connected together should be used for coils giving
from 2 to 4 inch sparks. It is shown at _e_.

Connecting Up the Apparatus.--Your sending set should be mounted on a
table, or a bench, where it need not be moved. Place the key in about
the middle of the table and down in front, and the spark coil to the
left and well to the back but so that the vibrator end will be to the
right, as this will enable you to adjust it easily. Place the battery
back of the spark coil and the tuning coil (oscillation transformer)
to the right of the spark coil and back of the key, all of which is
shown in the layout at A in Fig. 20.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 20.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Sending
Set No. 1.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 20.--Wiring of Diagram for Sending Set No. 1.]

For the _low voltage circuit_, that is the battery circuit, use _No.
12_ or _14_ insulated copper wire. Connect all of the dry cells
together in _series_, that is, connect the zinc of one cell with the
carbon of the next and so on until all of them are connected up. Then
connect the carbon of the end cell with one of the posts of the key,
the zinc of the other end cell with one of the primary posts of the
spark coil and the other primary post of the spark coil with the other
post of the key, when the primary circuit will be complete.

For the _high tension circuits_, that is, the _oscillation circuits_,
you may use either bare or insulated copper wire but you must be
careful that they do not touch the table, each other, or any part of
the apparatus, except, of course, the posts they are connected with.
Connect one of the posts of the secondary coil of the spark coil with
one of the posts of the spark gap, and the other post with one of the
posts of the condenser; then connect the other post of the condenser
with the lower spring clip of the tuning coil and also connect this
clip with the ground. This done, connect the middle spring clip with
one of the posts of the spark gap, and, finally, connect the top clip
with the aerial wire and your transmitting set is ready to be tuned. A
wiring diagram of the connections is shown at B. As this set is tuned
in the same way as _Set No. 2_ which follows, you are referred to the
end of this chapter.

A Better Transmitting Set (No. 2).--The apparatus for this set
includes: (1) an _alternating current transformer_, (2) a _wireless
telegraph key_, (3) a _fixed_, a _rotary_, or a _quenched spark gap_,
(4) a _condenser_, and (5) an _oscillation transformer_. If you have a
110 volt direct lighting current in your home instead of 110 volt
alternating current, then you will also need (6) an _electrolytic
interrupter_, for in this case the primary circuit of the transformer
must be made and broken rapidly in order to set up alternating
currents in the secondary coil.

The Alternating Current Transformer.--An alternating current, or
power, transformer is made on the same principle as a spark coil, that
is, it has a soft iron core, a primary coil formed of a couple of
layers of heavy wire, and a secondary coil wound up of a large number
of turns of very fine wire. Unlike the spark coil, however, which has
an _open magnetic core_ and whose secondary coil is wound on the
primary coil, the transformer has a _closed magnetic core_, with the
primary coil wound on one of the legs of the core and the secondary
wound on the other leg. It has neither a vibrator nor a condenser. A
plain transformer is shown at A in Fig. 21.

[Illustration: Fig. 21.--Parts for Transmitting Set No. 2.]

A transformer of this kind can be bought either (a) _unmounted_, that
is, just the bare transformer, or (b) _fully mounted_, that is, fitted
with an iron stand, mounted on an insulating base on which are a pair
of primary binding posts, while the secondary is provided with a
_safety spark gap_. There are three sizes of transformers of this kind
made and they are rated at 1/4, 1/2 and 1 kilowatt, respectively, they
deliver a secondary current of 9,000, 11,000 and 25,000 volts,
according to size, and cost $16.00, $22.00 and $33.00 when fully
mounted; a reduction of $3.00, $4.00 and $5.00 is made when they are
unmounted. All of these transformers operate on 110 volt, 60 cycle
current and can be connected directly to the source of alternating
current.

The Wireless Key.--For this transmitting set a standard wireless key
should be used as shown at B. It is made about the same as a regular
telegraph key but it is much heavier, the contact points are larger
and instead of the current being led through the bearings as in an
ordinary key, it is carried by heavy conductors directly to the
contact points. This key is made in three sizes and the first will
carry a current of 5 _amperes_[Footnote: See _Appendix_ for
definition.] and costs $4.00, the second will carry a current of 10
amperes and costs $6.50, while the third will carry a current of 20
amperes and costs $7.50.

The Spark Gap.--Either a fixed, a rotary, or a quenched spark gap can
be used with this set, but the former is seldom used except with
spark-coil sets, as it is very hard to keep the sparks from arcing
when large currents are used. A rotary spark gap comprises a wheel,
driven by a small electric motor, with projecting plugs, or
electrodes, on it and a pair of stationary plugs on each side of the
wheel as shown at C. The number of sparks per second can be varied by
changing the speed of the wheel and when it is rotated rapidly it
sends out signals of a high pitch which are easy to read at the
receiving end. A rotary gap with a 110-volt motor costs about $25.00.

A quenched spark gap not only eliminates the noise of the ordinary gap
but, when properly designed, it increases the range of an induction
coil set some 200 per cent. A 1/4 kilowatt quenched gap costs $10.00.
[Footnote: See Appendix for definition.]

The High Tension Condenser.--Since, if you are an amateur, you can
only send out waves that are 200 meters in length, you can only use a
condenser that has a capacitance of .007 _microfarad_. [Footnote: See
Appendix for definition.] A sectional high tension condenser like the
one described in connection with _Set No. 1_ can be used with this
set but it must have a capacitance of not more than .007 microfarad. A
condenser of this value for a 1/4-kilowatt transformer costs $7.00;
for a 1/2-kilowatt transformer $14.00, and for a 1-kilowatt
transformer $21.00. See E, Fig. 19.

The Oscillation Transformer.--With an oscillation transformer you can
tune much more sharply than with a single inductance coil tuner. The
primary coil is formed of 6 turns of copper strip, or No. 9 copper
wire, and the secondary is formed of 9 turns of strip, or wire. The
primary coil, which is the outside coil, is hinged to the base and can
be raised or lowered like the lid of a box. When it is lowered the
primary and secondary coils are in the same plane and when it is
raised the coils set at an angle to each other. It is shown at D and
costs $5.00.

Connecting Up the Apparatus. For Alternating Current.--Screw the key
to the table about the middle of it and near the front edge; place the
high tension condenser back of it and the oscillation transformer back
of the latter; set the alternating current transformer to the left of
the oscillation transformer and place the rotary or quenched spark gap
in front of it.

Now bring a pair of _No. 12_ or _14_ insulated wires from the 110 volt
lighting leads and connect them with a single-throw, double-pole
switch; connect one pole of the switch with one of the posts of the
primary coil of the alternating power transformer and connect the
other post of the latter with one of the posts of your key, and the
other post of this with the other pole of the switch. Now connect the
motor of the rotary spark gap to the power circuit and put a
single-pole, single-throw switch in the motor circuit, all of which is
shown at A in Fig. 22.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 22.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for Sending
Set No. 2.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 22.--Wiring Diagram for Sending Set No. 2.]

Next connect the posts of the secondary coil to the posts of the
rotary or quenched spark gap and connect one post of the latter to one
post of the condenser, the other post of this to the post of the
primary coil of the oscillation transformer, which is the inside coil,
and the clip of the primary coil to the other spark gap post. This
completes the closed oscillation circuit. Finally connect the post of
the secondary coil of the oscillation transformer to the ground and
the clip of it to the wire leading to the aerial when you are ready to
tune the set. A wiring diagram of the connections is shown at B.

For Direct Current.--Where you have 110 volt direct current you must
connect in an electrolytic interrupter. This interrupter, which is
shown at A and B in Fig. 23, consists of (1) a jar filled with a
solution of 1 part of sulphuric acid and 9 parts of water, (2) a lead
electrode having a large surface fastened to the cover of surface that
sets in a porcelain sleeve and whose end rests on the bottom of the
jar.

[Illustration: Fig. 23.--Using 110 Volt Direct Current with an
Alternating Current Transformer.]

When these electrodes are connected in series with the primary of a
large spark coil or an alternating current transformer, see C, and a
direct current of from 40 to 110 volts is made to pass through it, the
current is made and broken from 1,000 to 10,000 times a minute. By
raising or lowering the sleeve, thus exposing more or less of the
platinum, or alloy point, the number of interruptions per minute can
be varied at will. As the electrolytic interrupter will only operate
in one direction, you must connect it with its platinum, or alloy
anode, to the + or _positive_ power lead and the lead cathode to the -
or _negative_ power lead. You can find out which is which by
connecting in the interrupter and trying it, or you can use a polarity
indicator. An electrolytic interrupter can be bought for as little as
$3.00.

How to Adjust Your Transmitter. Tuning With a Hot Wire Ammeter.--A
transmitter can be tuned in two different ways and these are: (1) by
adjusting the length of the spark gap and the tuning coil so that the
greatest amount of energy is set up in the oscillating circuits, and
(2) by adjusting the apparatus so that it will send out waves of a
given length.

To adjust the transmitter so that the circuits will be in tune you
should have a _hot wire ammeter_, or radiation ammeter, as it is
called, which is shown in Fig. 24. It consists of a thin platinum wire
through which the high-frequency currents surge and these heat it; the
expansion and contraction of the wire moves a needle over a scale
marked off into fractions of an ampere. When the spark gap and tuning
coil of your set are properly adjusted, the needle will swing farthest
to the right over the scale and you will then know that the aerial
wire system, or open oscillation circuit, and the closed oscillation
circuit are in tune and radiating the greatest amount of energy.

[Illustration: Fig. 24.--Principle of the Hot Wire Ammeter.]

To Send Out a 200 Meter Wave Length.--If you are using a condenser
having a capacitance of .007 microfarad, which is the largest capacity
value that the Government will allow an amateur to use, then if you
have a hot wire ammeter in your aerial and tune the inductance coil or
coils until the ammeter shows the largest amount of energy flowing
through it you will know that your transmitter is tuned and that the
aerial is sending out waves whose length is 200 meters. To tune to
different wave lengths you must have a _wave-meter_.

The Use of the Aerial Switch.--Where you intend to install both a
transmitter and a receptor you will need a throwover switch, or
_aerial switch_, as it is called. An ordinary double-pole,
double-throw switch, as shown at A in Fig. 25, can be used, or a
switch made especially for the purpose as at B is handier because the
arc of the throw is much less.

[Illustration: Fig. 25.--Kinds of Aerial Switches.]

Aerial Switch for a Complete Sending and Receiving Set.--You can buy a
double-pole, double-throw switch mounted on a porcelain base for about
75 cents and this will serve for _Set No. 1_. Screw this switch on
your table between the sending and receiving sets and then connect one
of the middle posts of it with the ground wire and the other middle
post with the lightning switch which connects with the aerial. Connect
the post of the tuning coil with one of the end posts of the switch
and the clip of the tuning coil with the other and complementary post
of the switch. This done, connect one of the opposite end posts of the
switch to the post of the receiving tuning coil and connect the
sliding contact of the latter with the other and complementary post of
the switch as shown in Fig. 26.

[Illustration: Fig. 26.--Wiring Diagram for Complete Sending and
Receiving Set No. 1.]

Connecting in the Lightning Switch.--The aerial wire connects with the
middle post of the lightning switch, while one of the end posts lead
to one of the middle posts of the aerial switch. The other end post of
the lightning switch leads to a separate ground outside the building,
as the wiring diagrams Figs. 26 and 27 show.

[Illustration: Fig. 27.--Wiring Diagram for Complete Sending and
Receiving Set No. 2.]




CHAPTER V

ELECTRICITY SIMPLY EXPLAINED


It is easy to understand how electricity behaves and what it does if
you get the right idea of it at the start. In the first place, if you
will think of electricity as being a fluid like water its fundamental
actions will be greatly simplified. Both water and electricity may be
at rest or in motion. When at rest, under certain conditions, either
one will develop pressure, and this pressure when released will cause
them to flow through their respective conductors and thus produce a
current.

Electricity at Rest and in Motion.--Any wire or a conductor of any
kind can be charged with electricity, but a Leyden jar, or other
condenser, is generally used to hold an electric charge because it has
a much larger _capacitance_, as its capacity is called, than a wire.
As a simple analogue of a condenser, suppose you have a tank of water
raised above a second tank and that these are connected together by
means of a pipe with a valve in it, as shown at A in Fig. 28.

[Illustration: Fig. 28.--Water Analogue for Electric Pressure.]

[Illustration: original © Underwood and Underwood. First Wireless
College in the World, at Tufts College, Mass.]

Now if you fill the upper tank with water and the valve is turned off,
no water can flow into the lower tank but there is a difference of
pressure between them, and the moment you turn the valve on a current
of water will flow through the pipe. In very much the same way when
you have a condenser charged with electricity the latter will be under
_pressure,_ that is, a _difference of potential_ will be set up, for
one of the sheets of metal will be charged positively and the other
one, which is insulated from it, will be charged negatively, as shown
at B. On closing the switch the opposite charges rush together and
form a current which flows to and fro between the metal plates.
[Footnote: Strictly speaking it is the difference of potential that
sets up the electromotive force.]

The Electric Current and Its Circuit.--Just as water flowing through a
pipe has _quantity_ and _pressure_ back of it and the pipe offers
friction to it which tends to hold back the water, so, likewise, does
electricity flowing in a circuit have: (1) _quantity_, or _current
strength_, or just _current_, as it is called for short, or
_amperage_, and (2) _pressure_, or _potential difference_, or
_electromotive force_, or _voltage_, as it is variously called, and
the wire, or circuit, in which the current is flowing has (3)
_resistance_ which tends to hold back the current.

A definite relation exists between the current and its electromotive
force and also between the current, electromotive force and the
resistance of the circuit; and if you will get this relationship
clearly in your mind you will have a very good insight into how direct
and alternating currents act. To keep a quantity of water flowing in a
loop of pipe, which we will call the circuit, pressure must be applied
to it and this may be done by a rotary pump as shown at A in Fig. 29;
in the same way, to keep a quantity of electricity flowing in a loop
of wire, or circuit, a battery, or other means for generating electric
pressure must be used, as shown at B.

[Illustration: Fig. 29.--Water Analogues for Direct and Alternating
Currents.]

If you have a closed pipe connected with a piston pump, as at C, as
the piston moves to and fro the water in the pipe will move first one
way and then the other. So also when an alternating current generator
is connected to a wire circuit, as at D, the current will flow first
in one direction and then in the other, and this is what is called an
_alternating current_.

Current and the Ampere.--The amount of water flowing in a closed pipe
is the same at all parts of it and this is also true of an electric
current, in that there is exactly the same quantity of electricity at
one point of the circuit as there is at any other.

The amount of electricity, or current, flowing in a circuit in a
second is measured by a unit called the _ampere_, [Footnote: For
definition of _ampere_ see _Appendix._] and it is expressed by the
symbol I. [Footnote: This is because the letter C is used for the
symbol of _capacitance_] Just to give you an idea of the quantity of
current an _ampere_ is we will say that a dry cell when fresh gives a
current of about 20 amperes. To measure the current in amperes an
instrument called an _ammeter_ is used, as shown at A in Fig. 30, and
this is always connected in _series_ with the line, as shown at B.

[Illustration: Fig. 30.--How the Ammeter and Voltmeter are Used.]

Electromotive Force and the Volt.--When you have a pipe filled with
water or a circuit charged with electricity and you want to make them
flow you must use a pump in the first case and a battery or a dynamo
in the second case. It is the battery or dynamo that sets up the
electric pressure as the circuit itself is always charged with
electricity.

The more cells you connect together in _series_ the greater will be
the electric pressure developed and the more current it will move
along just as the amount of water flowing in a pipe can be increased
by increasing the pressure of the pump. The unit of electromotive
force is the _volt_, and this is the electric pressure which will
force a current of _1 ampere_ through a resistance of _1 ohm_; it is
expressed by the symbol _E_. A fresh dry cell will deliver a current
of about 1.5 volts. To measure the pressure of a current in volts an
instrument called a _voltmeter_ is used, as shown at C in Fig. 30, and
this is always connected across the circuit, as shown at D.

Resistance and the Ohm.--Just as a water pipe offers a certain amount
of resistance to the flow of water through it, so a circuit opposes
the flow of electricity in it and this is called _resistance_.
Further, in the same way that a small pipe will not allow a large
amount of water to flow through it, so, too, a thin wire limits the
flow of the current in it.

If you connect a _resistance coil_ in a circuit it acts in the same
way as partly closing the valve in a pipe, as shown at A and B in Fig.
31. The resistance of a circuit is measured by a unit called the
_ohm_, and it is expressed by the symbol _R_. A No. 10, Brown and
Sharpe gauge soft copper wire, 1,000 feet long, has a resistance of
about 1 ohm. To measure the resistance of a circuit an apparatus
called a _resistance bridge is used_. The resistance of a circuit can,
however, be easily calculated, as the following shows.

[Illustration: Fig. 31.--Water Valve Analogue of Electric Resistance.
A- a valve limits the flow of water. B- a resistance limits the flow
of current.]

What Ohm's Law Is.--If, now, (1) you know what the current flowing in
a circuit is in _amperes_, and the electromotive force, or pressure,
is in _volts_, you can then easily find what the resistance is in
_ohms_ of the circuit in which the current is flowing by this formula:

     Volts                   E
    --------- = Ohms,  or   --- = R
     Amperes                 I

That is, if you divide the current in amperes by the electromotive
force in volts the quotient will give you the resistance in ohms.

Or (2) if you know what the electromotive force of the current is in
_volts_ and the resistance of the circuit is in _ohms_ then you can
find what the current flowing in the circuit is in _amperes_, thus:

    Volts                   E
    ----- = Amperes,  or   --- = I
    Ohms                    R

That is, by dividing the resistance of the circuit in ohms, by the
electromotive force of the current you will get the amperes flowing in
the circuit.

Finally (3) if you know what the resistance of the circuit is in
_ohms_ and the current is in _amperes_ then you can find what the
electromotive force is in _volts_ since:

    Ohms x Amperes = Volts,  or   R x I = E

That is, if you multiply the resistance of the circuit in ohms by the
current in amperes the result will give you the electromotive force in
volts.

From this you will see that if you know the value of any two of the
constants you can find the value of the unknown constant by a simple
arithmetical process. This relation between these three constants is
known as _Ohm's Law_ and as they are very important you should
memorize them.

What the Watt and Kilowatt Are.--Just as _horsepower_ or _H.P._, is
the unit of work that steam has done or can do, so the _watt_ is the
unit of work that an electric current has done or can do. To find the
_watts_ a current develops you need only to multiply the _amperes_ by
the _volts_. There are _746 watts_ to _1 horsepower, and 1,000 watts
are equal to 1 kilowatt_.

Electromagnetic Induction.--To show that a current of electricity sets
up a magnetic field around it you have only to hold a compass over a
wire whose ends are connected with a battery when the needle will
swing at right angles to the length of the wire. By winding an
insulated wire into a coil and connecting the ends of the latter with
a battery you will find, if you test it with a compass, that the coil
is magnetic.

This is due to the fact that the energy of an electric current flowing
in the wire is partly changed into magnetic lines of force which
rotate at right angles about it as shown at A in Fig. 32. The
magnetic field produced by the current flowing in the coil is
precisely the same as that set up by a permanent steel magnet.
Conversely, when a magnetic line of force is set up a part of its
energy goes to make up electric currents which whirl about in a like
manner, as shown at B.

[Illustration: (A) and (B) Fig. 32.--How an Electric Current is
Changed into Magnetic Lines of Force and These into an Electric
Current.]

[Illustration: (C) and (D) Fig. 32.--How an Electric Current Sets up a
Magnetic Field.]

Self-induction or Inductance.--When a current is made to flow in a
coil of wire the magnetic lines of force produced are concentrated, as
at C, just as a lens concentrates rays of light, and this forms an
intense _magnetic field_, as it is called. Now if a bar of soft iron
is brought close to one end of the coil of wire, or, better still, if
it is pushed into the coil, it will be magnetized by _electromagnetic
induction,_ see D, and it will remain a magnet until the current is
cut off.

Mutual Induction.--When two loops of wire, or better, two coils of
wire, are placed close together the electromagnetic induction between
them is reactive, that is, when a current is made to flow through one
of the coils closed magnetic lines of force are set up and when these
cut the other loop or turns of wire of the other coil, they in turn
produce electric currents in it.

It is the mutual induction that takes place between two coils of wire
which makes it possible to transform _low voltage currents_ from a
battery or a 110 volt source of current into high pressure currents,
or _high potential currents_, as they are called, by means of a spark
coil or a transformer, as well as to _step up_ and _step down_ the
potential of the high frequency currents that are set up in sending
and receiving oscillation transformers. Soft iron cores are not used
in oscillation inductance coils and oscillation transformers for the
reason that the frequency of the current is so high the iron would not
have time to magnetize and demagnetize and so would not help along the
mutual induction to any appreciable extent.

High-Frequency Currents.--High frequency currents, or electric
oscillations as they are called, are currents of electricity that
surge to and fro in a circuit a million times, more or less, per
second. Currents of such high frequencies will _oscillate_, that is,
surge to and fro, in an _open circuit_, such as an aerial wire system,
as well as in a _closed circuit_.

Now there is only one method by which currents of high frequency, or
_radio-frequency_, as they are termed, can be set up by spark
transmitters, and this is by discharging a charged condenser through a
circuit having a small resistance. To charge a condenser a spark coil
or a transformer is used and the ends of the secondary coil, which
delivers the high potential alternating current, are connected with
the condenser. To discharge the condenser automatically a _spark,_ or
an _arc,_ or the _flow of electrons_ in a vacuum tube, is employed.

Constants of an Oscillation Circuit.--An oscillation circuit, as
pointed out before, is one in which high frequency currents surge or
oscillate. Now the number of times a high frequency current will surge
forth and back in a circuit depends upon three factors of the latter
and these are called the constants of the circuit, namely: (1) its
_capacitance,_ (2) its _inductance_ and (3) its _resistance._

What Capacitance Is.--The word _capacitance_ means the _electrostatic
capacity_ of a condenser or a circuit. The capacitance of a condenser
or a circuit is the quantity of electricity which will raise its
pressure, or potential, to a given amount. The capacitance of a
condenser or a circuit depends on its size and form and the voltage of
the current that is charging it.

The capacitance of a condenser or a circuit is directly proportional
to the quantity of electricity that will keep the charge at a given
potential. The _farad,_ whose symbol is _M,_ is the unit of
capacitance and a condenser or a circuit to have a capacitance of one
farad must be of such size that one _coulomb,_ which is the unit of
electrical quantity, will raise its charge to a potential of one volt.
Since the farad is far too large for practical purposes a millionth of
a farad, or _microfarad_, whose symbol is _mfd._, is used.

What Inductance Is.--Under the sub-caption of _Self-induction_ and
_Inductance_ in the beginning of this chapter it was shown that it was
the inductance of a coil that makes a current flowing through it
produce a strong magnetic field, and here, as one of the constants of
an oscillation circuit, it makes a high-frequency current act as
though it possessed _inertia_.

Inertia is that property of a material body that requires time and
energy to set in motion, or stop. Inductance is that property of an
oscillation circuit that makes an electric current take time to start
and time to stop. Because of the inductance, when a current flows
through a circuit it causes the electric energy to be absorbed and
changes a large part of it into magnetic lines of force. Where high
frequency currents surge in a circuit the inductance of it becomes a
powerful factor. The practical unit of inductance is the _henry_ and
it is represented by the symbol _L_.

What Resistance Is.--The resistance of a circuit to high-frequency
currents is different from that for low voltage direct or alternating
currents, as the former do not sink into the conductor to nearly so
great an extent; in fact, they stick practically to the surface of it,
and hence their flow is opposed to a very much greater extent. The
resistance of a circuit to high frequency currents is generally found
in the spark gap, arc gap, or the space between the electrodes of a
vacuum tube. The unit of resistance is, as stated, the _ohm_, and its
symbol is _R_.

The Effect of Capacitance, Inductance and Resistance on Electric
Oscillations.--If an oscillation circuit in which high frequency
currents surge has a large resistance, it will so oppose the flow of
the currents that they will be damped out and reach zero gradually, as
shown at A in Fig. 33. But if the resistance of the circuit is small,
and in wireless circuits it is usually so small as to be negligible,
the currents will oscillate, until their energy is damped out by
radiation and other losses, as shown at B.

[Illustration: Fig. 33.--The Effect of Resistance on the Discharge of
an Electric Current.]

As the capacitance and the inductance of the circuit, which may be
made of any value, that is amount, you wish, determines the _time
period_, that is, the length of time for a current to make one
complete oscillation, it must be clear that by varying the values of
the condenser and the inductance coil you can make the high frequency
current oscillate as fast or as slow as you wish within certain
limits. Where the electric oscillations that are set up are very fast,
the waves sent out by the aerial will be short, and, conversely, where
the oscillations are slow the waves emitted will be long.




CHAPTER VI

HOW THE TRANSMITTING AND RECEIVING SETS WORK


The easiest way to get a clear conception of how a wireless
transmitter sends out electric waves and how a wireless receptor
receives them is to take each one separately and follow: (1) in the
case of the transmitter, the transformation of the low voltage direct,
or alternating current into high potential alternating currents; then
find out how these charge the condenser, how this is discharged by the
spark gap and sets up high-frequency currents in the oscillation
circuits; then (2) in the case of the receptor, to follow the high
frequency currents that are set up in the aerial wire and learn how
they are transformed into oscillations of lower potential when they
have a larger current strength, how these are converted into
intermittent direct currents by the detector and which then flow into
and operate the telephone receiver.

How Transmitting Set No. 1 Works. The Battery and Spark Coil
Circuit.--When you press down on the knob of the key the silver points
of it make contact and this closes the circuit; the low voltage direct
current from the battery now flows through the primary coil of the
spark coil and this magnetizes the soft iron core. The instant it
becomes magnetic it pulls the spring of the vibrator over to it and
this breaks the circuit; when this takes place the current stops
flowing through the primary coil; this causes the core to lose its
magnetism when the vibrator spring flies back and again makes contact
with the adjusting screw; then the cycle of operations is repeated.

A condenser is connected across the contact points of the vibrator
since this gives a much higher voltage at the ends of the secondary
coil than where the coil is used without it; this is because: (1) the
self-induction of the primary coil makes the pressure of the current
rise and when the contact points close the circuit again it discharges
through the primary coil, and (2) when the break takes place the
current flows into the condenser instead of arcing across the contact
points.

Changing the Primary Spark Coil Current Into Secondary Currents.--Now
every time the vibrator contact points close the primary circuit the
electric current in the primary coil is changed into closed magnetic
lines of force and as these cut through the secondary coil they set up
in it a _momentary current_ in one direction. Then the instant the
vibrator points break apart the primary circuit is opened and the
closed magnetic lines of force contract and as they do so they cut the
turns of wire in the secondary coil in the opposite direction and this
sets up another momentary current in the secondary coil in the other
direction. The result is that the low voltage direct current of the
battery is changed into alternating currents whose frequency is
precisely that of the spring vibrator, but while the frequency of the
currents is low their potential, or voltage, is enormously increased.

What Ratio of Transformation Means.--To make a spark coil step up the
low voltage direct current into high potential alternating current the
primary coil is wound with a couple of layers of thick insulated
copper wire and the secondary is wound with a thousand, more or less,
number of turns with very fine insulated copper wire. If the primary
and secondary coils were wound with the same number of turns of wire
then the pressure, or voltage, of the secondary coil at its terminals
would be the same as that of the current which flowed through the
primary coil. Under these conditions the _ratio of transformation_, as
it is called, would be unity.

The ratio of transformation is directly proportional to the number of
turns of wire on the primary and secondary coils and, since this is
the case, if you wind 10 turns of wire on the primary coil and 1,000
turns of wire on the secondary coil then you will get 100 times as
high a pressure, or voltage, at the terminals of the secondary as that
which you caused to flow through the primary coil, but, naturally, the
current strength, or amperage, will be proportionately decreased.

The Secondary Spark Coil Circuit.--This includes the secondary coil
and the spark gap which are connected together. When the alternating,
but high potential, currents which are developed by the secondary
coil, reach the balls, or _electrodes_, of the spark gap the latter
are alternately charged positively and negatively.

Now take a given instant when one electrode is charged positively and
the other one is charged negatively, then when they are charged to a
high enough potential the electric strain breaks down the air gap
between them and the two charges rush together as described in the
chapter before this one in connection with the discharge of a
condenser. When the charges rush together they form a current which
burns out the air in the gap and this gives rise to the spark, and as
the heated gap between the two electrodes is a very good conductor the
electric current surges forth and back with high frequency, perhaps a
dozen times, before the air replaces that which has burned out. It is
the inrushing air to fill the vacuum of the gap that makes the
crackling noise which accompanies the discharge of the electric spark.

In this way then electric oscillations of the order of a million, more
or less, are produced and if an aerial and a ground wire are connected
to the spark balls, or electrodes, the oscillations will surge up and
down it and the energy of these in turn, are changed into electric
waves which travel out into space. An open circuit transmitter of this
kind will send out waves that are four times as long as the aerial
itself, but as the waves it sends out are strongly damped the
Government will not permit it to be used.

The Closed Oscillation Circuit.--By using a closed oscillation circuit
the transmitter can be tuned to send out waves of a given length and
while the waves are not so strongly damped more current can be sent
into the aerial wire system. The closed oscillation circuit consists
of: (1) a _spark gap_, (2) a _condenser_ and (3) an _oscillation
transformer_. The high potential alternating current delivered by the
secondary coil not only charges the spark gap electrodes which
necessarily have a very small capacitance, but it charges the
condenser which has a large capacitance and the value of which can be
changed at will.

Now when the condenser is fully charged it discharges through the
spark gap and then the electric oscillations set up surge to and fro
through the closed circuit. As a closed circuit is a very poor
radiator of energy, that is, the electric oscillations are not freely
converted into electric waves by it, they surge up to, and through the
aerial wire; now as the aerial wire is a good radiator nearly all of
the energy of the electric oscillations which surge through it are
converted into electric waves.

How Transmitting Set No. 2 Works. With Alternating Current. The
operation of a transmitting set that uses an alternating current
transformer, or _power transformer,_ as it is sometimes called, is
even more simple than one using a spark coil. The transformer needs no
vibrator when used with alternating current. The current from a
generator flows through the primary coil of the transformer and the
alternations of the usual lighting current is 60 cycles per second.
This current sets up an alternating magnetic field in the core of the
transformer and as these magnetic lines of force expand and contract
they set up alternating currents of the same frequency but of much
higher voltage at the terminals of the secondary coil according to the
ratio of the primary and secondary turns of wire as explained under
the sub-caption of _Ratio of Transformation_.

With Direct Current.--When a 110 volt direct current is used to
energize the power transformer an _electrolytic_ interruptor is needed
to make and break the primary circuit, just as a vibrator is needed
for the same purpose with a spark coil. When the electrodes are
connected in series with the primary coil of a transformer and a
source of direct current having a potential of 40 to 110 volts,
bubbles of gas are formed on the end of the platinum, or alloy anode,
which prevent the current from flowing until the bubbles break and
then the current flows again, in this way the current is rapidly made
and broken and the break is very sharp.

Where this type of interrupter is employed the condenser that is
usually shunted around the break is not necessary as the interrupter
itself has a certain inherent capacitance, due to electrolytic action,
and which is called its _electrolytic capacitance_, and this is large
enough to balance the self-induction of the circuit since the greater
the number of breaks per minute the smaller the capacitance required.

The Rotary Spark Gap.--In this type of spark gap the two fixed
electrodes are connected with the terminals of the secondary coil of
the power transformer and also with the condenser and primary of the
oscillation transformer. Now whenever any pair of electrodes on the
rotating disk are in a line with the pair of fixed electrodes a spark
will take place, hence the pitch of the note depends on the speed of
the motor driving the disk. This kind of a rotary spark-gap is called
_non-synchronous_ and it is generally used where a 60 cycle
alternating current is available but it will work with other higher
frequencies.

The Quenched Spark Gap.--If you strike a piano string a single quick
blow it will continue to vibrate according to its natural period. This
is very much the way in which a quenched spark gap sets up
oscillations in a coupled closed and open circuit. The oscillations
set up in the primary circuit by a quenched spark make only three or
four sharp swings and in so doing transfer all of their energy over to
the secondary circuit, where it will oscillate some fifty times or
more before it is damped out, because the high frequency currents are
not forced, but simply oscillate to the natural frequency of the
circuit. For this reason the radiated waves approach somewhat the
condition of continuous waves, and so sharper tuning is possible.

The Oscillation Transformer.--In this set the condenser in the closed
circuit is charged and discharged and sets up oscillations that surge
through the closed circuit as in _Set No. 1_. In this set, however, an
oscillation transformer is used and as the primary coil of it is
included in the closed circuit the oscillations set up in it produce
strong oscillating magnetic lines of force. The magnetic field thus
produced sets up in turn electric oscillations in the secondary coil
of the oscillation transformer and these surge through the aerial wire
system where their energy is radiated in the form of electric waves.

The great advantage of using an oscillation transformer instead of a
simple inductance coil is that the capacitance of the closed circuit
can be very much larger than that of the aerial wire system. This
permits more energy to be stored up by the condenser and this is
impressed on the aerial when it is radiated as electric waves.

How Receiving Set No. I Works.--When the electric waves from a distant
sending station impinge on the wire of a receiving aerial their energy
is changed into electric oscillations that are of exactly the same
frequency (assuming the receptor is tuned to the transmitter) but
whose current strength (amperage) and potential (voltage) are very
small. These electric waves surge through the closed circuit but when
they reach the crystal detector the contact of the metal point on the
crystal permits more current to flow through it in one direction than
it will allow to pass in the other direction. For this reason a
crystal detector is sometimes called a _rectifier_, which it really
is.

Thus the high frequency currents which the steel magnet cores of the
telephone receiver would choke off are changed by the detector into
intermittent direct currents which can flow through the magnet coils
of the telephone receiver. Since the telephone receiver chokes off the
oscillations, a small condenser can be shunted around it so that a
complete closed oscillation circuit is formed and this gives better
results.

When the intermittent rectified current flows through the coils of the
telephone receiver it energizes the magnet as long as it lasts, when
it is de-energized; this causes the soft iron disk, or _diaphragm_ as
it is called, which sets close to the ends of the poles of the magnet,
to vibrate; and this in turn gives forth sounds such as dots and
dashes, speech or music, according to the nature of the electric waves
that sent them out at the distant station.

How Receiving Set No. 2 Works.--When the electric oscillations that
are set up by the incoming electric waves on the aerial wire surge
through the primary coil of the oscillation transformer they produce a
magnetic field and as the lines of force of the latter cut the
secondary coil, oscillations of the same frequency are set up in it.
The potential (voltage) of these oscillations are, however, _stepped
down_ in the secondary coil and, hence, their current strength
(amperes) is increased.

The oscillations then flow through the closed circuit where they are
rectified by the crystal detector and transformed into sound waves by
the telephone receiver as described in connection with _Set No. 1_.
The variable condenser shunted across the closed circuit permits finer
secondary tuning to be done than is possible without it. Where you
are receiving continuous waves from a wireless telephone transmitter
(speech or music) you have to tune sharper than is possible with the
tuning coil alone and to do this a variable condenser connected in
parallel with the secondary coil is necessary.




CHAPTER VII

MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL TUNING


There is a strikingly close resemblance between _sound waves_ and the
way they are set up in _the air_ by a mechanically vibrating body,
such as a steel spring or a tuning fork, and _electric waves_ and the
way they are set up in _the ether_ by a current oscillating in a
circuit. As it is easy to grasp the way that sound waves are produced
and behave something will be told about them in this chapter and also
an explanation of how electric waves are produced and behave and thus
you will be able to get a clear understanding of them and of tuning in
general.

Damped and Sustained Mechanical Vibrations.--If you will place one end
of a flat steel spring in a vice and screw it up tight as shown at A
in Fig. 34, and then pull the free end over and let it go it will
vibrate to and fro with decreasing amplitude until it comes to rest as
shown at B. When you pull the spring over you store up energy in it
and when you let it go the stored up energy is changed into energy of
motion and the spring moves forth and back, or _vibrates_ as we call
it, until all of its stored up energy is spent.

[Illustration: Fig. 34.--Damped and Sustained Mechanical Vibrations.]

If it were not for the air surrounding it and other frictional losses,
the spring would vibrate for a very long time as the stored up energy
and the energy of motion would practically offset each other and so
the energy would not be used up. But as the spring beats the air the
latter is sent out in impulses and the conversion of the vibrations of
the spring into waves in the air soon uses up the energy you have
imparted to it and it comes to rest.

In order to send out _continuous waves_ in the air instead of _damped
waves_ as with a flat steel spring you can use an _electric driven
tuning fork_, see C, in which an electromagnet is fixed on the inside
of the prongs and when this is energized by a battery current the
vibrations of the prongs of the fork are kept going, or are
_sustained_, as shown in the diagram at D.

Damped and Sustained Electric Oscillations.--The vibrating steel
spring described above is a very good analogue of the way that damped
electric oscillations which surge in a circuit set up and send out
periodic electric waves in the ether while the electric driven tuning
fork just described is likewise a good analogue of how sustained
oscillations surge in a circuit and set up and send out continuous
electric waves in the ether as the following shows.

Now the inductance and resistance of a circuit such as is shown at A
in Fig. 35, slows down, and finally damps out entirely, the electric
oscillations of the high frequency currents, see B, where these are
set up by the periodic discharge of a condenser, precisely as the
vibrations of the spring are damped out by the friction of the air and
other resistances that act upon it. As the electric oscillations surge
to and fro in the circuit it is opposed by the action of the ether
which surrounds it and electric waves are set up in and sent out
through it and this transformation soon uses up the energy of the
current that flows in the circuit.

[Illustration: Fig. 35.--Damped and Sustained Electric Oscillations.]

To send out _continuous waves_ in the ether such as are needed for
wireless telephony instead of _damped waves_ which are, at the present
writing, generally used for wireless telegraphy, an _electric
oscillation arc_ or a _vacuum tube oscillator_ must be used, see C,
instead of a spark gap. Where a spark gap is used the condenser in the
circuit is charged periodically and with considerable lapses of time
between each of the charging processes, when, of course, the condenser
discharges periodically and with the same time element between them.
Where an oscillation arc or a vacuum tube is used the condenser is
charged as rapidly as it is discharged and the result is the
oscillations are sustained as shown at D.

About Mechanical Tuning.--A tuning fork is better than a spring or a
straight steel bar for setting up mechanical vibrations. As a matter
of fact a tuning fork is simply a steel bar bent in the middle so that
the two ends are parallel. A handle is attached to middle point of the
fork so that it can be held easily and which also allows it to vibrate
freely, when the ends of the prongs alternately approach and recede
from one another. When the prongs vibrate the handle vibrates up and
down in unison with it, and imparts its motion to the _sounding box_,
or _resonance case_ as it is sometimes called, where one is used.

If, now, you will mount the fork on a sounding box which is tuned so
that it will be in resonance with the vibrations of the fork there
will be a direct reinforcement of the vibrations when the note emitted
by it will be augmented in strength and quality. This is called
_simple resonance_. Further, if you mount a pair of forks, each on a
separate sounding box, and have the forks of the same size, tone and
pitch, and the boxes synchronized, that is, tuned to the same
frequency of vibration, then set the two boxes a foot or so apart, as
shown at A in Fig. 36, when you strike one of the forks with a rubber
hammer it will vibrate with a definite frequency and, hence, send out
sound waves of a given length. When the latter strike the second fork
the impact of the molecules of air of which the sound waves are formed
will set its prongs to vibrating and it will, in turn, emit sound
waves of the same length and this is called _sympathetic resonance_,
or as we would say in wireless the forks are _in tune_.

[Illustration: Fig. 36.--Sound Wave and Electric Wave Tuned Senders
and Receptors. A - variable tuning forks for showing sound wave
tuning. B - variable oscillation circuits for showing electric wave
tuning.]

Tuning forks are made with adjustable weights on their prongs and by
fixing these to different parts of them the frequency with which the
forks vibrate can be changed since the frequency varies inversely with
the square of the length and directly with the thickness [Footnote:
This law is for forks having a rectangular cross-section. Those having
a round cross-section vary as the radius.] of the prongs. Now by
adjusting one of the forks so that it vibrates at a frequency of, say,
16 per second and adjusting the other fork so that it vibrates at a
frequency of, say, 18 or 20 per second, then the forks will not be in
tune with each other and, hence, if you strike one of them the other
will not respond. But if you make the forks vibrate at the same
frequency, say 16, 20 or 24 per second, when you strike one of them
the other will vibrate in unison with it.

About Electric Tuning.--Electric resonance and electric tuning are
very like those of acoustic resonance and acoustic tuning which I have
just described. Just as acoustic resonance may be simple or
sympathetic so electric resonance may be simple or sympathetic. Simple
acoustic resonance is the direct reinforcement of a simple vibration
and this condition is had when a tuning fork is mounted on a sounding
box. In simple electric resonance an oscillating current of a given
frequency flowing in a circuit having the proper inductance and
capacitance may increase the voltage until it is several times greater
than its normal value. Tuning the receptor circuits to the transmitter
circuits are examples of sympathetic electric resonance. As a
demonstration if you have two Leyden jars (capacitance) connected in
circuit with two loops of wire (inductance) whose inductance can be
varied as shown at B in Fig. 36, when you make a spark pass between
the knobs of one of them by means of a spark coil then a spark will
pass in the gap of the other one provided the inductance of the two
loops of wire is the same. But if you vary the inductance of the one
loop so that it is larger or smaller than that of the other loop no
spark will take place in the second circuit.

When a tuning fork is made to vibrate it sends out waves in the air,
or sound waves, in all directions and just so when high frequency
currents surge in an oscillation circuit they send out waves in the
ether, or electric waves, that travel in all directions. For this
reason electric waves from a transmitting station cannot be sent to
one particular station, though they do go further in one direction
than in another, according to the way your aerial wire points.

Since the electric waves travel out in all directions any receiving
set properly tuned to the wave length of the sending station will
receive the waves and the only limit on your ability to receive from
high-power stations throughout the world depends entirely on the wave
length and sensitivity of your receiving set. As for tuning, just as
changing the length and the thickness of the prongs of a tuning fork
varies the frequency with which it vibrates and, hence, the length of
the waves it sends out, so, too, by varying the capacitance of the
condenser and the inductance of the tuning coil of the transmitter the
frequency of the electric oscillations set up in the circuit may be
changed and, consequently, the length of the electric waves they send
out. Likewise, by varying the capacitance and the inductance of the
receptor the circuits can be tuned to receive incoming electric waves
of whatever length within the limitation of the apparatus.




CHAPTER VIII

A SIMPLE VACUUM TUBE DETECTOR RECEIVING SET


While you can receive dots and dashes from spark wireless telegraph
stations and hear spoken words and music from wireless telephone
stations with a crystal detector receiving set such as described in
Chapter III, you can get stations that are much farther away and hear
them better with a _vacuum tube detector_ receiving set.

Though the vacuum tube detector requires two batteries to operate it
and the receiving circuits are somewhat more complicated than where a
crystal detector is used still the former does not have to be
constantly adjusted as does the latter and this is another very great
advantage. Taken all in all the vacuum tube detector is the most
sensitive and the most satisfactory of the detectors that are in use
at the present time.

Not only is the vacuum tube a detector of electric wave signals and
speech and music but it can also be used to _amplify_ them, that is,
to make them stronger and, hence, louder in the telephone receiver and
further its powers of amplification are so great that it will
reproduce them by means of a _loud speaker_, just as a horn amplifies
the sounds of a phonograph reproducer, until they can be heard by a
room or an auditorium full of people. There are two general types of
loud speakers, though both use the principle of the telephone
receiver. The construction of these loud speakers will be fully
described in a later chapter.

Assembled Vacuum Tube Receiving Sets.--You can buy a receiving set
with a vacuum tube detector from the very simplest type, which is
described in this chapter, to those that are provided with
_regenerative circuits_ and _amplifying_ tubes or both, which we shall
describe in later chapters, from dealers in electrical apparatus
generally. While one of these sets costs more than you can assemble a
set for yourself, still, especially in the beginning, it is a good
plan to buy an assembled one for it is fitted with a _panel_ on which
the adjusting knobs of the rheostat, tuning coil and condenser are
mounted and this makes it possible to operate it as soon as you get it
home and without the slightest trouble on your part.

You can, however, buy all the various parts separately and mount them
yourself. If you want the receptor simply for receiving then it is a
good scheme to have all of the parts mounted in a box or enclosed
case, but if you want it for experimental purposes then the parts
should be mounted on a base or a panel so that all of the connections
are in sight and accessible.

A Simple Vacuum Tube Receiving Set.--For this set you should use: (1)
a _loose coupled tuning coil,_ (2) a _variable condenser,_ (3) a
_vacuum tube detector,_ (4) an A or _storage battery_ giving 6 volts,
(5) a B or _dry cell battery_ giving 22-1/2 volts, (6) a _rheostat_
for varying the storage battery current, and (7) a pair of 2,000-ohm
_head telephone receivers_. The loose coupled tuning coil, the
variable condenser and the telephone receivers are the same as those
described in Chapter III.

The Vacuum Tube Detector. With Two Electrodes.--A vacuum tube in its
simplest form consists of a glass bulb like an incandescent lamp in
which a _wire filament_ and a _metal plate_ are sealed as shown in
Fig. 37, The air is then pumped out of the tube and a vacuum left or
after it is exhausted it is filled with nitrogen, which cannot burn.

[Illustration: Fig. 37.--Two Electrode Vacuum Tube Detectors.]

When the vacuum tube is used as a detector, the wire filament is
heated red-hot and the metal plate is charged with positive
electricity though it remains cold. The wire filament is formed into a
loop like that of an incandescent lamp and its outside ends are
connected with a 6-volt storage battery, which is called the A
battery; then the + or _positive_ terminal of a 22-1/2 volt dry cell
battery, called the B battery, is connected to the metal plate while
the - or _negative_ terminal of the battery is connected to one of the
terminals of the wire filament. The diagram, Fig. 37, simply shows how
the two electrode vacuum tube, the A or dry battery, and the B or
storage battery are connected up.

Three Electrode Vacuum Tube Detector.--The three electrode vacuum tube
detector shown at A in Fig. 38, is much more sensitive than the two
electrode tube and has, in consequence, all but supplanted it. In this
more recent type of vacuum tube the third electrode, or _grid_, as it
is called, is placed between the wire filament and the metal plate and
this allows the current to be increased or decreased at will to a very
considerable extent.

[Illustration: Fig. 38.--Three Electrode Vacuum Tube Detector and
Battery Connections.]

The way the three electrode vacuum tube detector is connected with the
batteries is shown at B. The plate, the A or dry cell battery and one
terminal of the filament are connected in _series_--that is, one after
the other, and the ends of the filament are connected to the B or
storage battery. In assembling a receiving set you must, of course,
have a socket for the vacuum tube. A vacuum tube detector costs from
$5.00 to $6.00.

The Dry Cell and Storage Batteries.--The reason that a storage battery
is used for heating the filament of the vacuum tube detector is
because the current delivered is constant, whereas when a dry cell
battery is used the current soon falls off and, hence, the heat of the
filament gradually grows less. The smallest A or 6 volt storage
battery on the market has a capacity of 20 to 40 ampere hours, weighs
13 pounds and costs about $10.00. It is shown at A in Fig. 39. The B
or dry cell battery for the vacuum tube plate circuit that gives
22-1/2 volts can be bought already assembled in sealed boxes. The
small size is fitted with a pair of terminals while the larger size is
provided with _taps_ so that the voltage required by the plate can be
adjusted as the proper operation of the tube requires careful
regulation of the plate voltage. A dry cell battery for a plate
circuit is shown at B.

[Illustration: Fig. 39.--A and B Batteries for Vacuum
Tube Detectors.]

The Filament Rheostat.--An adjustable resistance, called a _rheostat_,
must be used in the filament and storage battery circuit so that the
current flowing through the filament can be controlled to a nicety.
The rheostat consists of an insulating and a heat resisting form on
which is wound a number of turns of resistance wire. A movable contact
arm that slides over and presses on the turns of wire is fixed to the
knob on top of the rheostat. A rheostat that has a resistance of 6
ohms and a current carrying capacity of 1.5 amperes which can be
mounted on a panel board is the right kind to use. It is shown at A
and B in Fig. 40 and costs $1.25.

[Illustration: Fig. 40.--Rheostat for the A or Storage Battery
Current.]

Assembling the Parts.--Begin by placing all of the separate parts of
the receiving set on a board or a base of other material and set the
tuning coil on the left hand side with the adjustable switch end
toward the right hand side so that you can reach it easily. Then set
the variable condenser in front of it, set the vacuum tube detector at
the right hand end of the tuning coil and the rheostat in front of the
detector. Place the two sets of batteries back of the instruments and
screw a couple of binding posts _a_ and _b_ to the right hand lower
edge of the base for connecting in the head phones all of which is
shown at A in Fig. 41.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 41.--Top View of Apparatus Layout for a Vacuum
Tube Detector Receiving Set.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 41.--Wiring Diagram of a Simple Vacuum Tube
Receiving Set.]

Connecting Up the Parts.--To wire up the different parts begin by
connecting the sliding contact of the primary coil of the loose
coupled tuning coil (this you will remember is the outside one that is
wound with fine wire) to the upper post of the lightning switch and
connect one terminal of this coil with the water pipe. Now connect the
free end of the secondary coil of the tuning coil (this is the inside
coil that is wound with heavy wire) to one of the binding posts of the
variable condenser and connect the movable contact arm of the
adjustable switch of the primary of the tuning coil with the other
post of the variable condenser.

Next connect the grid of the vacuum tube to one of the posts of the
condenser and then connect the plate of the tube to the _carbon
terminal_ of the B or dry cell battery which is the + or _positive
pole_ and connect the _zinc terminal_ of the - or _negative_ pole to
the binding post _a_, connect the post _b_ to the other side of the
variable condenser and then connect the terminals of the head phones
to the binding posts _a_ and _b_. Whatever you do be careful not to
get the plate connections of the battery reversed.

Now connect one of the posts of the rheostat to one terminal of the
filament and the other terminal of the filament to the - or _negative_
terminal of the A or storage battery and the + or _positive_ terminal
of the A or storage battery to the other post of the rheostat. Finally
connect the + or positive terminal of the A or storage battery with
the wire that runs from the head phones to the variable condenser, all
of which is shown in the wiring diagram at B in Fig. 41.

Adjusting the Vacuum Tube Detector Receiving Set.--A vacuum tube
detector is tuned exactly in the same way as the _Crystal Detector Set
No. 2_ described in Chapter III, in-so-far as the tuning coil and
variable condenser are concerned. The sensitivity of the vacuum tube
detector receiving set and, hence, the distance over which signals and
other sounds can be heard depends very largely on the sensitivity of
the vacuum tube itself and this in turn depends on: (1) the right
amount of heat developed by the filament, or _filament brilliancy_ as
it is called, (2) the right amount of voltage applied to the plate,
and (3) the extent to which the tube is exhausted where this kind of a
tube is used.

To vary the current flowing from the A or storage battery
through the filament so that it will be heated to the right degree you
adjust the rheostat while you are listening in to the signals or other
sounds. By carefully adjusting the rheostat you can easily find the
point at which it makes the tube the most sensitive. A rheostat is
also useful in that it keeps the filament from burning out when the
current from the battery first flows through it. You can very often
increase the sensitiveness of a vacuum tube after you have used it for
a while by recharging the A or storage battery.

The degree to which a vacuum tube has been exhausted has a very
pronounced effect on its sensitivity. The longer the tube is used the
lower its vacuum gets and generally the less sensitive it becomes.
When this takes place (and you can only guess at it) you can very
often make it more sensitive by warming it over the flame of a candle.
Vacuum tubes having a gas content (in which case they are, of course,
no longer vacuum tubes in the strict sense) make better detectors than
tubes from which the air has been exhausted and which are sealed off
in this evacuated condition because their sensitiveness is not
dependent on the degree of vacuum as in the latter tubes. Moreover, a
tube that is completely exhausted costs more than one that is filled
with gas.




CHAPTER IX

VACUUM TUBE AMPLIFIER RECEIVING SETS


The reason a vacuum tube detector is more sensitive than a crystal
detector is because while the latter merely _rectifies_ the
oscillating current that surges in the receiving circuits, the former
acts as an _amplifier_ at the same time. The vacuum tube can be used
as a separate amplifier in connection with either: (1) a _crystal
detector_ or (2) a _vacuum tube detector_, and (_a_) it will amplify
either the _radio frequency currents_, that is the high frequency
oscillating currents which are set up in the oscillation circuits or
(_b_) it will amplify the _audio frequency currents_, that is, the
_low frequency alternating_ currents that flow through the head phone
circuit.

To use the amplified radio frequency oscillating currents or amplified
audio frequency alternating currents that are set up by an amplifier
tube either a high resistance, called a _grid leak_, or an _amplifying
transformer_, with or without an iron core, must be connected with the
plate circuit of the first amplifier tube and the grid circuit of the
next amplifier tube or detector tube, or with the wire point of a
crystal detector. Where two or more amplifier tubes are coupled
together in this way the scheme is known as _cascade amplification._

Where either a _radio frequency transformer_, that is one without the
iron core, or an _audio frequency transformer_, that is one with the
iron core, is used to couple the amplifier tube circuits together
better results are obtained than where a high resistance grid leak is
used, but the amplifying tubes have to be more carefully shielded from
each other or they will react and set up a _howling_ noise in the head
phones. On the other hand grid leaks cost less but they are more
troublesome to use as you have to find out for yourself the exact
resistance value they must have and this you can do only by testing
them out.

A Grid Leak Amplifier Receiving Set. With Crystal Detector.--The
apparatus you need for this set includes: (1) a _loose coupled tuning
coil_, (2) a _variable condenser_, (3) _two fixed condensers_, (4) a
_crystal detector_, or better a _vacuum tube detector_, (5) an A or _6
volt storage battery_, (6) a _rheostat_, (7) a B or 22-1/2 _volt dry
cell battery_, (8) a fixed resistance unit, or _leak grid_ as it is
called, and (9) a pair of _head-phones_. The tuning coil, variable
condenser, fixed condensers, crystal detectors and head-phones are
exactly the same as those described in _Set No. 2_ in Chapter III.
The A and B batteries are exactly the same as those described in
Chapter VIII. The _vacuum tube amplifier_ and the _grid leak_ are the
only new pieces of apparatus you need and not described before.

The Vacuum Tube Amplifier.--This consists of a three electrode vacuum
tube exactly like the vacuum tube detector described in Chapter VIII
and pictured in Fig. 38, except that instead of being filled with a
non-combustible gas it is evacuated, that is, the air has been
completely pumped out of it. The gas filled tube, however, can be used
as an amplifier and either kind of tube can be used for either radio
frequency or audio frequency amplification, though with the exhausted
tube it is easier to obtain the right plate and filament voltages for
good working.

The Fixed Resistance Unit, or Grid Leak.--Grid leaks are made in
different ways but all of them have an enormously high resistance.
One way of making them consists of depositing a thin film of gold on a
sheet of mica and placing another sheet of mica on top to protect it
the whole being enclosed in a glass tube as shown at A in Fig. 42.
These grid leaks are made in units of from 50,000 ohms (.05 megohm) to
5,000,000 ohms (5 megohms) and cost from $1 to $2.

[Illustration: Fig. 42.--Grid Leaks and How to Connect Them up.]

As the _value_ of the grid leak you will need depends very largely
upon the construction of the different parts of your receiving set and
on the kind of aerial wire system you use with it you will have to try
out various resistances until you hit the right one. The resistance
that will give the best results, however, lies somewhere between
500,000 ohms (1/2 a megohm) and 3,000,000 ohms (3 megohms) and the
only way for you to find this out is to buy 1/2, 1 and 2 megohm grid
leak resistances and connect them up in different ways, as shown at B,
until you find the right value.

Assembling the Parts for a Crystal Detector Set.--Begin by laying the
various parts out on a base or a panel with the loose coupled tuning
coil on the left hand side, but with the adjustable switch of the
secondary coil on the right hand end or in front according to the way
it is made. Then place the variable condenser, the rheostat, the
crystal detector and the binding posts for the head phones in front of
and in a line with each other. Set the vacuum tube amplifier back of
the rheostat and the A and B batteries back of the parts or in any
other place that may be convenient. The fixed condensers and the grid
leak can be placed anywhere so that it will be easy to connect them in
and you are ready to wire up the set.

Connecting Up the Parts for a Crystal Detector.--First connect the
sliding contact of the primary of the tuning coil to the leading-in
wire and one of the end wires of the primary to the water pipe, as
shown in Fig. 43. Now connect the adjustable arm that makes contact
with one end of the secondary of the tuning coil to one of the posts
of the variable condenser; then connect the other post of the latter
with a post of the fixed condenser and the other post of this with the
grid of the amplifying tube.

[Illustration: Fig. 43.--Crystal Detector Receiving Set with Vacuum
Tube Amplifier (Resistance Coupled).]

Connect the first post of the variable condenser to the + or _positive
electrode_ of the A battery and its - or _negative electrode_ with the
rotating contact arm of the rheostat. Next connect one end of the
resistance coil of the rheostat to one of the posts of the amplifier
tube that leads to the filament and the other filament post to the +
or _positive electrode_ of the A battery. This done connect the
_negative_, that is, the _zinc pole_ of the B battery to the positive
electrode of the A battery and connect the _positive_, or _carbon
pole_ of the former with one end of the grid leak and connect the
other end of this to the plate of the amplifier tube.

To the end of the grid leak connected with the plate of the amplifier
tube connect the metal point of your crystal detector, the crystal of
the latter with one post of the head phones and the other post of them
with the other end of the grid leak and, finally, connect a fixed
condenser in _parallel_ with--that is across the ends of the grid
leak, all of which is shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 43.

A Grid Leak Amplifying Receiving Set With Vacuum Tube Detector.--A
better amplifying receiving set can be made than the one just
described by using a vacuum tube detector instead of the crystal
detector. This set is built up exactly like the crystal detector
described above and shown in Fig. 43 up to and including the grid leak
resistance, but shunted across the latter is a vacuum tube detector,
which is made and wired up precisely like the one shown at A in Fig.
41 in the chapter ahead of this one. The way a grid leak and vacuum
tube detector with a one-step amplifier are connected up is shown at A
in Fig. 44. Where you have a vacuum tube detector and one or more
amplifying tubes connected up, or in _cascade_ as it is called, you
can use an A, or storage battery of 6 volts for all of them as shown
at B in Fig. 44, but for every vacuum tube you use you must have a B
or 22-1/2 volt dry battery to charge the plate with.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 44--Vacuum Tube Detector Set with One Step
Amplifier (Resistance Coupled).]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 44.--Wiring Diagram for Using One A or Storage
Battery with an Amplifier and a Detector Tube.]

A Radio Frequency Transformer Amplifying Receiving Set.--Instead of
using a grid leak resistance to couple up the amplifier and detector
tube circuits you can use a _radio frequency transformer_, that is, a
transformer made like a loose coupled tuning coil, and without an iron
core, as shown in the wiring diagram at A in Fig. 45. In this set,
which gives better results than where a grid leak is used, the
amplifier tube is placed in the first oscillation circuit and the
detector tube in the second circuit.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 45.--Wiring Diagram for a Radio Frequency
Transformer Amplifying Receiving Set.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 45.--Radio Frequency Transformer.]

Since the radio frequency transformer has no iron core the high
frequency, or _radio frequency_ oscillating currents, as they are
called, surge through it and are not changed into low frequency, or
_audio frequency_ pulsating currents, until they flow through the
detector. Since the diagram shows only one amplifier and one radio
frequency transformer, it is consequently a _one step amplifier_;
however, two, three or more, amplifying tubes can be connected up by
means of an equal number of radio frequency transformers when you will
get wonderful results. Where a six step amplifier, that is, where six
amplifying tubes are connected together, or in _cascade_, the first
three are usually coupled up with radio frequency transformers and the
last three with audio frequency transformers. A radio frequency
transformer is shown at B and costs $6 to $7.

An Audio Frequency Transformer Amplifying Receiving Set.--Where audio
frequency transformers are used for stepping up the voltage of the
current of the detector and amplifier tubes, the radio frequency
current does not get into the plate circuit of the detector at all for
the reason that the iron core of the transformer chokes them off,
hence, the succeeding amplifiers operate at audio frequencies. An
audio frequency transformer is shown at A in Fig. 46 and a wiring
diagram showing how the tubes are connected in _cascade_ with the
transformers is shown at B; it is therefore a two-step audio frequency
receiving set.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 46.--Audio Frequency Transformer.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 46--Wiring Diagram for an Audio Frequency
Transformer Amplifying Receiving Set. (With Vacuum Tube Detector and
Two Step Amplifier Tubes.)]

A Six Step Amplifier Receiving Set With a Loop Aerial.--By using a
receiving set having a three step radio frequency and a three step
audio frequency, that is, a set in which there are coupled three
amplifying tubes with radio frequency transformers and three
amplifying tubes with audio frequency transformers as described under
the caption _A Radio Frequency Transformer Receiving Set_, you can use
a _loop aerial_ in your room thus getting around the difficulties--if
such there be--in erecting an out-door aerial. You can easily make a
loop aerial by winding 10 turns of _No. 14_ or _16_ copper wire about
1/16 inch apart on a wooden frame two feet on the side as shown in
Fig. 47. With this six step amplifier set and loop aerial you can
receive wave lengths of 150 to 600 meters from various high power
stations which are at considerable distances away.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 47.--Six Step Amplifier with Loop Aerial.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 47.--Efficient Regenerative Receiving Set.
(With Three Coil Loose Coupler Tuner.)]

How to Prevent Howling.--Where radio frequency or audio frequency
amplifiers are used to couple your amplifier tubes in cascade you must
take particular pains to shield them from one another in order to
prevent the _feed back_ of the currents through them, which makes the
head phones or loud speaker _howl_. To shield them from each other the
tubes should be enclosed in metal boxes and placed at least 6 inches
apart while the transformers should be set so that their cores are at
right angles to each other and these also should be not less than six
inches apart.




CHAPTER X

REGENERATIVE AMPLIFICATION RECEIVING SETS


While a vacuum tube detector has an amplifying action of its own, and
this accounts for its great sensitiveness, its amplifying action can
be further increased to an enormous extent by making the radio
frequency currents that are set up in the oscillation circuits react
on the detector.

Such currents are called _feed-back_ or _regenerative_ currents and
when circuits are so arranged as to cause the currents to flow back
through the detector tube the amplification keeps on increasing until
the capacity of the tube itself is reached. It is like using steam
over and over again in a steam turbine until there is no more energy
left in it. A system of circuits which will cause this regenerative
action to take place is known as the _Armstrong circuits_ and is so
called after the young man who discovered it.

Since the regenerative action of the radio frequency currents is
produced by the detector tube itself and which sets up an amplifying
effect without the addition of an amplifying tube, this type of
receiving set has found great favor with amateurs, while in
combination with amplifying tubes it multiplies their power
proportionately and it is in consequence used in one form or another
in all the better sets.

There are many different kinds of circuits which can be used to
produce the regenerative amplification effect while the various kinds
of tuning coils will serve for coupling them; for instance a two or
three slide single tuning coil will answer the purpose but as it does
not give good results it is not advisable to spend either time or
money on it. A better scheme is to use a loose coupler formed of two
or three honeycomb or other compact coils, while a _variocoupler_ or a
_variometer_ or two will produce the maximum regenerative action.

The Simplest Type of Regenerative Receiving Set. With Loose Coupled
Tuning Coil.--While this regenerative set is the simplest that will
give anything like fair results it is here described not on account of
its desirability, but because it will serve to give you the
fundamental idea of how the _feed-back_ circuit is formed.

For this set you need: (1) a _loose-coupled tuning coil_ such as
described in Chapter III, (2) a _variable condenser_ of _.001 mfd._
(microfarad) capacitance; (3) one _fixed condenser_ of _.001 mfd._;
(4) one _fixed condenser_ for the grid leak circuit of _.00025 mfd._;
(5) a _grid leak_ of 1/2 to 2 megohms resistance; (6) a _vacuum tube
detector_; (7) an _A 6 volt battery_; (8) a _rheostat_; (9) a _B 22
1/2 volt battery_; and (10) a pair of _2000 ohm head phones_.

Connecting Up the Parts.--Begin by connecting the leading-in wire of
the aerial with the binding post end of the primary coil of the loose
coupler as shown in the wiring diagram Fig. 48 and then connect the
sliding contact with the water pipe or other ground. Connect the
binding post end of the primary coil with one post of the variable
condenser, connect the other post of this with one of the posts of the
_.00025 mfd._ condenser and the other end of this with the grid of the
detector tube; then around this condenser shunt the grid leak
resistance.

[Illustration: Fig. 48.--Simple Regenerative Receiving Set. (With
Loose Coupler Tuner.)]

Next connect the sliding contact of the primary coil with the other
post of the variable condenser and from this lead a wire on over to
one of the terminals of the filament of the vacuum tube; to the other
terminal of the filament connect one of the posts of the rheostat and
connect the other post to the - or negative electrode of the A
battery and then connect the + or positive electrode of it to the
other terminal of the filament.

Connect the + or positive electrode of the A battery with one post of
the .001 mfd. fixed condenser and connect the other post of this to
one of the ends of the secondary coil of the tuning coil and which is
now known as the _tickler coil_; then connect the other end of the
secondary, or tickler coil to the plate of the vacuum tube. In the
wiring diagram the secondary, or tickler coil is shown above and in a
line with the primary coil but this is only for the sake of making the
connections clear; in reality the secondary, or tickler coil slides to
and fro in the primary coil as shown and described in Chapter III.
Finally connect the _negative_, or zinc pole of the _B battery_ to one
side of the fixed condenser, the _positive_, or carbon, pole to one of
the terminals of the head phones and the other terminal of this to the
other post of the fixed condenser when your regenerative set is
complete.

An Efficient Regenerative Receiving Set. With Three Coil Loose
Coupler.--To construct a really good regenerative set you must use a
loose coupled tuner that has three coils, namely a _primary_, a
_secondary_ and a _tickler coil_. A tuner of this kind is made like an
ordinary loose coupled tuning coil but it has a _third_ coil as shown
at A and B in Fig. 49. The middle coil, which is the _secondary_, is
fixed to the base, and the large outside coil, which is the _primary_,
is movable, that is it slides to and fro over the middle coil, while
the small inside coil, which is the _tickler_, is also movable and can
slide in or out of the middle _coil_. None of these coils is variable;
all are wound to receive waves up to 360 meters in length when used
with a variable condenser of _.001 mfd_. capacitance. In other words
you slide the coils in and out to get the right amount of coupling and
you tune by adjusting the variable condenser to get the exact wave
length you want.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 49.--Diagram of a Three Coil Coupler.]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 49.--Three Coil Loose Coupler Tuner.]

With Compact Coils.--Compact coil tuners are formed of three fixed
inductances wound in flat coils, and these are pivoted in a mounting
so that the distance between them and, therefore, the coupling, can be
varied, as shown at A in Fig. 50. These coils are wound up by the
makers for various wave lengths ranging from a small one that will
receive waves of any length up to 360 meters to a large one that has a
maximum of 24,000 meters. For an amateur set get three of the smallest
coils when you can not only hear amateur stations that send on a 200
meter wave but broadcasting stations that send on a 360 meter wave.

[Illustration: Fig. 50.--Honeycomb Inductance Coil.]

These three coils are mounted with panel plugs which latter fit into a
stand, or mounting, so that the middle coil is fixed, that is,
stationary, while the two outside coils can be swung to and fro like a
door; this scheme permits small variations of coupling to be had
between the coils and this can be done either by handles or by means
of knobs on a panel board. While I have suggested the use of the
smallest size coils, you can get and use those wound for any wave
length you want to receive and when those are connected with
variometers and variable condensers, and with a proper aerial, you
will have a highly efficient receptor that will work over all ranges
of wave lengths. The smallest size coils cost about $1.50 apiece and
the mounting costs about $6 or $7 each.

The A Battery Potentiometer.--This device is simply a resistance like
the rheostat described in connection with the preceding vacuum tube
receiving sets but it is wound to 200 or 300 ohms resistance as
against 1-1/2 to 6 ohms of the rheostat. It is, however, used as well
as the rheostat. With a vacuum tube detector, and especially with one
having a gas-content, a potentiometer is very necessary as it is only
by means of it that the potential of the plate of the detector can be
accurately regulated. The result of proper regulation is that when the
critical potential value is reached there is a marked increase in the
loudness of the sounds that are emitted by the head phones.

As you will see from A in Fig. 51 it has three taps. The two taps
which are connected with the ends of the resistance coil are shunted
around the A battery and the third tap, which is attached to the
movable contact arm, is connected with the B battery tap, see B, at
which this battery gives 18 volts. Since the A battery gives 6 volts
you can vary the potential of the plate from 18 to 24 volts. The
potentiometer must never be shunted around the B battery or the latter
will soon run down. A potentiometer costs a couple of dollars.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 51.--The Use of the Potentiometer.]

The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.--For this regenerative set you
will need: (1) a _honeycomb_ or other compact _three-coil tuner_, (2)
two _variable_ (_.001_ and _.0005 mfd_.) _condensers_; (3) a _.00025
mfd. fixed condenser_; (4) a _1/2 to 2 megohm grid leak_; (5) a _tube
detector_; (6) a _6 volt A battery_; (7) _a rheostat_; (8) a
_potentiometer_; (9) an _18_ or _20 volt B battery_; (10) a _fixed
condenser_ of _.001 mfd. fixed condenser_; and (11) a _pair of 2000
ohm head phones_.

To wire up the parts connect the leading-in wire of the aerial with
the primary coil, which is the middle one of the tuner, and connect
the other terminal with the ground. Connect the ends of the secondary
coil, which is the middle one, with the posts of the variable
condenser and connect one of the posts of the latter with one post of
the fixed .00025 mfd. condenser and the other post of this with the
grid; then shunt the grid leak around it. Next connect the other post
of the variable condenser to the - or _negative_ electrode of the _A
battery_; the + or _positive_ electrode of this to one terminal of the
detector filament and the other end of the latter to the electrode of
the A battery.

Now connect one end of the tickler coil with the detector plate and
the other post to the fixed .001 mfd. condenser, then the other end of
this to the positive or carbon pole of the B battery.

This done shunt the potentiometer around the A battery and run a wire
from the movable contact of it (the potentiometer) over to the 18 volt
tap, (see B, Fig. 51), of the B battery.

Finally, shunt the head phones and the .001 mfd. fixed condenser and
you are ready to try out conclusions.

A Regenerative Audio Frequency Amplifier Receiving Set.--The use of
amateur regenerative cascade audio frequency receiving sets is getting
to be quite common. To get the greatest amplification possible with
amplifying tubes you have to keep a negative potential on the grids.
You can, however, get very good results without any special charging
arrangement by simply connecting one post of the rheostat with the
negative terminal of the filament and connecting the _low potential_
end of the secondary of the tuning coil with the - or negative
electrode of the A battery. This scheme will give the grids a negative
bias of about 1 volt. You do not need to bother about these added
factors that make for high efficiency until after you have got your
receiving set in working order and understand all about it.

The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.--Exactly the same parts are
needed for this set as the one described above, but in addition you
will want: (1) two more _rheostats_; (2) _two_ more sets of B 22-1/2
_volt batteries_; (3) _two amplifier tubes_, and (4) _two audio
frequency transformers_ as described in Chapter IX and pictured at A
in Fig. 46.

To wire up the parts begin by connecting the leading-in wire to one
end of the primary of the tuning coil and then connect the other end
of the coil with the ground. A variable condenser of .001 mfd.
capacitance can be connected in the ground wire, as shown in Fig. 52,
to good advantage although it is not absolutely needed. Now connect
one end of the secondary coil to one post of a _.001 mfd._ variable
condenser and the other end of the secondary to the other post of the
condenser.

[Illustration: Fig. 52.--Regenerative Audio Frequency Amplifier
Receiving Set.]

Next bring a lead (wire) from the first post of the variable condenser
over to the post of the first fixed condenser and connect the other
post of the latter with the grid of the detector tube. Shunt 1/2 to 2
megohm grid leak resistance around the fixed condenser and then
connect the second post of the variable condenser to one terminal of
the detector tube filament. Run this wire on over and connect it with
the first post of the second rheostat, the second post of which is
connected with one terminal of the filament of the first amplifying
tube; then connect the first post of the rheostat with one end of the
secondary coil of the first audio frequency transformer, and the other
end of this coil with the grid of the first amplifier tube.

Connect the lead that runs from the second post of variable condenser
to the first post of the third rheostat, the second post of which is
connected with one terminal of the second amplifying tube; then
connect the first post of the rheostat with one end of the secondary
coil of the second audio frequency transformer and the other end of
this coil with the grid of the second amplifier tube.

This done connect the - or negative electrode of the A battery
with the second post of the variable condenser and connect the + or
positive electrode with the free post of the first rheostat, the other
post of which connects with the free terminal of the filament of the
detector. From this lead tap off a wire and connect it to the free
terminal of the filament of the first amplifier tube, and finally
connect the end of the lead with the free terminal of the filament of
the second amplifier tube.

Next shunt a potentiometer around the A battery and connect the
third post, which connects with the sliding contact, to the negative
or zinc pole of a B battery, then connect the positive or
carbon pole of it to the negative or zinc pole of a second B
battery and the positive or carbon pole of the latter with one end of
the primary coil of the second audio frequency transformer and the
other end of it to the plate of the first amplifying tube. Run the
lead on over and connect it to one of the terminals of the second
fixed condenser and the other terminal of this with the plate of the
second amplifying tube. Then shunt the headphones around the
condenser.

Finally connect one end of the tickler coil of the tuner with the
plate of the detector tube and connect the other end of the tickler to
one end of the primary coil of the first audio frequency transformer
and the other end of it to the wire that connects the two B
batteries together.




CHAPTER XI

SHORT WAVE REGENERATIVE RECEIVING SETS


A _short wave receiving set_ is one that will receive a range of
wave lengths of from 150 to 600 meters while the distance over which
the waves can be received as well as the intensity of the sounds
reproduced by the headphones depends on: (1) whether it is a
regenerative set and (2) whether it is provided with amplifying tubes.

High-grade regenerative sets designed especially for receiving amateur
sending stations that must use a short wave length are built on the
regenerative principle just like those described in the last chapter
and further amplification can be had by the use of amplifier tubes as
explained in Chapter IX, but the new feature of these sets is the use
of the _variocoupler_ and one or more _variometers_. These tuning
devices can be connected up in different ways and are very popular
with amateurs at the present time.

Differing from the ordinary loose coupler the variometer has no
movable contacts while the variometer is provided with taps so that
you can connect it up for the wave length you want to receive. All you
have to do is to tune the oscillation circuits to each other is to
turn the _rotor_, which is the secondary coil, around in the _stator_,
as the primary coil is called in order to get a very fine variation of
the wave length. It is this construction that makes _sharp tuning_
with these sets possible, by which is meant that all wave lengths are
tuned out except the one which the receiving set is tuned for.

A Short Wave Regenerative Receiver--With One Variometer and Three
Variable Condensers.--This set also includes a variocoupler and a
_grid coil_. The way that the parts are connected together makes it a
simple and at the same time a very efficient regenerative receiver for
short waves. While this set can be used without shielding the parts
from each other the best results are had when shields are used.

The parts you need for this set include: (1) one _variocoupler_; (2)
one _.001 microfarad variable condenser_; (3) one _.0005 microfarad
variable condenser_; (4) one _.0007 microfarad variable condenser_;
(5) _one 2 megohm grid leak_; (6) one _vacuum tube detector_; (7) one
_6 volt A battery_; (8) one _6 ohm_, 1-1/2 _ampere rheostat_; (9) one
_200 ohm potentiometer_; (10) one 22-1/2 _volt B battery_; (11) one
_.001 microfarad fixed condenser_, (12) one pair of _2,000 ohm
headphones_, and (13) a _variometer_.

The Variocoupler.--A variocoupler consists of a primary coil wound on
the outside of a tube of insulating material and to certain turns of
this taps are connected so that you can fix the wave length which your
aerial system is to receive from the shortest wave; i.e., 150 meters
on up by steps to the longest wave, i.e., 600 meters, which is the
range of most amateur variocouplers that are sold in the open market.
This is the part of the variocoupler that is called the _stator_.

The secondary coil is wound on the section of a ball mounted on a
shaft and this is swung in bearings on the stator so that it can turn
in it. This part of the variocoupler is called the _rotor_ and is
arranged so that it can be mounted on a panel and adjusted by means of
a knob or a dial. A diagram of a variocoupler is shown at A in Fig.
53, and the coupler itself at B. There are various makes and
modifications of variocouplers on the market but all of them are about
the same price which is $6.00 or $8.00.

[Illustration: Fig. 53.--How the Variocoupler is Made and Works.]

The Variometer.--This device is quite like the variocoupler, but with
these differences: (1) the rotor turns in the stator, which is also
the section of a ball, and (2) one end of the primary is connected
with one end of the secondary coil. To be really efficient a
variometer must have a small resistance and a large inductance as well
as a small dielectric loss. To secure the first two of these factors
the wire should be formed of a number of fine, pure copper wires each
of which is insulated and the whole strand then covered with silk.
This kind of wire is the best that has yet been devised for the
purpose and is sold under the trade name of _litzendraht_.

A new type of variometer has what is known as a _basket weave_, or
_wavy wound_ stator and rotor. There is no wood, insulating compound
or other dielectric materials in large enough quantities to absorb the
weak currents that flow between them, hence weaker sounds can be heard
when this kind of a variometer is used. With it you can tune sharply
to waves under 200 meters in length and up to and including wave
lengths of 360 meters. When amateur stations of small power are
sending on these short waves this style of variometer keeps the
electric oscillations at their greatest strength and, hence, the
reproduced sounds will be of maximum intensity. A wiring diagram of a
variometer is shown at A in Fig. 54 and a _basketball_ variometer is
shown complete at B.

[Illustration: Fig. 54.--How the Variometer is Made and Works.]

Connecting Up the Parts.--To hook-up the set connect the leading-in
wire to one end of the primary coil, or stator, of the variocoupler
and solder a wire to one of the taps that gives the longest wave
length you want to receive. Connect the other end of this wire with
one post of a .001 microfarad variable condenser and connect the other
post with the ground as shown in Fig. 55. Now connect one end of the
secondary coil, or rotor, to one post of a .0007 mfd. variable
condenser, the other post of this to one end of the grid coil and the
other end of this with the remaining end of the rotor of the
variocoupler.

[Illustration: Fig. 55.--Short Wave Regenerative Receiving Set (one
Variometer and three Variable Condensers.)]

Next connect one post of the .0007 mfd. condenser with one of the
terminals of the detector filament; then connect the other post of
this condenser with one post of the .0005 mfd. variable condenser and
the other post of this with the grid of the detector, then shunt the
megohm grid leak around the latter condenser. This done connect the
other terminal of the filament to one post of the rheostat, the other
post of this to the - or negative electrode of the 6 volt A
battery and the + or positive electrode of the latter to the other
terminal of the filament.

Shunt the potentiometer around the A battery and connect the sliding
contact with the - or zinc pole of the B battery and the + or carbon
pole with one terminal of the headphone; connect the other terminal to
one of the posts of the variometer and the other post of the
variometer to the plate of the detector. Finally shunt a .001 mfd.
fixed condenser around the headphones. If you want to amplify the
current with a vacuum tube amplifier connect in the terminals of the
amplifier circuit shown at A in Figs. 44 or 45 at the point where
they are connected with the secondary coil of the loose coupled tuning
coil, in those diagrams with the binding posts of Fig. 55 where the
phones are usually connected in.

Short Wave Regenerative Receiver. With Two Variometers and Two
Variable Condensers.--This type of regenerative receptor is very
popular with amateurs who are using high-grade short-wave sets. When
you connect up this receptor you must keep the various parts well
separated. Screw the variocoupler to the middle of the base board or
panel, and secure the variometers on either side of it so that the
distance between them will be 9 or 10 inches. By so placing them the
coupling will be the same on both sides and besides you can shield
them from each other easier.

For the shield use a sheet of copper on the back of the panel and
place a sheet of copper between the parts, or better, enclose the
variometers and detector and amplifying tubes if you use the latter in
sheet copper boxes. When you set up the variometers place them so that
their stators are at right angles to each other for otherwise the
magnetic lines of force set up by the coils of each one will be
mutually inductive and this will make the headphones or loud speaker
_howl_. Whatever tendency the receptor has to howl with this
arrangement can be overcome by putting in a grid leak of the right
resistance and adjusting the condenser.

The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.--For this set you require: (1)
one _variocoupler_; (2) two _variometers_; (3) one _.001 microfarad
variable condenser_; (4) one _.0005 microfarad variable condenser_;
(5) one _2 megohm grid leak resistance_; (6) one _vacuum tube
detector_; (7) one _6 volt A battery_; (8) one _200 ohm
potentiometer_; (9) one _22-1/2 volt B battery_; (10) one _.001
microfarad fixed condenser_, and (11) one pair of _2,000 ohm
headphones_.

To wire up the set begin by connecting the leading-in wire to the
fixed end of the primary coil, or _stator_, of the variocoupler, as
shown in Fig. 56, and connect one post of the .001 mfd. variable
condenser to the stator by soldering a short length of wire to the tap
of the latter that gives the longest wave you want to receive. Now
connect one end of the secondary coil, or _rotor_, of the variocoupler
with one post of the .0005 mfd. variable condenser and the other part
to the grid of the detector tube. Connect the other end of the rotor
of the variocoupler to one of the posts of the first variometer and
the other post of this to one of the terminals of the detector
filament.

[Illustration: Fig. 56.--Short Wave Regenerative Receiving Set (two
Variometers and two Variable Condensers.)]

Connect this filament terminal with the - or negative electrode of the
A battery and the + or positive electrode of this with one post
of the rheostat and lead a wire from the other post to the free
terminal of the filament. This done shunt the potential around the
A battery and connect the sliding contact to the - or zinc pole
of the B battery and the + or carbon pole of this to one
terminal of the headphones, while the other terminal of this leads to
one of the posts of the second variometer, the other post of which is
connected to the plate of the detector tube. If you want to add an
amplifier tube then connect it to the posts instead of the headphones
as described in the foregoing set.




CHAPTER XII

INTERMEDIATE AND LONG WAVE REGENERATIVE RECEIVING SETS


All receiving sets that receive over a range of wave lengths of from
150 meters to 3,000 meters are called _intermediate wave sets_ and all
sets that receive wave lengths over a range of anything more than
3,000 meters are called _long wave sets_. The range of intermediate
wave receptors is such that they will receive amateur, broadcasting,
ship and shore Navy, commercial, Arlington's time and all other
stations using _spark telegraph damped waves_ or _arc_ or _vacuum tube
telephone continuous waves_ but not _continuous wave telegraph
signals_, unless these have been broken up into groups at the
transmitting station. To receive continuous wave telegraph signals
requires receiving sets of special kind and these will be described in
the next chapter.

Intermediate Wave Receiving Sets.--There are two chief schemes
employed to increase the range of wave lengths that a set can receive
and these are by using: (1) _loading coils_ and _shunt condensers_,
and (2) _bank-wound coils_ and _variable condensers_. If you have a
short-wave set and plan to receive intermediate waves with it then
loading coils and fixed condensers shunted around them affords you the
way to do it, but if you prefer to buy a new receptor then the better
way is to get one with bank-wound coils and variable condensers; this
latter way preserves the electrical balance of the oscillation
circuits better, the electrical losses are less and the tuning easier
and sharper.

Intermediate Wave Set With Loading Coils.--For this intermediate wave
set you can use either of the short-wave sets described in the
foregoing chapter. For the loading coils use _honeycomb coils_, or
other good compact inductance coils, as shown in Chapter X and having
a range of whatever wave length you wish to receive. The following
table shows the range of wave length of the various sized coils when
used with a variable condenser having a .001 microfarad _capacitance_,
the approximate _inductance_ of each coil in _millihenries_ and prices
at the present writing:

TABLE OF CHARACTERISTICS OF HONEYCOMB COILS

                     Approximate Wave
                   Length in Meters in

  Millihenries
  Inductance         .001 mfd. Variable           Mounted
    Appx.              Air Condenser.            on Plug

     .040                130--  375               $1.40

     .075                180--  515                1.40

     .15                 240--  730                1.50

     .3                  330-- 1030                1.50

     .6                  450-- 1460                1.55

    1.3                  660-- 2200                1.60

    2.3                  930-- 2850                1.65

    4.5                 1300-- 4000                1.70

    6.5                 1550-- 4800                1.75

   11.                  2050-- 6300                1.80

   20.                  3000-- 8500                2.00

   40.                  4000--12000                2.15

   65.                  5000--15000                2.35

  100.                  6200--19000                2.60

  125.                  7000--21000                3.00

  175.                  8200--24000                3.50

These and other kinds of compact coils can be bought at electrical
supply houses that sell wireless goods. If your aerial is not very
high or long you can use loading coils, but to get anything like
efficient results with them you must have an aerial of large
capacitance and the only way to get this is to put up a high and long
one with two or more parallel wires spaced a goodly distance apart.

The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.--Get (1) _two honeycomb or other
coils_ of the greatest wave length you want to receive, for in order
to properly balance the aerial, or primary oscillation circuit, and
the closed, or secondary oscillation circuit, you have to tune them to
the same wave length; (2) two _.001 mfd. variable condensers_, though
fixed condensers will do, and (3) two small _single-throw double-pole
knife switches_ mounted on porcelain bases.

To use the loading coils all you have to do is to connect one of them
in the aerial above the primary coil of the loose coupler, or
variocoupler as shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 57, then shunt one
of the condensers around it and connect one of the switches around
this; this switch enables you to cut in or out the loading coil at
will. Likewise connect the other loading coil in one side of the
closed, or secondary circuit between the variable .0007 mfd. condenser
and the secondary coil of the loose coupler or variocoupler as shown
in Fig. 53. The other connections are exactly the same as shown in
Figs. 44 and 45.

[Illustration: Fig. 57.--Wiring Diagram Showing Fixed Loading Coils
for Intermediate Wave Set.]

An Intermediate Wave Set With Variocoupler Inductance Coils.--By using
the coil wound on the rotor of the variocoupler as the tickler the
coupling between the detector tube circuits and the aerial wire system
increases as the set is tuned for greater wave lengths. This scheme
makes the control of the regenerative circuit far more stable than it
is where an ordinary loose coupled tuning coil is used.

When the variocoupler is adjusted for receiving very long waves the
rotor sets at right angles to the stator and, since when it is in this
position there is no mutual induction between them, the tickler coil
serves as a loading coil for the detector plate oscillation circuit.
Inductance coils for short wave lengths are usually wound in single
layers but _bank-wound coils_, as they are called are necessary to get
compactness where long wave lengths are to be received. By winding
inductance coils with two or more layers the highest inductance values
can be obtained with the least resistance. A wiring diagram of a
multipoint inductance coil is shown in Fig. 58. You can buy this
intermediate wave set assembled and ready to use or get the parts and
connect them up yourself.

[Illustration: Fig. 58.--Wiring Diagram for Intermediate Wave Receptor
with one Variocoupler and 12 section Bank-wound Inductance Coil.]

The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.--For this regenerative
intermediate wave set get: (1) one _12 section triple bank-wound
inductance coil_, (2) one _variometer_, and (3) all the other parts
shown in the diagram Fig. 58 except the variocoupler. First connect
the free end of the condenser in the aerial to one of the terminals of
the stator of the variocoupler; then connect the other terminal of the
stator with one of the ends of the bank-wound inductance coil and
connect the movable contact of this with the ground.

Next connect a wire to the aerial between the variable condenser and
the stator and connect this to one post of a .0005 microfarad fixed
condenser, then connect the other post of this with the grid of the
detector and shunt a 2 megohm grid leak around it. Connect a wire to
the ground wire between the bank-wound inductance coil and the ground
proper, i.e., the radiator or water pipe, connect the other end of
this to the + electrode of the A battery and connect this end also to
one of the terminals of the filament. This done connect the other
terminal of the filament to one post of the rheostat and the other
post of this to the - or negative side of the A battery.

To the + electrode of the A battery connect the - or zinc pole of the
B battery and connect the + or carbon pole of the latter with one post
of the fixed .001 microfarad condenser. This done connect one terminal
of the tickler coil which is on the rotor of the variometer to the
plate of the detector and the other terminal of the tickler to the
other post of the .001 condenser and around this shunt your
headphones. Or if you want to use one or more amplifying tubes connect
the circuit of the first one, see Fig. 45, to the posts on either side
of the fixed condenser instead of the headphones.

A Long Wave Receiving Set.--The vivid imagination of Jules Verne never
conceived anything so fascinating as the reception of messages without
wires sent out by stations half way round the world; and in these days
of high power cableless stations on the five continents you can
listen-in to the messages and hear what is being sent out by the
Lyons, Paris and other French stations, by Great Britain, Italy,
Germany and even far off Russia and Japan.

A long wave set for receiving these stations must be able to tune to
wave lengths up to 20,000 meters. Differing from the way in which the
regenerative action of the short wave sets described in the preceding
chapter is secured and which depends on a tickler coil and the
coupling action of the detector in this long wave set, [Footnote: All
of the short wave and intermediate wave receivers described, are
connected up according to the wiring diagram used by the A. H. Grebe
Company, Richmond Hill, Long Island, N. Y.] this action is obtained by
the use of a tickler coil in the plate circuit which is inductively
coupled to the grid circuit and this feeds back the necessary amount
of current. This is a very good way to connect up the circuits for the
reason that: (1) the wiring is simplified, and (2) it gives a single
variable adjustment for the entire range of wave lengths the receptor
is intended to cover.

The Parts and How to Connect Them Up.--The two chief features as far
as the parts are concerned of this long wave length receiving set are
(1) the _variable condensers_, and (2) the _tuning inductance coils_.
The variable condenser used in series with the aerial wire system has
26 plates and is equal to a capacitance of _.0008 mfd._ which is the
normal aerial capacitance. The condenser used in the secondary coil
circuit has 14 plates and this is equal to a capacitance of _.0004
mfd_.

There are a number of inductance coils and these are arranged so that
they can be connected in or cut out and combinations are thus formed
which give a high efficiency and yet allow them to be compactly
mounted. The inductance coils of the aerial wire system and those of
the secondary coil circuit are practically alike. For wave lengths up
to 2,200 meters _bank litz-wound coils_ are used and these are
wound up in 2, 4 and 6 banks in order to give the proper degree of
coupling and inductance values.

Where wave lengths of more than 2,200 meters are to be received
_coto-coils_ are used as these are the "last word" in inductance coil
design, and are especially adapted for medium as well as long wave
lengths. [Footnote: Can be had of the Coto Coil Co., Providence, R. I.]
These various coils are cut in and out by means of two five-point
switches which are provided with auxiliary levers and contactors for
_dead-ending_ the right amount of the coils. In cutting in coils for
increased wave lengths, that is from 10,000 to 20,000 meters, all of
the coils of the aerial are connected in series as well as all of the
coils of the secondary circuit. The connections for a long wave
receptor are shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 59.

[Illustration: Fig. 59.--Wiring Diagram Showing Long Wave Receptor
with Variocouplers and Bank-wound Inductance Coils]




CHAPTER XIII

HETERODYNE OR BEAT LONG WAVE TELEGRAPH RECEIVING SET


Any of the receiving sets described in the foregoing chapters will
respond to either: (1) a wireless telegraph transmitter that uses a
spark gap and which sends out periodic electric waves, or to (2) a
wireless telephone transmitter that uses an arc or a vacuum tube
oscillator and which sends out continuous electric waves. To receive
wireless _telegraph_ signals, however, from a transmitter that uses an
arc or a vacuum tube oscillator and which sends out continuous waves,
either the transmitter or the receptor must be so constructed that the
continuous waves will be broken up into groups of audio frequency and
this is done in several different ways.

There are four different ways employed at the present time to break up
the continuous waves of a wireless telegraph transmitter into groups
and these are: (_a_) the _heterodyne_, or _beat_, method, in which
waves of different lengths are impressed on the received waves and so
produces beats; (_b_) the _tikker_, or _chopper_ method, in which the
high frequency currents are rapidly broken up; (_c_) the variable
condenser method, in which the movable plates are made to rapidly
rotate; (_d_) the _tone wheel_, or _frequency transformer_, as it is
often called, and which is really a modified form of and an
improvement on the tikker. The heterodyne method will be described in
this chapter.

What the Heterodyne or Beat Method Is.--The word _heterodyne_ was
coined from the Greek words _heteros_ which means _other_, or
_different_, and _dyne_ which means _power_; in other words it means
when used in connection with a wireless receptor that another and
different high frequency current is used besides the one that is
received from the sending station. In music a _beat_ means a regularly
recurrent swelling caused by the reinforcement of a sound and this is
set up by the interference of sound waves which have slightly
different periods of vibration as, for instance, when two tones take
place that are not quite in tune with each other. This, then, is the
principle of the heterodyne, or beat, receptor.

In the heterodyne, or beat method, separate sustained oscillations,
that are just about as strong as those of the incoming waves, are set
up in the receiving circuits and their frequency is just a little
higher or a little lower than those that are set up by the waves
received from the distant transmitter. The result is that these
oscillations of different frequencies interfere and reinforce each
other when _beats_ are produced, the period of which is slow enough to
be heard in the headphones, hence the incoming signals can be heard
only when waves from the sending station are being received. A fuller
explanation of how this is done will be found in Chapter XV.

The Autodyne or Self-Heterodyne Long-Wave Receiving Set.--This is the
simplest type of heterodyne receptor and it will receive periodic
waves from spark telegraph transmitters or continuous waves from an
arc or vacuum tube telegraph transmitter. In this type of receptor the
detector tube itself is made to set up the _heterodyne oscillations_
which interfere with those that are produced by the incoming waves
that are a little out of tune with it.

With a long wave _autodyne_, or _self-heterodyne_ receptor, as this
type is called, and a two-step audio-frequency amplifier you can
clearly hear many of the cableless stations of Europe and others that
send out long waves. For receiving long wave stations, however, you
must have a long aerial--a single wire 200 or more feet in length will
do--and the higher it is the louder will be the signals. Where it is
not possible to put the aerial up a hundred feet or more above the
ground, you can use a lower one and still get messages in
_International Morse_ fairly strong.

The Parts and Connections of an Autodyne, or Self-Heterodyne,
Receiving Set.--For this long wave receiving set you will need: (1)
one _variocoupler_ with the primary coil wound on the stator and the
secondary coil and tickler coil wound on the rotor, or you can use
three honeycomb or other good compact coils of the longest wave you
want to receive, a table of which is given in Chapter XII; (2) two
_.001 mfd. variable condensers_; (3) one _.0005 mfd. variable
condenser_; (4) one _.5 to 2 megohm grid leak resistance_; (5) one
_vacuum tube detector_; (6) one _A battery_; (7) one _rheostat_; (8)
one _B battery_; (9) one _potentiometer_; (10) one _.001 mfd. fixed
condenser_ and (11) one pair of _headphones_. For the two-step
amplifier you must, of course, have besides the above parts the
amplifier tubes, variable condensers, batteries rheostats,
potentiometers and fixed condensers as explained in Chapter IX. The
connections for the autodyne, or self-heterodyne, receiving set are
shown in Fig. 60.

[Illustration: Fig. 60.--Wiring Diagram of Long Wave Antodyne, or
Self-Heterodyne Receptor.]

The Separate Heterodyne Long Wave Receiving Set.--This is a better
long wave receptor than the self heterodyne set described above for
receiving wireless telegraph signals sent out by a continuous long
wave transmitter. The great advantage of using a separate vacuum tube
to generate the heterodyne oscillations is that you can make the
frequency of the oscillations just what you want it to be and hence
you can make it a little higher or a little lower than the
oscillations set up by the received waves.

The Parts and Connections of a Separate Heterodyne Long Wave Receiving
Set.--The parts required for this long wave receiving set are: (1)
four honeycomb or other good _compact inductance_ coils of the longest
wave length that you want to receive; (2) three _.001 mfd. variable
condensers_; (3) one _.0005 mfd. variable condenser_; (4) one _1
megohm grid leak resistance_; (5) one _vacuum tube detector_; (6) one
_A battery_; (7) two rheostats; (8) two _B batteries_, one of which is
supplied with taps; (9) one _potentiometer_; (10) one _vacuum tube
amplifier_, for setting up the heterodyne oscillations; (11) a pair of
_headphones_ and (12) all of the parts for a _two-step amplifier_ as
detailed in Chapter IX, that is if you are going to use amplifiers.
The connections are shown in Fig. 61.

[Illustration: Fig. 61.--Wiring Diagram of Long Wave Separate
Heterodyne Receiving Set.]

In using either of these heterodyne receivers be sure to carefully
adjust the B battery by means of the potentiometer.

[Footnote: The amplifier tube in this case is used as a generator of
oscillations.]




CHAPTER XIV

HEADPHONES AND LOUD SPEAKERS


Wireless Headphones.--A telephone receiver for a wireless receiving
set is made exactly on the same principle as an ordinary Bell
telephone receiver. The only difference between them is that the
former is made flat and compact so that a pair of them can be fastened
together with a band and worn on the head (when it is called a
_headset_), while the latter is long and cylindrical so that it can be
held to the ear. A further difference between them is that the
wireless headphone is made as sensitive as possible so that it will
respond to very feeble currents, while the ordinary telephone receiver
is far from being sensitive and will respond only to comparatively
large currents.

How a Bell Telephone Receiver Is Made.--An ordinary telephone receiver
consists of three chief parts and these are: (1) a hard-rubber, or
composition, shell and cap, (2) a permanent steel bar magnet on one
end of which is wound a coil of fine insulated copper wire, and (3) a
soft iron disk, or _diaphragm_, all of which are shown in the
cross-section in Fig. 62. The bar magnet is securely fixed inside of
the handle so that the outside end comes to within about 1/32 of an
inch of the diaphragm when this is laid on top of the shell and the
cap is screwed on.

[Illustration: Fig. 62.--Cross-section of Bell telephone Receiver.]

[Illustration: original © Underwood and Underwood. Alexander Graham
Bell, Inventor of the Telephone, now an ardent Radio Enthusiast.]

The ends of the coil of wire are connected with two binding posts
which are in the end of the shell, but are shown in the picture at the
sides for the sake of clearness. This coil usually has a resistance of
about 75 ohms and the meaning of the _ohmic resistance_ of a receiver
and its bearing on the sensitiveness of it will be explained a little
farther along. After the disk, or diaphragm, which is generally made
of thin, soft sheet iron that has been tinned or japanned, [Footnote:
A disk of photographic tin-type plate is generally used.] is placed
over the end of the magnet, the cap, which has a small opening in it,
is screwed on and the receiver is ready to use.

How a Wireless Headphone Is Made.--For wireless work a receiver of the
watch-case type is used and nearly always two such receivers are
connected with a headband. It consists of a permanent bar magnet bent
so that it will fit into the shell of the receiver as shown at A in
Fig. 63.

[Illustration: Fig. 63.--Wireless Headphone.]

The ends of this magnet, which are called _poles_, are bent up, and
hence this type is called a _bipolar_ receiver. The magnets are wound
with fine insulated wire as before and the diaphragm is held securely
in place over them by screwing on the cap.

About Resistance, Turns of Wire and Sensitivity of Headphones.--If you
are a beginner in wireless you will hear those who are experienced
speak of a telephone receiver as having a resistance of 75 ohms, 1,000
ohms, 2,000 or 3,000 ohms, as the case may be; from this you will
gather that the higher the resistance of the wire on the magnets the
more sensitive the receiver is. In a sense this is true, but it is not
the resistance of the magnet coils that makes it sensitive, in fact,
it cuts down the current, but it is the _number of turns_ of wire on
them that determines its sensitiveness; it is easy to see that this is
so, for the larger the number of turns the more often will the same
current flow round the cores of the magnet and so magnetize them to a
greater extent.

But to wind a large number of turns of wire close enough to the cores
to be effective the wire must be very small and so, of course, the
higher the resistance will be. Now the wire used for winding good
receivers is usually No. 40, and this has a diameter of .0031 inch;
consequently, when you know the ohmic resistance you get an idea of
the number of turns of wire and from this you gather in a general way
what the sensitivity of the receiver is.

A receiver that is sensitive enough for wireless work should be wound
to not less than 1,000 ohms (this means each ear phone), while those
of a better grade are wound to as high as 3,000 ohms for each one. A
high-grade headset is shown in Fig. 64. Each phone of a headset should
be wound to the same resistance, and these are connected in series as
shown. Where two or more headsets are used with one wireless receiving
set they must all be of the same resistance and connected in series,
that is, the coils of one head set are connected with the coils of the
next head set and so on to form a continuous circuit.

[Illustration: Fig. 64.--Wireless Headphone.]

The Impedance of Headphones.--When a current is flowing through a
circuit the material of which the wire is made not only opposes its
passage--this is called its _ohmic resistance_--but a
_counter-electromotive force_ to the current is set up due to the
inductive effects of the current on itself and this is called
_impedance_. Where a wire is wound in a coil the impedance of the
circuit is increased and where an alternating current is used the
impedance grows greater as the frequency gets higher. The impedance of
the magnet coils of a receiver is so great for high frequency
oscillations that the latter cannot pass through them; in other words,
they are choked off.

How the Headphones Work.--As you will see from the cross-sections in
Figs. 62 and 63 there is no connection, electrical or mechanical,
between the diaphragm and the other parts of the receiver. Now when
either feeble oscillations, which have been rectified by a detector,
or small currents from a B battery, flow through the magnet coils the
permanent steel magnet is energized to a greater extent than when no
current is flowing through it. This added magnetic energy makes the
magnet attract the diaphragm more than it would do by its own force.
If, on the other hand, the current is cut off the pull of the magnet
is lessened and as its attraction for the diaphragm is decreased the
latter springs back to its original position. When varying currents
flow through the coils the diaphragm vibrates accordingly and sends
out sound waves.

About Loud Speakers.--The simplest acoustic instrument ever invented
is the _megaphone_, which latter is a Greek word meaning _great
sound_. It is a very primitive device and our Indians made it out of
birch-bark before Columbus discovered America. In its simplest form it
consists of a cone-shaped horn and as the speaker talks into the small
end the concentrated sound waves pass out of the large end in whatever
direction it is held.

Now a loud speaker of whatever kind consists of two chief parts and
these are: (1) a _telephone receiver_, and (2) a _megaphone_, or
_horn_ as it is called. A loud speaker when connected with a wireless
receiving set makes it possible for a room, or an auditorium, full of
people, or an outdoor crowd, to hear what is being sent out by a
distant station instead of being limited to a few persons listening-in
with headphones. To use a loud speaker you should have a vacuum tube
detector receiving set and this must be provided with a one-step
amplifier at least.

To get really good results you need a two-step amplifier and then
energize the plate of the second vacuum tube amplifier with a 100 volt
B battery; or if you have a three-step amplifier then use the
high voltage on the plate of the third amplifier tube. Amplifying
tubes are made to stand a plate potential of 100 volts and this is the
kind you must use. Now it may seem curious, but when the current flows
through the coils of the telephone receiver in one direction it gives
better results than when it flows through in the other direction; to
find out the way the current gives the best results try it out both
ways and this you can do by simply reversing the connections.

The Simplest Type of Loud Speaker.--This loud speaker, which is
called, the Arkay, [Footnote: Made by the Riley-Klotz Mfg. Co.,
Newark, N. J.] will work on a one- or two-step amplifier. It consists
of a brass horn with a curve in it and in the bottom there is an
adapter, or frame, with a set screw in it so that you can fit in one
of your headphones and this is all there is to it. The construction is
rigid enough to prevent overtones, or distortion of speech or music.
It is shown in Fig. 65.

[Illustration: Fig. 65.--Arkay Loud Speaker.]

Another Simple Kind of Loud Speaker.--Another loud speaker, see Fig.
66, is known as the _Amplitone_ [Footnote: Made by the American
Pattern, Foundry and Machine Co., 82 Church Street, N. Y. C.] and it
likewise makes use of the headphones as the sound producer. This
device has a cast metal horn which improves the quality of the sound,
and all you have to do is to slip the headphones on the inlet tubes of
the horn and it is ready for use. The two headphones not only give a
longer volume of sound than where a single one is used but there is a
certain blended quality which results from one phone smoothing out the
imperfections of the other.

[Illustration: Fig. 66.--Amplitone Loud Speaker.]

A Third Kind of Simple Loud Speaker.--The operation of the
_Amplitron_, [Footnote: Made by the Radio Service Co., 110 W. 40th
Street, N. Y.] as this loud speaker is called, is slightly different
from others used for the same purpose. The sounds set up by the
headphone are conveyed to the apex of an inverted copper cone which is
7 inches long and 10 inches in diameter. Here it is reflected by a
parabolic mirror which greatly amplifies the sounds. The amplification
takes place without distortion, the sounds remaining as clear and
crisp as when projected by the transmitting station. By removing the
cap from the receiver the shell is screwed into a receptacle on the
end of the loud speaker and the instrument is ready for use. It is
pictured in Fig. 67.

[Illustration: Fig. 67.--Amplitron Loud Speaker.]

A Super Loud Speaker.--This loud speaker, which is known as the
_Magnavox Telemegafone_, was the instrument used by Lt. Herbert E.
Metcalf, 3,000 feet in the air, and which startled the City of
Washington on April 2, 1919, by repeating President Wilson's _Victory
Loan Message_ from an airplane in flight so that it was distinctly
heard by 20,000 people below.

This wonderful achievement was accomplished through the installation
of the _Magnavox_ and amplifiers in front of the Treasury Building.
Every word Lt. Metcalf spoke into his wireless telephone transmitter
was caught and swelled in volume by the _Telemegafones_ below and
persons blocks away could hear the message plainly. Two kinds of these
loud speakers are made and these are: (1) a small loud speaker for the
use of operators so that headphones need not be worn, and (2) a large
loud speaker for auditorium and out-door audiences.

[Illustration: original © Underwood and Underwood. World's Largest
Loud Speaker ever made. Installed in Lytle Park, Cincinnati, Ohio, to
permit President Harding's Address at Point Pleasant, Ohio, during the
Grant Centenary Celebration to be heard within a radius of one
square.]

Either kind may be used with a one- or two-step amplifier or with a
cascade of half a dozen amplifiers, according to the degree of
loudness desired. The _Telemegafone_ itself is not an amplifier in the
true sense inasmuch as it contains no elements which will locally
increase the incoming current. It does, however, transform the
variable electric currents of the wireless receiving set into sound
vibrations in a most wonderful manner.

A _telemegafone_ of either kind is formed of: (1) a telephone receiver
of large proportions, (2) a step-down induction coil, and (3) a 6 volt
storage battery that energizes a powerful electromagnet which works
the diaphragm. An electromagnet is used instead of a permanent magnet
and this is energized by a 6-volt storage battery as shown in the
wiring diagram at A in Fig. 68. One end of the core of this magnet is
fixed to the iron case of the speaker and together these form the
equivalent of a horseshoe magnet. A movable coil of wire is supported
from the center of the diaphragm the edge of which is rigidly held
between the case and the small end of the horn. This coil is placed
over the upper end of the magnet and its terminals are connected to
the secondary of the induction coil. Now when the coil is energized by
the current from the amplifiers it and the core act like a solenoid in
that the coil tends to suck the core into it; but since the core is
fixed and the coil is movable the core draws the coil down instead.
The result is that with every variation of the current that flows
through the coil it moves up and down and pulls and pushes the
diaphragm down and up with it. The large amplitude of the vibrations
of the latter set up powerful sound waves which can be heard several
blocks away from the horn. In this way then are the faint incoming
signals, speech and music which are received by the amplifying
receiving set reproduced and magnified enormously. The _Telemegafone_
is shown complete at B.

[Illustration: Fig. 68.--Magnavox Loud Speaker.]




CHAPTER XV

OPERATION OF VACUUM TUBE RECEPTORS


From the foregoing chapters you have seen that the vacuum tube can be
used either as a _detector_ or an _amplifier_ or as a _generator_ of
electric oscillations, as in the case of the heterodyne receiving set.
To understand how a vacuum tube acts as a detector and as an amplifier
you must first know what _electrons_ are. The way in which the vacuum
tube sets up sustained oscillations will be explained in Chapter XVIII
in connection with the _Operation of Vacuum Tube Transmitters_.

What Electrons Are.--Science teaches us that masses of matter are made
up of _molecules_, that each of these is made up of _atoms_, and each
of these, in turn, is made up of a central core of positive particles
of electricity surrounded by negative particles of electricity as
shown in the schematic diagram, Fig. 69. The little black circles
inside the large circle represent _positive particles of electricity_
and the little white circles outside of the large circle represent
_negative particles of electricity_, or _electrons_ as they are
called.

[Illustration: Fig. 69.--Schematic Diagram of an Atom.]

It is the number of positive particles of electricity an atom has that
determines the kind of an element that is formed when enough atoms of
the same kind are joined together to build it up. Thus hydrogen, which
is the lightest known element, has one positive particle for its
nucleus, while uranium, the heaviest element now known, has 92
positive particles. Now before leaving the atom please note that it is
as much smaller than the diagram as the latter is smaller than our
solar system.

What Is Meant by Ionization.--A hydrogen atom is not only lighter but
it is smaller than the atom of any other element while an electron is
more than a thousand times smaller than the atom of which it is a
part. Now as long as all of the electrons remain attached to the
surface of an atom its positive and negative charges are equalized and
it will, therefore, be neither positive nor negative, that is, it will
be perfectly neutral. When, however, one or more of its electrons are
separated from it, and there are several ways by which this can be
done, the atom will show a positive charge and it is then called a
_positive ion_.

In other words a _positive ion_ is an atom that has lost some of its
negative electrons while a _negative ion_ is one that has acquired
some additional negative _electrons_. When a number of electrons are
being constantly given by the atoms of an element, which let us
suppose is a metal, and are being attracted to atoms of another
element, which we will say is also a metal, a flow of electrons takes
place between the two oppositely charged elements and form a current
of negative electricity as represented by the arrows at A in Fig. 70.

[Illustration: Fig. 70.--Action of Two-electrode Vacuum Tube.]

When a stream of electrons is flowing between two metal elements, as a
filament and a plate in a vacuum tube detector, or an amplifier, they
act as _carriers_ for more negative electrons and these are supplied
by a battery as we shall presently explain. It has always been
customary for us to think of a current of electricity as flowing from
the positive pole of a battery to the negative pole of it and hence we
have called this the _direction of the current_. Since the electronic
theory has been evolved it has been shown that the electrons, or
negative charges of electricity, flow from the negative to the
positive pole and that the ionized atoms, which are more positive than
negative, flow in the opposite direction as shown at B.

How Electrons are Separated from Atoms.--The next question that arises
is how to make a metal throw off some of the electrons of the atoms of
which it is formed. There are several ways that this can be done but
in any event each atom must be given a good, hard blow. A simple way
to do this is to heat a metal to incandescence when the atoms will
bombard each other with terrific force and many of the electrons will
be knocked off and thrown out into the surrounding space.

But all, or nearly all, of them will return to the atoms from whence
they came unless a means of some kind is employed to attract them to
the atoms of some other element. This can be done by giving the latter
piece of metal a positive charge. If now these two pieces of metal are
placed in a bulb from which the air has been exhausted and the first
piece of metal is heated to brilliancy while the second piece of metal
is kept positively electrified then a stream of electrons will flow
between them.

Action of the Two Electrode Vacuum Tube.--Now in a vacuum tube
detector a wire filament, like that of an incandescent lamp, is
connected with a battery and this forms the hot element from which the
electrons are thrown off, and a metal plate with a terminal wire
secured to it is connected to the positive or carbon tap of a dry
battery; now connect the negative or zinc tap of this with one end of
a telephone receiver and the other end of this with the terminals of
the filament as shown at A in Fig. 71. If now you heat the filament
and hold the phone to your ear you can hear the current from the B
battery flowing through the circuit.

[Illustration: (A) and (B) Fig. 71.--How a Two Electrode Tube Acts as
a Relay or a Detector.]

[Illustration: (C) Fig. 71.--Only the Positive Part of Oscillations
Goes through the Tube.]

Since the electrons are negative charges of electricity they are not
only thrown off by the hot wire but they are attracted by the positive
charged metal plate and when enough electrons pass, or flow, from the
hot wire to the plate they form a conducting path and so complete the
circuit which includes the filament, the plate and the B or
plate battery, when the current can then flow through it. As the
number of electrons that are thrown off by the filament is not great
and the voltage of the plate is not high the current that flows
between the filament and the plate is always quite small.

How the Two Electrode Tube Acts as a Detector.--As the action of a two
electrode tube as a detector [Footnote: The three electrode vacuum
tube has entirely taken the place of the two electrode type.] is
simpler than that of the three electrode vacuum tube we shall describe
it first. The two electrode vacuum tube was first made by Mr. Edison
when he was working on the incandescent lamp but that it would serve
as a detector of electric waves was discovered by Prof. Fleming, of
Oxford University, London. As a matter of fact, it is not really a
detector of electric waves, but it acts as: (1) a _rectifier_ of the
oscillations that are set up in the receiving circuits, that is, it
changes them into pulsating direct currents so that they will flow
through and affect a telephone receiver, and (2) it acts as a _relay_
and the feeble received oscillating current controls the larger direct
current from the B battery in very much the same way that a telegraph
relay does. This latter relay action will be explained when we come to
its operation as an amplifier.

We have just learned that when the stream of electrons flow from the
hot wire to the cold positive plate in the tube they form a conducting
path through which the battery current can flow. Now when the electric
oscillations surge through the closed oscillation circuit, which
includes the secondary of the tuning coil, the variable condenser, the
filament and the plate as shown at B in Fig. 71 the positive part of
them passes through the tube easily while the negative part cannot get
through, that is, the top, or positive, part of the wave-form remains
intact while the lower, or negative, part is cut off as shown in the
diagram at C. As the received oscillations are either broken up into
wave trains of audio frequency by the telegraph transmitter or are
modulated by a telephone transmitter they carry the larger impulses of
the direct current from the B battery along with them and these flow
through the headphones. This is the reason the vacuum tube amplifies
as well as detects.

How the Three Electrode Tube Acts as a Detector.--The vacuum tube as a
detector has been made very much more sensitive by the use of a third
electrode shown in Fig. 72. In this type of vacuum tube the third
electrode, or _grid_, is placed between the filament and the plate and
this controls the number of electrons flowing from the filament to the
plate; in passing between these two electrodes they have to go through
the holes formed by the grid wires.

[Illustration: (A) and (B) Fig. 72.--How the Positive and Negative
Voltages of Oscillations Act on the Electrons.]

[Illustration: (C) Fig. 72.--How the Three Electrode Tube Acts as a
Detector and Amplifier.]

[Illustration: (D) Fig. 72.--How the Oscillations Control the Flow of
the Battery Current through the Tube.]

If now the grid is charged to a higher _negative_ voltage than the
filament the electrons will be stopped by the latter, see A, though
some of them will go through to the plate because they travel at a
high rate of speed. The higher the negative charge on the grid the
smaller will be the number of electrons that will reach the plate and,
of course, the smaller will be the amount of current that will flow
through the tube and the headphones from the B battery.

On the other hand if the grid is charged _positively_, see B, then
more electrons will strike the plate than when the grid is not used or
when it is negatively charged. But when the three electrode tube is
used as a detector the oscillations set up in the circuits change the
grid alternately from negative to positive as shown at C and hence the
voltage of the B battery current that is allowed to flow through the
detector from the plate to the filament rises and falls in unison with
the voltage of the oscillating currents. The way the positive and
negative voltages of the oscillations which are set up by the incoming
waves, energize the grid; how the oscillator tube clips off the
negative parts of them, and, finally, how these carry the battery
current through the tube are shown graphically by the curves at D.

How the Vacuum Tube Acts as an Amplifier.--If you connect up the
filament and the plate of a three electrode tube with the batteries
and do not connect in the grid, you will find that the electrons which
are thrown off by the filament will not get farther than the grid
regardless of how high the voltage is that you apply to the plate.
This is due to the fact that a large number of electrons which are
thrown off by the filament strike the grid and give it a negative
charge, and consequently, they cannot get any farther. Since the
electrons do not reach the plate the current from the B battery cannot
flow between it and the filament.

Now with a properly designed amplifier tube a very small negative
voltage on the grid will keep a very large positive voltage on the
plate from sending a current through the tube, and oppositely, a very
small positive voltage on the grid will let a very large plate current
flow through the tube; this being true it follows that any small
variation of the voltage from positive to negative on the grid and the
other way about will vary a large current flowing from the plate to
the filament.

In the Morse telegraph the relay permits the small current that is
received from the distant sending station to energize a pair of
magnets, and these draw an armature toward them and close a second
circuit when a large current from a local battery is available for
working the sounder. The amplifier tube is a variable relay in that
the feeble currents set up by the incoming waves constantly and
proportionately vary a large current that flows through the
headphones. This then is the principle on which the amplifying tube
works.

The Operation of a Simple Vacuum Tube Receiving Set.--The way a simple
vacuum tube detector receiving set works is like this: when the
filament is heated to brilliancy it gives off electrons as previously
described. Now when the electric waves impinge on the aerial wire they
set up oscillations in it and these surge through the primary coil of
the loose coupled tuning coil, a diagram of which is shown at B in
Fig. 41.

The energy of these oscillations sets up oscillations of the same
frequency in the secondary coil and these high frequency currents
whose voltage is first positive and then negative, surge in the closed
circuit which includes the secondary coil and the variable condenser.
At the same time the alternating positive and negative voltage of the
oscillating currents is impressed on the grid; at each change from +
to - and back again it allows the electrons to strike the plate and
then shuts them off; as the electrons form the conducting path between
the filament and the plate the larger direct current from the B
battery is permitted to flow through the detector tube and the
headphones.

Operation of a Regenerative Vacuum Tube Receiving Set.--By feeding
back the pulsating direct current from the B battery through the
tickler coil it sets up other and stronger oscillations in the
secondary of the tuning coil when these act on the detector tube and
increase its sensitiveness to a remarkable extent. The regenerative,
or _feed back_, action of the receiving circuits used will be easily
understood by referring back to B in Fig. 47.

When the waves set up oscillations in the primary of the tuning coil
the energy of them produces like oscillations in the closed circuit
which includes the secondary coil and the condenser; the alternating
positive and negative voltages of these are impressed on the grid and
these, as we have seen before, cause similar variations of the direct
current from the B battery which acts on the plate and which
flows between the latter and the filament.

This varying direct current, however, is made to flow back through the
third, or tickler coil of the tuning coil and sets up in the secondary
coil and circuits other and larger oscillating currents and these
augment the action of the oscillations produced by the incoming waves.
These extra and larger currents which are the result of the feedback
then act on the grid and cause still larger variations of the current
in the plate voltage and hence of the current of the B battery
that flows through the detector and the headphones. At the same time
the tube keeps on responding to the feeble electric oscillations set
up in the circuits by the incoming waves. This regenerative action of
the battery current augments the original oscillations many times and
hence produce sounds in the headphones that are many times greater
than where the vacuum tube detector alone is used.

Operation of Autodyne and Heterodyne Receiving Sets.--On page 109
[Chapter VII] we discussed and at A in Fig. 36 is shown a picture of
two tuning forks mounted on sounding boxes to illustrate the principle
of electrical tuning. When a pair of these forks are made to vibrate
exactly the same number of times per second there will be a
condensation of the air between them and the sound waves that are sent
out will be augmented. But if you adjust one of the forks so that it
will vibrate 256 times a second and the other fork so that it will
vibrate 260 times a second then there will be a phase difference
between the two sets of waves and the latter will augment each other 4
times every second and you will hear these rising and falling sounds
as _beats_.

Now electric oscillations set up in two circuits that are coupled
together act in exactly the same way as sound waves produced by two
tuning forks that are close to each other. Since this is true if you
tune one of the closed circuits so that the oscillations in it will
have a frequency of a 1,000,000 and tune the other circuit so that the
oscillations in it have a frequency of 1,001,000 a second then the
oscillations will augment each other 1,000 times every second.

As these rising and falling currents act on the pulsating currents
from the B battery which flow through the detector tube and the
headphones you will hear them as beats. A graphic representation of
the oscillating currents set up by the incoming waves, those produced
by the heterodyne oscillator and the beats they form is shown in Fig.
73. To produce these beats a receptor can use: (1) a single vacuum
tube for setting up oscillations of both frequencies when it is called
an _autodyne_, or _self-heterodyne_ receptor, or (2) a separate vacuum
tube for setting up the oscillations for the second circuit when it is
called a _heterodyne_ receptor.

[Illustration: Fig. 73.--How the Heterodyne Receptor Works.]

The Autodyne, or Self-Heterodyne Receiving Set.--Where only one vacuum
tube is used for producing both frequencies you need only a
regenerative, or feed-back receptor; then you can tune the aerial wire
system to the incoming waves and tune the closed circuit of the
secondary coil so that it will be out of step with the former by 1,000
oscillations per second, more or less, the exact number does not
matter in the least. From this you will see that any regenerative set
can be used for autodyne, or self-heterodyne, reception.

The Separate Heterodyne Receiving Set.--The better way, however, is to
use a separate vacuum tube for setting up the heterodyne oscillations.
The latter then act on the oscillations that are produced by the
incoming waves and which energize the grid of the detector tube. Note
that the vacuum tube used for producing the heterodyne oscillations is
a _generator_ of electric oscillations; the latter are impressed on
the detector circuits through the variable coupling, the secondary of
which is in series with the aerial wire as shown in Fig. 74. The way
in which the tube acts as a generator of oscillations will be told in
Chapter XVIII.

[Illustration: Fig. 74.--Separate Heterodyne Oscillator.]




CHAPTER XVI

CONTINUOUS WAVE TELEGRAPH TRANSMITTING SETS WITH DIRECT CURRENT


In the first part of this book we learned about spark-gap telegraph
sets and how the oscillations they set up are _damped_ and the waves
they send out are _periodic_. In this and the next chapter we shall
find out how vacuum tube telegraph transmitters are made and how they
set up oscillations that are _sustained_ and radiate waves that are
_continuous_.

Sending wireless telegraph messages by continuous waves has many
features to recommend it as against sending them by periodic waves and
among the most important of these are that the transmitter can be: (1)
more sharply tuned, (2) it will send signals farther with the same
amount of power, and (3) it is noiseless in operation. The
disadvantageous features are that: (1) a battery current is not
satisfactory, (2) its circuits are somewhat more complicated, and (3)
the oscillator tubes burn out occasionally. There is, however, a
growing tendency among amateurs to use continuous wave transmitters
and they are certainly more up-to-date and interesting than spark gap
sets.

Now there are two practical ways by which continuous waves can be set
up for sending either telegraphic signals or telephonic speech and
music and these are with: (a) an _oscillation arc lamp_, and (b) a
_vacuum tube oscillator_. The oscillation arc was the earliest known
way of setting up sustained oscillations, and it is now largely used
for commercial high power, long distance work. But since the vacuum
tube has been developed to a high degree of efficiency and is the
scheme that is now in vogue for amateur stations we shall confine our
efforts here to explaining the apparatus necessary and how to wire the
various parts together to produce several sizes of vacuum tube
telegraph transmitters.

Sources of Current for Telegraph Transmitting Sets.--Differing from a
spark-gap transmitter you cannot get any appreciable results with a
low voltage battery current to start with. For a purely experimental
vacuum tube telegraph transmitter you can use enough B batteries to
operate it but the current strength of these drops so fact when they
are in use, that they are not at all satisfactory for the work.

You can, however, use 110 volt direct current from a lighting circuit
as your initial source of power to energize the plate of the vacuum
tube oscillator of your experimental transmitter. Where you have a 110
volt _direct current_ lighting service in your home and you want a
higher voltage for your plate, you will then have to use a
motor-generator set and this costs money. If you have 110 volt
_alternating current_ lighting service at hand your troubles are over
so far as cost is concerned for you can step it up to any voltage you
want with a power transformer. In this chapter will be shown how to
use a direct current for your source of initial power and in the next
chapter how to use an alternating current for the initial power.

An Experimental Continuous Wave Telegraph Transmitter.--You will
remember that in Chapter XV we learned how the heterodyne receiver
works and that in the separate heterodyne receiving set the second
vacuum tube is used solely to set up oscillations. Now while this
extra tube is used as a generator of oscillations these are, of
course, very weak and hence a detector tube cannot be used to generate
oscillations that are useful for other purposes than heterodyne
receptors and measurements.

There is a vacuum tube amplifier [Footnote: This is the _radiation_
UV-201, made by the Radio Corporation of America, Woolworth Bldg., New
York City.] made that will stand a plate potential of 100 volts, and
this can be used as a generator of oscillations by energizing it with
a 110 volt direct current from your lighting service. Or in a pinch
you can use five standard B batteries to develop the plate voltage,
but these will soon run down. But whatever you do, never use a
current from a lighting circuit on a tube of any kind that has a rated
plate potential of less than 100 volts.

The Apparatus You Need.--For this experimental continuous wave
telegraph transmitter get the following pieces of apparatus: (1) one
_single coil tuner with three clips_; (2) one _.002 mfd. fixed
condenser_; (3) three _.001 mfd. condensers_; (4) one _adjustable grid
leak_; (5) one _hot-wire ammeter_; (6) one _buzzer_; (7) one _dry
cell_; (8) one _telegraph key_; (9) one _100 volt plate vacuum tube
amplifier_; (10) one _6 volt storage battery_; (11) one _rheostat_;
(12) one _oscillation choke coil_; (13) one _panel cut-out_ with a
_single-throw, double-pole switch_, and a pair of _fuse sockets_ on
it.

The Tuning Coil.--You can either make this tuning coil or buy one. To
make it get two disks of wood 3/4-inch thick and 5 inches in diameter
and four strips of hard wood, or better, hard rubber or composition
strips, such as _bakelite_, 1/2-inch thick, 1 inch wide and 5-3/4
inches long, and screw them to the disks as shown at A in Fig. 75. Now
wrap on this form about 25 turns of No. 8 or 10, Brown and Sharpe
gauge, bare copper wire with a space of 1/8-inch between each turn.
Get three of the smallest size terminal clips, see B, and clip them on
to the different turns, when your tuning coil is ready for use. You
can buy a coil of this kind for $4.00 or $5.00.

The Condensers.--For the aerial series condenser get one that has a
capacitance of .002 mfd. and that will stand a potential of 3,000
volts. [Footnote: The U C-1014 _Faradon_ condenser made by the Radio
Corporation of America will serve the purpose.] It is shown at C. The
other three condensers, see D, are also of the fixed type and may have
a capacitance of .001 mfd.; [Footnote: List No. 266; fixed receiving
condenser, sold by the Manhattan Electrical Supply Co.] the blocking
condenser should preferably have a capacitance of 1/2 a mfd. In these
condensers the leaves of the sheet metal are embedded in composition.
The aerial condenser will cost you $2.00 and the others 75 cents each.

[Illustration: (A) Fig. 75.--Apparatus for Experimental C. W.
Telegraph Transmitter.]

[Illustration: Fig. 75.--Apparatus for Experimental C. W. Telegraph
Transmitter.]

The Aerial Ammeter.--This instrument is also called a _hot-wire_
ammeter because the oscillating currents flowing through a piece of
wire heat it according to their current strength and as the wire
contracts and expands it moves a needle over a scale. The ammeter is
connected in the aerial wire system, either in the aerial side or the
ground side--the latter place is usually the most convenient. When you
tune the transmitter so that the ammeter shows the largest amount of
current surging in the aerial wire system you can consider that the
oscillation circuits are in tune. A hot-wire ammeter reading to 2.5
amperes will serve your needs, it costs $6.00 and is shown at E in
Fig. 75.

[Illustration: United States Naval High Power Station, Arlington Va.
General view of Power Room. At the left can be seen the Control
Switchboards, and overhead, the great 30 K.W. Arc Transmitter with
Accessories.]

The Buzzer and Dry Cell.--While a heterodyne, or beat, receptor can
receive continuous wave telegraph signals an ordinary crystal or
vacuum tube detector receiving set cannot receive them unless they are
broken up into trains either at the sending station or at the
receiving station, and it is considered the better practice to do this
at the former rather than at the latter station. For this small
transmitter you can use an ordinary buzzer as shown at F. A dry cell
or two must be used to energize the buzzer. You can get one for about
75 cents.

The Telegraph Key.--Any kind of a telegraph key will serve to break up
the trains of sustained oscillations into dots and dashes. The key
shown at G is mounted on a composition base and is the cheapest key
made, costing $1.50.

The Vacuum Tube Oscillator.--As explained before you can use any
amplifying tube that is made for a plate potential of 100 volts. The
current required for heating the filament is about 1 ampere at 6
volts. A porcelain socket should be used for this tube as it is the
best insulating material for the purpose. An amplifier tube of this
type is shown at H and costs $6.50.

The Storage Battery.--A storage battery is used to heat the filament
of the tube, just as it is with a detector tube, and it can be of any
make or capacity as long as it will develop 6 volts. The cheapest 6
volt storage battery on the market has a 20 to 40 ampere-hour capacity
and sells for $13.00.

The Battery Rheostat.--As with the receptors a rheostat is needed to
regulate the current that heats the filament. A rheostat of this kind
is shown at I and is listed at $1.25.

The Oscillation Choke Coil.--This coil is connected in between the
oscillation circuits and the source of current which feeds the
oscillator tube to keep the oscillations set up by the latter from
surging back into the service wires where they would break down the
insulation. You can make an oscillation choke coil by winding say 100
turns of No. 28 Brown and Sharpe gauge double cotton covered magnet
wire on a cardboard cylinder 2 inches in diameter and 2-1/2 inches
long.

Transmitter Connectors.--For connecting up the different pieces of
apparatus of the transmitter it is a good scheme to use _copper
braid_; this is made of braided copper wire in three sizes and sells
for 7,15 and 20 cents a foot respectively. A piece of it is pictured
at J.

The Panel Cut-Out.--This is used to connect the cord of the 110-volt
lamp socket with the transmitter. It consists of a pair of _plug
cutouts and a single-throw, double-pole_ switch mounted on a porcelain
base as shown at K. In some localities it is necessary to place these
in an iron box to conform to the requirements of the fire
underwriters.

Connecting Up the Transmitting Apparatus.--The way the various pieces
of apparatus are connected together is shown in the wiring diagram.
Fig. 76. Begin by connecting one post of the ammeter with the wire
that leads to the aerial and the other post of it to one end of the
tuning coil; connect clip _1_ to one terminal of the .002 mfd. 3,000
volt aerial condenser and the other post of this with the ground.

[Illustration: Fig. 76--Experimental C.W. Telegraph Transmitter]

Now connect the end of the tuning coil that leads to the ammeter with
one end of the .001 mfd. grid condenser and the other end of this with
the grid of the vacuum tube. Connect the telegraph key, the buzzer and
the dry cell in series and then shunt them around the grid condenser.
Next connect the plate of the tube with one end of the .001 mfd.
blocking condenser and the other end of this with the clip _2_ on the
tuning coil.

Connect one end of the filament with the + or positive electrode of
the storage battery, the - or negative electrode of this with one post
of the rheostat and the other post of the latter with the other end of
the filament; then connect clip _3_ with the + or positive side of the
storage battery. This done connect one end of the choke coil to the
conductor that leads to the plate and connect the other end of the
choke coil to one of the taps of the switch on the panel cut-out.
Connect the + or positive electrode of the storage battery to the
other switch tap and between the switch and the choke coil connect the
protective condenser across the 110 volt feed wires. Finally connect
the lamp cord from the socket to the plug fuse taps when your
experimental continuous wave telegraph transmitter is ready to use.

A 100 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.--Here is a continuous
wave telegraph transmitter that will cover distances up to 100 miles
that you can rely on. It is built on exactly the same lines as the
experimental transmitter just described, but instead of using a 100
volt plate amplifier as a makeshift generator of oscillations it
employs a vacuum tube made especially for setting up oscillations and
instead of having a low plate voltage it is energized with 350 volts.

The Apparatus You Need.--For this transmitter you require: (1) one
_oscillation transformer_; (2) one _hot-wire ammeter_; (3) one _aerial
series condenser_; (4) one _grid leak resistance_; (5) one _chopper_;
(6) one _key circuit choke coil_; (7) one _5 watt vacuum tube
oscillator_; (8) one _6 volt storage battery_; (9) one _battery
rheostat_; (10) one _battery voltmeter_; (11) one _blocking
condenser_; (12) one _power circuit choke coil_, and (13) one
_motor-generator_.

The Oscillation Transformer.--The tuning coil, or _oscillation
transformer_ as this one is called, is a conductively coupled
tuner--that is, the primary and secondary coils form one continuous
coil instead of two separate coils. This tuner is made up of 25 turns
of thin copper strip, 3/8 inch wide and with its edges rounded, and
this is secured to a wood base as shown at A in Fig. 77. It is fitted
with one fixed tap and three clips to each of which a length of copper
braid is attached. It has a diameter of 6-1/4 inches, a height of
7-7/8 inches and a length of 9-3/8 inches, and it costs $11.00.

[Illustration: Fig. 77.--Apparatus of 100 Mile C. W. Telegraph
Transmitter.]

The Aerial Condenser.--This condenser is made up of three fixed
condensers of different capacitances, namely .0003, .0004 and .0005
mfd., and these are made to stand a potential of 7500 volts. The
condenser is therefore adjustable and, as you will see from the
picture B, it has one terminal wire at one end and three terminal
wires at the other end so that one, two or three condensers can be
used in series with the aerial. A condenser of this kind costs $5.40.

The Aerial Ammeter.--This is the same kind of a hot-wire ammeter
already described in connection with the experimental set, but it
reads to 5 amperes.

The Grid and Blocking Condensers.--Each of these is a fixed condenser
of .002 mfd. capacitance and is rated to stand 3,000 volts. It is
made like the aerial condenser but has only two terminals. It costs
$2.00.

The Key Circuit Apparatus.--This consists of: (1) the _grid leak_; (2)
the _chopper_; (3) the _choke coil_, and (4) the _key_. The grid leak
is connected in the lead from the grid to the aerial to keep the
voltage on the grid at the right potential. It has a resistance of
5000 ohms with a mid-tap at 2500 ohms as shown at C. It costs $2.00.

The chopper is simply a rotary interrupter driven by a small motor. It
comprises a wheel of insulating material in which 30 or more metal
segments are set in an insulating disk as shown at D. A metal contact
called a brush is fixed on either side of the wheel. It costs about
$7.00 and the motor to drive it is extra. The choke coil is wound up
of about 250 turns of No. 30 Brown and Sharpe gauge cotton covered
magnet wire on a spool which has a diameter of 2 inches and a length
of 3-1/4 inches.

The 5 Watt Oscillator Vacuum Tube.--This tube is made like the
amplifier tube described for use with the preceding experimental
transmitter, but it is larger, has a more perfect vacuum, and will
stand a plate potential of 350 volts while the plate current is .045
ampere. The filament takes a current of a little more than 2 amperes
at 7.5 volts. A standard 4-tap base is used with it. The tube costs
$8.00 and the porcelain base is $1.00 extra. It is shown at E.

The Storage Battery and Rheostat.--This must be a 5-cell battery so
that it will develop 10 volts. A storage battery of any capacity can
be used but the lowest priced one costs about $22.00. The rheostat for
regulating the battery current is the same as that used in the
preceding experimental transmitter.

The Filament Voltmeter.--To get the best results it is necessary that
the voltage of the current which heats the filament be kept at the
same value all of the time. For this transmitter a direct current
voltmeter reading from 0 to 15 volts is used. It is shown at F and
costs $7.50. The Oscillation Choke Coil.--This is made exactly like
the one described in connection with the experimental transmitter.

The Motor-Generator Set.--Where you have only a 110 or a 220 volt
direct current available as a source of power you need a
_motor-generator_ to change it to 350 volts, and this is an expensive
piece of apparatus. It consists of a single armature core with a motor
winding and a generator winding on it and each of these has its own
commutator. Where the low voltage current flows into one of the
windings it drives its as a motor and this in turn generates the
higher voltage current in the other winding. Get a 100 watt 350 volt
motor-generator; it is shown at F and costs about $75.00.

The Panel Cut-Out.--This switch and fuse block is the same as that
used in the experimental set.

The Protective Condenser.--This is a fixed condenser having a
capacitance of 1 mfd. and will stand 750 volts. It costs $2.00.

Connecting Up the Transmitting Apparatus.--From all that has gone
before you have seen that each piece of apparatus is fitted with
terminal, wires, taps or binding posts. To connect up the parts of
this transmitter it is only necessary to make the connections as shown
in the wiring diagram Fig. 78.

[Illustration: Fig. 78.--5 to 50 Watt C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.
(With Single Oscillation Tube.)]

A 200 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.--To make a continuous wave
telegraph transmitter that will cover distances up to 200 miles all
you have to do is to use two 5 watt vacuum tubes in _parallel_, all of
the rest of the apparatus being exactly the same. Connecting the
oscillator tubes up in parallel means that the two filaments are
connected across the leads of the storage battery, the two grids on
the same lead that goes to the aerial and the two plates on the same
lead that goes to the positive pole of the generator. Where two or
more oscillator tubes are used only one storage battery is needed, but
each filament must have its own rheostat. The wiring diagram Fig. 79
shows how the two tubes are connected up in parallel.

[Illustration: Fig. 79.--200 Mile C.W. Telegraph Transmitter (With Two
Tubes in Parallel.)]

A 500 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.--For sending to distances of
over 200 miles and up to 500 miles you can use either: (1) three or
four 5 watt oscillator tubes in parallel as described above, or (2)
one 50 watt oscillator tube. Much of the apparatus for a 50 watt tube
set is exactly the same as that used for the 5 watt sets. Some of the
parts, however, must be proportionately larger though the design all
the way through remains the same.

The Apparatus and Connections.--The aerial series condenser, the
blocking condenser, the grid condenser, the telegraph key, the
chopper, the choke coil in the key circuit, the filament voltmeter and
the protective condenser in the power circuit are identical with those
described for the 5 watt transmitting set.

The 50 Watt Vacuum Tube Oscillator.--This is the size of tube
generally used by amateurs for long distance continuous wave
telegraphy. A single tube will develop 2 to 3 amperes in your aerial.
The filament takes a 10 volt current and a plate potential of 1,000
volts is needed. One of these tubes is shown in Fig. 80 and the cost
is $30.00. A tube socket to fit it costs $2.50 extra.

[Illustration: Fig. 80.--50 Watt Oscillator Vacuum Tube.]

The Aerial Ammeter.--This should read to 5 amperes and the cost is
$6.25.

The Grid Leak Resistance.--It has the same resistance, namely 5,000
ohms as the one used with the 5 watt tube transmitter, but it is a
little larger. It is listed at $1.65.

The Oscillation Choke Coil.--The choke coil in the power circuit is
made of about 260 turns of No. 30 B. & S. cotton covered magnet wire
wound on a spool 2-1/4 inches in diameter and 3-1/4 inches long.

The Filament Rheostat.--This is made to take care of a 10 volt current
and it costs $10.00.

The Filament Storage Battery.--This must develop 12 volts and one
having an output of 40 ampere-hours costs about $25.00.

The Protective Condenser.--This condenser has a capacitance of 1 mfd.
and costs $2.00.

The Motor-Generator.--Where you use one 50 watt oscillator tube you
will need a motor-generator that develops a plate potential of 1000
volts and has an output of 200 watts. This machine will stand you
about $100.00.

The different pieces of apparatus for this set are connected up
exactly the same as shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 78.

A 1000 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter.--All of the parts of this
transmitting set are the same as for the 500 mile transmitter just
described except the motor generator and while this develops the same
plate potential, i.e., 1,000 volts, it must have an output of 500
watts; it will cost you in the neighborhood of $175.00. For this long
distance transmitter you use two 50 watt oscillator tubes in parallel
and all of the parts are connected together exactly the same as for
the 200 mile transmitter shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 79.




CHAPTER XVII

CONTINUOUS WAVE TELEGRAPH TRANSMITTING SETS WITH ALTERNATING CURRENT


Within the last few years alternating current has largely taken the
place of direct current for light, heat and power purposes in and
around towns and cities and if you have alternating current service in
your home you can install a long distance continuous wave telegraph
transmitter with very little trouble and at a comparatively small
expense.

A 100 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitting Set.--The principal pieces of
apparatus for this transmitter are the same as those used for the _100
Mile Continuous Wave Telegraph Transmitting Set_ described and
pictured in the preceding chapter which used direct current, except
that an _alternating current power transformer_ is employed instead of
the more costly _motor-generator_.

The Apparatus Required.--The various pieces of apparatus you will need
for this transmitting set are: (1) one _hot-wire ammeter_ for the
aerial as shown at E in Fig. 75, but which reads to 5 amperes instead
of to 2.5 amperes; (2) one _tuning coil_ as shown at A in Fig. 77; (3)
one aerial condenser as shown at B in Fig. 77; (4) one _grid leak_ as
shown at C in Fig. 77; (5) one _telegraph key_ as shown at G in Fig.
75; (6) one _grid condenser_, made like the aerial condenser but
having only two terminals; (7) one _5 watt oscillator tube_ as shown
at E in Fig. 77; (8) one _.002 mfd. 3,000 volt by-pass condenser_,
made like the aerial and grid condensers; (9) one pair of _choke
coils_ for the high voltage secondary circuit; (10) one
_milli-ammeter_; (11) one A. C. _power transformer_; (12) one
_rheostat_ as shown at I in Fig. 75, and (13) one _panel cut-out_ as
shown at K in Fig. 75.

The Choke Coils.--Each of these is made by winding about 100 turns of
No. 28, Brown and Sharpe gauge, cotton covered magnet wire on a spool
2 inches in diameter and 2-1/2 inches long, when it will have an
inductance of about 0.5 _millihenry_ [Footnote: A millihenry is
1/1000th part of a henry.] at 1,000 cycles.

The Milli-ammeter.--This is an alternating current ammeter and reads
from 0 to 250 _milliamperes_; [Footnote: A _milliampere_ is the
1/1000th part of an ampere.] and is used for measuring the secondary
current that energizes the plate of the oscillator tube. It looks like
the aerial ammeter and costs about $7.50.

The A. C. Power Transformer.--Differing from the motor generator set
the power transformer has no moving parts. For this transmitting set
you need a transformer that has an input of 325 volts. It is made to
work on a 50 to 60 cycle current at 102.5 to 115 volts, which is the
range of voltage of the ordinary alternating lighting current. This
adjustment for voltage is made by means of taps brought out from the
primary coil to a rotary switch.

The high voltage secondary coil which energizes the plate has an
output of 175 watts and develops a potential of from 350 to 1,100
volts. The low voltage secondary coil which heats the filament has an
output of 175 watts and develops 7.5 volts. This transformer, which is
shown in Fig. 81, is large enough to take care of from one to four 5
watt oscillator tubes. It weighs about 15 pounds and sells for $25.00.

[Illustration: Fig. 81.--Alternation Current Power Transformer. (For
C. W. Telegraphy and Wireless Telephony.)]

[Illustration: The Transformer and Tuner of the World's Largest Radio
Station. Owned by the Radio Corporation of America at Rocky Point near
Port Jefferson L.I.]

Connecting Up the Apparatus.--The wiring diagram Fig. 82 shows clearly
how all of the connections are made. It will be observed that a
storage battery is not needed as the secondary coil of the transformer
supplies the current to heat the filament of the oscillator. The
filament voltmeter is connected across the filament secondary coil
terminals, while the plate milli-ammeter is connected to the mid-taps
of the plate secondary coil and the filament secondary coil.

[Illustration: Fig. 82. Wiring Diagram for 200 to 500 Mile C.W.
Telegraph Transmitting Set. (With Alternating Current)]

A 200 to 500 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitting Set.--Distances of from
200 to 500 miles can be successfully covered with a telegraph
transmitter using two, three or four 5 watt oscillator tubes in
parallel. The apparatus needed is identical with that used for the 100
mile transmitter just described. The tubes are connected in parallel
as shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 83.

[Illustration: Fig. 83.--Wiring Diagram for 500 to 1000 Mile C. W.
Telegraph Transmitter.]

A 500 to 1,000 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitting Set.--With the
apparatus described for the above set and a single 50 watt oscillator
tube a distance of upwards of 500 miles can be covered, while with two
50 watt oscillator tubes in parallel you can cover a distance of 1,000
miles without difficulty, and nearly 2,000 miles have been covered
with this set.

The Apparatus Required.--All of the apparatus for this C. W.
telegraph transmitting set is the same as that described for the 100
and 200 mile sets but you will need: (1) one or two _50 watt
oscillator tubes with sockets;_ (2) one _key condenser_ that has a
capacitance of 1 mfd., and a rated potential of 1,750 volts; (3) one
_0 to 500 milli-ammeter_; (4) one _aerial ammeter_ reading to 5
amperes, and (5) an _A. C. power transformer_ for one or two 50 watt
tubes.

[Illustration: Broadcasting Government Reports by Wireless from
Washington. This shows Mr. Gale at work with his set in the Post
Office Department.]

The Alternating Current Power Transformer.--This power transformer is
made exactly like the one described in connection with the preceding
100 mile transmitter and pictured in Fig. 81, but it is considerably
larger. Like the smaller one, however, it is made to work with a 50 to
60 cycle current at 102.5 to 115 volts and, hence, can be used with
any A. C. lighting current.

It has an input of 750 volts and the high voltage secondary coil which
energizes the plate has an output of 450 watts and develops 1,500 to
3,000 volts. The low voltage secondary coil which heats the filament
develops 10.5 volts. This transformer will supply current for one or
two 50-watt oscillator tubes and it costs about $40.00.

Connecting Up the Apparatus.--Where a single oscillator tube is used
the parts are connected as shown in Fig. 82, and where two tubes are
connected in parallel the various pieces of apparatus are wired
together as shown in Fig. 83. The only difference between the 5 watt
tube transmitter and the 50 watt tube transmitter is in the size of
the apparatus with one exception; where one or two 50 watt tubes are
used a second condenser of large capacitance (1 mfd.) is placed in the
grid circuit and the telegraph key is shunted around it as shown in
the diagram Fig. 83.




CHAPTER XVIII

WIRELESS TELEPHONE TRANSMITTING SETS WITH DIRECT AND ALTERNATING
CURRENTS


In time past the most difficult of all electrical apparatus for the
amateur to make, install and work was the wireless telephone. This was
because it required a _direct current_ of not less than 500 volts to
set up the sustained oscillations and all ordinary direct current for
lighting purposes is usually generated at a potential of 110 volts.

Now as you know it is easy to _step-up_ a 110 volt alternating current
to any voltage you wish with a power transformer but until within
comparatively recent years an alternating current could not be used
for the production of sustained oscillations for the very good reason
that the state of the art had not advanced that far. In the new order
of things these difficulties have all but vanished and while a
wireless telephone transmitter still requires a high voltage direct
current to operate it this is easily obtained from 110 volt source of
alternating current by means of _vacuum tube rectifiers_.

The pulsating direct currents are then passed through a filtering
reactance coil, called a _reactor_, and one or more condensers, and
these smooth them out until they approximate a continuous direct
current. The latter is then made to flow through a vacuum tube
oscillator when it is converted into high frequency oscillations and
these are _varied_, or _modulated_, as it is called, by a _microphone
transmitter_ such as is used for ordinary wire telephony. The energy
of these sustained modulated oscillations is then radiated into space
from the aerial in the form of electric waves.

The distance that can be covered with a wireless telephone transmitter
is about one-fourth as great as that of a wireless telegraph
transmitter having the same input of initial current, but it is long
enough to satisfy the most enthusiastic amateur. For instance with a
wireless telephone transmitter where an amplifier tube is used to set
up the oscillations and which is made for a plate potential of 100
volts, distances up to 10 or 15 miles can be covered.

With a single 5 watt oscillator tube energized by a direct current of
350 volts from either a motor-generator or from a power transformer
(after it has been rectified and smoothed out) speech and music can be
transmitted to upwards of 25 miles. Where two 5 watt tubes connected
in parallel are used wireless telephone messages can be transmitted to
distances of 40 or 50 miles. Further, a single 50 watt oscillator tube
will send to distances of 50 to 100 miles while two of these tubes in
parallel will send from 100 to 200 miles. Finally, where four or five
oscillator tubes are connected in parallel proportionately greater
distances can be covered.

A Short Distance Wireless Telephone Transmitting Set-With 110 Volt
Direct Lighting Current.--For this very simple, short distance
wireless telephone transmitting set you need the same apparatus as
that described and pictured in the beginning of Chapter XVI for a
_Short Distance C. W. Telegraph Transmitter_, except that you use a
_microphone transmitter_ instead of a _telegraph key_. If you have a
110 volt direct lighting current in your home you can put up this
short distance set for very little money and it will be well worth
your while to do so.

The Apparatus You Need.--For this set you require: (1) one _tuning
coil_ as shown at A and B in Fig. 75; (2) one _aerial ammeter_ as
shown at C in Fig. 75; (3) one _aerial condenser_ as shown at C in
Fig. 75; (4) one _grid, blocking and protective condenser_ as shown at
D in Fig. 75; (5) one _grid leak_ as shown at C in Fig. 77; (6) one
_vacuum tube amplifier_ which is used as an _oscillator_; (7) one _6
volt storage battery_; (8) one _rheostat_ as shown at I in Fig. 75;
(9) one _oscillation choke coil_; (10) one _panel cut-out_ as shown at
K in Fig. 75 and an ordinary _microphone transmitter_.

The Microphone Transmitter.--The best kind of a microphone to use with
this and other telephone transmitting sets is a _Western Electric No.
284-W_. [Footnote: Made by the Western Electric Company, Chicago,
Ill.] This is known as a solid back transmitter and is the standard
commercial type used on all long distance Bell telephone lines. It
articulates sharply and distinctly and there are no current variations
to distort the wave form of the voice and it will not buzz or sizzle.
It is shown in Fig. 84 and costs $2.00. Any other good microphone
transmitter can be used if desired.

[Illustration: Fig. 84.--Standard Microphone Transmitter.]

Connecting Up the Apparatus.--Begin by connecting the leading-in wire
with one of the terminals of the microphone transmitter, as shown in
the wiring diagram Fig. 85, and the other terminal of this to one end
of the tuning coil. Now connect _clip 1_ of the tuning coil to one of
the posts of the hot-wire ammeter, the other post of this to one end
of aerial condenser and, finally, the other end of the latter with the
water pipe or other ground. The microphone can be connected in the
ground wire and the ammeter in the aerial wire and the results will be
practically the same.

[Illustration: Fig. 85.--Wiring Diagram of Short Distance Wireless
Telephone Set. (Microphone in Aerial Wire.)]

Next connect one end of the grid condenser to the post of the tuning
coil that makes connection with the microphone and the other end to
the grid of the tube, and then shunt the grid leak around the
condenser. Connect the + or _positive_ electrode of the storage
battery with one terminal of the filament of the vacuum tube, the
other terminal of the filament with one post of the rheostat and the
other post of this with the - or _negative_ electrode of the battery.
This done, connect _clip 2_ of the tuning coil to the + or _positive_
electrode of the battery and bring a lead from it to one of the switch
taps of the panel cut-out.

Now connect _clip 3_ of the tuning coil with one end of the blocking
condenser, the other end of this with one terminal of the choke coil
and the other terminal of the latter with the other switch tap of the
cut-out. Connect the protective condenser across the direct current
feed wires between the panel cut-out and the choke coil. Finally
connect the ends of a lamp cord to the fuse socket taps of the
cut-out, and connect the other ends to a lamp plug and screw it into
the lamp socket of the feed wires. Screw in a pair of 5 ampere _fuse
plugs_, close the switch and you are ready to tune the transmitter and
talk to your friends.

A 25 to 50 Mile Wireless Telephone Transmitter--With Direct Current
Motor Generator.--Where you have to start with 110 or 220 volt direct
current and you want to transmit to a distance of 25 miles or more you
will have to install a _motor-generator_. To make this transmitter you
will need exactly the same apparatus as that described and pictured
for the _100 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitting Set_ in Chapter XVI,
except that you must substitute a _microphone transmitter_ and a
_telephone induction coil_, or a _microphone transformer_, or still
better, a _magnetic modulator_, for the telegraph key and chopper.

The Apparatus You Need.--To reiterate; the pieces of apparatus you
need are: (1) one _aerial ammeter_ as shown at E in Fig. 75; (2) one
_tuning coil_ as shown at A in Fig. 77; (3) one _aerial condenser_ as
shown at B in Fig. 77; (4) one _grid leak_ as shown at C in Fig. 77;
(5) one _grid, blocking_ and _protective condenser_; (6) one _5 watt
oscillator tube_ as shown at E in Fig. 77; (7) one _rheostat_ as shown
at I in Fig. 75; (8) one _10 volt (5 cell) storage battery_; (9) one
_choke coil_; (10) one _panel cut-out_ as shown at K in Fig. 75, and
(11) a _motor-generator_ having an input of 110 or 220 volts and an
output of 350 volts.

In addition to the above apparatus you will need: (12) a _microphone
transmitter_ as shown in Fig. 84; (13) a battery of four dry cells or
a 6 volt storage battery, and either (14) a _telephone induction coil_
as shown in Fig. 86; (15) a _microphone transformer_ as shown in Fig.
87; or a _magnetic modulator_ as shown in Fig. 88. All of these parts
have been described, as said above, in Chapter XVI, except the
microphone modulators.

[Illustration: Fig. 86.--Telephone Induction Coil. (Used with
Microphone Transmitter.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 87.--Microphone Transformer. (Used with Microphone
Transmitter.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 88.--Magnetic Modulator. (Used with Microphone
Transmitter.)]

The Telephone Induction Coil.--This is a little induction coil that
transforms the 6-volt battery current after it has flowed through and
been modulated by the microphone transmitter into alternating currents
that have a potential of 1,000 volts of more. It consists of a primary
coil of _No. 20 B. and S._ gauge cotton covered magnet wire wound on a
core of soft iron wires while around the primary coil is wound a
secondary coil of _No. 30_ magnet wire. Get a _standard telephone
induction coil_ that has a resistance of 500 or 750 ohms and this will
cost you a couple of dollars.

The Microphone Transformer.--This device is built on exactly the same
principle as the telephone induction coil just described but it is
more effective because it is designed especially for modulating the
oscillations set up by vacuum tube transmitters. As with the telephone
induction coil, the microphone transmitter is connected in series with
the primary coil and a 6 volt dry or storage battery.

In the better makes of microphone transformer, there is a third
winding, called a _side tone_ coil, to which a headphone can be
connected so that the operator who is speaking into the microphone can
listen-in and so learn if his transmitter is working up to standard.

The Magnetic Modulator.--This is a small closed iron core transformer
of peculiar design and having a primary and a secondary coil wound on
it. This device is used to control the variations of the oscillating
currents that are set up by the oscillator tube. It is made in three
sizes and for the transmitter here described you want the smallest
size, which has an output of 1/2 to 1-1/2 amperes. It costs about
$10.00.

How the Apparatus Is Connected Up.--The different pieces of apparatus
are connected together in exactly the same way as the _100 Mile C. W.
Telegraph Set_ in Chapter XVI except that the microphone transmitter
and microphone modulator (whichever kind you use) is substituted for
the telegraph key and chopper.

Now there are three different ways that the microphone and its
modulator can be connected in circuit. Two of the best ways are shown
at A and B in Fig. 89. In the first way the secondary terminals of the
modulator are shunted around the grid leak in the grid circuit as at
A, and in the second the secondary terminals are connected in the
aerial as at B. Where an induction coil or a microphone transformer is
used they are shunted around a condenser, but this is not necessary
with the magnetic modulator. Where a second tube is used as in Fig. 90
then the microphone and its modulator are connected with the grid
circuit and _clip 3_ of the tuning coil.

[Illustration: Fig. 89.--Wiring Diagram of 25 to 50 Mile Wireless
Telephone. (Microphone Modulator Shunted Around Grid-Leak Condenser.)]

[Illustration: (B) Fig. 89.--Microphone Modulator Connected in Aerial
Wire.]

[Illustration: Fig. 90.--Wiring Diagram of 50 to 100 Mile Wireless
Telephone Transmitting Set.]

A 50 to 100 Mile Wireless Telephone Transmitter--With Direct Current
Motor Generator.--As the initial source of current available is taken
to be a 110 or 220 volt direct current a motor-generator having an
output of 350 volts must be used as before. The only difference
between this transmitter and the preceding one is that: (1) two 5 watt
tubes are used, the first serving as an _oscillator_ and the second as
a _modulator_; (2) an _oscillation choke coil_ is used in the plate
circuit; (3) a _reactance coil_ or _reactor_, is used in the plate
circuit; and (4) a _reactor_ is used in the grid circuit.

The Oscillation Choke Coil.--You can make this choke coil by winding
about 275 turns of _No. 28 B. and S. gauge_ cotton covered magnet wire
on a spool 2 inches in diameter and 4 inches long. Give it a good
coat of shellac varnish and let it dry thoroughly.

The Plate and Grid Circuit Reactance Coils.--Where a single tube is
used as an oscillator and a second tube is employed as a modulator, a
_reactor_, which is a coil of wire wound on an iron core, is used in
the plate circuit to keep the high voltage direct current of the
motor-generator the same at all times. Likewise the grid circuit
reactor is used to keep the voltage of the grid at a constant value.
These reactors are made alike and a picture of one of them is shown in
Fig. 91 and each one will cost you $5.75.

[Illustration: Fig. 91.--Plate and Grid Circuit Reactor.]

Connecting up the Apparatus.--All of the different pieces of apparatus
are connected up as shown in Fig. 89. One of the ends of the secondary
of the induction coil, or the microphone transformer, or the magnetic
modulator is connected to the grid circuit and the other end to _clip
3_ of the tuning coil.

A 100 to 200 Mile Wireless Telephone Transmitter--With Direct Current
Motor Generator.--By using the same connections shown in the wiring
diagrams in Fig. 89 and a single 50 watt oscillator tube your
transmitter will then have a range of 100 miles or so, while if you
connect up the apparatus as shown in Fig. 90 and use two 50 watt tubes
you can work up to 200 miles. Much of the apparatus for a 50 watt
oscillator set where either one or two tubes are used is of the same
size and design as that just described for the 5 watt oscillator sets,
but, as in the C. W. telegraph sets, some of the parts must be
proportionately larger. The required parts are (1) the _50 watt tube_;
(2) the _grid leak resistance_; (3) the _filament rheostat_; (4) the
_filament storage battery_; and (5) the _magnetic modulator_. All of
these parts, except the latter, are described in detail under the
heading of a _500 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitting Set_ in Chapter
XVI, and are also pictured in that chapter.

It is not advisable to use an induction coil for the modulator for
this set, but use, instead, either a telephone transformer, or better,
a magnetic modulator of the second size which has an output of from
1-1/2 to 3-1/2 amperes. The magnetic modulator is described and
pictured in this chapter.

A 50 to 100 Mile Wireless Telephone Transmitting Set--With 110 Volt
Alternating Current.--If you have a 110 volt [Footnote: Alternating
current for lighting purposes ranges from 102.5 volts to 115 volts, so
we take the median and call it 110 volts.] alternating current
available you can use it for the initial source of energy for your
wireless telephone transmitter. The chief difference between a
wireless telephone transmitting set that uses an alternating current
and one that uses a direct current is that: (1) a _power transformer_
is used for stepping up the voltage instead of a motor-generator, and
(2) a _vacuum tube rectifier_ must be used to convert the alternating
current into direct current.

The Apparatus You Need.--For this telephone transmitting set you need:
(1) one _aerial ammeter_; (2) one _tuning coil_; (3) one _telephone
modulator_; (4) one _aerial series condenser_; (5) one _4 cell dry
battery_ or a 6 volt storage battery; (6) one _microphone
transmitter_; (7) one _battery switch_; (8) one _grid condenser_; (9)
one _grid leak_; (10) two _5 watt oscillator tubes with sockets_; (11)
one _blocking condenser_; (12) one _oscillation choke coil_; (13) two
_filter condensers_; (14) one _filter reactance coil_; (15) an
_alternating current power transformer_, and (16) two _20 watt
rectifier vacuum tubes_.

All of the above pieces of apparatus are the same as those described
for the _100 Mile C. W. Telegraph Transmitter_ in Chapter XVII,
except: (a) the _microphone modulator_; (b) the _microphone
transmitter_ and (c) the _dry_ or _storage battery_, all of which are
described in this chapter; and the new parts which are: (d) the
_rectifier vacuum tubes_; (e) the _filter condensers_; and (f) the
_filter reactance coil_; further and finally, the power transformer
has a _third_ secondary coil on it and it is this that feeds the
alternating current to the rectifier tubes, which in turn converts it
into a pulsating direct current.

The Vacuum Tube Rectifier.--This rectifier has two electrodes, that
is, it has a filament and a plate like the original vacuum tube
detector, The smallest size rectifier tube requires a plate potential
of 550 volts which is developed by one of the secondary coils of the
power transformer. The filament terminal takes a current of 7.5 volts
and this is supplied by another secondary coil of the transformer.
This rectifier tube delivers a direct current of 20 watts at 350
volts. It looks exactly like the 5 watt oscillator tube which is
pictured at E in Fig. 77. The price is $7.50.

The Filter Condensers.--These condensers are used in connection with
the reactance coil to smooth out the pulsating direct current after it
has passed through the rectifier tube. They have a capacitance of 1
mfd. and will stand 750 volts. These condensers cost about $2.00 each.

The Filter Reactance Coil.--This reactor which is shown in Fig. 92,
has about the same appearance as the power transformer but it is
somewhat smaller. It consists of a coil of wire wound on a soft iron
core and has a large inductance, hence the capacitance of the filter
condensers are proportionately smaller than where a small inductance
is used which has been the general practice. The size you require for
this set has an output of 160 milliamperes and it will supply current
for one to four 5 watt oscillator tubes. This size of reactor costs
$11.50.

[Illustration: Fig. 92.--Filter Reactor for Smoothing out Rectified
Currents.]

Connecting Up the Apparatus.--The wiring diagram in Fig. 93 shows how
the various pieces of apparatus for this telephone transmitter are
connected up. You will observe: (1) that the terminals of the power
transformer secondary coil which develops 10 volts are connected to
the filaments of the oscillator tubes; (2) that the terminals of the
other secondary coil which develops 10 volts are connected with the
filaments of the rectifier tubes; (3) that the terminals of the third
secondary coil which develops 550 volts are connected with the plates
of the rectifier tubes; (4) that the pair of filter condensers are
connected in parallel and these are connected to the mid-taps of the
two filament secondary coils; (5) that the reactance coil and the
third filter condenser are connected together in series and these are
shunted across the filter condensers, which are in parallel; and,
finally, (6) a lead connects the mid-tap of the 550-volt secondary
coil of the power transformer with the connection between the reactor
and the third filter condenser.

[Illustration: Fig 93.--100 to 200 Mile Wireless Telephone
Transmitter.]

A 100 to 200 Mile Wireless Telephone Transmitting Set--With 110 Volt
Alternating Current.--This telephone transmitter is built up of
exactly the same pieces of apparatus and connected up in precisely the
same way as the one just described and shown in Fig. 93.

Apparatus Required.--The only differences between this and the
preceding transmitter are: (1) the _magnetic modulator_, if you use
one, should have an output of 3-1/2 to 5 amperes; (2) you will need
two _50 watt oscillator tubes with sockets_; (3) two _150 watt
rectifier tubes with sockets_; (4) an _aerial ammeter_ that reads to
_5 amperes_; (5) three _1 mfd. filter condensers_ in parallel; (6)
_two filter condensers of 1 mfd. capacitance_ that will stand _1750
volts_; and (6) a _300 milliampere filter reactor_.

The apparatus is wired up as shown in Fig. 93.




CHAPTER XIX

THE OPERATION OF VACUUM TUBE TRANSMITTERS


The three foregoing chapters explained in detail the design and
construction of (1) two kinds of C. W. telegraph transmitters, and (2)
two kinds of wireless telephone transmitters, the difference between
them being whether they used (A) a direct current, or (B) an
alternating current as the initial source of energy. Of course there
are other differences between those of like types as, for instance,
the apparatus and connections used (_a_) in the key circuits, and
(_b_) in the microphone circuits. But in all of the transmitters
described of whatever type or kind the same fundamental device is used
for setting up sustained oscillations and this is the _vacuum tube_.

The Operation of the Vacuum Tube Oscillator.--The operation of the
vacuum tube in producing sustained oscillations depends on (1) the
action of the tube as a valve in setting up the oscillations in the
first place and (2) the action of the grid in amplifying the
oscillations thus set up, both of which we explained in Chapter XIV.
In that chapter it was also pointed out that a very small change in
the grid potential causes a corresponding and larger change in the
amount of current flowing from the plate to the filament; and that if
a vacuum tube is used for the production of oscillations the initial
source of current must have a high voltage, in fact the higher the
plate voltage the more powerful will be the oscillations.

To understand how oscillations are set up by a vacuum tube when a
direct current is applied to it, take a look at the simple circuits
shown in Fig. 94. Now when you close the switch the voltage from the
battery charges the condenser and keeps it charged until you open it
again; the instant you do this the condenser discharges through the
circuit which includes it and the inductance coil, and the discharge
of a condenser is always oscillatory.

[Illustration: (A) and (B) Fig. 94. Operation of Vacuum Tube
Oscillators.]

Where an oscillator tube is included in the circuits as shown at A and
B in Fig. 94, the grid takes the place of the switch and any slight
change in the voltage of either the grid or the plate is sufficient to
start a train of oscillations going. As these oscillations surge
through the tube the positive parts of them flow from the plate to the
filament and these carry more of the direct current with them.

To make a tube set up powerful oscillations then, it is only necessary
that an oscillation circuit shall be provided which will feed part of
the oscillations set up by the tube back to the grid circuit and when
this is done the oscillations will keep on being amplified until the
tube reaches the limit of its output.

[Illustration: (C) Fig. 94.--How a Direct Current Sets up
Oscillations.]

The Operation of C. W. Telegraph Transmitters With Direct
Current--Short Distance C. W. Transmitter.--In the transmitter shown
in the wiring diagram in Fig. 76 the positive part of the 110 volt
direct current is carried down from the lamp socket through one side
of the panel cut-out, thence through the choke coil and to the plate
of the oscillator tube, when the latter is charged to the positive
sign. The negative part of the 110 volt direct current then flows down
the other wire to the filament so that there is a difference of
potential between the plate and the filament of 110 volts. Now when
the 6-volt battery current is switched on the filament is heated to
brilliancy, and the electrons thrown off by it form a conducting path
between it and the plate; the 110 volt current then flows from the
latter to the former.

Now follow the wiring from the plate over to the blocking condenser,
thence to _clip 3_ of the tuning coil, through the turns of the latter
to _clip 2_ and over to the filament and, when the latter is heated,
you have a _closed oscillation circuit_. The oscillations surging in
the latter set up other and like oscillations in the tuning coil
between the end of which is connected with the grid, the aerial and
the _clip 2_, and these surge through the circuit formed by this
portion of the coil, the grid condenser and the filament; this is the
amplifying circuit and it corresponds to the regenerative circuit of a
receiving set.

When oscillations are set up in it the grid is alternately charged to
the positive and negative signs. These reversals of voltage set up
stronger and ever stronger oscillations in the plate circuit as before
explained. Not only do the oscillations surge in the closed circuits
but they run to and fro on the aerial wire when their energy is
radiated in the form of electric waves. The oscillations are varied by
means of the telegraph key which is placed in the grid circuit as
shown in Fig. 76.

The Operation of the Key Circuit.--The effect in a C. W. transmitter
when a telegraph key is connected in series with a buzzer and a
battery and these are shunted around the condenser in the grid
circuit, is to rapidly change the wave form of the sustained
oscillations, and hence, the length of the waves that are sent out.
While no sound can be heard in the headphones at the receiving station
so long as the points of the key are not in contact, when they are in
contact the oscillations are modulated and sounds are heard in the
headphones that correspond to the frequency of the buzzer in the key
circuit.

The Operation of C. W. Telegraph Transmitters with Direct
Current.--The chief differences between the long distance sets which
use a direct current, i.e., those described in Chapter XVI, and the
short distance transmitting sets are that the former use: (1) a
motor-generator set for changing the low voltage direct current into
high voltage direct current, and (2) a chopper in the key circuit. The
way the motor-generator changes the low- into high-voltage current has
been explained in Chapter XVI.

The chopper interrupts the oscillations surging through the grid
circuit at a frequency that the ear can hear, that is to say, about
800 to 1,000 times per second. When the key is open, of course, the
sustained oscillations set up in the circuits will send out continuous
waves but when the key is closed these oscillations are broken up and
then they send out discontinuous waves. If a heterodyne receiving set,
see Chapter XV, is being used at the other end you can dispense with
the chopper and the key circuit needed is very much simplified. The
operation of key circuits of the latter kind will be described
presently.

The Operation of C. W. Telegraph Transmitters with Alternating
Current--With a Single Oscillator Tube.--Where an oscillator tube
telegraph transmitter is operated by a 110 volt alternating current as
the initial source of energy, a buzzer, chopper or other interruptor
is not needed in the key circuit. This is because oscillations are set
up only when the plate is energized with the positive part of the
alternating current and this produces an intermittent musical tone in
the headphones. Hence this kind of a sending set is called a _tone
transmitter_.

Since oscillations are set up only by the positive part or voltage of
an alternating current it is clear that, as a matter of fact, this
kind of a transmitter does not send out continuous waves and therefore
it is not a C. W. transmitter. This is graphically shown by the curve
of the wave form of the alternating current and the oscillations that
are set up by the positive part of it in Fig. 95. Whenever the
positive half of the alternating current energizes the plate then
oscillations are set up by the tube and, conversely, when the negative
half of the current charges the plate no oscillations are produced.

[Illustration: Fig. 95.--Positive Voltage only sets up Oscillations.]

You will also observe that the oscillations set up by the positive
part of the current are not of constant amplitude but start at zero
the instant the positive part begins to energize the plate and they
keep on increasing in amplitude as the current rises in voltage until
the latter reaches its maximum; then as it gradually drops again to
zero the oscillations decrease proportionately in amplitude with it.

Heating the Filament with Alternating Current.--Where an alternating
current power transformer is used to develop the necessary plate
voltage a second secondary coil is generally provided for heating the
filament of the oscillation tube. This is better than a direct current
for it adds to the life of the filament. When you use an alternating
current to heat the filament keep it at the same voltage rather than
at the same amperage (current strength). To do this you need only to
use a voltmeter across the filament terminals instead of an ammeter in
series with it; then regulate the voltage of the filament with a
rheostat.

The Operation of C. W. Telegraph Transmitters with Alternating
Current--With Two Oscillator Tubes.--By using two oscillator tubes and
connecting them up with the power transformer and oscillating circuits
as shown in the wiring diagram in Fig. 83 the plates are positively
energized alternately with every reversal of the current and,
consequently, there is no time period between the ending of the
oscillations set up by one tube and the beginning of the oscillations
set up by the other tube. In other words these oscillations are
sustained but as in the case of those of a single tube, their
amplitude rises and falls. This kind of a set is called a _full wave
rectification transmitter_.

The waves radiated by this transmitter can be received by either a
crystal detector or a plain vacuum-tube detector but the heterodyne
receptor will give you better results than either of the foregoing
types.

The Operation of Wireless Telephone Transmitters with Direct
Current--Short Distance Transmitter.--The operation of this short
distance wireless telephone transmitter, a wiring diagram of which is
shown in Fig. 85 is exactly the same as that of the _Direct Current
Short Distance C. W. Telegraph Transmitter_ already explained in this
chapter. The only difference in the operation of these sets is the
substitution of the _microphone transmitter_ for the telegraph key.

The Microphone Transmitter.--The microphone transmitter that is used
to vary, or modulate, the sustained oscillations set up by the
oscillator tube and circuits is shown in Fig. 84. By referring to the
diagram at A in this figure you will readily understand how it
operates. When you speak into the mouthpiece the _sound waves_, which
are waves in the air, impinge upon the diaphragm and these set it into
vibration--that is, they make it move to and fro.

When the diaphragm moves toward the back of the transmitter it forces
the carbon granules that are in the cup closer together; this lowers
their resistance and allows more current from the battery to flow
through them; when the pressure of the air waves is removed from the
diaphragm it springs back toward the mouth-piece and the carbon
granules loosen up when the resistance offered by them is increased
and less current can flow through them. Where the oscillation current
in the aerial wire is small the transmitter can be connected directly
in series with the latter when the former will surge through it. As
you speak into the microphone transmitter its resistance is varied and
the current strength of the oscillations is varied accordingly.

The Operation of Wireless Telephone Transmitters with Direct
Current--Long Distance Transmitters.--In the wireless telephone
transmitters for long distance work which were shown and described in
the preceding chapter a battery is used to energize the microphone
transmitter, and these two elements are connected in series with a
_microphone modulator_. This latter device may be either (1) a
_telephone induction coil_, (2) a _microphone transformer_, or (3) a
_magnetic modulator_; the first two of these devices step-up the
voltage of the battery current and the amplified voltage thus
developed is impressed on the oscillations that surge through the
closed oscillation circuit or the aerial wire system according to the
place where you connect it. The third device works on a different
principle and this will be described a little farther along.

The Operation of Microphone Modulators--The Induction Coil.--This
device is really a miniature transformer, see A in Fig. 86, and its
purpose is to change the 6 volt direct current that flows through the
microphone into 100 volts alternating current; in turn, this is
impressed on the oscillations that are surging in either (1) the grid
circuit as shown at A in Fig. 89, and in Fig. 90, (2) the aerial wire
system, as shown at B in Fig. 89 and Fig. 93. When the current from
the battery flows through the primary coil it magnetizes the soft iron
core and as the microphone varies the strength of the current the high
voltage alternating currents set up in the secondary coil of the
induction coil are likewise varied, when they are impressed upon and
modulate the oscillating currents.

The Microphone Transformer.--This is an induction coil that is
designed especially for wireless telephone modulation. The iron core
of this transformer is also of the open magnetic circuit type, see A
in Fig. 87, and the _ratio_ of the turns [Footnote: See Chapter VI] of
the primary and the secondary coil is such that when the secondary
current is impressed upon either the grid circuit or the aerial wire
system it controls the oscillations flowing through it with the
greatest efficiency.

The Magnetic Modulator.--This piece of apparatus is also called a
_magnetic amplifier_. The iron core is formed of very thin plates, or
_laminations_ as they are called, and this permits high-frequency
oscillations to surge in a coil wound on it. In this transformer, see
A in Fig. 88, the current flowing through the microphone varies the
magnetic permeability of the soft iron core by the magnetic saturation
of the latter. Since the microphone current is absolutely distinct
from the oscillating currents surging through the coil of the
transformer a very small direct current flowing through a coil on the
latter will vary or modulate very large oscillating currents surging
through the former. It is shown connected in the aerial wire system
at A in Fig. 88, and in Fig. 93.

Operation of the Vacuum Tube as a Modulator.--Where a microphone
modulator of the induction coil or microphone transformer type is
connected in the grid circuit or aerial wire system the modulation is
not very effective, but by using a second tube as a _modulator_, as
shown in Fig. 90, an efficient degree of modulation can be had. Now
there are two methods by which a vacuum tube can be used as a
modulator and these are: (1) by the _absorption_ of the energy of the
current set up by the oscillator tube, and (2) by _varying_ the direct
current that energizes the plate of the oscillator tube.

The first of these two methods is not used because it absorbs the
energy of the oscillating current produced by the tube and it is
therefore wasteful. The second method is an efficient one, as the
direct current is varied before it passes into the oscillator tube.
This is sufficient reason for describing only the second method. The
voltage of the grid of the modulator tube is varied by the secondary
coil of the induction coil or microphone transformer, above described.
In this way the modulator tube acts like a variable resistance but it
amplifies the variations impressed on the oscillations set up by the
oscillator tube. As the magnetic modulator does the same thing a
vacuum tube used as a modulator is not needed where the former is
employed. For this reason a magnetic modulator is the cheapest in the
long run.

The Operation of Wireless Telephone Transmitters with Alternating
Current.--Where an initial alternating current is used for wireless
telephony, the current must be rectified first and then smoothed out
before passing into the oscillator tube to be converted into
oscillations. Further so that the oscillations will be sustained, two
oscillator tubes must be used, and, finally, in order that the
oscillations may not vary in amplitude the alternating current must be
first changed into direct current by a pair of rectifier vacuum tubes,
as shown in Fig. 93. When this is done the plates will be positively
charged alternately with every reversal of the current in which case
there will be no break in the continuity of the oscillations set up
and therefore in the waves that are sent out.

The Operation of Rectifier Vacuum Tubes.--The vacuum tube rectifier is
simply a two electrode vacuum tube. The way in which it changes a
commercial alternating current into pulsating direct current is the
same as that in which a two electrode vacuum tube detector changes an
oscillating current into pulsating direct currents and this has been
explained in detail under the heading of _The Operation of a Two
Electrode Vacuum Tube Detector_ in Chapter XII. In the _C. W.
Telegraph Transmitting Sets_ described in Chapter XVII, the oscillator
tubes act as rectifiers as well as oscillators but for wireless
telephony the alternating current must be rectified first so that a
continuous direct current will result.

The Operation of Reactors and Condensers.--A reactor is a single coil
of wire wound on an iron core, see Fig. 90 and A in Fig. 91, and it
should preferably have a large inductance. The reactor for the plate
and grid circuit of a wireless telephone transmitter where one or more
tubes are used as modulators as shown in the wiring diagram in Fig.
90, and the filter reactor shown in Fig. 92, operate in the same way.

When an alternating current flows through a coil of wire the reversals
of the current set up a _counter electromotive force_ in it which
opposes, that is _reacts_, on the current, and the _higher_ the
frequency of the current the _greater_ will be the _reactance_. When
the positive half of an alternating current is made to flow through a
large resistance the current is smoothed out but at the same time a
large amount of its energy is used up in producing heat.

But when the positive half of an alternating current is made to flow
through a large inductance it acts like a large resistance as before
and likewise smooths out the current, but none of its energy is wasted
in heat and so a coil having a large inductance, which is called an
_inductive reactance_, or just _reactor_ for short, is used to smooth
out, or filter, the alternating current after it has been changed into
a pulsating direct current by the rectifier tubes.

A condenser also has a reactance effect on an alternating current but
different from an induction coil the _lower_ the frequency the
_greater_ will be the reactance. For this reason both a filter reactor
and _filter condensers_ are used to smooth out the pulsating direct
currents.




CHAPTER XX

HOW TO MAKE A RECEIVING SET FOR $5.00 OR LESS


In the chapters on _Receptors_ you have been told how to build up
high-grade sets. But there are thousands of boys, and, probably, not a
few men, who cannot afford to invest $25.00, more or less, in a
receiving set and would like to experiment in a small way.

The following set is inexpensive, and with this cheap, little portable
receptor you can get the Morse code from stations a hundred miles
distant and messages and music from broadcasting stations if you do
not live too far away from them. All you need for this set are: (1) a
_crystal detector_, (2) a _tuning coil_ and (3) an _earphone_. You can
make a crystal detector out of a couple of binding posts, a bit of
galena and a piece of brass wire, or, better, you can buy one all
ready to use for 50 cents.

[Illustration: Wireless Receptor, the size of a Safety Match Box. A
Youthful Genius in the person of Kenneth R. Hinman, Who is only twelve
years old, has made a Wireless Receiving Set that fits neatly into a
Safety Match Box. With this Instrument and a Pair of Ordinary
Receivers, He is able to catch not only Code Messages but the regular
Broadcasting Programs from Stations Twenty and Thirty Miles Distant.]

The Crystal Detector.--This is known as the _Rasco baby_ detector and
it is made and sold by the _Radio Specialty Company_, 96 Park Place,
New York City. It is shown in Fig. 96. The base is made of black
composition and on it is mounted a standard in which a rod slides and
on one end of this there is fixed a hard rubber adjusting knob while
the other end carries a thin piece of _phosphor-bronze wire_, called a
_cat-whisker_. To secure the galena crystal in the cup you simply
unscrew the knurled cap, place it in the cavity of the post and screw
the cap back on again. The free end of the cat-whisker wire is then
adjusted so that it will rest lightly on the exposed part of the
galena.

[Illustration: Fig. 96.--Rasco Baby Crystal Detector.]

The Tuning Coil.--You will have to make this tuning coil, which you
can do at a cost of less than $1.00, as the cheapest tuning coil you
can buy costs at least $3.00, and we need the rest of our $5.00 to
invest in the earphone. Get a cardboard tube, such as is used for
mailing purposes, 2 inches in diameter and 3 inches long, see A in
Fig. 97. Now wind on 250 turns of _No. 40 Brown and Sharpe gauge plain
enameled magnet wire_. You can use _No. 40 double cotton covered
magnet wire_, in which case you will have to shellac the tube and the
wire after you get it on.

[Illustration: Fig. 97.--How the Tuning Coil is Made.]

As you wind on the wire take off a tap at every 15th turn, that is,
scrape the wire and solder on a piece about 7 inches long, as shown in
Fig. 99; and do this until you have 6 taps taken off. Instead of
leaving the wires outside of the tube bring them to the inside of it
and then out through one of the open ends. Now buy a _round wood-base
switch_ with 7 contact points on it as shown at B in Fig. 97. This
will cost you 25 or 50 cents.

The Headphone.--An ordinary Bell telephone receiver is of small use
for wireless work as it is wound to too low a resistance and the
diaphragm is much too thick. If you happen to have a Bell phone you
can rewind it with _No. 40_ single covered silk magnet wire, or
enameled wire of the same size, when its sensitivity will be very
greatly improved. Then you must get a thin diaphragm and this should
_not_ be enameled, as this tends to dampen the vibrations of it. You
can get a diaphragm of the right kind for 5 cents.

The better way, though, is to buy an earphone made especially for
wireless work. You can get one wound to 1000 ohms resistance for $1.75
and this price includes a cord. [Footnote: This is Mesco, No. 470
wireless phone. Sold by the Manhattan Electrical Supply Co., Park
Place, N.Y.C.] For $1.00 extra you can get a head-band for it, and
then your phone will look like the one pictured in Fig. 98.

[Illustration: Fig. 98.--Mesco 1000 Ohm Head Set.]

How to Mount the Parts.--Now mount the coil on a wood base, 1/2 or 1
inch thick, 3-1/2 inches wide and 5-1/2 inches long, and then connect
one end of the coil to one of the end points on the switch, and
connect each succeeding tap to one of the switch points, as shown
schematically in Fig. 99 and diagrammatically in Fig. 100. This done,
screw the switch down to the base. Finally screw the detector to the
base and screw two binding posts in front of the coil. These are for
the earphone.

[Illustration: Fig. 99.--Schematic Layout of $5.00 Receiving Set.]

[Illustration: Fig. 100.--Wiring Diagram for $5.00 Receiving Set.]

The Condenser.--You do not have to connect a condenser across the
earphone but if you do you will improve the receiving qualities of the
receptor.

How to Connect Up the Receptor.--Now connect up all the parts as shown
in Figs. 99 and 100, then connect the leading-in wire of the aerial
with the lever of the switch; and connect the free end of the tuning
coil with the _ground_. If you have no aerial wire try hooking it up
to a rain pipe that is _not grounded_ or the steel frame of an
umbrella. For a _ground_ you can use a water pipe, an iron pipe driven
into the ground, or a hydrant. Put on your headphone, adjust the
detector and move the lever over the switch contacts until it is in
adjustment and then, if all your connections are properly made, you
should be able to pick up messages.

[Illustration: Wireless Set made into a Ring, designed by Alfred G.
Rinehart, of Elizabeth, New Jersey. This little Receptor is a
Practical Set; it will receive Messages, Concerts, etc., Measures 1"
by 5/8" by 7/8". An ordinary Umbrella is used as an Aerial.]




APPENDIX


USEFUL INFORMATION

ABBREVIATIONS OF UNITS

Unit                   Abbreviation

ampere                 amp.
ampere-hours           amp.-hr.
centimeter             cm.
centimeter-gram-second c.g.s.
cubic centimeters      cm.^3
cubic inches           cu. in.
cycles per second      ~
degrees Centigrade     °C.
degrees Fahrenheit     °F.
feet                   ft.
foot-pounds            ft.-lb.
grams                  g.
henries                h.
inches                 in.
kilograms              kg.
kilometers             km.
kilowatts              kw.
kilowatt-hours         kw.-hr.
kilovolt-amperes       kv.-a.
meters                 m.
microfarads            [Greek: mu]f.
micromicrofarads       [Greek: mu mu]f.
millihenries           mh.
millimeters            mm.
pounds                 lb.
seconds                sec.
square centimeters     cm.^2
square inches          sq. in.
volts                  v.
watts                  w.

PREFIXES USED WITH METRIC SYSTEM UNITS

Prefix          Abbreviation          Meaning

micro           [Greek: mu].          1 millionth
milli           m.                    1 thousandth
centi           c.                    1 hundredth
deci            d.                    1 tenth
deka            dk.                   10
hekto           h.                    1 hundred
kilo            k.                    1 thousand
mega            m.                    1 million




SYMBOLS USED FOR VARIOUS QUANTITIES


Quantity                 Symbol

capacitance              C

conductance              g

coupling co-efficient    k

current, instantaneous   i

current, effective value I

decrement                [Greek: delta]

dielectric constant      [Greek: alpha]

electric field intensity [Greek: epsilon]

electromotive force,
instantaneous value      E

electromotive force,
effective value          F

energy                   W

force                    F

frequency                f

frequency x 2[Greek: pi] [Greek: omega]

impedance                Z

inductance, self         L

inductance, mutual       M

magnetic field intensity A

magnetic flux            [Greek: Phi]

magnetic induction       B

period of a complete
oscillation              T

potential difference     V

quantity of electricity  Q

ratio of the
circumference of a
circle to its diameter
=3.1416                  [Greek: pi]

reactance                X

resistance               R

time                     t

velocity                 v

velocity of light        c

wave length              [Greek: lambda]

wave length in meters    [Greek: lambda]m

work                     W

permeability             [Greek: mu]

Square root              [Math: square root]




TABLE OF ENAMELED WIRE

  No. of   Turns     Turns      Ohms per
  Wire,     per       per      Cubic Inch
  B.& S.  Linear    Square        of
  Gauge    Inch      Inch       Winding

  20        30         885         .748

  22        37        1400        1.88

  24        46        2160        4.61

  26        58        3460       11.80

  28        73        5400       29.20

  30        91        8260       70.90

  32       116      21,000     7547.00

  34       145      13,430     2968.00

  36       178      31,820     1098.00

  38       232      54,080      456.00

  40       294      86,500      183.00




TABLE OF FREQUENCY AND WAVE LENGTHS


  W. L.--Wave Lengths in Meters.
  F.--Number of Oscillations per Second.
  O. or square root L. C. is called Oscillation Constant.
  C.--Capacity in Microfarads.
  L.--Inductance in Centimeters.
  1000 Centimeters = 1 Microhenry.


    W.L.     F          O       L.C.
      50  6,000,000     .839       .7039
     100  3,000,000    1.68       2.82
     150  2,000,000    2.52       6.35
     200  1,500,000    3.36      11.29
     250  1,200,000    4.19      17.55
     300  1,000,000    5.05      25.30
     350    857,100    5.87      34.46
     400    750,000    6.71      45.03
     450    666,700    7.55      57.00
     500    600,000    8.39      70.39
     550    545,400    9.23      85.19
     600    500,000   10.07     101.41
     700    428,600   11.74     137.83
     800    375,000   13.42     180.10
     900    333,300   15.10     228.01
   1,000    300,000   16.78     281.57
   1,100    272,730   18.45     340.40
   1,200    250,000   20.13     405.20
   1,300    230,760   21.81     475.70
   1,400    214,380   23.49     551.80
   1,500    200,000   25.17     633.50
   1,600    187,500   26.84     720.40
   1,700    176,460   28.52     813.40
   1,800    166,670   30.20     912.00
   1,900    157,800   31.88   1,016.40
   2,000    150,000   33.55   1,125.60
   2,100    142,850   35.23   1,241.20
   2,200    136,360   36.91   1,362.40
   2,300    130,430   38.59   1,489.30
   2,400    125,000   40.27   1,621.80
   2,500    120,000   41.95   1,759.70
   2,600    115,380   43.62   1,902.60
   2,700    111,110   45.30   2,052.00
   2,800    107,140   46.89   2,207.00
   2,900    103,450   48.66   2,366.30
   3,000    100,000   50.33   2,533.20
   4,000     75,000   67.11   4,504.00
   5,000     60,000   83.89   7,038.00
   6,000     50,000  100.7   10,130.00
   7,000     41,800  117.3   13,630.00
   8,000     37,500  134.1   18,000.00
   9,000     33,300  151.0   22,820.00
  10,000     30,000  167.9   28,150.00
  11,000     27,300  184.8   34,150.00
  12,000     25,000  201.5   40,600.00
  13,000     23,100  218.3   47,600.00
  14,000     21,400  235.0   55,200.00
  15,000     20,000  252.0   63,500.00
  16,000     18,750  269.0   72,300.00




PRONUNCIATION OF GREEK LETTERS


Many of the physical quantities use Greek letters for symbols. The
following is the Greek alphabet with the way the letters are
pronounced:

  a   alpha
  b   beta
  g   gamma
  d   delta
  e   epsilon
  z   zeta
  ae  eta
  th  theta
  i   iota
  k   kappa
  l   lambda
  m   mu
  n   nu
  x   Xi(Zi)
  o   omicron
  p   pi
  r   rho
  s   sigma
  t   tau
  u   upsilon
  ph  phi
  ch  chi
  ps  psi
  o   omega




TABLE OF SPARKING DISTANCES

In Air for Various Voltages between Needle Points


  Volts               Distance
               Inches         Centimeter
  5,000         .225            .57
  10,000        .470           1.19
  15,000        .725           1.84
  20,000       1.000           2.54
  25,000       1.300           3.30
  30,000       1.625           4.10
  35,000       2.000           5.10
  40,000       2.450           6.20
  45,000       2.95            7.50
  50,000       3.55            9.90
  60,000       4.65           11.8
  70,000       5.85           14.9
  80,000       7.10           18.0
  90,000       8.35           21.2
  100,000      9.60           24.4
  110,000     10.75           27.3
  120,000     11.85           30.1
  130,000     12.95           32.9
  140,000     13.95           35.4
  150,000     15.00           38.1


FEET PER POUND OF INSULATED MAGNET WIRE

  No. of    Single     Double     Single     Double
  B.& S.    Cotton,    Cotton,    Silk,      Silk,      Enamel
  Gauge     4-Mils     8-Mils     1-3/4-Mils 4-Mils

  20           311        298       319         312       320
  21           389        370       408         389       404
  22           488        461       503         498       509
  23           612        584       636         631       642
  24           762        745       800         779       810
  25           957        903     1,005         966     1,019
  26         1,192      1,118     1,265       1,202     1,286
  27         1,488      1,422     1,590       1,543     1,620
  28         1,852      1,759     1,972       1,917     2,042
  29         2,375      2,207     2,570       2,435     2,570
  30         2,860      2,534     3,145       2,900     3,240
  31         3,800      2,768     3,943       3,683     4,082
  32         4,375      3,737     4,950       4,654     5,132
  33         5,590      4,697     6,180       5,689     6,445
  34         6,500      6,168     7,740       7,111     8,093
  35         8,050      6,737     9,600       8,584    10,197
  36         9,820      7,877    12,000      10,039    12,813
  37        11,860      9,309    15,000      10,666    16,110
  38        14,300     10,636    18,660      14,222    20,274
  39        17,130     11,907    23,150      16,516    25,519
  40        21,590     14,222    28,700      21,333    32,107




INTERNATIONAL MORSE CODE AND CONVENTIONAL SIGNALS

TO BE USED FOR ALL GENERAL PUBLIC SERVICE RADIO COMMUNICATION


1. A dash is equal to three dots.

2. The space between parts of the same letter is equal to one dot.

3. The space between two letters is equal to three dots.

4. The space between two words is equal to five dots.

[Note: period denotes Morse dot, hyphen denotes Morse dash]

A .-

B -...

C -.-.

D -..

E .

F ..-.

G --.

H ....

I ..

J .---

K -.-

L .-..

M --

N -.

O ---

P .--.

Q --.-

R .-.

S ...

T -

U ..-

V ...-

W .--

X -..-

Y -.--

Z --..

Ä (German) .-.-

Á or Å (Spanish-Scandinavian) .--.-

CH (German-Spanish) ----

É (French) ..-..

Ñ (Spanish) --.--

Ö (German) ---.

Ü (German) ..--

1 .----

2 ..---

3 ...--

4 ....-

5 .....

6 -....

7 --...

8 ---..

9 ----.

0 -----

Period .. .. ..

Semicolon -.-.-.

Comma -.-.-.

Colon ---...

Interrogation ..--..

Exclamation point --..--

Apostrophe .----.

Hyphen -....-

Bar indicating fraction -..-.

Parenthesis -.--.-

Inverted commas .-..-.

Underline ..--.-

Double dash -...-

Distress Call ...---...

Attention call to precede every transmission -.-.-

General inquiry call -.-. --.-

From (de) -.. .

Invitation to transmit (go ahead) -.-

Warning--high power --..--

Question (please repeat after ...)--interrupting long messages ..--..

Wait .-...

Break (Bk.) (double dash) -...-

Understand ...-.

Error ........

Received (O.K.) .-.

Position report (to precede all position messages) - .-.

End of each message (cross) .-.-.

Transmission finished (end of work) (conclusion of correspondence) ...-.-




INTERNATIONAL RADIOTELEGRAPHIC CONVENTION

LIST OF ABBREVIATIONS TO BE USED IN RADIO COMMUNICATION

ABBREVIATION      QUESTION                ANSWER OR REPLY

PRB   Do you wish to communicate          I wish to communicate by means
        by means of the International       of the International Signal Code.
        Signal Code?

QRA   What ship or coast station is       This is....
      that?

QRB   What is your distance?              My distance is....

QRC   What is your true bearing?          My true bearing is....

QRD   Where are you bound for?            I am bound for....

QRF   Where are you bound from?           I am bound from....

QRG   What line do you belong to?         I belong to the ... Line.

QRH   What is your wave length in         My wave length is ... meters.
        meters?

QRJ   How many words have you to send?    I have ... words to send.

QRK   How do you receive me?              I am receiving well.

QRL   Are you receiving badly?            I am receiving badly. Please
        Shall I send 20?                    send 20.
                   ...-.                               ...-.
                   for adjustment?                     for adjustment.

QRM   Are you being interfered with?      I am being interfered with.

QRN   Are the atmospherics strong?        Atmospherics are very strong.

QRO   Shall I increase power?             Increase power.

QRP   Shall I decrease power?             Decrease power.

QRQ   Shall I send faster?                Send faster.

QRS   Shall I send slower?                Send slower.

QRT   Shall I stop sending?               Stop sending.

QRU   Have you anything for me?           I have nothing for you.

QRV   Are you ready?                      I am ready. All right now.

QRW   Are you busy?                       I am busy (or: I am busy with...).
                                            Please do not interfere.

QRX   Shall I stand by?                   Stand by. I will call you when
                                            required.

QRY   When will be my turn?               Your turn will be No....

QRZ   Are my signals weak?                You signals are weak.

QSA   Are my signals strong?              You signals are strong.

QSB   Is my tone bad?                     The tone is bad.
      Is my spark bad?                    The spark is bad.

QSC   Is my spacing bad?                  Your spacing is bad.

QSD   What is your time?                  My time is....

QSF   Is transmission to be in            Transmission will be in
       alternate order or in series?        alternate order.

QSG                                       Transmission will be in a
                                            series of 5 messages.

QSH                                       Transmission will be in a
                                            series of 10 messages.

QSJ   What rate shall I collect for...?   Collect....

QSK   Is the last radiogram canceled?     The last radiogram is canceled.

QSL   Did you get my receipt?             Please acknowledge.

QSM   What is your true course?           My true course is...degrees.

QSN   Are you in communication with land? I am not in communication with land.

QSO   Are you in communication with       I am in communication with...
        any ship or station                 (through...).
        (or: with...)?

QSP   Shall I inform...that you are       Inform...that I am calling him.
        calling him?

QSQ   Is...calling me?                    You are being called by....

QSR   Will you forward the radiogram?     I will forward the radiogram.

QST   Have you received the general       General call to all stations.
        call?

QSU   Please call me when you have        Will call when I have finished.
        finished (or: at...o'clock)?

QSV  Is public correspondence being       Public correspondence is being
       handled?                             handled. Please do not interfere.

[Footnote: Public correspondence is any radio work, official or
private, handled on commercial wave lengths.]

QSW   Shall I increase my spark           Increase your spark frequency.
        frequency?

QSX   Shall I decrease my spark           Decrease your spark frequency.
        frequency?

QSY   Shall I send on a wavelength        Let us change to the wave length
        of ... meters?                        of ... meters.

QSZ                                       Send each word twice. I have
                                            difficulty in receiving you.

QTA                                       Repeat the last radiogram.


When an abbreviation is followed by a mark of interrogation, it refers
to the question indicated for that abbreviation.




Useful Information

Symbols Used For Apparatus

alternator

ammeter

aerial

arc

battery

buzzer

condenser

variable condenser

connection of wires

no connection

coupled coils

variable coupling

detector

gap, plain

gap, quenched

ground

hot wire ammeter

inductor

variable inductor

key

resistor

variable resistor

switch s.p.s.t.

" s.p.d.t.

" d.p.s.t.

" d.p.d.t.

" reversing

phone receiver

" transmitter

thermoelement

transformer

vacuum tube

voltmeter

choke coil




DEFINITIONS OF ELECTRIC AND MAGNETIC UNITS


The _ohm_ is the resistance of a thread of mercury at the temperature
of melting ice, 14.4521 grams in mass, of uniform cross-section and a
length of 106.300 centimeters.

The _ampere_ is the current which when passed through a solution of
nitrate of silver in water according to certain specifications,
deposits silver at the rate of 0.00111800 of a gram per second.

The _volt_ is the electromotive force which produces a current of 1
ampere when steadily applied to a conductor the resistance of which is
1 ohm.

The _coulomb_ is the quantity of electricity transferred by a current
of 1 ampere in 1 second.

The _ampere-hour_ is the quantity of electricity transferred by a
current of 1 ampere in 1 hour and is, therefore, equal to 3600
coulombs.

The _farad_ is the capacitance of a condenser in which a potential
difference of 1 volt causes it to have a charge of 1 coulomb of
electricity.

The _henry_ is the inductance in a circuit in which the electromotive
force induced is 1 volt when the inducing current varies at the rate
of 1 ampere per second.

The _watt_ is the power spent by a current of 1 ampere in a resistance
of 1 ohm.

The _joule_ is the energy spent in I second by a flow of 1 ampere in 1
ohm.

The _horse-power_ is used in rating steam machinery. It is equal to
746 watts.

The _kilowatt_ is 1,000 watts.

The units of capacitance actually used in wireless work are the
_microfarad_, which is the millionth part of a farad, because the
farad is too large a unit; and the _C. G. S. electrostatic unit of
capacitance_, which is often called the _centimeter of capacitance_,
which is about equal to 1.11 microfarads.

The units of inductance commonly used in radio work are the
_millihenry_, which is the thousandth part of a henry; and the
_centimeter of inductance_, which is one one-thousandth part of a
microhenry.

Note.--For further information about electric and magnetic units get
the _Bureau of Standards Circular No. 60_, called _Electric Units and
Standards_, the price of which is 15 cents; also get _Scientific Paper
No. 292_, called _International System of Electric and Magnetic
Units_, price 10 cents. These and other informative papers can be had
from the _Superintendent of Documents, Government Printing Office_,
Washington, D. C.




WIRELESS BOOKS


The Admiralty Manual of Wireless Telegraphy. 1920. Published by His
Majesty's Stationery Office, London.

Ralph E. Batcher.--Prepared Radio Measurements. 1921. Wireless Press,
Inc., New York City.

Elmer E. Bucher.--Practical Wireless Telegraphy. 1918. Wireless
Press, Inc., New York City.

Elmer E. Bucher.--Vacuum Tubes in Wireless Communication. 1919.
Wireless Press, Inc., New York City.

Elmer E. Bucher.--The Wireless Experimenter's Manual. 1920. Wireless
Press, Inc., New York City.

A. Frederick Collins.--Wireless Telegraphy, Its History, Theory, and
Practice. 1905. McGraw Pub. Co., New York City.

J. H. Dellinger.--Principles Underlying Radio Communication. 1921.
Signal Corps, U. S. Army, Washington, D. C.

H. M. Dorsett.--Wireless Telegraphy and Telephony. 1920. Wireless
Press, Ltd., London.

J. A. Fleming.--Principles of Electric Wave Telegraphy. 1919.
Longmans, Green and Co., London.

Charles B. Hayward.--How to Become a Wireless Operator. 1918.
American Technical Society, Chicago, Ill.

G. D. Robinson.--Manual of Radio Telegraphy and Telephony. 1920.
United States Naval Institute, Annapolis, Md.

Rupert Stanley.--Textbook of Wireless Telegraphy. 1919. Longmans,
Green and Co., London.

E. W. Stone.--Elements of Radio Telegraphy. 1919. D, Van Nostrand Co.,
New York City.

L. B. Turner.--Wireless Telegraphy and Telephony. 1921. Cambridge
University Press. Cambridge, England.

Send to the _Superintendent of Documents, Government Printing Office_,
Washington, D. C., for a copy of _Price List No. 64_ which lists the
Government's books and pamphlets on wireless. It will be sent to you
free of charge.

The Government publishes; (1) _A List of Commercial Government and
Special Wireless Stations_, every year, price 15 cents; (2) _A List of
Amateur Wireless Stations_, yearly, price 15 cents; (3) _A Wireless
Service Bulletin_ is published monthly, price 5 cents a copy, or 25
cents yearly; and (4) _Wireless Communication Laws of the United
States_, the _International Wireless Telegraphic Convention and
Regulations Governing Wireless Operators and the Use of Wireless on
Ships and Land Stations_, price 15 cents a copy. Orders for the above
publications should be addressed to the _Superintendent of Documents,
Government Printing Office, Washington, D. C._




Manufacturers and Dealers in Wireless Apparatus and Supplies:

Adams-Morgan Co., Upper Montclair, N. J.

American Hard Rubber Co., 11 Mercer Street, New York City.

American Radio and Research Corporation, Medford Hillside, Mass.

Brach (L. S.) Mfg. Co., 127 Sussex Ave., Newark, N. J.

Brandes (C.) Inc., 237 Lafayette St., New York City.

Bunnell (J. H.) Company, Park Place, New York City.

Burgess Battery Company, Harris Trust Co. Bldg., Chicago, Ill.

Clapp-Eastman Co., 120 Main St., Cambridge, Mass.

Connecticut Telephone and Telegraph Co., Meriden, Conn.

Continental Fiber Co., Newark, Del.

Coto-Coil Co., Providence, R. I.

Crosley Mfg. Co., Cincinnati, Ohio.

Doolittle (F. M.), 817 Chapel St., New Haven, Conn.

Edelman (Philip E.), 9 Cortlandt St., New York City.

Edison Storage Battery Co., Orange, N. J.

Electric Specialty Co., Stamford, Conn.

Electrose Mfg. Co., 60 Washington St., Brooklyn, N. Y.

General Electric Co., Schenectady, N. Y.

Grebe (A. H.) and Co., Inc., Richmond Hill, N. Y. C.

International Brass and Electric Co., 176 Beekman St., New York City.

International Insulating Co., 25 West 45th St., New York City.

King Amplitone Co., 82 Church St., New York City.

Kennedy (Colin B.) Co., Rialto Bldg., San Francisco, Cal.

Magnavox Co., Oakland, Cal.

Manhattan Electrical Supply Co., Park Place, N. Y.

Marshall-Gerken Co., Toledo, Ohio.

Michigan Paper Tube and Can Co., 2536 Grand River Ave., Detroit, Mich.

Murdock (Wm. J.) Co., Chelsea, Mass.

National Carbon Co., Inc., Long Island City, N. Y.

Pittsburgh Radio and Appliance Co., 112 Diamond St., Pittsburgh, Pa,

Radio Corporation of America, 233 Broadway, New York City.

Riley-Klotz Mfg. Co., 17-19 Mulberry St., Newark, N. J.

Radio Specialty Co., 96 Park Place, New York City.

Roller-Smith Co., 15 Barclay St., New York City.

Tuska (C. D.) Co., Hartford, Conn.

Western Electric Co., Chicago, Ill.

Westinghouse Electric Co., Pittsburgh, Pa.

Weston Electrical Instrument Co., 173 Weston Ave., Newark, N. J.

Westfield Machine Co., Westfield, Mass.




ABBREVIATIONS OF COMMON TERMS


A. ..............Aerial

A.C. ............Alternating Current

A.F. ............Audio Frequency

B. and S. .......Brown & Sharpe Wire Gauge

C. ..............Capacity or Capacitance

C.G.S. ..........Centimeter-Grain-Second

Cond. ...........Condenser

Coup. ...........Coupler

C.W. ............Continuous Waves

D.C. ............Direct Current

D.P.D.T. ........Double Point Double Throw

D.P.S.T. ........Double Point Single Throw

D.X. ............Distance

E. ..............Short for Electromotive Force (Volt)

E.M.F. ..........Electromotive Force

F. ..............Filament or Frequency

G. ..............Grid

Gnd. ............Ground

I. ..............Current Strength (Ampere)

I.C.W. ..........Interrupted Continuous Waves

KW. .............Kilowatt

L. ..............Inductance

L.C. ............Loose Coupler

Litz. ...........Litzendraht

Mfd. ............Microfarad

Neg. ............Negative

O.T. ............Oscillation Transformer

P. ..............Plate

Prim. ...........Primary

Pos. ............Positive

R. ..............Resistance

R.F. ............Radio Frequency

Sec. ............Secondary

S.P.D.T. ........Single Point Double Throw

S.P.S.T. ........Single Point Single Throw

S.R. ............Self Rectifying

T. ..............Telephone or Period (time) of Complete
                    Oscillation

Tick. ...........Tickler

V. ..............Potential Difference

Var. ............Variometer

Var. Cond. ......Variable Condenser

V.T. ............Vacuum Tube

W.L. ............Wave Length

X. ..............Reactance




GLOSSARY


A BATTERY.--See Battery A.

ABBREVIATIONS, CODE.--Abbreviations of questions and answers used in
wireless communication. The abbreviation _of a question_ is usually in
three letters of which the first is Q. Thus Q R B is the code
abbreviation of "_what is your distance?_" and the answer "_My
distance is_..." See Page 306 [Appendix: List of Abbreviations].

ABBREVIATIONS, UNITS.--Abbreviations of various units used in wireless
electricity. These abbreviations are usually lower case letters of the
Roman alphabet, but occasionally Greek letters are used and other
signs. Thus _amperes_ is abbreviated _amp., micro_, which means _one
millionth_, [Greek: mu], etc. See Page 301 [Appendix: Useful
Abbreviations].

ABBREVIATIONS OF WORDS AND TERMS.--Letters used instead of words and
terms for shortening them up where there is a constant repetition of
them, as _A.C._ for _alternating current; C.W._ for _continuous waves;
V.T._ for _vacuum tube_, etc. See Page 312 [Appendix: Abbreviations of
Common Terms].

AERIAL.--Also called _antenna_. An aerial wire. One or more wires
suspended in the air and insulated from its supports. It is the aerial
that sends out the waves and receives them.

AERIAL, AMATEUR.--An aerial suitable for sending out 200 meter wave
lengths. Such an aerial wire system must not exceed 120 feet in length
from the ground up to the aerial switch and from this through the
leading-in wire to the end of the aerial.

AERIAL AMMETER.--See _Ammeter, Hot Wire_.

AERIAL, BED-SPRINGS.--Where an outdoor aerial is not practicable
_bed-springs_ are often made to serve the purpose.

AERIAL CAPACITY.--See _Capacity, Aerial._

AERIAL COUNTERPOISE.--Where it is not possible to get a good ground an
_aerial counterpoise_ or _earth capacity_ can be used to advantage.
The counterpoise is made like the aerial and is supported directly
under it close to the ground but insulated from it.

AERIAL, DIRECTIONAL.--A flat-top or other aerial that will transmit
and receive over greater distances to and from one direction than to
and from another.

AERIAL, GROUND.--Signals can be received on a single long wire when it
is placed on or buried in the earth or immersed in water. It is also
called a _ground antenna_ and an _underground aerial._

AERIAL, LOOP.--Also called a _coil aerial, coil antenna, loop aerial,
loop antenna_ and when used for the purpose a _direction finder_. A
coil of wire wound on a vertical frame.

AERIAL RESISTANCE.--See _Resistance, Aerial._

AERIAL SWITCH.--See _Switch Aerial._

AERIAL WIRE.--(1) A wire or wires that form the aerial. (2) Wire that
is used for aerials; this is usually copper or copper alloy.

AERIAL WIRE SYSTEM.--An aerial and ground wire and that part of the
inductance coil which connects them. The open oscillation circuit of
a sending or a receiving station.

AIR CORE TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Air Core._

AMATEUR AERIAL OR ANTENNA.--See _Aerial, Amateur._

ALTERNATOR.--An electric machine that generates alternating current.

ALPHABET, INTERNATIONAL CODE.--A modified Morse alphabet of dots and
dashes originally used in Continental Europe and, hence, called the
_Continental Code_. It is now used for all general public service
wireless communication all over the world and, hence, it is called the
_International Code_. See page 305 [Appendix: International Morse
Code].

ALTERNATING CURRENT (_A.C._)--See _Current._

ALTERNATING CURRENT TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer_.

AMATEUR GROUND.--See _Ground, Amateur_.

AMMETER.--An instrument used for measuring the current strength, in
terms of amperes, that flows in a circuit. Ammeters used for measuring
direct and alternating currents make use of the _magnetic effects_ of
the currents. High frequency currents make use of the _heating
effects_ of the currents.

AMMETER, HOT-WIRE.--High frequency currents are usually measured by
means of an instrument which depends on heating a wire or metal strip
by the oscillations. Such an instrument is often called a _thermal
ammeter_, _radio ammeter_ and _aerial ammeter_.

AMMETER, AERIAL.--See _Ammeter, Hot Wire_.

AMMETER, RADIO.--See _Ammeter, Hot Wire_.

AMPERE.--The current which when passed through a solution of nitrate
of silver in water according to certain specifications, deposits
silver at the rate of 0.00111800 of a gram per second.

AMPERE-HOUR.--The quantity of electricity transferred by a current of
1 ampere in 1 hour and is, therefore, equal to 3600 coulombs.

AMPERE-TURNS.--When a coil is wound up with a number of turns of wire
and a current is made to flow through it, it behaves like a magnet. B
The strength of the magnetic field inside of the coil depends on (1)
the strength of the current and (2) the number of turns of wire on the
coil. Thus a feeble current flowing through a large number of turns
will produce as strong a magnetic field as a strong current flowing
through a few turns of wire. This product of the current in amperes
times the number of turns of wire on the coil is called the
_ampere-turns_.

AMPLIFICATION, AUDIO FREQUENCY.--A current of audio frequency that is
amplified by an amplifier tube or other means.

AMPLIFICATION, CASCADE.--See _Cascade Amplification_.

AMPLIFICATION, RADIO FREQUENCY.--A current of radio frequency that is
amplified by an amplifier tube or other means before it reaches the
detector.

AMPLIFICATION, REGENERATIVE.--A scheme that uses a third circuit to
feed back part of the oscillations through a vacuum tube and which
increases its sensitiveness when used as a detector and multiplies its
action as an amplifier and an oscillator.

AMPLIFIER, AUDIO FREQUENCY.--A vacuum tube or other device that
amplifies the signals after passing through the detector.

AMPLIFIER, MAGNETIC.--A device used for controlling radio frequency
currents either by means of a telegraph key or a microphone
transmitter. The controlling current flows through a separate circuit
from that of the radio current and a fraction of an ampere will
control several amperes in the aerial wire.

AMPLIFIERS, MULTI-STAGE.--A receiving set using two or more
amplifiers. Also called _cascade amplification_.

AMPLIFIER, VACUUM TUBE.--A vacuum tube that is used either to amplify
the radio frequency currents or the audio frequency currents.

AMPLITUDE OF WAVE.--The greatest distance that a point moves from its
position of rest.

AMPLIFYING TRANSFORMER, AUDIO.--See _Transformer, Audio Amplifying_.

AMPLIFYING MODULATOR VACUUM TUBE.--See _Vacuum Tube, Amplifying
Modulator_.

AMPLIFYING TRANSFORMER RADIO.--See _Transformer, Radio Amplifying_.

ANTENNA, AMATEUR.--See _Aerial, Amateur_.

ANTENNA SWITCH.--See _Switch, Aerial_.

APPARATUS SYMBOLS.--See _Symbols, Apparatus_.

ARMSTRONG CIRCUIT.--See _Circuit, Armstrong_.

ATMOSPHERICS.--Same as _Static_, which see.

ATTENUATION.--In Sending wireless telegraph and telephone messages the
amplitude of the electric waves is damped out as the distance
increases. This is called _attenuation_ and it increases as the
frequency is increased. This is the reason why short wave lengths
will not carry as far as long wave lengths.

AUDIO FREQUENCY AMPLIFIER.--See _Amplifier, Audio Frequency_.

AUDIO FREQUENCY AMPLIFICATION.--See _Amplification, Audio Frequency_.

AUDIBILITY METER.--See _Meter, Audibility_.

AUDIO FREQUENCY.--See _Frequency, Audio_.

AUDIO FREQUENCY CURRENT.--See _Current, Audio Frequency_.

AUDION.--An early trade name given to the vacuum tube detector.

AUTODYNE RECEPTOR.--See _Receptor, Autodyne_.

AUTO TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Auto_.

BAKELITE.--A manufactured insulating compound.

B BATTERY.--See _Battery B_.

BAND, WAVE LENGTH.--See _Wave Length Band_.

BASKET WOUND COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance_.

BATTERY, A.--The 6-volt storage battery used to heat the filament of a
vacuum tube, detector or amplifier.

BATTERY, B.--The 22-1/2-volt dry cell battery used to energize the
plate of a vacuum tube detector or amplifier.

BATTERY, BOOSTER.--This is the battery that is connected in series
with the crystal detector.

BATTERY, C.--A small dry cell battery sometimes used to give the grid
of a vacuum tube detector a bias potential.

BATTERY, EDISON STORAGE.--A storage battery in which the elements are
made of nickel and iron and immersed in an alkaline
_electrolyte_.

BATTERY, LEAD STORAGE.--A storage battery in which the elements are
made of lead and immersed in an acid electrolyte.

BATTERY POLES.--See _Poles, Battery_.

BATTERY, PRIMARY.--A battery that generates current by chemical
action.

BATTERY, STORAGE.--A battery that develops a current after it has been
charged.

BEAT RECEPTION.--See _Heterodyne Reception_.

BED SPRINGS AERIAL.--See _Aerial, Bed Springs_.

BLUB BLUB.--Over modulation in wireless telephony.

BROAD WAVE.--See _Wave, Broad_.

BRUSH DISCHARGE.--See _Discharge_.

BUZZER MODULATION.--See _Modulation, Buzzer_.

BLUE GLOW DISCHARGE.--See _Discharge_.

BOOSTER BATTERY.--See _Battery, Booster_.

BROADCASTING.--Sending out intelligence and music from a central
station for the benefit of all who live within range of it and who
have receiving sets.

CAPACITANCE.--Also called by the older name of _capacity_. The
capacity of a condenser, inductance coil or other device capable of
retaining a charge of electricity. Capacitance is measured in terms
of the _microfarad_.

CAPACITIVE COUPLING.--See _Coupling, Capacitive_.

CAPACITY.--Any object that will retain a charge of electricity; hence
an aerial wire, a condenser or a metal plate is sometimes called a
_capacity_.

CAPACITY, AERIAL.--The amount to which an aerial wire system can be
charged. The _capacitance_ of a small amateur aerial is from
0.0002 to 0.0005 microfarad.

CAPACITY, DISTRIBUTED.--A coil of wire not only has inductance, but
also a certain small capacitance. Coils wound with their turns
parallel and having a number of layers have a _bunched capacitance_
which produces untoward effects in oscillation circuits. In honeycomb
and other stagger wound coils the capacitance is more evenly
distributed.

CAPACITY REACTANCE.--See _Reactance, Capacity_.

CAPACITY UNIT.--See _Farad_.

CARBON RHEOSTATS.--See _Rheostat, Carbon_.

CARBORUNDUM DETECTOR.--See _Detector_.

CARRIER CURRENT TELEPHONY.--See _Wired-Wireless_.

CARRIER FREQUENCY.--See _Frequency, Carrier_.

CARRIER FREQUENCY TELEPHONY.--See _Wired-Wireless_.

CASCADE AMPLIFICATION.--Two or more amplifying tubes hooked up in a
receiving set.

CAT WHISKER CONTACT.--A long, thin wire which makes contact with the
crystal of a detector.

CENTIMETER OF CAPACITANCE.--Equal to 1.11 _microfarads_.

CENTIMETER OF INDUCTANCE.--Equal to one one-thousandth part of a
_microhenry_.

CELLULAR COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance_.

C.G.S. ELECTROSTATIC UNIT OF CAPACITANCE.--See _Centimeter of
Capacitance_.

CHARACTERISTICS.--The special behavior of a device, such as an aerial,
a detector tube, etc.

CHARACTERISTICS, GRID.--See _Grid Characteristics_.

CHOKE COILS.--Coils that prevent the high voltage oscillations from
surging back into the transformer and breaking down the insulation.

CHOPPER MODULATION.--See _Modulation, Chopper_.

CIRCUIT.--Any electrical conductor through which a current can flow. A
low voltage current requires a loop of wire or other conductor both
ends of which are connected to the source of current before it can
flow. A high frequency current will surge in a wire which is open at
both ends like the aerial.

Closed Circuit.--A circuit that is continuous.

Open Circuit.--A conductor that is not continuous.

Coupled Circuits.--Open and closed circuits connected together
by inductance coils, condensers or resistances. See _coupling_.

Close Coupled Circuits.--Open and closed circuits connected
directly together with a single inductance coil.

Loose Coupled Circuits.--Opened and closed currents connected
together inductively by means of a transformer.

Stand-by Circuits.--Also called _pick-up_ circuits. When listening-in
for possible calls from a number of stations, a receiver is used which
will respond to a wide band of wave lengths.

Armstrong Circuits.--The regenerative circuit invented by Major E. H.
Armstrong.

CLOSE COUPLED CIRCUITS.--See _Currents, Close Coupled_.

CLOSED CIRCUIT.--See _Circuit, Closed_.

CLOSED CORE TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Closed Core_.

CODE.--

Continental.--Same as _International_.

International.--On the continent of Europe land lines use the
_Continental Morse_ alphabetic code. This code has come to be used
throughout the world for wireless telegraphy and hence it is now
called the _International code_. It is given on Page 305. [Appendix:
International Morse Code].

Morse.--The code devised by Samuel F. B. Morse and which is used on
the land lines in the U. S.

National Electric.--A set of rules and requirements devised by the
_National Board of Fire Underwriters_ for the electrical installations
in buildings on which insurance companies carry risks. This code also
covers the requirements for wireless installations. A copy may be had
from the _National Board of Fire Underwriters_, New York City, or from
your insurance agent.

National Electric Safety.--The Bureau of Standards, Washington, D. C.,
have investigated the precautions which should be taken for the safe
operation of all electric equipment. A copy of the _Bureau of
Standards Handbook No. 3_ can be had for 40 cents from the
_Superintendent of Documents_.

COEFFICIENT OF COUPLING.--See _Coupling, Coefficient of_.

COIL AERIAL.--See _Aerial, Loop_.

COIL ANTENNA.--See _Aerial, Loop_.

COIL, INDUCTION.--An apparatus for changing low voltage direct
currents into high voltage, low frequency alternating currents. When
fitted with a spark gap the high voltage, low frequency currents are
converted into high voltage, high frequency currents. It is then also
called a _spark coil_ and a _Ruhmkorff coil_.

COIL, LOADING.--A coil connected in the aerial or closed oscillation
circuit so that longer wave lengths can be received.

COIL, REPEATING.--See _Repeating Coil_.

COIL, ROTATING.--One which rotates on a shaft instead of sliding as in
a _loose coupler_. The rotor of a _variometer_ or _variocoupler_ is a
_rotating coil_.

COILS, INDUCTANCE.--These are the tuning coils used for sending and
receiving sets. For sending sets they are formed of one and two coils,
a single sending coil is generally called a _tuning inductance coil_,
while a two-coil tuner is called an _oscillation transformer_.
Receiving tuning coils are made with a single layer, single coil, or a
pair of coils, when it is called an oscillation _transformer_. Some
tuning inductance coils have more than one layer, they are then called
_lattice wound_, _cellular_, _basket wound_, _honeycomb_,
_duo-lateral_, _stagger wound_, _spider-web_ and _slab_ coils.

COMMERCIAL FREQUENCY.--See _Frequency, Commercial_.

CONDENSER, AERIAL SERIES.--A condenser placed in the aerial wire
system to cut down the wave length.

CONDENSER, VERNIER.--A small variable condenser used for receiving
continuous waves where very sharp tuning is desired.

CONDENSER.--All conducting objects with their insulation form
capacities, but a _condenser_ is understood to mean two sheets or
plates of metal placed closely together but separated by some
insulating material.

Adjustable Condenser.--Where two or more condensers can be coupled
together by means of plugs, switches or other devices.

Aerial Condenser.--A condenser connected in the aerial.

Air Condenser.--Where air only separates the sheets of metal.

By-Pass Condenser.--A condenser connected in the transmitting currents
so that the high frequency currents cannot flow back through the power
circuit.

Filter Condenser.--A condenser of large capacitance used in
combination with a filter reactor for smoothing out the pulsating
direct currents as they come from the rectifier.

Fixed Condenser.--Where the plates are fixed relatively to one
another.

Grid Condenser.--A condenser connected in series with the grid lead.

Leyden Jar Condenser.--Where glass jars are used.

Mica Condenser.--Where mica is used.

Oil Condenser.--Where the plates are immersed in oil.

Paper Condenser.--Where paper is used as the insulating material.

Protective.--A condenser of large capacity connected across the low
voltage supply circuit of a transmitter to form a by-path of kick-back
oscillations.

Variable Condenser.--Where alternate plates can be moved and so made
to interleave more or less with a set of fixed plates.

Vernier.--A small condenser with a vernier on it so that it can be
very accurately varied. It is connected in parallel with the variable
condenser used in the primary circuit and is used for the reception of
continuous waves where sharp tuning is essential.

CONDENSITE.--A manufactured insulating compound.

CONDUCTIVITY.--The conductance of a given length of wire of uniform
cross section. The reciprocal of _resistivity_.

CONTACT DETECTORS.--See _Detectors, Contact_.

CONTINENTAL CODE.--See _Code, Continental_.

COULOMB.--The quantity of electricity transferred by a current of 1
ampere in 1 second.

CONVECTIVE DISCHARGE.--See _Discharge_.

CONVENTIONAL SIGNALS.--See _Signals, Conventional_.

COUNTER ELECTROMOTIVE FORCE.--See _Electromotive Force, Counter_.

COUNTERPOISE. A duplicate of the aerial wire that is raised a few feet
above the earth and insulated from it. Usually no connection is made
with the earth itself.

COUPLED CIRCUITS.--See _Circuit, Coupled_.

COUPLING.--When two oscillation circuits are connected together either
by the magnetic field of an inductance coil, or by the electrostatic
field of a condenser.

COUPLING, CAPACITIVE.--Oscillation circuits when connected together by
condensers instead of inductance coils.

COUPLING, COEFFICIENT OF.--The measure of the closeness of the
coupling between two coils.

COUPLING, INDUCTIVE.--Oscillation circuits when connected together by
inductance coils.

COUPLING, RESISTANCE.--Oscillation circuits connected together by a
resistance.

CRYSTAL RECTIFIER.--A crystal detector.

CURRENT, ALTERNATING (A.C.).--A low frequency current that surges to
and fro in a circuit.

CURRENT, AUDIO FREQUENCY.--A current whose frequency is low enough to
be heard in a telephone receiver. Such a current usually has a
frequency of between 200 and 2,000 cycles per second.

CURRENT, PLATE.--The current which flows between the filament and the
plate of a vacuum tube.

CURRENT, PULSATING.--A direct current whose voltage varies from moment
to moment.

CURRENT, RADIO FREQUENCY.--A current whose frequency is so high it
cannot be heard in a telephone receiver. Such a current may have a
frequency of from 20,000 to 10,000,000 per second.

CURRENTS, HIGH FREQUENCY.--(1) Currents that oscillate from 10,000 to
300,000,000 times per second. (2) Electric oscillations.

CURRENTS, HIGH POTENTIAL.--(1) Currents that have a potential of more
than 10,000 volts. (2) High voltage currents.

CYCLE.--(1) A series of changes which when completed are again at the
starting point. (2) A period of time at the end of which an
alternating or oscillating current repeats its original direction of
flow.

DAMPING.--The degree to which the energy of an electric oscillation is
reduced. In an open circuit the energy of an oscillation set up by a
spark gap is damped out in a few swings, while in a closed circuit it
is greatly prolonged, the current oscillating 20 times or more before
the energy is dissipated by the sum of the resistances of the circuit.

DECREMENT.--The act or process of gradually becoming less.

DETECTOR.--Any device that will (1) change the oscillations set up by
the incoming waves into direct current, that is which will rectify
them, or (2) that will act as a relay.

Carborundum.--One that uses a _carborundum_ crystal for the sensitive
element. Carborundum is a crystalline silicon carbide formed in the
electric furnace.

Cat Whisker Contact.--See _Cat Whisker Contact_.

Chalcopyrite.--Copper pyrites. A brass colored mineral used as a
crystal for detectors. See _Zincite_.

Contact.--A crystal detector. Any kind of a detector in which two
dissimilar but suitable solids make contact.

Ferron.--A detector in which iron pyrites are used as the sensitive
element.

Galena.--A detector that uses a galena crystal for the rectifying
element.

Iron Pyrites.--A detector that uses a crystal of iron pyrites for its
sensitive element.

Molybdenite.--A detector that uses a crystal of _sulphide of
molybdenum_ for the sensitive element.

Perikon.--A detector in which a _bornite_ crystal makes contact with a
_zincite_ crystal.

Silicon.--A detector that uses a crystal of silicon for its sensitive
element.

Vacuum Tube.--A vacuum tube (which see) used as a detector.

Zincite.--A detector in which a crystal of _zincite_ is used as the
sensitive element.

DE TUNING.--A method of signaling by sustained oscillations in which
the key when pressed down cuts out either some of the inductance or
some of the capacity and hence greatly changes the wave length.

DIELECTRIC.--An insulating material between two electrically charged
plates in which there is set up an _electric strain_, or displacement.

DIELECTRIC STRAIN.--The electric displacement in a dielectric.

DIRECTIONAL AERIAL.--See _Aerial, Directional_.

DIRECTION FINDER.--See _Aerial, Loop_.

DISCHARGE.--(1) A faintly luminous discharge that takes place from the
positive pointed terminal of an induction coil, or other high
potential apparatus; is termed a _brush discharge_. (2) A continuous
discharge between the terminals of a high potential apparatus is
termed a _convective discharge_. (3) The sudden breaking-down of the
air between the balls forming the spark gap is termed a _disruptive
discharge_; also called an _electric spark_, or just _spark_ for
short. (4) When a tube has a poor vacuum, or too large a battery
voltage, it glows with a blue light and this is called a _blue glow
discharge_.

DISRUPTIVE DISCHARGE.--See _Discharge_.

DISTRESS CALL. [Morse code:] ...---... (SOS).

DISTRIBUTED CAPACITY.--See _Capacity, Distributed_.

DOUBLE HUMP RESONANCE CURVE.--A resonance curve that has two peaks or
humps which show that the oscillating currents which are set up when
the primary and secondary of a tuning coil are closely coupled have
two frequencies.

DUO-LATERAL COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance_.

DUPLEX COMMUNICATION.--A wireless telephone system with which it is
possible to talk between both stations in either direction without the
use of switches. This is known as the _duplex system_.

EARTH CAPACITY.--An aerial counterpoise.

EARTH CONNECTION.--Metal plates or wires buried in the ground or
immersed in water. Any kind of means by which the sending and
receiving apparatus can be connected with the earth.

EDISON STORAGE BATTERY.--See _Storage Battery, Edison_.

ELECTRIC ENERGY.--The power of an electric current.

ELECTRIC OSCILLATIONS.--See _Oscillations, Electric_.

ELECTRIC SPARK.--See _Discharge, Spark_.

ELECTRICITY, NEGATIVE.--The opposite of _positive electricity_.
Negative electricity is formed of negative electrons which make up the
outside particles of an atom.

ELECTRICITY, POSITIVE.--The opposite of _negative electricity_.
Positive electricity is formed of positive electrons which make up the
inside particles of an atom.

ELECTRODES.--Usually the parts of an apparatus which dip into a liquid
and carry a current. The electrodes of a dry battery are the zinc and
carbon elements. The electrodes of an Edison storage battery are the
iron and nickel elements, and the electrodes of a lead storage battery
are the lead elements.

ELECTROLYTES.--The acid or alkaline solutions used in batteries.

ELECTROMAGNETIC WAVES.--See _Waves, Electric_.

ELECTROMOTIVE FORCE.--Abbreviated _emf_. The force that drives an
electric current along a conductor. Also loosely called
_voltage_.

ELECTROMOTIVE FORCE, COUNTER.--The emf. that is set up in a direction
opposite to that in which the current is flowing in a conductor.

ELECTRON.--(1) A negative particle of electricity that is detached
from an atom. (2) A negative particle of electricity thrown off from
the incandescent filament of a vacuum tube.

ELECTRON FLOW.--The passage of electrons between the incandescent
filament and the cold positively charged plate of a vacuum tube.

ELECTRON RELAY.--See _Relay, Electron_.

ELECTRON TUBE.--A vacuum tube or a gas-content tube used for any
purpose in wireless work. See _Vacuum Tube_.

ELECTROSE INSULATORS.--Insulators made of a composition material the
trade name of which is _Electrose_.

ENERGY, ELECTRIC.--See _Electric Energy_.

ENERGY UNIT.--The _joule_, which see, Page 308 [Appendix: Definitions
of Electric and Magnetic Units].

FADING.--The sudden variation in strength of signals received from a
transmitting station when all the adjustments of both sending and
receiving apparatus remain the same. Also called _swinging_.

FARAD.--The capacitance of a condenser in which a potential difference
of 1 volt causes it to have a charge of 1 coulomb of electricity.

FEED-BACK ACTION.--Feeding back the oscillating currents in a vacuum
tube to amplify its power. Also called _regenerative action_.

FERROMAGNETIC CONTROL.--See _Magnetic Amplifier_.

FILAMENT.--The wire in a vacuum tube that is heated to incandescence
and which throws off electrons.

FILAMENT RHEOSTAT.--See _Rheostat, Filament_.

FILTER.--Inductance coils or condensers or both which (1) prevent
troublesome voltages from acting on the different circuits, and (2)
smooth out alternating currents after they have been rectified.

FILTER REACTOR.--See _Reactor, Filter_.

FIRE UNDERWRITERS.--See _Code, National Electric_.

FIXED GAP.--See _Gap_.

FLEMING VALVE.--A two-electrode vacuum tube.

FORCED OSCILLATIONS.--See _Oscillations, Forced_.

FREE OSCILLATIONS.--See _Oscillations, Free_.

FREQUENCY, AUDIO.--(1) An alternating current whose frequency is low
enough to operate a telephone receiver and, hence, which can be heard
by the ear. (2) Audio frequencies are usually around 500 or 1,000
cycles per second, but may be as low as 200 and as high as 10,000
cycles per second.

Carrier.--A radio frequency wave modulated by an audio frequency wave
which results in setting of _three_ radio frequency waves. The
principal radio frequency is called the carrier frequency, since it
carries or transmits the audio frequency wave.

Commercial.--(1) Alternating current that is used for commercial
purposes, namely, light, heat and power. (2) Commercial frequencies
now in general use are from 25 to 50 cycles per second.

Natural.--The pendulum and vibrating spring have a _natural frequency_
which depends on the size, material of which it is made, and the
friction which it has to overcome. Likewise an oscillation circuit has
a natural frequency which depends upon its _inductance_, _capacitance_
and _resistance_.

Radio.--(1) An oscillating current whose frequency is too high to
affect a telephone receiver and, hence, cannot be heard by the ear.
(2) Radio frequencies are usually between 20,000 and 2,000,000 cycles
per second but may be as low as 10,000 and as high as 300,000,000
cycles per second.

Spark.--The number of sparks per second produced by the discharge of a
condenser.

GAP, FIXED.--One with fixed electrodes.

GAP, NON-SYNCHRONOUS.--A rotary spark gap run by a separate motor
which may be widely different from that of the speed of the
alternator.

GAP, QUENCHED.--(1) A spark gap for the impulse production of
oscillating currents. (2) This method can be likened to one where a
spring is struck a single sharp blow and then continues to set up
vibrations.

GAP, ROTARY.--One having fixed and rotating electrodes.

GAP, SYNCHRONOUS.--A rotary spark gap run at the same speed as the
alternator which supplies the power transformer. Such a gap usually
has as many teeth as there are poles on the generator. Hence one spark
occurs per half cycle.

GAS-CONTENT TUBE.--See _Vacuum Tube._

GENERATOR TUBE.--A vacuum tube used to set up oscillations. As a
matter of fact it does not _generate_ oscillations, but changes the
initial low voltage current that flows through it into oscillations.
Also called an _oscillator tube_ and a _power tube._

GRID BATTERY.--See _Battery C._

GRID CHARACTERISTICS.--The various relations that could exist between
the voltages and currents of the grid of a vacuum tube, and the values
which do exist between them when the tube is in operation. These
characteristics are generally shown by curves.

GRID CONDENSER.--See _Condenser, Grid._

GRID LEAK.--A high resistance unit connected in the grid lead of both
sending and receiving sets. In a sending set it keeps the voltage of
the grid at a constant value and so controls the output of the aerial.
In a receiving set it controls the current flowing between the plate
and filament.

GRID MODULATION.--See _Modulation, Grid._

GRID POTENTIAL.--The negative or positive voltage of the grid of a
vacuum tube.

GRID VOLTAGE.--See _Grid Potential._

GRINDERS.--The most common form of _Static,_ which see. They make a
grinding noise in the headphones.

GROUND.--See _Earth Connection._

GROUND, AMATEUR.--A water-pipe ground.

GROUND, WATERPIPE.--A common method of grounding by amateurs is to use
the waterpipe, gaspipe or radiator.

GUIDED WAVE TELEPHONY.--See _Wired Wireless._

HARD TUBE.--A vacuum tube in which the vacuum is _high,_ that is,
exhausted to a high degree.

HELIX.--(1) Any coil of wire. (2) Specifically a transmitter tuning
inductance coil.

HENRY.--The inductance in a circuit in which the electromotive force
induced is 1 volt when the inducing current varies at the rate of 1
ampere per second.

HETERODYNE RECEPTION.--(1) Receiving by the _beat_ method. (2)
Receiving by means of superposing oscillations generated at the
receiving station on the oscillations set up in the aerial by the
incoming waves.

HETERODYNE RECEPTOR.--See _Receptor, Heterodyne._

HIGH FREQUENCY CURRENTS.--See _Currents, High Frequency._

HIGH FREQUENCY RESISTANCE.--See _Resistance, High Frequency._

HIGH POTENTIAL CURRENTS.--See _Currents, High Potential._

HIGH VOLTAGE CURRENTS.--See _Currents, High Potential._

HONEYCOMB COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance._

HORSE-POWER.--Used in rating steam machinery. It is equal to 746
watts.

HOT WIRE AMMETER.--See _Ammeter, Hot Wire._

HOWLING.--Where more than three stages of radio amplification, or more
than two stages of audio amplification, are used howling noises are
apt to occur in the telephone receivers.

IMPEDANCE.--An oscillation circuit has _reactance_ and also
_resistance,_ and when these are combined the total opposition to the
current is called _impedance._

INDUCTANCE COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance._

INDUCTANCE COIL, LOADING.--See _Coil, Loading Inductance._

INDUCTIVE COUPLING.--See _Coupling, Inductive._

INDUCTIVE REACTANCE.--See _Reactance, Inductive._

INDUCTION COIL.--See _Coil, Induction._

INDUCTION, MUTUAL.--Induction produced between two circuits or coils
close to each other by the mutual interaction of their magnetic
fields.

INSULATION.--Materials used on and around wires and other conductors
to keep the current from leaking away.

INSPECTOR, RADIO.--A U. S. inspector whose business it is to issue
both station and operators' licenses in the district of which he is in
charge.

INTERFERENCE.--The crossing or superposing of two sets of electric
waves of the same or slightly different lengths which tend to oppose
each other. It is the untoward interference between electric waves
from different stations that makes selective signaling so difficult a
problem.

INTERMEDIATE WAVES.--See _Waves._

IONIC TUBES.--See _Vacuum Tubes._

INTERNATIONAL CODE.--See Code, International.

JAMMING.--Waves that are of such length and strength that when they
interfere with incoming waves they drown them out.

JOULE.--The energy spent in 1 second by a flow of 1 ampere in 1 ohm.

JOULE'S LAW.--The relation between the heat produced in seconds to the
resistance of the circuit, to the current flowing in it.

KENOTRON.--The trade name of a vacuum tube rectifier made by the
_Radio Corporation of America._

KICK-BACK.--Oscillating currents that rise in voltage and tend to flow
back through the circuit that is supplying the transmitter with low
voltage current.

KICK-BACK PREVENTION.--See _Prevention, Kick-Back._

KILOWATT.--1,000 watts.

LAMBDA.--See Pages 301, 302. [Appendix: Useful Abbreviations].

LATTICE WOUND COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance._

LIGHTNING SWITCH.--See _Switch, Lightning._

LINE RADIO COMMUNICATION.--See _Wired Wireless._

LINE RADIO TELEPHONY.--See _Telephony, Line Radio._

LITZENDRAHT.--A conductor formed of a number of fine copper wires
either twisted or braided together. It is used to reduce the _skin
effect._ See _Resistance, High Frequency._

LOAD FLICKER.--The flickering of electric lights on lines that supply
wireless transmitting sets due to variations of the voltage on opening
and closing the key.

LOADING COIL.--See _Coil, Loading._

LONG WAVES.--See _Waves._

LOOP AERIAL.--See _Aerial, Loop._

LOOSE COUPLED CIRCUITS.--See _Circuits, Loose Coupled._

LOUD SPEAKER.--A telephone receiver connected to a horn, or a
specially made one, that reproduces the incoming signals, words or
music loud enough to be heard by a room or an auditorium full of
people, or by large crowds out-doors.

MAGNETIC POLES.--See _Poles, Magnetic._

MEGOHM.--One million ohms.

METER, AUDIBILITY.--An instrument for measuring the loudness of a
signal by comparison with another signal. It consists of a pair of
headphones and a variable resistance which have been calibrated.

MHO.--The unit of conductance. As conductance is the reciprocal of
resistance it is measured by the _reciprocal ohm_ or _mho._

MICA.--A transparent mineral having a high insulating value and which
can be split into very thin sheets. It is largely used in making
condensers both for transmitting and receiving sets.

MICROFARAD.--The millionth part of a _farad._

MICROHENRY.--The millionth part of a _farad._

MICROMICROFARAD.--The millionth part of a _microfarad._

MICROHM.--The millionth part of an _ohm._

MICROPHONE TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Microphone._

MICROPHONE TRANSMITTER.--See _Transmitter, Microphone._

MILLI-AMMETER.--An ammeter that measures a current by the
one-thousandth of an ampere.

MODULATION.--(1) Inflection or varying the voice. (2) Varying the
amplitude of oscillations by means of the voice.

MODULATION, BUZZER.--The modulation of radio frequency oscillations by
a buzzer which breaks up the sustained oscillations of a transmitter
into audio frequency impulses.

MILLIHENRY.--The thousandth part of a _henry._

MODULATION, CHOPPER.--The modulation of radio frequency oscillations
by a chopper which breaks up the sustained oscillations of a
transmitter into audio frequency impulses.

MODULATION, GRID.--The scheme of modulating an oscillator tube by
connecting the secondary of a transformer, the primary of which is
connected with a battery and a microphone transmitter, in the grid
lead.

MODULATION, OVER.--See _Blub Blub._

MODULATION, PLATE.--Modulating the oscillations set up by a vacuum
tube by varying the current impressed on the plate.

MODULATOR TUBE.--A vacuum tube used as a modulator.

MOTION, WAVE.--(1) The to and fro motion of water at sea. (2) Waves
transmitted by, in and through the air, or sound waves. (3) Waves
transmitted by, in and through the _ether,_ or _electromagnetic
waves,_ or _electric waves_ for short.

MOTOR-GENERATOR.--A motor and a dynamo built to run at the same speed
and mounted on a common base, the shafts being coupled together. In
wireless it is used for changing commercial direct current into direct
current of higher voltages for energizing the plate of a vacuum tube
oscillator.

MULTI-STAGE AMPLIFIERS.--See _Amplifiers, Multi-Stage._

MUTUAL INDUCTION.--See _Induction, Mutual._

MUSH.--Irregular intermediate frequencies set up by arc transmitters
which interfere with the fundamental wave lengths.

MUSHY NOTE.--A note that is not clear cut, and hence hard to read,
which is received by the _heterodyne method_ when damped waves or
modulated continuous waves are being received.

NATIONAL ELECTRIC CODE.--See _Code, National Electric._

NATIONAL ELECTRIC SAFETY CODE.--See _Code, National Electric
Safety._

NEGATIVE ELECTRICITY.--See _Electricity, Negative._

NON-SYNCHRONOUS GAP.--See _Gap, Non-Synchronous._

OHM.--The resistance of a thread of mercury at the temperature of
melting ice, 14.4521 grams in mass, of uniform cross-section and a
length of 106.300 centimeters.

OHM'S LAW.--The important fixed relation between the electric current,
its electromotive force and the resistance of the conductor in which
it flows.

OPEN CIRCUIT.--See _Circuit, Open._

OPEN CORE TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Open Core._

OSCILLATION TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Oscillation._

OSCILLATIONS, ELECTRIC.--A current of high frequency that surges
through an open or a closed circuit. (1) Electric oscillations may be
set up by a spark gap, electric arc or a vacuum tube, when they have
not only a high frequency but a high potential, or voltage. (2) When
electric waves impinge on an aerial wire they are transformed into
electric oscillations of a frequency equal to those which emitted the
waves, but since a very small amount of energy is received their
potential or voltage is likewise very small.

Sustained.--Oscillations in which the damping factor is small.

Damped.--Oscillations in which the damping factor is large.

Free.--When a condenser discharges through an oscillation circuit,
where there is no outside electromotive force acting on it, the
oscillations are said to be _free._

Forced.--Oscillations that are made to surge in a circuit whose
natural period is different from that of the oscillations set up in
it.

OSCILLATION TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer._

OSCILLATION VALVE.--See _Vacuum Tube._

OSCILLATOR TUBE.--A vacuum tube which is used to produce electric
oscillations.

OVER MODULATION.--See _Blub Blub._

PANCAKE OSCILLATION TRANSFORMER.--Disk-shaped coils that are used for
receiving tuning inductances.

PERMEABILITY, MAGNETIC.--The degree to which a substance can be
magnetized. Iron has a greater magnetic permeability than air.

PHASE.--A characteristic aspect or appearance that takes place at the
same point or part of a cycle.

PICK-UP CIRCUITS.--See _Circuits, Stand-by._

PLATE CIRCUIT REACTOR.--See _Reactor, Plate Circuit._

PLATE CURRENT.--See _Current, Plate._

PLATE MODULATION.--See _Modulation, Plate._

PLATE VOLTAGE.--See _Foliage, Plate._

POLES, BATTERY.--The positive and negative terminals of the elements
of a battery. On a storage battery these poles are marked + and -
respectively.

POLES, MAGNETIC.--The ends of a magnet.

POSITIVE ELECTRICITY.--See _Electricity, Positive._

POTENTIAL DIFFERENCE.--The electric pressure between two charged
conductors or surfaces.

POTENTIOMETER.--A variable resistance used for subdividing the voltage
of a current. A _voltage divider._

POWER TRANSFORMER.--See _Transformer, Power._

POWER TUBE.--See _Generator Tube._

PRIMARY BATTERY.--See _Battery, Primary._

PREVENTION, KICK-BACK.--A choke coil placed in the power circuit to
prevent the high frequency currents from getting into the transformer
and breaking down the insulation.

Q S T.--An abbreviation used in wireless communication for (1) the
question "Have you received the general call?" and (2) the notice,
"General call to all stations."

QUENCHED GAP.--See _Gap, Quenched._

RADIATION.--The emission, or throwing off, of electric waves by an
aerial wire system.

RADIO AMMETER.--See _Ammeter, Hot Wire._

RADIO FREQUENCY.--See _Frequency, Radio._

RADIO FREQUENCY AMPLIFICATION.--See _Amplification, Radio Frequency._

RADIO FREQUENCY CURRENT.--See _Current, Radio Frequency._

RADIO INSPECTOR.--See _Inspector, Radio_.

RADIOTRON.--The trade name of vacuum tube detectors, amplifiers,
oscillators and modulators made by the _Radio Corporation of America_.

RADIO WAVES.--See _Waves, Radio_.

REACTANCE.--When a circuit has inductance and the current changes in
value, it is opposed by the voltage induced by the variation of the
current.

REACTANCE, CAPACITY.--The capacity reactance is the opposition offered
to a current by a capacity. It is measured as a resistance, that is,
in _ohms_.

RECEIVING TUNING COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance_.

RECEIVER, LOUD SPEAKING.--See _Loud Speakers_.

RECEIVER, WATCH CASE.--A compact telephone receiver used for wireless
reception.

REACTANCE, INDUCTIVE.--The inductive reactance is the opposition
offered to the current by an inductance coil. It is measured as a
resistance, that is, in _ohms_.

REACTOR, FILTER.--A reactance coil for smoothing out the pulsating
direct currents as they come from the rectifier.

REACTOR, PLATE CIRCUIT.--A reactance coil used in the plate circuit of
a wireless telephone to keep the direct current supply at a constant
voltage.

RECEIVER.--(1) A telephone receiver. (2) An apparatus for receiving
signals, speech or music. (3) Better called a _receptor_ to
distinguish it from a telephone receiver.

RECTIFIER.--(1) An apparatus for changing alternating current into
pulsating direct current. (2) Specifically in wireless (_a_) a
crystal or vacuum tube detector, and (_b_) a two-electrode vacuum
tube used for changing commercial alternating current into direct
current for wireless telephony.

REGENERATIVE AMPLIFICATION.--See _Amplification, Regenerative_.

RECEPTOR.--A receiving set.

RECEPTOR, AUTODYNE.--A receptor that has a regenerative circuit and
the same tube is used as a detector and as a generator of local
oscillations.

RECEPTOR, BEAT.--A heterodyne receptor.

RECEPTOR, HETERODYNE.--A receiving set that uses a separate vacuum
tube to set up the second series of waves for beat reception.

REGENERATIVE ACTION.--See _Feed-Back Action._

REGENERATIVE AMPLIFICATION.--See _Amplification, Regenerative._

RELAY, ELECTRON.--A vacuum tube when used as a detector or an
amplifier.

REPEATING COIL.--A transformer used in connecting up a wireless
receiver with a wire transmitter.

RESISTANCE.--The opposition offered by a wire or other conductor to
the passage of a current.

RESISTANCE, AERIAL.--The resistance of the aerial wire to oscillating
currents. This is greater than its ordinary ohmic resistance due to
the skin effect. See _Resistance, High Frequency._

RESISTANCE BOX.--See _Resistor._

RESISTANCE COUPLING.--See _Coupling, Resistance._

RESISTANCE, HIGH FREQUENCY.--When a high frequency current oscillates
on a wire two things take place that are different than when a direct
or alternating current flows through it, and these are (1) the current
inside of the wire lags behind that of the current on the surface, and
(2) the amplitude of the current is largest on the surface and grows
smaller as the center of the wire is reached. This uneven distribution
of the current is known as the _skin effect_ and it amounts to the
same thing as reducing the size of the wire, hence the resistance is
increased.

RESISTIVITY.--The resistance of a given length of wire of uniform
cross section. The reciprocal of _conductivity._

RESISTOR.--A fixed or variable resistance unit or a group of such
units. Variable resistors are also called _resistance boxes_ and more
often _rheostats._

RESONANCE.--(1) Simple resonance of sound is its increase set up by
one body by the sympathetic vibration of a second body. (2) By
extension the increase in the amplitude of electric oscillations when
the circuit in which they surge has a _natural_ period that is the
same, or nearly the same, as the period of the first oscillation
circuit.

RHEOSTAT.--A variable resistance unit. See _Resistor._

RHEOSTAT, CARBON.--A carbon rod, or carbon plates or blocks, when used
as variable resistances.

RHEOSTAT, FILAMENT.--A variable resistance used for keeping the
current of the storage battery which heats the filament of a vacuum
tube at a constant voltage.

ROTATING COIL.--See _Coil._

ROTARY GAP.--See _Gap._

ROTOR.--The rotating coil of a variometer or a variocoupler.

RUHMKORFF COIL.--See _Coil, Induction._

SATURATION.--The maximum plate current that a vacuum tube will take.

SENSITIVE SPOTS.--Spots on detector crystals that are sensitive to the
action of electric oscillations.

SHORT WAVES.--See _Waves._

SIDE WAVES.--See _Wave Length Band._

SIGNALS, CONVENTIONAL.--(1) The International Morse alphabet and
numeral code, punctuation marks, and a few important abbreviations
used in wireless telegraphy. (2) Dot and dash signals for distress
call, invitation to transmit, etc. Now used for all general public
service wireless communication.

SKIN EFFECT.--See _Resistance, High Frequency._

SOFT TUBE.--A vacuum tube in which the vacuum is low, that is, it is
not highly exhausted.

SPACE CHARGE EFFECT.--The electric field intensity due to the pressure
of the negative electrons in the space between the filament and plate
which at last equals and neutralizes that due to the positive
potential of the plate so that there is no force acting on the
electrons near the filament.

SPARK.--See _Discharge._

SPARK COIL.--See _Coil, Induction._

SPARK DISCHARGE.--See _Spark, Electric._

SPARK FREQUENCY.--See _Frequency, Spark._

SPARK GAP.--(1) A _spark gap,_ without the hyphen, means the apparatus
in which sparks take place; it is also called a _spark discharger._
(2) _Spark-gap,_ with the hyphen, means the air-gap between the
opposed faces of the electrodes in which sparks are produced.

Plain.--A spark gap with fixed electrodes.

Rotary.--A spark gap with a pair of fixed electrodes and a number of
electrodes mounted on a rotating element.

Quenched.--A spark gap formed of a number of metal plates placed
closely together and insulated from each other.

SPIDER WEB INDUCTANCE COIL.--See _Coil, Spider Web Inductance._

SPREADER.--A stick of wood, or spar, that holds the wires of the
aerial apart.

STAGGER WOUND COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance._

STAND-BY CIRCUITS.--See _Circuits, Stand-By._

STATIC.--Also called _atmospherics, grinders, strays, X's,_ and, when
bad enough, by other names. It is an electrical disturbance in the
atmosphere which makes noises in the telephone receiver.

STATOR.--The fixed or stationary coil of a variometer or a
variocoupler.

STORAGE BATTERY.--See _Battery, Storage._

STRAY ELIMINATION.--A method for increasing the strength of the
signals as against the strength of the strays. See _Static._

STRAYS.--See _Static_.

STRANDED WIRE.--See _Wire, Stranded_.

SUPER-HETERODYNE RECEPTOR.--See _Heterodyne, Super_.

SWINGING.--See _Fading_.

SWITCH, AERIAL.--A switch used to change over from the sending to the
receiving set, and the other way about, and connect them with the
aerial.

SWITCH, LIGHTNING.--The switch that connects the aerial with the
outside ground when the apparatus is not in use.

SYMBOLS, APPARATUS.--Also called _conventional symbols_. These are
diagrammatic lines representing various parts of apparatus so that
when a wiring diagram of a transmitter or a receptor is to be made it
is only necessary to connect them together. They are easy to make and
easy to read. See Page 307 [Appendix: Symbols Used for Apparatus].

SYNCHRONOUS GAP.--See _Gap, Synchronous_.

TELEPHONY, LINE RADIO.--See _Wired Wireless_.

THERMAL AMMETER.--See _Ammeter, Hot Wire_.

THREE ELECTRODE VACUUM TUBE.--_See Vacuum Tube, Three Electrode_.

TIKKER.--A slipping contact device that breaks up the sustained
oscillations at the receiving end into groups so that the signals can
be heard in the head phones. The device usually consists of a fine
steel or gold wire slipping in the smooth groove of a rotating brass
wheel.

TRANSFORMER.--A primary and a secondary coil for stepping up or down a
primary alternating or oscillating current.

A. C.--See _Power Transformer_.

Air Cooled.--A transformer in which the coils are exposed to the air.

Air Core.--With high frequency currents it is the general practice not
to use iron cores as these tend to choke off the oscillations. Hence
the core consists of the air inside of the coils.

Auto.--A single coil of wire in which one part forms the primary and
the other part the secondary by bringing out an intermediate tap.

Audio Amplifying.--This is a transformer with an iron core and is used
for frequencies up to say 3,000.

Closed Core.--A transformer in which the path of the magnetic flux is
entirely through iron. Power transformers have closed cores.

Microphone.--A small transformer for modulating the oscillations set
up by an arc or a vacuum tube oscillator.

Oil Cooled.--A transformer in which the coils are immersed in oil.

Open Core.--A transformer in which the path of the magnetic flux is
partly through iron and partly through air. Induction coils have open
cores.

Oscillation.--A coil or coils for transforming or stepping down or up
oscillating currents. Oscillation transformers usually have no iron
cores when they are also called _air core transformers._

Power.--A transformer for stepping down a commercial alternating
current for lighting and heating the filament and for stepping up the
commercial a.c., for charging the plate of a vacuum tube oscillator.

Radio Amplifying.--This is a transformer with an air core. It does not
in itself amplify but is so called because it is used in connection
with an amplifying tube.

TRANSMITTER, MICROPHONE.--A telephone transmitter of the kind that is
used in the Bell telephone system.

TRANSMITTING TUNING COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance._

TUNING.--When the open and closed oscillation circuits of a
transmitter or a receptor are adjusted so that both of the former will
permit electric oscillations to surge through them with the same
frequency, they are said to be tuned. Likewise, when the sending and
receiving stations are adjusted to the same wave length they are said
to be _tuned._

Coarse Tuning.--The first adjustment in the tuning oscillation
circuits of a receptor is made with the inductance coil and this tunes
them coarse, or roughly.

Fine Tuning.--After the oscillation circuits have been roughly tuned
with the inductance coil the exact adjustment is obtained with the
variable condenser and this is _fine tuning._

Sharp.--When a sending set will transmit or a receiving set will
receive a wave of given length only it is said to be sharply tuned.
The smaller the decrement the sharper the tuning.

TUNING COILS.--See _Coils, Inductance._

TWO ELECTRODE VACUUM TUBE.--See _Vacuum Tube, Two Electrode._

VACUUM TUBE.--A tube with two or three electrodes from which the air
has been exhausted, or which is filled with an inert gas, and used as
a detector, an amplifier, an oscillator or a modulator in wireless
telegraphy and telephony.

Amplifier.--See _Amplifier, Vacuum Tube._

Amplifying Modulator.--A vacuum tube used for modulating and
amplifying the oscillations set up by the sending set.

Gas Content.--A tube made like a vacuum tube and used as a detector
but which contains an inert gas instead of being exhausted.

Hard.--See _Hard Tube._

Rectifier.--(1) A vacuum tube detector. (2) a two-electrode vacuum
tube used for changing commercial alternating current into direct
current for wireless telephony.

Soft.--See _Soft Tube._

Three Electrode.--A vacuum tube with three electrodes, namely a
filament, a grid and a plate.

Two Electrode.--A vacuum tube with two electrodes, namely the filament
and the plate.

VALVE.--See _Vacuum Tube._

VALVE, FLEMING.--See _Fleming Valve._

VARIABLE CONDENSER.--See _Condenser, Variable._

VARIABLE INDUCTANCE.--See _Inductance, Variable._

VARIABLE RESISTANCE.--See _Resistance, Variable._

VARIOCOUPLER.--A tuning device for varying the inductance of the
receiving oscillation circuits. It consists of a fixed and a rotatable
coil whose windings are not connected with each other.

VARIOMETER.--A tuning device for varying the inductance of the
receiving oscillation currents. It consists of a fixed and a rotatable
coil with the coils connected in series.

VERNIER CONDENSER.--See _Condenser, Vernier._

VOLT.--The electromotive force which produces a current of 1 ampere
when steadily applied to a conductor the resistance of which is one
ohm.

VOLTAGE DIVIDER.--See _Potentiometer._

VOLTAGE, PLATE.--The voltage of the current that is used to energize
the plate of a vacuum tube.

VOLTMETER.--An instrument for measuring the voltage of an electric
current.

WATCH CASE RECEIVER.--See _Receiver, Watch Case._

WATER-PIPE GROUND.--See _Ground, Water-Pipe._

WATT.--The power spent by a current of 1 ampere in a resistance of 1
ohm.

WAVE, BROAD.--A wave having a high decrement, when the strength of the
signals is nearly the same over a wide range of wave lengths.

WAVE LENGTH.--Every wave of whatever kind has a length. The wave
length is usually taken to mean the distance between the crests of two
successive waves.

WAVE LENGTH BAND.--In wireless reception when continuous waves are
being sent out and these are modulated by a microphone transmitter the
different audio frequencies set up corresponding radio frequencies and
the energy of these are emitted by the aerial; this results in waves
of different lengths, or a band of waves as it is called.

WAVE METER.--An apparatus for measuring the lengths of electric waves
set up in the oscillation circuits of sending and receiving sets.

WAVE MOTION.--Disturbances set up in the surrounding medium as water
waves in and on the water, sound waves in the air and electric waves
in the ether.

WAVES.--See _Wave Motion_.

WAVES, ELECTRIC.--Electromagnetic waves set up in and transmitted by
and through the ether.

Continuous. Abbreviated C.W.--Waves that are emitted without a break
from the aerial. Also called _undamped waves_.

Discontinuous.--Waves that are emitted periodically from the aerial.
Also called _damped waves_. Damped.--See _Discontinuous Waves_.

Intermediate.--Waves from 600 to 2,000 meters in length.

Long.--Waves over 2,000 meters in length.

Radio.--Electric waves used in wireless telegraphy and telephony.

Short.--Waves up to 600 meters in length.

Wireless.--Electric waves used in wireless telegraphy and telephony.

Undamped.--See _Continuous Waves_.

WIRELESS TELEGRAPH CODE.--See _Code, International_.

WIRE, ENAMELLED.--Wire that is given a thin coat of enamel which
insulates it.

WIRE, PHOSPHOR BRONZE.--A very strong wire made of an alloy of copper
and containing a trace of phosphorus.

WIRED WIRELESS.--Continuous waves of high frequency that are sent over
telephone wires instead of through space. Also called _line radio
communication; carrier frequency telephony, carrier current telephony;
guided wave telephony_ and _wired wireless._

X'S.--See _Static._

ZINCITE.--See _Detector._




WIRELESS DON'TS

AERIAL WIRE DON'TS

_Don't_ use iron wire for your aerial.

_Don't_ fail to insulate it well at both ends.

_Don't_ have it longer than 75 feet for sending out a 200-meter wave.

_Don't_ fail to use a lightning arrester, or better, a lightning
switch, for your receiving set.

_Don't_ fail to use a lightning switch with your transmitting set.

_Don't_ forget you must have an outside ground.

_Don't_ fail to have the resistance of your aerial as small as
possible. Use stranded wire.

_Don't_ fail to solder the leading-in wire to the aerial.

_Don't_ fail to properly insulate the leading-in wire where it goes
through the window or wall.

_Don't_ let your aerial or leading-in wire touch trees or other
objects.

_Don't_ let your aerial come too close to overhead wires of any kind.

_Don't_ run your aerial directly under, or over, or parallel with
electric light or other wires.

_Don't_ fail to make a good ground connection with the water pipe
inside.

TRANSMITTING DON'TS

_Don't_ attempt to send until you get your license.

_Don't_ fail to live up to every rule and regulation.

_Don't_ use an input of more than 1/2 a kilowatt if you live within 5
nautical miles of a naval station.

_Don't_ send on more than a 200-meter wave if you have a restricted or
general amateur license.

_Don't_ use spark gap electrodes that are too small or they will get
hot.

_Don't_ use too long or too short a spark gap. The right length can be
found by trying it out.

_Don't_ fail to use a safety spark gap between the grid and the
filament terminals where the plate potential is above 2,000 volts.

_Don't_ buy a motor-generator set if you have commercial alternating
current in your home.

_Don't_ overload an oscillation vacuum tube as it will greatly shorten
its life. Use two in parallel.

_Don't_ operate a transmitting set without a hot-wire ammeter in the
aerial.

_Don't_ use solid wire for connecting up the parts of transmitters.
Use stranded or braided wire.

_Don't_ fail to solder each connection.

_Don't_ use soldering fluid, use rosin.

_Don't_ think that all of the energy of an oscillation tube cannot be
used for wave lengths of 200 meters and under. It can be if the
transmitting set and aerial are properly designed.

_Don't_ run the wires of oscillation circuits too close together.

_Don't_ cross the wires of oscillation circuits except at right
angles.

_Don't_ set the transformer of a transmitting set nearer than 3 feet
to the condenser and tuning coil.

_Don't_ use a rotary gap in which the wheel runs out of true.

RECEIVING DON'TS

_Don't_ expect to get as good results with a crystal detector as with
a vacuum tube detector.

_Don't_ be discouraged if you fail to hit the sensitive spot of a
crystal detector the first time--or several times thereafter.

_Don't_ use a wire larger than _No. 80_ for the wire electrode of a
crystal detector.

_Don't_ try to use a loud speaker with a crystal detector receiving
set.

_Don't_ expect a loop aerial to give worthwhile results with a crystal
detector.

_Don't_ handle crystals with your fingers as this destroys their
sensitivity. Use tweezers or a cloth.

_Don't_ imbed the crystal in solder as the heat destroys its
sensitivity. Use _Wood's metal,_ or some other alloy which melts at or
near the temperature of boiling water.

_Don't_ forget that strong static and strong signals sometimes destroy
the sensitivity of crystals.

_Don't_ heat the filament of a vacuum tube to greater brilliancy than
is necessary to secure the sensitiveness required.

_Don't_ use a plate voltage that is less or more than it is rated for.

_Don't_ connect the filament to a lighting circuit.

_Don't_ use dry cells for heating the filament except in a pinch.

_Don't_ use a constant current to heat the filament, use a constant
voltage.

_Don't_ use a vacuum tube in a horizontal position unless it is made
to be so used.

_Don't_ fail to properly insulate the grid and plate leads.

_Don't_ use more than 1/3 of the rated voltage on the filament and on
the plate when trying it out for the first time.

_Don't_ fail to use alternating current for heating the filament where
this is possible.

_Don't_ fail to use a voltmeter to find the proper temperature of the
filament.

_Don't_ expect to get results with a loud speaker when using a single
vacuum tube.

_Don't_ fail to protect your vacuum tubes from mechanical shocks and
vibration.

_Don't_ fail to cut off the A battery entirely from the filament when
you are through receiving.

_Don't_ switch on the A battery current all at once through the
filament when you start to receive.

_Don't_ expect to get the best results with a gas-content detector
tube without using a potentiometer.

_Don't_ connect a potentiometer across the B battery or it will
speedily run down.

_Don't_ expect to get as good results with a single coil tuner as you
would with a loose coupler.

_Don't_ expect to get as good results with a two-coil tuner as with
one having a third, or _tickler_, coil.

_Don't_ think you have to use a regenerative circuit, that is, one
with a tickler coil, to receive with a vacuum tube detector.

_Don't_ think you are the only amateur who is troubled with static.

_Don't_ expect to eliminate interference if the amateurs around you
are sending with spark sets.

_Don't_ lay out or assemble your set on a panel first. Connect it up
on a board and find out if everything is right.

_Don't_ try to connect up your set without a wiring diagram in front
of you.

_Don't_ fail to shield radio frequency amplifiers.

_Don't_ set the axes of the cores of radio frequency transformers in a
line. Set them at right angles to each other.

_Don't_ use wire smaller than _No. 14_ for connecting up the various
parts.

_Don't_ fail to adjust the B battery after putting in a fresh vacuum
tube, as its sensitivity depends largely on the voltage.

_Don't_ fail to properly space the parts where you use variometers.

_Don't_ fail to put a copper shield between the variometer and the
variocoupler.

_Don't_ fail to keep the leads to the vacuum tube as short as
possible.

_Don't_ throw your receiving set out of the window if it _howls_. Try
placing the audio-frequency transformers farther apart and the cores
of them at right angles to each other.

_Don't_ use condensers with paper dielectrics for an amplifier
receiving set or it will be noisy.

_Don't_ expect as good results with a loop aerial, or when using the
bed springs, as an out-door aerial will give you.

_Don't_ use an amplifier having a plate potential of less than 100
volts for the last step where a loud speaker is to be used.

_Don't_ try to assemble a set if you don't know the difference between
a binding post and a blue print. Buy a set ready to use.

_Don't_ expect to get Arlington time signals and the big cableless
stations if your receiver is made for short wave lengths.

_Don't_ take your headphones apart. You are just as apt to spoil them
as you would a watch.

_Don't_ expect to get results with a Bell telephone receiver.

_Don't_ forget that there are other operators using the ether besides
yourself.

_Don't_ let your B battery get damp and don't let it freeze.

_Don't_ try to recharge your B battery unless it is constructed for
the purpose.

STORAGE BATTERY DON'TS

_Don't_ connect a source of alternating current direct to your storage
battery. You have to use a rectifier.

_Don't_ connect the positive lead of the charging circuit with the
negative terminal of your storage battery.

_Don't_ let the electrolyte get lower than the tops of the plates of
your storage battery.

_Don't_ fail to look after the condition of your storage battery once
in a while.

_Don't_ buy a storage battery that gives less than 6 volts for heating
the filament.

_Don't_ fail to keep the specific gravity of the electrolyte of your
storage battery between 1.225 and 1.300 Baume. This you can do with a
hydrometer.

_Don't_ fail to recharge your storage battery when the hydrometer
shows that the specific gravity of the electrolyte is close to 1.225.

_Don't_ keep charging the battery after the hydrometer shows that the
specific gravity is 1.285.

_Don't_ let the storage battery freeze.

_Don't_ let it stand for longer than a month without using unless you
charge it.

_Don't_ monkey with the storage battery except to add a little
sulphuric acid to the electrolyte from time to time. If anything goes
wrong with it better take it to a service station and let the expert
do it.

EXTRA DON'TS

_Don't_ think you have an up-to-date transmitting station unless you
are using C.W.

_Don't_ use a wire from your lightning switch down to the outside
ground that is smaller than No. _4_.

_Don't_ try to operate your spark coil with 110-volt direct lighting
current without connecting in a rheostat.

_Don't_ try to operate your spark coil with 110-volt alternating
lighting current without connecting in an electrolytic interrupter.

_Don't_ try to operate an alternating current power transformer with
110-volt direct current without connecting in an electrolytic
interruptor.

_Don't_--no never--connect one side of the spark gap to the aerial
wire and the other side of the spark gap to the ground. The Government
won't have it--that's all.

_Don't_ try to tune your transmitter to send out waves of given length
by guesswork. Use a wavemeter.

_Don't_ use _hard fiber_ for panels. It is a very poor insulator where
high frequency currents are used.

_Don't_ think you are the only one who doesn't know all about
wireless. Wireless is a very complex art and there are many things
that those experienced have still to learn.




THE END.









End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Radio Amateur's Hand Book, by
A. Frederick Collins

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE RADIO AMATEUR'S HAND BOOK ***

***** This file should be named 6934-8.txt or 6934-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/6/9/3/6934/

Produced by Alan Millar and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team.

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
  www.gutenberg.org/license.


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at 809
North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887.  Email
contact links and up to date contact information can be found at the
Foundation's web site and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit:  www.gutenberg.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For forty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg EBook of A Treatise on Staff Making and Pivoting, by
Eugene E. Hall

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: A Treatise on Staff Making and Pivoting
       Containing Complete Directions for Making and Fitting New
       Staffs from the Raw Material

Author: Eugene E. Hall

Release Date: January 8, 2007 [EBook #20317]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK A TREATISE ON STAFF MAKING ***




Produced by Sigal Alon, Chris Curnow, Fox in the Stars and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net





Transcriber's notes:
Some minor typographical errors have been corrected.
The author's spelling has been retained.




                         A TREATISE

                             ON

                        STAFF MAKING

                            AND

                          PIVOTING


           CONTAINING COMPLETE DIRECTIONS FOR MAKING
                 AND FITTING NEW STAFFS FROM
                      THE RAW MATERIAL


                       EUGENE E. HALL


                 WITH NUMEROUS ILLUSTRATIONS


                          CHICAGO:
                 HAZLITT & WALKER, PUBLISHERS
                            1910




                          CONTENTS.


                          CHAPTER I.

The raw material. The gravers. The roughing out. The hardening
and tempering                                                     5

                          CHAPTER II.

Kinds of pivots. Their shape. Capillarity. The requirements of
a good pivot                                                     13

                          CHAPTER III.

The proper measurements and how obtained                         19

                          CHAPTER IV.

The gauging of holes. The side shake. The position of the graver 23

                          CHAPTER V.

The grinding and polishing. The reversal of the work. The wax
chuck                                                            29

                          CHAPTER VI.

Another wax chuck. The centering of the work                     35

                          CHAPTER VII.

The finishing of the staff. Pivoting. Making pivot drills. Hardening
drills. The drilling and fitting of new pivots                   39




STAFF MAKING AND PIVOTING.




CHAPTER I.


To produce a good balance staff requires more skill than to produce any
other turned portion of a watch, and your success will depend not alone
on your knowledge of its proper shape and measurements, nor the tools at
your command, but rather upon your skill with the graver and your success
in hardening and tempering. There are many points worthy of consideration
in the making of a balance staff that are too often neglected. I have
seen staffs that were models as regards execution and finish, that were
nearly worthless from a practical standpoint, simply because the maker
had devoted all his time and energy to the execution of a beautiful piece
of lathe work, and had given no thought or study to the form and size of
the pivots. On the other hand, one often sees staffs whose pivots are
faultless in shape, but the execution and finish so bungling as to offset
all the good qualities as regards shape. To have good tools and the right
ideas is one thing, and to use these tools properly and make a practical
demonstration of your theory is another.

I shall endeavor to take up every point in connection with the balance
staff, from the steel to the jewels, and their relation to the pivots,
and I believe this will then convey to the reader all the necessary
points, not only as regards staffs, but pivots also, whether applied to a
balance or a pinion staff.

It may be argued, and we often do hear material dealers advance the
theory, that to-day, with our interchangeable parts and the cheapness of
all material, it is a waste of time to make a balance staff. To the
reader who takes this view of the situation I simply want to say, kindly
follow me to the end of this paragraph, and if you are still of the same
opinion, then you are wasting your time in following me farther. For a
material dealer to advance this theory I can find some excuse; he is an
interested party, and the selling of material is his bread and butter;
but the other fellow, well I never could understand him and possibly
never shall. When we seriously consider the various styles and series in
"old model" and "new model," of only one of the leading manufacturers of
watches in this country, to say nothing of the legion of small and large
concerns who are manufacturing or have manufactured in the past, and then
think of carrying these staffs in stock, all ready for use, we then begin
to realize how utterly absurd the idea is, to say nothing of how
expensive! On the other hand, if you reside in a large city and propose
to rely on the stock of your material dealer, you will find yourself in
an embarrasing situation very often, for as likely as not the movement
requiring a new staff was made by a company that went out of business
back in the '80s, or it is a new movement, the material for which has
not yet been placed on the market. This state of affairs leads to
makeshifts, and they in turn lead to botch work. The watchmaker who does
not possess the experience or necessary qualifications to make a new
balance staff and make it in a neat and workmanlike manner, is never
certain of having exactly what is needed, and cannot hope to long retain
the confidence of his customers. In fact, he is not a watchmaker at all,
but simply an apprentice or student, even though he be working for a
salary or be his own master. There are undoubtedly many worthy members of
the trade, who are not familiar with the making of a balance staff, who
will take exceptions to this statement; but it is nevertheless true. They
may be good workmen as far as they go; they may be painstaking; but they
cannot be classed as watchmakers.

This article is intended for the benefit of that large class whose
opportunities for obtaining instruction are limited, and who are ready
and willing to learn, and for that still larger class of practical
workmen who can make a new staff in a creditable manner, but who are
always glad to read others people's ideas on any subject connected with
the trade and who are not yet too old to learn new tricks should they
find any such.

[Illustration: _Fig. 1._]

Good tools, in good condition, are the most essential requisites in
making a new staff. I would not advise any particular make of lathe, as
the most expensive lathe in the world will not produce a true staff if
the workman cannot center his work accurately and does not know how to
handle his graver, while on the other hand fine work can be done on the
simplest and cheapest lathe by a workman possessing the requisite skill.
I will take it for granted that you use an American-made lathe of some
kind, or a foreign-made lathe manufactured on American lines. It is
advisable, though not absolutely necessary, to have three gravers similar
to those illustrated in Fig. 1, A being used for turning the staff down
in the rough; B for the conical pivots and square shoulders and C for the
under-cutting. The other tools and attachments needed will be described
as I come to them in use.

The balance staff should be made of the best steel, tempered to such a
degree as to give the longest service and yet not so hard as to endanger
the breakage of the pivots. Select a piece of Stubb's steel wire, say No.
46, or a little larger than the largest part of the finished staff is to
be, and center it in a split chuck of your lathe. Be careful in selecting
your chuck that you pick one that fits the wire fairly close. The chuck
holds the work truest that comes the nearest to fitting it. If you try to
use a chuck that is too large or too small for the work, you will only
ruin the chuck for truth. Turn the wire to the form of a rough staff, as
shown in Fig. 2, leaving on a small part of the original wire, as shown
at A. After the wire is roughed out to this general form, remove from the
chuck and get ready to harden and temper it. The hardening and tempering
may be effected in various ways, and I am scarcely prepared to say which
method is the best, as there are several which give about the same
general results. One method of hardening is to smear the blank with
common yellow soap, heat it to a cherry red, and drop endwise into
linseed oil. Petroleum is preferred by some to linseed oil, but, to tell
the truth, I can see no difference in the action of linseed, petroleum or
olive oil. Be sure and have enough oil to thoroughly cool the blank, and
a deep vessel, such as a large-mouthed vial, is preferable to a saucer.
The blank will now be found too hard to work easily with the graver, and
we must therefore draw the temper down to that of fine spring steel.
Before doing this the blank should be brightened, in order that we may
see to just what color we are drawing it. The main object in using the
soap in hardening is that it may form a scale upon the blank, and if the
heating is effected gradually the soap will melt and form a practically
air-tight case around the blank. This scale, if the hardening is
carefully and properly done, will generally chip and fall off when the
blank is plunged in the oil, particularly if the oil is cool, and if it
does not fall off of its own accord, it can easily be removed by rolling
the blank upon the bench. If it does not come out clean, or if soap is
not used, it may be brightened by again inserting in the lathe and
bringing it in contact with a piece of fine emery paper or cloth.

[Illustration: _Fig. 2._]

I draw the temper in the following manner: Place some fine brass filings
in a boiling-out cup or bluing pan and lay the blank upon these filings,
holding the pan over the flame of an alcohol lamp until the blank assumes
a dark purple color, which it will reach when the heat gets to about 500°
F. This I consider the right hardness for a balance staff, as it is not
too hard to work well under the graver nor too soft for the pivots. At
this degree of hardness steel will assume an exquisite polish if properly
treated. Another method of tempering is to place the staff on a piece of
sheet iron or copper (say 1 inch wide by 4 long), having previously bent
it into a small angle, for the reception of the staff, as shown in Fig.
3. This piece of metal, when nicely fitted into a file handle, will
answer all the purposes of the bluing pan and presents quite a neat
appearance. Having placed the blank in the angle, lay on it a piece of
yellow wax about the size of a bean, and heat it over your lamp until the
wax takes fire and burns. Blow out the flame and allow the staff to cool,
and it will be found to be of about the right hardness.

[Illustration: _Fig. 3._]

We have now arrived at an important station in staff making, a junction,
we may term it, where many lines branch off from the main road. At this
particular spot is where authorities differ. I have no hesitation in
saying that at this particular point the split chuck should be removed
from the lathe head and carefully placed in the chuck box and the cement
chuck put in its place. I believe that all of the remaining work upon a
staff should be executed while it is held in a cement chuck. On the other
hand I have seen good workmen who turned and finished all the lower part
of a staff while in a split chuck, cut it off and turned and finished the
upper part in a cement chuck. All I have got to say is that they had more
confidence in the truth of their chucks than I have in mine. I have even
read of watchmakers who made the entire staff in a split chuck, but I
must confess I am somewhat curious to examine a staff made in that way,
and must have the privilege of examining it before I will admit that a
true staff can be so made.

We will suppose that the workman has a moderately true chuck, and that he
prefers to turn and finish all the lower portions in this way. Of course
the directions for using a cement chuck on the upper part of a staff are
equally applicable to the lower. Before going further I think it
advisable to consider the requirements of a pivot, but will reserve this
for another chapter.




CHAPTER II.


The chief requirements of a pivot are that it shall be round and well
polished. Avoid the burnish file at all hazards; it will not leave the
pivot round, for the pressure is unequal at various points in the
revolution. A pivot that was not perfectly round might act fairly well in
a jewel hole that was round, but unfortunately the greater proportion of
jewel holes are not as they should be, and we must therefore take every
precaution to guard against untrue pivots. Let us examine just what the
effect will be if an imperfect pivot is fitted into an unround hole
jewel, and to demonstrate its action more clearly let us exaggerate the
defects. Suppose we pick a perfectly round jewel and insert into the
opening a three-cornered piece of steel wire, in shape somewhat
resembling the taper of a triangular file. We find that this triangular
piece of steel will turn in the jewel with the same ease that the most
perfect cylindrical pivot will. Now suppose we change the jewel for one
that is out of round and repeat the experiment. We now find that the
triangular steel soon finds the hollow spots in the jewel hole and comes
to a stand-still as it is inserted in the hole. The action of a pivot
that is not true, when in contact with a jewel whose hole is out of
round, is very similar, though in a less marked degree. If the pivot
inclines toward the elliptical and the jewel hole has a like failing,
which is often the case, it is very evident that this want of truth in
both the pivot and hole is very detrimental to the good going of a watch.

[Illustration: _Fig. 4._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 5._]

There are two kinds of pivots, known respectively as straight and conical
pivots, but for the balance staff there is but one kind and that is the
conical, which is illustrated in Fig. 4. The conical pivot has at least
one advantage over the straight one, _i. e._, it can be made much smaller
than a straight pivot, as it is much stronger in proportion, owing to its
shape. All pivots have a tendency to draw the oil away from the jewels,
and particularly the conically formed variety, which develops a strong
capillary attraction. To prevent this capillary attraction of the oil,
the back-slope is formed next to the shoulder, although many persons seem
to think that this back-slope is merely added by way of ornament, to make
the pivot more graceful in appearance. It is very essential, however, for
if too much oil is applied the staff would certainly draw it away if its
thickness were not reduced, by means of the back-slope. Before leaving
the subject of capillarity let us examine the enlarged jewel in Fig. 5;
_c_ is an enlarged pivot, _b_ is the hole jewel and _a_ is the end stone.
We observe that the hole jewel on the side towards the end stone is
convex. It is so made that through capillarity the oil is retained at
the end of the pivot where it is most wanted. It is, in my opinion, very
necessary that the young watchmaker should have at least a fair
understanding of capillarity, and should understand why the end stone is
made convex and the pivot with a back slope. For this reason I will try
and make clear this point before proceeding further. We all know that it
is essential to apply oil to all surfaces coming in contact, in order to
reduce the friction as much as possible, and if the application of oil is
necessary to any part of the mechanism of a watch, that part is the
pivot. Saunier very aptly puts it thus: "A liquid is subject to the
action of three forces: gravity, adhesion (the mutual attraction between
the liquid and the substance of the vessel containing it), and cohesion
(the attractive force existing among the molecules of the liquid and
opposing the subdivision of the mass.)"

We all know that if we place a small drop of oil upon a piece of flat
glass or steel and then invert the same the oil will cling to the glass,
owing to the adhesion of the particles; if we then add a little more to
the drop and again invert, it will still cling, although the drop may be
elongated to a certain degree. This is owing to the cohesion of the
molecules of the oil, which refuse to be separated from one another. If,
however, we again add to the drop of oil and invert the plate the drop
will elongate and finally part, one portion dropping while the other
portion clings to the main body of the liquid. The fall of the drop is
occasioned by gravity overcoming the cohesion of the molecules. Now take
a perfectly clean and polished needle and place a drop of oil upon its
point and we will see that the oil very rapidly ascends towards the
thicker portion of the needle. Now if we heat and hammer out the point of
the needle into the form of a small drill and repeat the operation we
find that the oil no longer ascends. It rises from the point to the
extreme width of the drill portion, but refuses to go beyond. It clings
to that portion of the needle which would correspond to the ridge just
back of the slope in a conical pivot. Water, oil, etc., when placed in a
clean wine glass, do not exhibit a perfectly level surface, but raise at
the edges as shown at _a_ in Fig. 6. If a tube is now inserted, we find
that the liquid not only rises around the outside of the tube and the
edges of the vessel, but also rises in the tube far beyond its mean
level, as shown at _b_. These various effects are caused by one of the
forces above described, _i. e._, the adhesion, or mutual attraction
existing between the liquid and the substance of the vessel and rod. The
word capillarity is of Latin derivation, and signifies hair-like
slenderness. The smaller the tube, or the nearer the edges of a vessel
are brought together, the higher in proportion will the liquid rise above
the level. An ascent of a liquid, due to capillarity, also takes place,
where the liquid is placed between two separate bodies, as oil placed
between two pieces of flat glass. If the plates are parallel to one
another and perpendicular to the surface of the liquid it will ascend to
the same height between the plates, as shown at _c_ in Fig. 6. If the
plates were united at the back like a book and spread somewhat at the
front, the oil would ascend the higher as the two sides approach one
another, as shown at _d_, Fig. 6. If a drop is placed somewhat away from
the intersecting point, of the glasses, as shown at _m_ it will, if not
too far away, gradually work its way to the junction, providing the
glasses are level. If, however, the glasses are inclined to a certain
extent, the drop will remain stationary, since it is drawn in one
direction by gravity and in the other by capillarity. When a drop of oil
is placed between two surfaces, both of which are convex, or one convex
and the other plain, as shown at _g_, it will collect at the point _n_,
at which the surfaces nearest approach one another. We now see very
clearly why the hole jewel is made convex on the side towards the
end-stone and concave on the side towards the pivot.

[Illustration: _Fig. 6._]

Particular pains should be taken to polish those portions of the pivots
which actually enter the jewel hole and to see that all marks of the
graver be thoroughly removed, because if any grooves, no matter how
small, are left, they act as minute capillary tubes to convey the oil.

If the hole jewel be of the proper shape, the end-stone not too far from
the hole jewel and too much oil is not applied at one time, the oil will
not spread nor run down the staff, but a small portion will be retained
at the acting surface of pivot and jewel, and this supply will be
gradually fed to these parts from the reservoir between the jewel and
end-stone, by the action of capillarity.

Having examined into the requirements of the pivot and its jewel and
having gained an insight into what their forms should be, we are the
better able to perform that portion of the work in an intelligent
manner.




CHAPTER III.


Our wire has been roughed out into the form of a staff, has been hardened
and the temper drawn down to the requisite hardness and we are now ready
to proceed with our work. As I said before, we have now arrived at a
point where many authorities differ, _i. e._, as to whether the finishing
of the staff proper, should be performed while the work is held in the
chuck, or whether a wax chuck be substituted. We will take it for granted
that you have a true chuck and that you prefer to finish all the lower
portion of the staff while held in the chuck.

Before we proceed with our work it will be necessary for us to make some
accurate measurements, as we cannot afford to do any guess work by
measuring by means of the old staff. I have used a number of different
kinds of calipers and measuring instruments for determining the various
measurements for a balance staff, but have met with more success with a
very simple little tool which I made myself from drawings and description
published some years ago in THE AMERICAN JEWELER. This simple little tool
is shown in Fig. 7, and has been of great service to me. It consists of a
brass sleeve A, with a projection at one end as shown at B. This sleeve
is threaded, and into it is fitted the screw part C, which terminates in
a pivot D, which is small enough to enter the smallest jewel. The sleeve
I made from a solid piece of brass, turning it down in my lathe and
finishing the projection by means of a file. The hole was then drilled
and threaded with a standard thread. The screw part C, I made of steel
and polished carefully.

[Illustration: _Fig. 7._]

To ascertain the proper height for the roller, place it upon the tool,
allowing it to rest upon the leg B, and set the pivot D in the foot
jewel. Now adjust, by means of the screw C until the roller is in its
proper position in relation to the lever fork. This may be understood
better by consulting Fig. 8, where A is the gauge, C is the roller, E is
the lever, F is the plate and G is the potance.

[Illustration: _Fig. 8._]

Now in order to locate the proper place to cut the seat for the roller,
remove it from the foot of the gauge and apply the gauge to the work as
shown in Fig. 9. The foot of the gauge resting against the end of the
pivot, the taper end of the gauge will locate accurately the position of
the roller seat. In order to locate the proper position for the seat for
the balance, proceed the same as for the roller, except that the foot of
the gauge is lowered until it is brought sufficiently below the plate to
allow of the proper clearance as indicated by the dotted lines at H. Now
apply the gauge to the new staff, as shown in Fig. 10, and the taper end
will locate the exact position for the balance seat.

[Illustration: _Fig. 9._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 10._]

As previously stated, I have taken it for granted that you preferred to
finish all the lower portion of the staff while the work was held in the
chuck. I have assumed that you prefer to work in this way because I have
noted the fact that nine watchmakers out of every ten start with, and
first finish up, the lower portion of the staff. Where this method of
working originated I do not know, but it always has the appearance to me
of "placing the cart before the horse." I do not pretend to say that a
true staff cannot be made in this way, but it certainly is not the most
convenient nor advisable. We all know that the heaviest part of the staff
is from the roller seat to the end of the top pivot. Now it seems to me
that it is the most natural thing in the world for a mechanic to desire
to turn the greater bulk of his work before reversing it. Now if the
workman has been educated to turn indifferently with right or left hand,
it may make little difference, as far as the actual turning is concerned,
whether he starts to work at the upper or lower end of the staff, but
unfortunately there are few among us who are so skilled as to use the
graver with equal facility with either hand, and it is therefore an
advantage to start with the upper end, as you can thus finish a greater
portion of the work more readily. You can readily see that when you come
to reverse your staff and use the wax chuck, that by starting at the top
of staff your wax has a much larger surface of metal to cling to, and
again the shape of the balance seat is such as to secure the work firmly
in the wax, while if the reverse method is employed, the larger portion
of the balance seat is exposed and the staff is more liable to loosen
from the motion of the lathe and pressure of the graver and polishers.




CHAPTER IV.


By the aid of the pinion calipers and the old staff, the diameter of the
roller seat and the balance and hair-spring collet seats may be readily
taken, but it is perhaps better to gauge the holes, as the old staff may
not have been perfect in this respect. A round broach will answer
admirably for this purpose, and the size may be taken from the broach by
means of the calipers. In fitting our pivots, we can not be too exact;
and as yet no instrument has been placed upon the market for this purpose
which is moderate in price and yet thoroughly reliable. The majority of
watchmakers use what is termed the pivot-gauge, a neat little instrument
which accompanies the Jacot lathe, and which may be obtained from any
material house. This tool, which is shown in Fig. 11, is, however, open
to one objection in the measurement of pivots, and that is that it may be
pressed down at one time with greater force than at another, and
consequently will show a variation in two measurements of the same pivot.
Some of my readers may think that I am over-particular on this point, and
that the difference in measurement on two occasions is too trivial to be
worthy of attention, but I do not think that too much care can be
bestowed upon this part of the work, and neglect in this particular is,
I think, the cause of poor performance in many otherwise good
timepieces. The ordinarily accepted rule among watchmakers is that a
pivot should be made 1/2500 of an inch smaller than the hole in the jewel
to allow for the proper lubrication. I am acquainted with watchmakers,
and men who are termed good workmen, too, who invariably allow 1/2500 of
an inch side shake, no matter whether the pivot is 12/2500 or 16/2500 of
an inch in diameter. Now if 1/2500 of an inch is the proper side shake
for a pivot measuring 12/2500 of an inch in diameter, it is certainly not
sufficient for a pivot which is one-third larger. Of course it is
understood that side shakes do not increase in proportion according as
the pivot increases in size, for if they did a six-inch shaft would
require at this rate a side shake of 1/2 inch, or 1/4 inch on each side,
which would be ridiculously out of all proportion, as the 1/64 of an inch
would be ample under any circumstances. Neither can we arrive at the
proper end shake for a pivot by reducing in proportion from the end shake
allowed on a six-inch shaft, because if we followed out the same course
of reasoning we would arrive at a point where a pivot measuring 12/2500
of an inch would require an end shake so infinitely small that it would
require six figures to express the denominator of the fraction, and the
most minute measuring instrument yet invented would be incapable of
recording the measurement. We must leave sufficient side shake, however,
on the smallest pivot and jewel for the globules of the oil to move
freely, and experiments have shown conclusively that 1/2500 of an inch or
1/5000 on each side of the pivot, is as little space as it is desirable
to leave for that purpose, as the globules of the best chronometer oil
will refuse to enter spaces that are very much more minute. But to return
to our pivot gauge.

[Illustration: _Fig. 11._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 12._]

Each division on the gauge represents 1/2500 of an inch, which is all
that we require. The diameter that the pivot should be, can be
ascertained by inserting a round pivot broach into the jewel and taking
the measurement with the pivot gauge, and then making the necessary
deduction for side shake. Slip the jewel on the broach as far as it will
go, as shown in Fig. 12, and then with the pivot gauge, take the size of
the broach, as close up to the jewel as you can measure, and the taper of
the broach will be about right for the side shake of the pivot. If,
however, you prefer to make the measurement still more accurate, you can
do so by dipping the broach into rouge before slipping on the jewel and
then remove the jewel and the place which is occupied on the broach can
be plainly discerned and the exact measurement taken and an allowance of
1/2500 of an inch made for the side shake. Another method, and one which
is particularly applicable to Swiss watches, where the jewel is burnished
into the cock or plate, is to first slip on to the broach a small flat
piece of cork and as the broach enters the jewel the cork is forced
farther on to the broach, and when the jewel is removed it marks the
place on the broach which its inner side occupied, and the measurement
can then be taken with the gauge. If care is used in the selection of a
broach, that it be as nearly perfect in round and taper as possible, by a
little experiment you can soon ascertain just what part of the length of
the broach corresponds to one degree on the gauge and by a repetition of
the experiment the broach can then be divided accurately, by very minute
rings turned with a fine-pointed graver, into sections, each representing
one degree, or 1/2500 of an inch, and the measurement will thus be
simplified greatly.

[Illustration: _Fig. 13._]

As before stated, much depends upon the condition of your gravers and the
manner of using them. It is of the utmost importance that they be kept
sharp, and as soon as they begin to show the slightest sign of losing
their keenness, you should sharpen them. The proper shape for balance
pivots was shown in Fig. 4. Now let us examine into the best positions
for holding the gravers. In Fig. 13 two ways of holding the graver are
shown, _A_ representing the right and _B_ representing the wrong way. If
the graver is applied to the work as shown at _A_, it will cut a clean
shaving, while if applied as shown at _B_ it will simply scrape the side
of the pivot and ruin the point of the graver without materially
forwarding the work. Again, the holding of the graver as indicated at _A_
has its advantages, because the force of the cut is towards the hand
holding it, and should it catch from any cause the jar of the obstruction
will be conveyed immediately to the hand, and it will naturally give and
no harm will be done. If, on the other hand, the graver should meet with
an obstruction while held in the position indicated at _B_, the force of
the cut will be in the direction of the arrow, downward and toward the
rest, and the rest being unlike the hand, or rather being rigid, it
cannot give, and the result is that the work, or graver, or both, are
ruined. In Fig. 14 two other methods of holding the graver are shown. The
general roughing out of a staff should be done with the graver held about
as shown at _A_, Fig. 13; but in finishing, the graver should be held so
that the cut is made diagonally, as indicated at _A_, Fig. 14. It is
rather dificult to explain in print just how the graver should be held,
but a little experiment will suffice to teach the proper position. The
best indication that a graver is doing its work properly, is the fact
that the chips come away in long spiral coils. Aim to see how light a cut
you can make rather than how heavy. Never use force in removing the
material, but depend entirely upon the keenness of the cutting edges.
Never use the point of the graver, except where you are compelled to, but
rather use the right or left hand cutting edges. By following out this
rule you will find that your work, when left by the graver, requires
little or no finishing up, except at the pivots. At _B_, Fig. 14, is
shown the correct manner of applying the graver when turning a pivot.
Hold the graver nearly on a line with the axis of the lathe and catching
a chip at the extreme end of the pivot with the back edge of the graver,
push slightly forward and at the same time roll the graver towards you
and it will give the pivot the desired conical form. By keeping the
graver on a line with the length of the pivot, all the force applied is
simply exerted in the direction of the chuck, and does not tend to spring
the pivot, as it would were the extreme point applied, as in Fig. 13.
When we come to such places as the shoulder of the back slope, the seat
for the roller, balance, etc., we must necessarily use the point of the
graver.

[Illustration: _Fig. 14._]




CHAPTER V.


In chapter IV I called attention to the right and wrong way of holding
the graver while using the extreme point, and also the correct manner of
applying the graver in turning conical pivots. I also called attention to
the fact that it was well to only use the point of the graver where
positively necessary, as in the back slope of the pivot, etc. In turning
the seat for the balance, as indicated at A, Fig. 15, the graver A, Fig.
1, or a similar one as shown at B, Fig. 15, should be used. The slope at
C should now be turned. In turning the pivot and seat for the roller, you
should leave them slightly larger than required, to allow for the
grinding and polishing which is to follow. No definite amount can be left
for this purpose, because the amount left for polishing depends entirely
on how smoothly your turning has been done. If it has been done
indifferently, you may have to allow considerable for grinding and
polishing before all the graver marks are removed, while, on the
contrary, if the work has been performed with care, very little will have
to be removed. Avoid the use of the pivot file by performing your work
properly to start with.

[Illustration: _Fig. 15._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 16._]

For grinding, bell-metal or soft iron slips are desirable, and the
grinding is effected by means of oil stone powder and oil. Two slips of
metal similar in shape to A and B, Fig. 16, are easily made, and will be
found very useful. A is for square pivots, etc., while B is used for
conical pivots. These slips should be dressed with a dead smooth file,
the filing to be done crosswise, to hold the oil stone powder and oil.
During the operation of grinding, the lathe should be run at a high speed
and the slips applied to the work lightly, squarely and carefully. The
polishing is effected by means of diamantine and alcohol. After the work
is brought to a smooth gray surface, slips of boxwood of the shape shown
in Fig. 16 should be substituted for the metal slips. Oil stone slips are
sometimes used in lieu of metal ones, but they soon get out of shape and
are troublesome to care for on this account. All things considered, there
is nothing better for polishing than a slip or file made of agate, say
one inch long, one-quarter inch wide and one-eighth inch thick. A slip of
this kind can be obtained from any lapidary, and after grinding with
emery and water until the surface has a very fine grain, it should be
mounted by fastening with cement into a brass socket and this is then
inserted into a small wooden handle, as shown in Fig. 17. The agate slip
should be ground to about the shape of B, Fig. 16, so that one side can
be used for square corners and the other for conical pivots. The final
polish can soon be imparted by means of a small boxwood slip, or
flattened peg-wood, and diamantine and alcohol. Never try to bring out
the final polish until you are satisfied that all graver marks have been
ground out, otherwise you will simply have to go all over the work again.

[Illustration: _Fig. 17._]

When the staff is finished from the lower pivot to the seat of the
balance, the upper part should be roughed out nearly to size and then cut
off preparatory to finishing the top part.

Attention was previously called to the fact that the majority of
watchmakers prefer to finish all the lower portion of the staff first,
notwithstanding the fact that there are numerous advantages to be gained
by proceeding to first finish up the upper portion. We have now reached
the point where the wax chuck must be used, and perhaps these advantages
may be now more clearly defined. In order that the two procedures may be
more distinctly shown, illustrations of both methods are here given.
Fig. 18 shows the popular method, the lower portion of the staff being
all completed and fastened by means of wax, in the wax chuck. Fig. 19
shows the opposite course of procedure. In both illustrations the lines
indicate the amount of wax applied to hold the work. It will be noted
that in Fig. 18 the hub of the staff is enclosed in the wax very much as
a cork is fitted into a bottle, while in Fig. 19 the hub is reversed,
just as a cork would appear were the larger portion within the bottle and
the smaller portion protruding through the neck. A study of the diagram
will readily show that in Fig. 19 the staff is held more rigidly in place
and that a greater bulk of the work is enclosed in the wax than in Fig.
18, although there is less wax used in the former than in the latter.

[Illustration: _Fig. 18._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 19._]

Before proceeding to set the staff in the wax, it is necessary to make
some measurements to determine its full length. Remove both cap jewels
and screw the balance cock in place. Examine the cock and see if it has
at any time been bent up or down or punched to raise or lower it. If so,
rectify the error by straightening it and then put it in place. Now with
a degree gauge, or calipers, proceed to take the distance between the
outer surfaces of the hole jewels and shorten the staff to the required
length. Do not remove too much, but leave the staff a little long rather
than cut it too short, as the length can be shortened later.

[Illustration: _Fig. 20._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 21._]

A very handy tool for the purpose of making these length measurements can
be constructed by adding a stop screw to the common double calipers as
shown in Fig. 20. The improvement consists in the fact that they can be
opened to remove from the work and closed again at exactly the same
place, so that an accurate measurement can be made. The all-important
point in the use of wax chucks is to get a perfect center. If you are not
careful you are liable to leave a small projection in the center as shown
at A, Fig. 21. The ordinary wax chuck cannot be unscrewed from the
spindle and restored to its proper place again with anything like a
certainty of its being exactly true, and if you insist on doing this
there is no remedy left but finding a new center each time. It will be
found more satisfactory and economical in the long run to have a
permanent chuck for a wax chuck and you will then have no necessity for
removing the brass chuck.

The center, or cone for the reception of the pivot, should be turned out
with the graver at an angle of about 60° and such a graver as is shown at
B, Fig. 1, will answer admirably for this purpose. After you have
carefully centered your wax chuck, place a small alcohol lamp under the
chuck and heat it until the wax will just become fluid and yet not be hot
enough to burn the wax. Revolve the lathe slowly and insert the staff so
that the pivot rests squarely and firmly in the center. Now re-heat the
chuck carefully in order that the wax may adhere firmly to the staff,
keeping the lathe revolving meanwhile, but not so fast that the wax will
be drawn from the center, and at the same time apply the forefinger to
the end of the staff, as shown in Figs. 18 and 19, and gently press it
squarely into place in the wax chuck. The lines in Figs. 18 and 19
designate about the right amount of wax after the work is ready, but it
is well to add a little more than is shown in those figures, and you
should be careful to keep the wax of equal bulk all around, or when it
cools it will have a tendency to draw the staff to one side. Now remove
the lamp and keep the lathe revolving until the wax is quite cool, when
it should be removed, by means of a graver, down to the dimensions
designated by the lines in Figs. 18 and 19. When this is accomplished
re-heat a little, but only enough to make it soft, but not liquid, and
placing a sharpened peg-wood on the tool rest proceed to the final truing
up, by resting the pointed end against the hub.




CHAPTER VI.


I have described above one of the methods in vogue for holding a staff by
means of wax. It is the common method employed by most watch repairers,
the popular method so to speak. The method which I am now about to
describe may seem awkward at first to those who have not practiced it,
but once you have fairly tried it, you will never be contented to work in
any other way.

The first requisite is a true taper chuck; and it is well to purchase an
extra one to be used solely for this purpose, so that you will be
prepared at all times for staff work. Select a good steel taper, and
having placed your chuck in the lathe, see if your taper fits well by
inserting it in the chuck while running slowly. If it fits well, it will
be marked almost throughout its length. Insert again in the chuck, and
with a few light taps of the hammer set it firmly in place, so that you
know that there is no danger of its working loose. The taper will then
project about three-quarters of an inch from the face of the chuck. By
means of a sharp graver, make the face of the taper smooth and straight,
and cut off the taper end. Now mark a point on the taper about one-fourth
of an inch from the end, and proceed to turn down the diameter from this
point to the end, leaving that portion of the taper about two-thirds of
its original diameter, and finish with a nice square shoulder. Now with
a long-pointed sharp graver proceed to cut a nice V-shaped center with an
angle of about 60°. When you have proceeded thus far you will find that
you have an implement resembling that shown in Fig. 22.

[Illustration: _Fig. 22._]

Care must be taken that the center is quite true, and that no projection
is left like that illustrated in Fig. 21, no matter how minute it may be.
Now examine the center by the aid of a strong glass, and after you are
satisfied with its appearance proceed to test it. Take a large sized pin
with a good point, and placing the point in the center, maintain it in
position by pressing upon the head, and while revolving the lathe slowly
proceed to examine by means of your glass. If the center is a good one
there will be no perceptible vibration of the pin.

Now procure a piece of small brass tubing with an internal diameter a
little less than that of the turned down portion of your taper. If the
brass tubing cannot be procured readily, you can substitute a piece of
brass wire a little larger than the taper, and by means of a drill a
little smaller in diameter than the turned down portion you can readily
make a small tube about one-half inch long. Now by means of a broach
proceed to open the tube to a point one-quarter inch from one end, and
carefully fit it on the turned down portion of your taper. After fitting
tightly to the shoulder of the taper, proceed to turn out the other end
until it will take in the hub of your staff easily and leave a little
room to spare. Now turn your tube down in length until a little of the
hub is exposed either way you put the staff in. Turn the outside of the
tube smooth and to correspond with the outline of the taper, so you will
have a nice looking job when completed. Just below where the hub will
come drill a small hole in the tube and remove all burr, both inside and
out, that may have been made in drilling, so that the shellac or wax will
not adhere to it. This little hole acts as an outlet for the air in the
tube; and as the hot shellac enters at the end of the tube the air is
expelled through this vent. It also helps to hold the cement firmly in
place. Now try your staff in the tube again, and be sure that it is quite
free, and that you will be able to work on the portions of it above and
below the hub, according as one end or the other is inserted.

You are now ready to insert your staff and proceed with your work. Hold
your shellac in the flame of your lamp a moment until it is quite liquid,
and then smear both the inside and outside of the tube with it. Heat the
shell or tube gently by means of the lamp, keeping the lathe revolving
slowly all the while, and taking the staff in your tweezers proceed to
insert it carefully into the tube. Press firmly back, making sure that it
has reached the bottom of the V-shaped center. Pack the cement well in
around the staff, and while centering remove the lamp and allow the
whole to cool, keeping the whole revolving until quite cool. Now remove
the superfluous cement by means of the graver, and heating the tube again
slightly, proceed to center exactly by means of a pointed peg-wood,
resting on your T rest to steady it. Turn slowly in the lathe and examine
with glass to see that it is quite true. Your completed instrument will
resemble Fig. 23.

[Illustration: _Fig. 23._]

The advantage of the device is that your center is always ready, and all
you have to do is to insert your chuck in the lathe, warm it, and you are
ready to insert your staff and proceed to work. As I said in the first
place, it is well to employ a taper chuck exclusively for this work, and
not attempt to use it for any other, for if you try to remove your taper
and replace it again, you will surely find that your work is out of
center, and you will be compelled to remove the brass shell and find a
new center each time you use it. You can avoid all this trouble, however,
by purchasing an extra chuck and devoting it exclusively to wax work. Of
course, the brass shell can be removed and placed in position again
without in any way affecting the truth of the center, and any number,
shape and size of shells can be made to fit the one taper, and these
shells will be found very useful for holding a variety of work, aside
from balance staffs.




CHAPTER VII.


The two popular methods of holding a balance staff in wax have been
described and illustrated; the reader may take his choice. The turning
and finishing of the other end of the staff is performed as previously
described. That portion on which the hair-spring collet goes should be
turned to nearly the proper size, making due allowance for the grinding
and polishing that is to come. The balance seat should be slightly
undercut, so that the balance can be driven on tightly and all riveting
dispensed with. The size for the pivot can be determined from its jewel,
as previously described. Finish the ends of the pivots flat and round the
corners off slightly; and right here comes a point worthy of
consideration in all watch work. Leave no absolutely square corners in
any of your work, but round them off very slightly. This may seem a very
little thing, but it is one of the small things that go to make up
first-class work. You can judge pretty accurately of a watchmaker by the
corners he leaves on his work, as well as by the appearance of his
gravers and screw-drivers.

When your staff is completed and nicely polished, remove from the wax and
boil in alcohol to clean, and when dried it is ready for the balance.
Great care must be exercised in removing the balance from the old staff,
especially if it be a compensation balance, that you do not distort it
any way. If the balance has been riveted on extra care will have to be
exercised. The riveting may be cut by means of a graver, or a hollow
drill made from Stubb's steel wire. The recess in the drill should just
fit over the shoulder left for the reception of the hair-spring collet.
The edge of the hollow drill has small teeth formed upon it similar to a
fine file, and will cut quite rapidly.

After removing the balance, if it appears to be sprung in the arms, the
result of removal or previous bad treatment, proceed to bend them
straight, and then to true up the rim carefully, and stake on with a flat
end punch. Now put on your roller and drive it down to the hub and see
that the roller is free from the fork. See that jewel pin reaches fork
properly and that the guard pin also reaches the roller. See that your
balance is free from the plate and the bridge. If the balance is true and
all right, you are ready to put on your hair-spring. See that it is in
beat. It is well to make a mark on the balance before taking off the old
staff, showing positions of hair-spring stud and jewel pin.

Three-quarter plate English lever and Swiss lever balance staffs differ
only in detail, except that they are sprung under balances. The general
operations for making, however, are similar to those described.

I have not described the method of poising the balance for two reasons;
first, the mere poising of a balance for a cheap movement is so simple
that it needs no explanation; and second, to describe the poising of the
balance of a fine watch is a lengthy task, and can hardly be included
under the heading of staffing and pivoting. The ground has been
thoroughly and conscientiously covered by Mr. J. L. Finn, in a little
volume entitled Poising the Balance,[A] and I would advise all
watchmakers, both young and old, to read what he has to say.

Good pivoting is an art in itself, and although there are many who
undertake to do this work, there are but few who can pivot a staff in
such a manner that it will bear close inspection under the glass. We
often hear watchmakers brag of the secrets they possess for hardening
pivot drills, but I fancy they would be somewhat surprised if they
traveled around a little, to find how many watchmakers harden their
drills in exactly the same way that they do. The great secret, so-called,
of making good drills, is to first secure good steel, and then use care
to see that you do not burn it in the subsequent operations. The fewer
times the steel is heated the better. My experience teaches me that you
can do no better than to select some nice pieces of Stubb's steel for
your pivot drills. Many watchmakers make their drills from sewing
needles, say No. 3 or 4, sharps. The steel in these needles is usually of
good quality, but the great drawback is that a drill made from a needle
will not resist any great pressure, and is liable to break just at the
time that you have arrived at the most important point. If your drill is
made from a piece of Stubb's steel wire, or an old French or Swiss
graver, you not only know that the material in it is first-class, but you
can leave the base of the drill solid and substantial, with enough metal
in it to resist considerable pressure. The part of the drill which
actually enters the pivot is very short, and the end can be turned down
to the desired diameter. Turn or reduce your wire by means of a pivot
file so as to be smooth and conical, as shown at _A_, Fig. 24. The
conical form is given to the drill for exactly the same reason that it is
given to the balance pivots, because it gives additional strength. Heat
to a very pale red for about one-half inch from the end, and then spread
the point, as shown at _B_, Fig. 24, by a slight blow of the hammer. We
are now ready to temper our drill, and we must exercise a little care
that the steel is not burnt and that the drill is not bent or warped when
hardening. The flame of the alcohol lamp should be reduced as small as
possible, or otherwise the steel may become overheated and lose all its
good qualities. If needles are used for making drills there is a great
liability of their warping when hardening, but when a larger piece of
wire is used there is not much danger, if care is exercised in
introducing the drill that it goes into the compound straight and point
foremost. If a needle is used, it is well to construct a shield for it,
to be used when heating and hardening. This shield can be made from a
small piece of metal tubing, broached out to fit loosely over the shank
and point of the drill. The drill is introduced into this shield as shown
in Fig. 25, and a little soap may be introduced into the end _a_ before
plunging. Various hardening devices are used, but in my experience
beeswax or sealing wax will be found as good as any. Heat the drill (or
if a needle, the drill and shield both), to a pale red and plunge
straight into the wax. In the latter case, where the shield is used, the
shield, on striking the wax, will run up the shank of the drill, allowing
the point to pierce the wax. Some watchmakers introduce the extreme point
of the drill into mercury first and then plunge into the wax. This
hardens the extreme point of the drill very hard, so hard, in fact, that
it will penetrate the hardest steel, but care must be exercised with such
a drill because the mercury makes it not only very hard but very brittle.
_C_, Fig. 24, shows a drill after it has been finished on the Arkansas
stone. This shape of drill will withstand the pressure necessary to drill
into hard steel. Many watchmakers reduce the temper of every staff before
drilling. This, I think, is quite unnecessary. There are very few cases
in which it is necessary to reduce the temper of the staff, and even then
it should only be reduced as far as it is to be drilled, and then not in
excess of a good spring temper.

[Illustration: _Fig. 24._]

[Illustration: _Fig. 25._]

The centering of a staff in wax has been thoroughly described and in
pivoting the proceeding is the same as in staffing. After accurately
centering your work, make a small cut in the center for the reception of
the drill and make this mark deep enough to take the entire cutting head
of the drill. Keep the drill firmly pressed into this center and kept wet
constantly with turpentine. Do not revolve the work all one way, but give
the lathe an alternating motion. At first give but a third or a half
revolution each way, until the drill begins to bite into the staff, when
you can then safely give it a full revolution each way. Care must be
exercised, however, not to give the work too rapid a motion, for if you
do the friction is apt to draw down the temper of your drill. Many
watchmakers find that their drills cut well for a certain distance and
then refuse to work altogether, and one of the chief reasons is that they
are in too great a hurry with their drilling.

If you find it absolutely necessary to reduce the hardness of your staff
before drilling, do so by drilling a hole in the end of a small piece of
copper wire that will just fit over the part to be softened, and apply
the heat to this copper wire, say one-fourth of an inch from the staff.
The heat will run down the copper wire and heat the staff just where you
wish to draw the temper. Be careful and do not draw the temper too much,
nor let it extend down the staff too far.

The plug for the new pivot should be carefully made, perfectly round,
with a very little taper, and should be draw-filed before being driven
in. Some workmen dip the plug in acid before driving in, as they declare
that the pivot is less liable to be loosened while turning, if so
treated. The acid simply rusts the pivot and the hole, but I cannot see
that this will hold it any more firmly in place while finishing. If the
taper is a gradual one and the pivot a good close fit, there will be
little danger of it loosening while dressing to shape. If too great a
taper is given to the plug, there is danger of splitting the end of the
staff, and this involves the making of an entire new staff.

The turning up of a new pivot does not differ in any way from the
instructions given for turning pivots on a new staff. With a little care
both in turning and finishing, a new pivot can be put in so nicely that
only the initiated can tell it, and then only with the aid of a strong
glass.

In pivoting cylinders there is some danger of breaking them. To avoid
this, select a piece of joint wire, the opening of which is slightly
larger than the diameter of the cylinder at the lower end, and cut off a
piece the length of the cylinder proper, leaving the pivot projecting.
Now fill the cylinder with lathe wax, and while the wax is warm, slip on
the joint wire. You can now proceed to true up the pivot in the usual
manner, and when the wax is quite cold, proceed to turn and polish the
pivot before removing from the lathe. If the joint wire is properly
cemented on the cylinder, it is almost impossible to break it. After all
the work is done, the wax can be dissolved in alcohol. In pivoting
pinions to cylinder escape-wheels and third wheels, it is not necessary
to remove the wheels, but great care should be used in handling. In the
latter case use plenty of wax. Do all your centering by the outside of
the pinion. Perfect centering and sharp tools are requisite to good
pivoting. Do not try to rush your work, especially while drilling.
Proceed deliberately with your work and aim to restore the watch to the
condition it was in originally, and you will find staffing and pivoting
is not half as hard as some workmen would have you believe.

[Footnote A: POISING THE BALANCE, by J. L. Finn, Geo. K. Hazlitt & Co.,
publishers, Chicago.]





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of A Treatise on Staff Making and Pivoting, by
Eugene E. Hall

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK A TREATISE ON STAFF MAKING ***

***** This file should be named 20317-8.txt or 20317-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/0/3/1/20317/

Produced by Sigal Alon, Chris Curnow, Fox in the Stars and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Story of Glass, by Sara Ware Bassett

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Story of Glass

Author: Sara Ware Bassett

Illustrator: C.P. Gray

Release Date: February 27, 2007 [EBook #20698]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE STORY OF GLASS ***




Produced by Sigal Alon, La Monte H.P. Yarroll and the
Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net






[Illustration: THE THRONG OF MOVING WORKMEN]




THE STORY OF GLASS



By

SARA WARE BASSETT


Author of

"The Story of Lumber"
"The Story of Wool"
"The Story of Leather"
"The Story of Sugar"
etc.



ILLUSTRATED BY

C. P. GRAY



THE PENN PUBLISHING COMPANY
PHILADELPHIA
1917


COPYRIGHT 1916 BY
THE PENN PUBLISHING COMPANY




_To G. C._

_a patient listener and a helpful critic I inscribe this book as a
reminder of many happy hours which we spent together in the Old
World_

_S. W. B._




Contents


   I. A FRIENDLY FEUD                                     9

  II. JEAN HAS A SURPRISE AND GIVES ONE                  27

 III. GIUSIPPE TELLS A STORY                             50

  IV. UNCLE BOB ENLARGES HIS PARTY                       66

   V. GIUSIPPE ENCOUNTERS AN OLD FRIEND                  83

  VI. UNCLE BOB AS STORY TELLER                          99

 VII. AMERICA ONCE MORE                                 121

VIII. JEAN THREATENS TO STEAL GIUSIPPE'S TRADE          140

  IX. A REUNION                                         163

   X. TWO UNCLES AND A NEW HOME                         182

  XI. JEAN'S TELEGRAM AND WHAT IT SAID                  208

 XII. JEAN AND GIUSIPPE EACH FIND A NICHE IN LIFE       220




Illustrations

                                                       Page

THE THRONG OF MOVING WORKMEN                  _Frontispiece_

"EVERY ONE KNOWS ME AT THE GLASS WORKS"                  47

"I KNEW HER IN VENICE"                                   95

"IT IS SHAPED TO THE FORM REQUIRED"                     160

"THE MELT IS POURED OUT ON AN IRON TABLE"               202

"I WANT THESE ORDERS FILLED"                            223




THE STORY OF GLASS




CHAPTER I

A FRIENDLY FEUD


Jean Cabot "lived around." She did not live around because nobody
wanted her, however; on the contrary, she lived around because so many
people wanted her. Both her father and mother had died when Jean was a
baby and so until she was twelve years old she had been brought up by a
cousin of her mother's. Then the cousin had married a missionary and
had gone to teach the children in China, and China, as you will agree,
was no place for an American girl to go to school. Therefore Jean was
sent to Boston and put in charge of her uncle, Mr. Robert Cabot. Uncle
Bob was delighted with the arrangement, for they were great friends,
Jean and this boy-uncle of hers.

But no sooner did she arrive in Boston and settle down to live on
Beacon Hill than up rose Uncle Tom Curtis, Jean's other uncle, who
lived in Pittsburgh. He made a dreadful fuss because Jean had gone to
Uncle Bob's to live. _He_ wanted her out in Pittsburgh, and he wrote
that Fräulein Decker, who was his housekeeper, and had been governess
to Jean's own mother, wanted her too.

That started Hannah, Uncle Bob's housekeeper.

"The very idea," she said, "of that German woman thinking they want
Jean in Pittsburgh as much as we want her here in Boston. Didn't I
bring up Jean's father, I'd like to know; and her Uncle Bob as well? I
guess I can be trusted to bring up another Cabot. It's ridiculous--that's
what it is--perfectly _ree_-diculous!" That was Hannah's favorite
expression--"Ree-diculous!" "I'd like my job," went on Hannah, "sending
that precious child to Pittsburgh where her white dresses would get all
grimed up with coal soot."

But Hannah's scorn of Pittsburgh did not settle the matter.

Instead Mr. Carleton, Uncle Tom Curtis's lawyer, came to Boston as fast
as he could get there and one afternoon presented himself at Uncle
Bob's house on Beacon Hill. Uncle Bob was in the library when he
arrived and the two men sat down before the fire, for it was a chilly
day in early spring. After they had said a few pleasant things about
the weather, and Uncle Bob had inquired for Uncle Tom, they really got
started on what they wanted to say and my--how they did talk! It was
all good-natured talk, for Uncle Bob liked Uncle Tom Curtis very much;
nevertheless Uncle Bob and Uncle Tom's lawyer did talk pretty hard and
pretty fast, for they had lots of things to say.

At last Uncle Bob Cabot rose from his leather chair and going to the
fireplace gave the blazing logs a vicious little poke.

He was becoming nettled. Anybody could see that.

"The Curtises have not a whit more title to the child than I have," he
burst out. "You are a lawyer, Carleton, and you know that. I am just as
much Jean's uncle as Tom Curtis is; in fact I think I am more her uncle
because I am her father's own brother. I'm a Cabot, and so is Jean. I
should think that ought to be enough. Who would she live with, if not
with the Cabots?"

Mr. Carleton cleared his throat.

"You certainly have a strong claim to the little girl," he agreed. "But
you see my other client puts up an equally convincing story. In fact,
he uses almost your identical words. He says he is Jean's mother's own
brother, and argues no one can have a closer right than that."

"But what does he know about bringing up a little girl? Isn't he an old
bachelor?"

"You are not married yourself, Mr. Cabot."

"Well, no. So I'm not. However, that's neither here nor there. Tom
Curtis is fifty if he's a day. He is too old to bring up a child,
Carleton."

"He complains that you are only thirty, and too young."

Mr. Robert Cabot, who was walking excitedly about the room, turned
quickly.

"But I have Hannah. You do not know Hannah or you would feel
differently. It is hard to tell you what Hannah is. You just have to
know her. She is the mainspring of my household. Not only does she
cook, clean, mend, and market for me; she does a score of things
besides. Why, I couldn't live without her. She is one of those motherly
souls whose wisdom is of the sages. She has been in our family since I
was a baby. Most of my bringing up, in fact, was due to her and," he
added whimsically, "behold the work of her hands!"

Mr. Carleton smiled.

"I cannot deny the product is good, Mr. Cabot. But again, all these
arguments you put forth Mr. Tom Curtis also reëchoes in behalf of his
German Fräulein. She too has been for years in the Curtis family and
brought up their children, and Mr. Curtis feels that since she trained
Jean's mother she is eminently the person to train Jean."

"Humph!"

"The claims seem about equal."

"No, they're not. That's where you are wrong. Allowing everything else
to be equal even you must grant that there is one serious objection of
which you have not spoken. Mr. Tom Curtis lives in _Pittsburgh_! That
is enough to overthrow the whole thing. Pittsburgh! Think of bringing
up a child in Pittsburgh when she could be brought up in Boston.
Boston, my good man, is intellectually--well, of course I do not wish
to appear prejudiced, but you will, I am sure, admit that Boston----"

Mr. Bob Cabot dropped helplessly into his chair, leaving the sentence
unfinished. There seemed to be no words in the English language
adequate to express what, in Mr. Bob Cabot's estimation, Boston
actually was.

Mr. Carleton started to laugh, but after glancing furtively at Mr. Bob
Cabot he changed his mind and coughed instead.

"We all grant Boston is without an intellectual peer," he answered with
a grave inclination of his head. "Even I, who was born in Indiana,
grant that, although out in my state we think we run you a close
second. Boston moreover has a background of which we in the West cannot
boast--history, you know, and all that sort of thing. It would be a
great privilege for little Miss Jean Cabot to receive a home and an
education in Boston. There are, however, many fine things in
Pittsburgh; it is not all soot, or panting factories."

"I suppose not. Jean's mother was a Pittsburgh girl, and certainly she
was a wonderful type of woman. Yet you cannot tell what result a Boston
environment might have had on such a nature as hers. She might have
been even nearer perfection. Yet after all she was quite fine enough
for human clay, Carleton, quite fine enough. And the little girl
promises to be like her--an uncommonly sweet, gentle child, and pretty,
too--very pretty. To send her to Pittsburgh--hang it all! Why must Tom
Curtis live in Pittsburgh?"

"Mr. Curtis, as you seem to have forgotten, Mr. Cabot, is the owner of
one of the largest plate glass factories in the country. He has built
up a fortune by his business and he is no more ready to hurl his life's
work to the winds and come to Boston to live than you are to toss aside
your own business and move to Pittsburgh. And by the way, speaking of
business, Mr. Cabot, if it does not seem an impertinent question, what
is _your_ business?"

"My business? Well, for a good many years my chief business seemed to
be getting over a bad knee I got when playing tackle on the Harvard
football eleven. We wiped up the ground with Yale, though, so it was
worth it. Of late I spend more or less time in seeing that Hannah does
not feed me too well and starve herself. Part of my business, too, is
to argue with disagreeable old lawyers like yourself, Carleton." Mr.
Bob Cabot chuckled. "When I am not doing some of these things and have
the surplus time I am incidentally an interior decorator. Oh, I do not
go out papering and painting; oh dear, no! I just tell other people how
to spend a fortune furnishing their houses. I advise brocade hangings,
Italian marbles and every sort of rare and beautiful thing, and since I
do not have these luxuries to pay for I find my vocation a tremendously
interesting one."

"You have set a worthy example in your own house," observed Mr.
Carleton, glancing about with admiration.

"Oh, I've done a little--not much. I like the old landscape paper in
this library; some of my antique furniture, too, is rather nice. I
picked up many of the best pieces in the South. The house itself came
to me from my father, and I have altered it very little, as I was
anxious to keep its old colonial atmosphere. Hannah and I live here
most peacefully with a waitress and inside man to help us. With Jean
added to the household we shall have just the touch of young life that
we need. I am very fond of children, and----"

"You seem very certain that Jean is to settle with you, Mr. Cabot. Now
let me own up to something; although Mr. Tom Curtis sent me to have
this talk with you and pave the way, it chances--no, chance is not the
right word--on the contrary it is an intentional fact that Mr. Tom
Curtis is at this very moment here in Boston."

Mr. Bob Cabot started.

"Tom Curtis here!"

"Yes. He is putting up at the University Club, and he wanted me to ask
you if you would be so good as to dine there with him to-night."

"So he has come over to enter the fray himself, has he? Well, well! Why
didn't he come right here? Of course I'll join him. I always liked Tom
Curtis. The only things I have against him are that he _will_ live
in Pittsburgh--and that he wants Jean."

Mr. Carleton rose with satisfaction. At least part of his mission had
been successfully accomplished. He could afford to overlook the slur on
Pittsburgh which, as it happened, was his home as well as that of Mr.
Tom Curtis.

"Then I'll call up Mr. Curtis," he said, "and tell him he may expect
you. Will seven o'clock be all right?"

"Certainly. I suppose I shall not see you again, Carleton?"

Mr. Carleton hesitated.

"It is just possible that I may drop in on you and Mr. Curtis after
dinner."

"Oh, I see. A plot."

"Not at all. I have some business to settle with Mr. Curtis before I
return to Pittsburgh."

"Going back to that grimy coal hole, are you?" blustered Mr. Bob Cabot.
"How you fellows can live there when you might spend your days in
Bost----"

The door slammed.

Mr. Carleton was gone.

Shrugging his shoulders Mr. Bob Cabot glanced at the clock. He had just
about time to dash off a necessary letter, dress, and get to the
University Club.

"Hannah!" he called.

A small dark-haired woman appeared in the doorway. She had sharp little
black eyes that twinkled a great deal, and she had a mouth that turned
up at the corners; furthermore she had a plump figure neatly dressed in
gray, and a white apron tied behind in an enormous and very spirited
bow.

"Yes, Mr. Bob."

"Hannah, Mr. Tom Curtis is in town with a rascal of a lawyer. They have
come to see about taking Jean to live in Pittsburgh."

"Pittsburgh! My soul, Mr. Bob! You'll not let her go, of course.
Pittsburgh, indeed! Don't we know that Boston----"

"We certainly do, Hannah. Nobody knows what Boston is better than we
do. But Mr. Tom Curtis unfortunately was not born in Boston."

"More's the pity! Still, I suppose he cannot be blamed for that. It
wasn't really his fault."

Mr. Bob Cabot laughed and dropped a big, kindly hand on the shoulder of
the woman beside him.

"I will try and impress upon him all that he has missed when I see him
to-night. I am to dine with him at the University Club at seven."

"You're not dining out!" ejaculated Hannah in dismay.

"I'm afraid so."

"Oh, Mr. Bob! And fried chicken for dinner--just the way you like it,
too."

"I'm sorry, Hannah."

"And me browning all those sweet potatoes!"

"I'm lots more disappointed than you are--truly I am. It can't be
helped, though. Now let me finish this letter and you go and lay out my
dress shirt and studs and things, or I'll be late."

Hannah darted from the room.

"I made you a Brown Betty pudding, too, Mr. Bob!" she called over her
shoulder. "But no matter. There is no evil without some good; your
trousers are freshly pressed and handsome as pictures--if I do say it
as shouldn't. I'll lay 'em out for you, and your dinner coat as well.
But to think of that pudding! Why couldn't Mr. Curtis have invited you
the night the beef stew was scorched."

                     *        *        *        *

Promptly on the stroke of seven Uncle Bob Cabot presented himself at
the University Club, where Uncle Tom Curtis was waiting for him, and
the two men grasped hands cordially. How big Uncle Tom Curtis looked
and, despite Hannah's remarks, how rosy and how clean! And what a nice
smile he had! The dinner was extraordinarily good. The filet was done
to a turn, and there was just enough seasoning on the mushrooms. As for
the grilled potatoes, even Hannah herself couldn't have improved upon
them. An old Harvard "grad" came over from the next table and greeted
Uncle Tom Curtis, telling him he did not look a day older than when he
was in college, and in spite of his gray hairs Uncle Tom Curtis seemed
to believe it. Then they talked of the last Harvard boat race; the
winning eleven; the D. K. E. with its initiation pranks; and the old
professors. And after the other man had left the waiter brought coffee
which was deliciously hot and cheese that was exactly ripe enough.
Uncle Tom Curtis seemed to have no end of stories at which Uncle Bob
Cabot laughed until he was very red in the face, and afterward Uncle
Bob told some stories and Uncle Tom Curtis sat back in his chair and
laughed and wiped his eyes and mopped his forehead. Then Uncle Bob said
that of course the Club was all very well, but he should insist on
Uncle Tom's tossing his things into his grip and coming over to Beacon
Hill with him to finish up his Boston visit.

They did not talk about Jean any more that night, but the next morning
after breakfast they went at the discussion and were just in the midst
of it when who should walk in but Jean herself. She had been spending
two or three days with a friend of her mother who lived in the suburbs.

"Uncle Bob!" she called as she dashed her hat and muff down upon the
settle in the hall. "Uncle Bob! Oh, I had a perfectly lovely time. And
what do you think! Mrs. Chandler has three darling Irish terrier
puppies, and she is going to give me one if you are willing that I
should have it. You do like puppies, don't you? I know you'd like these
anyway; they are so blinky, and fat, and little."

Tossing her coat on top of the hat and muff she ran up the front stairs
and into the library.

"Why, Uncle Tom Curtis!" she cried. "Whatever brought you here?"

Fluttering to the big man's side she gave him a prodigious hug and at
the same time dropped a butterfly kiss on the top of his shiny bald
head. The next instant she was perched on the arm of Uncle Bob's chair,
eyeing her two uncles expectantly.

"You both look so hot and so--well, almost cross, you know. What is the
matter?"

"We are talking about you, honey," ventured Uncle Bob after a short,
uneasy silence.

"About _me_! And it makes you look as solemn and ruffled up as this?
Whatever have I done? Did Mrs. Chandler telephone you about the puppy?
Don't worry. I do not mind if I don't have it--really I don't."

"No, dear, it wasn't the puppy. You shall have all the puppies you want
so far as I'm concerned," Uncle Bob answered, stroking the tiny hand
that nestled in his. "No, your Uncle Tom and I were talking about where
you are to live."

"But I thought I was to live here."

"I thought so too," agreed Uncle Bob. "Uncle Tom, though, is not
satisfied with that arrangement. He says he wants you to come and live
with him."

"But I couldn't leave you, Uncle Bob--you know that; at least, not for
all the time. If there were only two of me and I could live with each
of you how nice it would be. Of course I'd love to be with Uncle Tom
sometimes. Why couldn't I live with one of you part of the time and
with the other the rest of the year? I'd rather be here in the summer,
though, I think, because it's near the ocean."

How simple the great tangle over which the two men had argued suddenly
seemed!

"Jean has settled it herself!" Uncle Tom exclaimed. "It shall be
Pittsburgh winters and Boston summers. I wonder we didn't solve it that
way in the beginning."

So everybody was pleased. Even Hannah admitted that if that was the
best that could be done she would put up with it; but she made Uncle
Tom Curtis promise to lay in a big supply of soap.

"You must scrub her face and hands three times a day, and at least once
between meals if she is to live in Pittsburgh," remarked she. "And
please remember to have the grime soaked out of her white dresses, Mr.
Curtis. Borax and a little ammonia will do it," she concluded
seriously.

"We will wash not only the clothes in ammonia water, but Jean if you
say so, Hannah," promised Uncle Tom.

At this everybody laughed.

Then by and by they had luncheon, and Uncle Tom Curtis said it was a
much better meal than he had had at the Club the night before; and
Hannah said that maybe Pittsburgh was not so black as it was painted;
and Uncle Bob said he'd send the inside man to the Chandlers' to get
the puppy that very afternoon. And he did. And the puppy came, and he
was very small, and very fat, and very wobbly. His head was much too
large for him and so were his feet.

"You must name him Beacon Hill and call him Beacon for short, Jean,"
said Uncle Tom Curtis--which, coming from Uncle Tom Curtis, who thought
there was no place on earth like Pittsburgh, was a generous
condescension.




CHAPTER II

JEAN HAS A SURPRISE AND GIVES ONE


Uncle Tom Curtis returned to Pittsburgh the next day, leaving Jean and
Beacon to stay with Uncle Bob until October. It was now April, and on
the Common and Public Garden the trees, which were beginning to break
into delicate foliage, were invaded by scores of scampering gray
squirrels so tame that they would eat out of one's hand. Often in the
morning when Jean walked to the office with Uncle Bob she would stop to
feed these hungry little creatures and also the flocks of friendly
pigeons clustering along the walks. Of course Beacon had to be left
behind when the family went on such strolls, for he was far too fond of
chasing everything he saw; afternoon was his gala time. Then, while
Jean flew on roller skates along the broad asphalt Esplanade bordering
the Charles River, Beacon would race up and down dodging the skaters,
playing with the children, and nearly tripping up the throngs of
nurse-maids who trundled their wee charges in the bright sunshine.

How quickly the days passed!

Already the Beacon Hill house had become a real home, and Uncle Bob
dearer each moment she stayed in it.

"You know, Uncle Bob, you would be really perfect if only you liked
dolls and could tie hair ribbons," said Jean teasingly.

Uncle Bob shook his head ruefully.

"I never could care for sawdust people," said he, "when there were so
many interesting real ones in the world. As for the hair ribbons,
perhaps I might learn to tie those in time, although I doubt if I ever
could make as perky a bow as Hannah does. I like the _perk_ but I
haven't the faintest idea how to get it."

Jean laughed.

She and her uncle had many a joke together.

"He is better at a joke than Uncle Tom is," confided Jean to Hannah.

In fact Uncle Bob joked so much that it was hard to tell when he was
serious, and so one day when he came into the library where Jean was
and swept all the dolls on the couch over into the corner, laughingly
demanding how Jean would like to go to Europe, she paid no attention to
him.

"Seems to me you are not a very enthusiastic or grateful young woman,"
said he at last tweaking a curl that hung low on her cheek. "Here I am
inviting you to tour the world with me and all you say is: 'I'll think
about it!' How's that for gratitude?"

"If you had any intention of taking me I might be more grateful," Jean
answered, fastening the gown of the doll she was dressing, and holding
her at arm's length to enjoy the effect.

"But I am entirely serious, my young friend; I never was more so. I am
imploring you to go to Italy, for go I must, and I have no mind to
leave you behind."

"To Italy? To real Italy, Uncle Bob? Do you mean it?"

"I surely do, dear child. Behold me, solemn as an owl. Ah, now you
begin to listen. It would serve you right if I should refuse to take
such an ungrateful lady. What say you? Should you like to go?"

"Like it! I'd love it! I've never been on an ocean trip in all my
life."

"You may not care to go on another after you've been on this one,"
chuckled Uncle Bob. "However, the fact remains that we are going. I
have charge of decorating a very beautiful house in the suburbs and I
am going over to Florence to order some marble stairways and
fireplaces. That is my excuse. Incidentally we can make a pleasant trip
out of it and see many places besides Italy."

"Could we go to Venice?" burst out Jean. "Venice is in Italy, isn't it?
I'd like of all places to see Venice with its water streets and its
gondolas."

"Yes, honey, you certainly shall see Venice and ride in all the
gondolas you like."

"Splendid!" cried Jean, clapping her hands. "When can we start? Let's
go right away," and springing up from the couch she whirled toward the
door.

"Slowly, slowly!" protested Uncle Bob. "Come back here to me a moment,
you flyaway. Many things must be decided before we sail for Italy. In
the first place there is Hannah; what shall we do with her?"

"Oh, Hannah must come along with us," Jean answered. "She'll have to.
We never could think of going to Europe and leaving good old Hannah,
who is so kind to both of us, now could we? Besides, she has to fix my
hair every morning, and mend my clothes. I'd be coming to pieces all
over Europe if Hannah didn't go."

"Well, then, that settles it. Hannah goes. I never could consent to
escort a young lady who might drop to pieces at any moment and strew
her belongings all along the route from Italy to Scotland. Now about
Esther, the waitress. She wants to go West and visit her brother; this
will be just the chance. Suppose we tie a long string to her and let
her go. Then we come to Beacon."

"Beacon would go with us, of course," Jean replied quickly. "You may be
sure I'd never leave Beacon at home. I'd rather not go myself."

"But, girlie, we couldn't very well----"

"Why, Uncle Bob! You don't mean to say you thought of leaving Beacon!
If you did I simply sha'n't go. That's all there is about it. I shall
never, never be parted from Beacon--never!"

"Listen, dear. Beacon wouldn't enjoy going. We could not get for him
the food to which he is accustomed, nor would they admit him to the
picture galleries which we shall visit. I doubt if he would even care
for the gondolas."

"No, I'm sure he would not like the gondolas," admitted Jean smiling
faintly, "because Hannah and I tried him on the swan-boats in the
Public Garden and he hated them; he just barked and snarled all the
time, and wriggled about so in my arms that he nearly went overboard
and carried me with him."

"That's just it! That is precisely the way he would feel on shipboard.
Now my plan is this. We'll send him out to Pittsburgh for Uncle Tom to
take care of until you get back. Then when you go out there in October
your doggie will be nicely settled in his other home and waiting for
you. In fact," confessed Uncle Bob a little sheepishly, "I wrote Uncle
Tom and asked how he would feel about adding a puppy to his household.
This is his answer:

    "'_European plan excellent. Send Beacon. Next best thing to
    Jean._'"

"Dear Uncle Tom! He is awfully good, isn't he?"

"Yes, he is. I fancy he will decide so, too, when he finds all his sofa
cushions torn, and his shoes chewed up," chuckled Uncle Bob. "Let him
take his turn at it."

Beacon provided for, the remainder of the European plan seemed simple
enough. To be sure there was Hannah, who at first flatly refused to be
separated from the golden dome of the State House or from the Boston
"Evening Transcript." At last, however, after much persuasion she
consented to suffer these deprivations for the common good, and brought
herself to purchasing the necessary clothing for Jean and herself. To
these she added French, German and Italian dictionaries because, as she
explained: "We might get lost or parted from your Uncle Bob somehow,
and you never can tell what will happen in those heathen countries
where the poor people cannot speak English. How men and women can live
in places where they talk those dreadful languages and use that queer
money when they might come over here to Boston----"

"That's right, Hannah," agreed Uncle Bob, playfully urging her on.

"And all that strange weather! Why, I read only the other day that in
Italy they just have summer all the year round. So foolish! They never
get any snow at all--think of that! It is such a slack and lazy way to
do always to be wearing one set of things and never getting out any
winter flannels. I shouldn't know where I was if I didn't chalk off the
seasons by my house cleaning, preserving, getting out the furs, and
putting them away. I just know those Italians live without any system.
How could they be expected to have any when it's summer all the time?"

She sniffed scornfully.

In fact Hannah sniffed a good many times before the great ship which
was carrying them to Naples docked beneath the shadow of Vesuvius. The
staterooms she termed little coops, and the berths nothing more nor
less than shelves.

"When I go to bed, Mr. Bob, I feel exactly as if I was a sheet put away
in the linen closet."

Uncle Bob and Jean both laughed. Hannah kept them royally entertained.

"As for these clocks that strike every hour but the right one--I've
nothing to say," she went on. "If the captain prefers to ring two when
he means nine, well and good. He runs the ship and it is his lookout,
although I will say it is hard on the rest of us. He explains that it
has something to do with the watch--whose watch I don't know; his own,
I suppose. Evidently he has some queer way of telling time, some theory
he is free to work out when he is here in the middle of the ocean away
from land. Be glad, Jean, that you learned to tell time properly, and
that you live with people who are content to use the old method and do
not set themselves up to invent a system that is a puzzle to every one
but themselves."

Thus Hannah measured every new experience, applying to it the Beacon
Hill standard. If it conformed to what was done in Boston it was quite
correct, but if it varied in the least it was condemned as
"ridiculous."

To Jean, on the contrary, the voyage was one of unending delight. She
proved herself an excellent sailor, and was never tired of playing
shuffle-board on the deck or pacing to and fro with Uncle Bob in the
fresh breeze. And when at last Gibraltar was reached and she actually
beheld the coasts of Spain, Africa and Italy, her wonder grew until she
said she had to pinch herself to be sure she was alive and not
dreaming. It was a journey of marvels.

"I feel exactly as if I had gone down the rabbit hole with Alice," she
exclaimed, squeezing Uncle Bob's arm as they were disembarking at
Naples.

Uncle Bob was in such a hurry to reach Florence that the travelers did
not stay long in Naples--only long enough to visit the famous Aquarium
with its myriad of strange sea creatures, and to take a flying glimpse
of the Museum. It was at the latter place that Jean saw the celebrated
Naples Vase which, Uncle Bob told her, was found over a hundred years
ago in a tomb in Pompeii.

"It probably was made by very skilful Grecian workmen about the year 70
A. D. Think how wonderful it is that there were artists living many
thousands of years ago who knew how to make such a beautiful thing.
Look closely at it, Jean, for it is one of the art treasures of the
world."

Jean looked.

The vase, scarcely more than a foot in height, was of dark blue glass,
and had upon it in white a design of delicate Grecian figures.

"It was first made with a coating of white opaque glass entirely over
the blue," Uncle Bob explained. "Then the artist with extreme care and
some sharp instrument cut this beautiful picture of the harvest
gatherers. Notice, too, how the pattern is repeated on the handles. It
is a pity the base or foot of the vase is missing; it was probably of
gold and was doubtless stolen at some time. There is now made in
England a kind of pottery called Wedgwood, which has much this same
effect although, of course, it is far less perfectly fashioned."

"I'm glad I do not have this thing to dust," Hannah observed grimly.

"Well you may be, Hannah," Uncle Bob retorted, "for the vase is worth
thousands of dollars. There are in the world several very famous glass
vases--this is one; the Auldjo Vase, also from Pompeii and now in the
British Museum, is another; and the Portland Vase, which is there too,
makes a third. The design on the Portland Vase is considered even finer
than this. We shall see it and I will tell you its history when we get
to London."

What weren't they to see!

Jean's head was a jumble of fairy anticipations--of Crown Jewels,
palaces, gondolas, famous pictures, and scenes of undreamed of beauty.
The Tower of London merged itself with visions of Napoleon's Tomb,
while in and out of her mind flitted fragmentary pictures of Notre Dame
and the Vatican. Everything seemed so old!

"At first I stood with my mouth open when I was told things were built,
or dug up, or made hundreds of years ago," laughed Jean. "But now I
find I am growing fussy, and unless a thing is thousands of years old
it scarcely seems worth looking at. How horribly new they must think us
in America! Even Bunker Hill and the State House, Hannah, are very
modern," she added teasingly.

"Now, Jean, if this trip to Europe is going to make you turn up your
nose at your native land the best thing you can do is to face round and
go straight back home," was Hannah's severe reply.

"There, there, you dear old thing! Don't worry. I love my America, but
you should have learned by this time that I never can resist seeing you
bristle. But even you, bigoted as you are, must admit that a great deal
seems to have happened in the world before we on the other side of the
sea were alive at all."

"Much of it," observed Hannah with dignity, "was nothing to be proud
of, and it's as well they kept it on this side of the ocean."

From Naples Uncle Bob whirled his bewildered charges to Rome and then
to Florence, and while he was busy transacting business Hannah and Jean
were put in charge of a courier and taken to see so many pictures and
churches that Hannah begged never to be shown another masterpiece or
another spire so long as she lived.

"Bless your heart, Mr. Bob, if you were to lean the Sistine Madonna
right up against the table in my room I wouldn't turn my head to look
at it. And as for churches--I wouldn't accept Westminster Abbey as a
gift. Tell 'em not to urge it on me, for I wouldn't take it even if I
could get it through the customs free of duty. The things I'd like best
at this very minute would be an east wind and some baked beans."

But when they reached Venice and saw their first gondola even Hannah
was forced to admit that it far outshone the Boston swan-boats. The
travelers arrived late at night, and on passing through the station
came out on a broad platform where, instead of cabs and cars,
numberless gondolas floated, illumined by twinkling lights.

"Oh!" murmured Jean in a hushed whisper.

It was indeed a beautiful sight. Before them a stretch of water flooded
by the full moon wandered off into a multitude of tiny canals shut in
on either side by murky dwellings of stone or brick. In and out of
these dim little avenues plied boatmen who shouted a warning in shrill
Italian as they rounded the turns.

Uncle Bob lost no time in summoning a gondolier, and soon the party
were being swept along by the sturdy strokes of a swarthy Venetian who,
Hannah declared in an undertone, looked like nothing so much as a
full-fledged brigand. She could not be persuaded to take her hand off
her luggage, but sat clutching it with all her strength until she
arrived at the hotel. Jean, on the other hand, was too excited by the
novelty of the scene to know or care what the boatman looked like. Her
one fear seemed to be that if she went to bed and allowed herself to
fall asleep the wonderful water streets might vanish forever. It took
all Uncle Bob's pleading to make her close her eyes. At last, however,
she did and when she opened them in the morning her very first thought
was to fly to the window and see if the canals were still there.

No, it was not a dream!

There were the moving gondolas, the narrow water streets, and the
glorious dome of Del Salute directly opposite across the sparkling
expanse of the Grand Canal.

Jean suppressed a cry of delight, and scurried into her clothes.

"Now, Uncle Bob," she announced at breakfast, "I want to go straight
out in a gondola the minute I have finished my chocolate and rolls. I
think I am pretty good to stop for them at all. I want to go and stay
until noon. May I?"

"Well, let me think a second, little girl," replied Uncle Bob. "I am
afraid I must run over to the bankers' directly after breakfast, so I
won't be able to start right away; I can, however, take you later."
Then as he saw Jean's face fall he added, "You and Hannah may go early
if you like and come back for me at eleven. How will that do?"

"It will do beautifully only I wish you could be with us. How shall we
know how to get a boatman, or tell him where to take us? I am sure I
couldn't, and Hannah's Italian is not very good, although," with a
mischievous smile, "I suppose she could use her dictionary."

"I will arrange everything with a gondolier before I leave for the
bankers'," Uncle Bob answered. "Now I must be running along. Suppose
the gondola is here at half-past nine."

"The earlier the better," cried Jean.

Promptly at the hour set the gondola glided up to the steps of the
Grand Canal Hotel where Jean and Hannah were waiting. It was an
unusually beautiful gondola, with scarlet curtains and a gilded prow
carved in the shape of a woman's head.

Jean sprang forward, all eagerness, her eyes on the magic apparition.
Then suddenly her foot slipped on the slime left by the tide on the
marble step, and she would have fallen into the water had not a young
boy, with rare presence of mind, leaped forward and caught her.

Another moment and Hannah, white with fright, had the girl in her arms.

"Oh, my dear child!" she wailed. "My precious lamb! Thank goodness, you
are safe. Think if you'd been drowned before you had had a chance to
see Venice at all! But you are quite safe now, honey. Don't be
frightened. Young man," and she turned to the boy, "that was a good
deed of yours. What is your name? But there--how silly to be asking him
when he can't understand a word I'm saying. I forgot no one could
understand anything in this queer, upside-down town where the streets
are water when they ought to be land."

To her utter astonishment, however, the boy answered in English, which,
although slightly broken, was perfectly intelligible.

"My name is Giusippe Cicone."

"Say it again," demanded Hannah. "Say it more slowly."

"Giusippe Cicone."

"Giusippe," echoed Hannah, "Giusippe Cicone. There! Giusippe Cicone. I
got it better that time. Giusippe Cicone. Now I have it! Well, Master
Giusippe Cicone, it was very good of you to save this little lady from
a ducking in your canal which, if I may be permitted to say so, is not
as clean as it might be. We are very much obliged to you, and here is
some money to pay you for being so quick."

The boy shook his head.

"I could not take money for saving the señorita from the water,"
protested he proudly. "I was glad to do it. I could not take pay."

"Well, I thank you very much," Jean ventured shyly.

He helped Hannah and the girl into the waiting gondola and then stood
on the steps shading his eyes with his brown hand as the gondolier made
his way to the oar.

"Perhaps you can tell us where we can find you if we should want to see
you again," called Hannah as the distance between them widened.

"Certainly. I am at Murano." He pointed across the lagoon to a distant
island.

"Murano?"

"Yes, I work there. Every one knows me at the glass works."

[Illustration: "EVERY ONE KNOWS ME AT THE GLASS WORKS"]

He waved his hand and was soon lost to sight.

"I do wonder who he is," speculated Jean, who had now quite recovered
from her fright and could smile at the memory of the episode. "And how
strange that he understood English!"

"I don't call it strange," Hannah responded. "English is the only
sensible language, and probably this boy realizes it. I think it speaks
well for his discrimination."

"Anyway, he was a gentleman not to take the money; and yet he looked
poor," reflected the girl.

"One may be a gentleman despite poverty, thank goodness," Hannah said.
"Your uncle will probably insist upon hunting him up and thanking him.
I can't see, Jean, how you came to slip that way. Wasn't the boatman
holding on to you?" and for the tenth time every detail of the disaster
had to be gone over.

"Well, all I can say is that if anything had happened to you I never
should have dared show my face to your Uncle Bob. And think of your
Uncle Tom at home--he would have things to say! They would both blame
me even if it was not my fault," sighed Hannah.

"Of course it wasn't your fault. How could you possibly be to blame if
I was so heedless as to rush ahead without looking where I was going?
I'm always doing that, Hannah; you know I am. I am always in such a
hurry to enjoy the things I like that I never can wait a moment. This
is a good lesson for me. I just hope the salt water won't spoil my new
tan shoes. Come! Let us talk of something pleasanter. Isn't it too
perfectly lovely out here? Look back at the shore and see how St.
Mark's and the Campanile stand out. I know those already, because I
remember seeing pictures of them in my geography. Oh, I am so glad we
are here! I am sure we shall have a wonderful time in Venice even if I
did begin by nearly drowning myself in the canal."

"It is all very well to laugh about it now," Hannah answered solemnly,
"but it was no laughing matter when it happened--no laughing matter!"




CHAPTER III

GIUSIPPE TELLS A STORY


When Uncle Bob heard of Jean's adventure he lost no time, you may be
sure, in hunting up Giusippe Cicone. A note was sent to Murano asking
that the lad call at the hotel; and as the following day chanced to be
a festa day the glass works were closed and Giusippe presented himself
directly after breakfast. He was neatly although poorly clothed, and
had he had no other claim to Mr. Cabot's good will than his frank face
that would have won him a welcome. Perhaps added to Uncle Bob's
gratitude there was, too, a measure of the artist's joy in the
beautiful; for Giusippe was handsome. Thick brown hair clustered about
the well-formed head; his eyes were of soft hazel; and into his round
olive cheek was steeped the rich crimson of the southern sun. More than
all this, he was a well bred lad--manly, courteous, and proud. When Mr.
Cabot began to thank him for his service to Jean the boy made light of
what he had done and once more refused to accept any reward.

Uncle Bob's curiosity was aroused.

Never before had he met an Italian who would not take money when it was
offered him.

"Perhaps you would be willing, young man, to tell us more about
yourself," said he at last. "You work in the glass factory, you say.
Have you been long there?"

Giusippe smiled, showing two rows of dazzling white teeth.

"So long, señor, that I cannot remember when I was not there. And
before me was my father, and my grandfather; and before that his
father; and so on back for years and years. There was always a Cicone
at Murano. For you must know, señor, that glass-making has ever been
the great art of Venice. When paintings began to take the place of the
glass mosaics then came the height of fame for Venetian glass. For you
will remember that for many years before artists could paint people
made pictures out of bits of glass, and in this way represented to
those who had no books scenes from the Bible or from history. Then
wonderful painters were born in Italy and they crowded out the mosaic
makers, who had previously decorated the churches, palaces, and public
buildings. The making of glass mosaics died out and it was then that
the Venetian artisans turned their attention and their skill to the
making of other glass things--beads, mirrors, drinking cups, and
ornaments. In fact," went on Giusippe, "there soon became so many glass
houses in Venice that the Great Council feared a terrible fire might
sweep the island, and in 1291, with the exception of a few factories
for small articles, all the glass houses were banished to the island of
Murano a mile distant where, if fire came, no destruction could be done
to the city of Venice itself. Those factories which were allowed to
remain had to have a space of fifteen paces around them. By the decree
of the Council the other glass houses were torn down."

"And it was thus that your great-great-great-great-great-grandfather
was driven to Murano, was it?" queried Mr. Cabot.

"Yes. He was a member of the guild of bead-makers. For you know,
señor, that in those days workmen were banded together in guilds,
and kept the mysteries of their trade to themselves. The precious
secret was handed down from father to son. So it was with my
great-great-great-great-great-grandfather."

Giusippe drew himself up.

"Oh, it was a grand thing to be a glass-maker in those days, señor!"
continued the boy, his eyes glowing. "The members of the guilds were so
honored in Venice that they were considered equal in birth to the
noblest families. They were gentlemen. A titled woman felt only pride
in uniting herself with a glass-maker's family."

"Perhaps that is what your great-great-great-great-great-grandmother
did," Jean said, half aloud.

"Yes, señorita," was Giusippe's simple answer. "And they say, too, she
was beautiful. My ancestor was of the _pater-nostereri_; he was a maker
of beads for rosaries. Then there were the _margaritai_, who made small
beads; and the _fuppialume_, who made large blown beads. Each man was a
skilled artist, you see, and did some one special thing. The _phiolari_
made vases, cups, and glass for windows; the _cristallai_ optical
glass; and the _specchiai_ mirrors. No strangers were allowed to visit
the glass works, and all apprentices must pass a rigid examination not
only as to their skill, but as to their previous personal history. In
1495 the glass houses at Murano extended for a mile along a single
street and the great furnaces roared night and day, so you can imagine
how much glass was made on the island."

"My!" gasped Jean breathlessly.

"Absolute loyalty to the art was demanded of every man engaged in it,"
Giusippe said. "And you can see, señor, that this was necessary. Any
workman carrying the secrets elsewhere was first warned to return to
Venice; then, if he refused, his nearest relative was imprisoned; if he
still refused to obey he was tracked down and killed. Often glass-makers
were found in Padua, Ravenna, and other places stabbed through the
heart, and the word _Traitor_ was fastened to the dagger."

Jean shuddered.

"Do not tremble, señorita," Giusippe said. "It was a just punishment.
You see the Council of Ten felt that the prosperity of the Venetians
depended upon keeping their art away from all the outside world which
was so eager to learn it. All knew the penalty for disloyalty. The
decree read:

    "'_If any workman conveys his art to a strange country to the
    detriment of the Republic he shall be sent an order to return to
    Venice. Failing to obey his nearest of kin shall be imprisoned. If
    he still persists in remaining abroad and plying his art an
    emissary shall be charged to kill him._'

"In this way the secrets of glass-making were kept in Venice and the
Republic soon became famous and prosperous. As the reputation of the
Venetian glass-makers spread an immense trade was established. My
grandfather has often told me of the great numbers of beads which were
sent everywhere throughout the East--sometimes to Africa and even to
India. In 1764 twenty-two great furnaces were kept busy supplying the
beads that were demanded. Frequently, they say, as many as forty-four
thousand barrels were turned out in a single week."

"Why, I should think that everybody in the world would have been
covered with beads!" Jean exclaimed, smiling.

"Ah, I can tell you something stranger than that, señorita. So popular
did Venetian glass of every variety become that a foreign prince
created a great sensation by appearing in Paris with curls of finely
spun black glass."

Jean and Uncle Bob laughed merrily.

"I think myself he was silly," Giusippe declared, echoing their
amusement. "He, however, was not alone in his admiration for the
beautiful and ingenious workmanship of the people of my country, for
even as far back as 1400 Richard the Second of England gave permission
to our Venetian merchants to sell glass aboard their galleys, duty
free; and King Henry the Eighth owned as many as four or five hundred
Venetian drinking goblets, vases, dishes, and plates, some of which,
they say, are still in the British Museum."

"We must see them when we go to London, mustn't we, Uncle Bob?" cried
Jean eagerly.

"We surely must. All this is very interesting, Giusippe. You do well to
remember so much of your country's history," said Mr. Cabot.

"I am proud of it, señor. Besides I have heard it many, many times. My
people were never tired of telling over and over the story of the old
days; the golden days of Venice, my father called them. The Republic
might have retained its fame much longer had not some of our countrymen
been persuaded to go to other lands and sell their secrets for gold. It
was thus that the art of making mirrors was taken into France and
Germany."

"Tell us about it, Giusippe," pleaded Jean.

"Why, as I think I told you, the Venetians began to make mirrors as
early as 1300. Of course, señorita, they were crude affairs--not at all
like the fine ones of to-day, but to people who had nothing better they
were marvels. And indeed they were both clever and beautiful. For you
must remember that ages ago there was no such thing as a looking-glass.
Men and women could only see their reflections in streams, pools, and
fountains. Then the Egyptians, Greeks, and Romans began to make mirrors
of burnished metal, using bits of brass or bronze often beautifully
decorated on the back with classic Grecian figures. Rich women carried
such mirrors fastened to their girdles or sometimes instead had them
fitted into small, shallow boxes of carved ivory; sometimes too the
mirror was set in a case of gold, silver, enamel, or ebony with
intricate decoration on the outside. That was the first of
mirror-making."

"How curious!"

"Later the Venetians experimented and began backing pieces of glass
with mercury or tin. The surface was first covered with tinfoil and
then rubbed down until smooth; then the whole was coated with
quicksilver, which formed an amalgam with the tin. It does no harm to
tell you about it now, señorita," added Giusippe a little sadly, "for
every one knows. This process was slow and unsatisfactory, but it was
the best the workmen then knew. These mirrors they set in elaborate
frames of glass, silver, carved wood, mother-of-pearl, coral, tarsi, or
into frames of painted wood. Some of them were sent by Venetian nobles
as gifts to kings and queens of other countries; often they were
purchased by royalties themselves. You can see many in the museums of
France, Germany, or England."

"We will hunt them up, Jean," Uncle Bob declared.

"I'd love to see them," replied the girl.

"My father has told me that there were frequent quarrels between the
glass-makers and the mirror-framers because, you see, the framers
wanted to learn the secret of making the mirrors, and the mirror-makers
were jealous of the skill of the framers and feared the frame would be
more beautiful than the mirror itself and so overshadow it. Then in
1600 the French stole from our people the secret of mirror-making and
began turning out mirrors not only as good, but in some respects better
than the Venetian ones."

"Oh, Giusippe, how did they steal the secret?" Jean cried. "How
dreadful!"

"It was through the treachery of our own countrymen, señorita,"
Giusippe confessed. "Yes, sorry as I am to say so, it was our own
fault. The French, you see, as well as the Venetians, had long been
experimenting with glass-making and since it was considered there, as
here, an art, many penniless Huguenot gentlemen who had lost their
fortunes took it up; for one might be a glass-maker and still retain
his noble rank. Such was Bernard Palissy----"

"The potter!" interrupted Jean. "I learned all about him in my
history."

Giusippe nodded.

"So? Then you know how he struggled for years to solve the secret of
making the enamel he had seen on a Saracen cup. Palissy also made some
fine old stained glass, although few people seem to know this. Many
another Frenchman tried to discover the Venetian's great secret. They
sought to bribe our people to tell the process, but without success.
Then Colbert, the chief minister under Louis the Fourteenth, wrote the
French ambassador at Venice that he must obtain for France some
Venetian workmen. The ambassador was upset enough, as you may imagine,
when he received the order. He said he could not do it. He dared not.
If found out he would be thrown into the sea."

"He ought to have been!" Jean cried. "He would have deserved it."

"I think so too," Uncle Bob agreed.

"It would have been far better for Venice had he been drowned in the
Adriatic," Giusippe answered slowly. "But he wasn't. Instead he began
cautiously to look about. There are always in the world, señor, men who
have no pride in their fatherland and can be bought with money. The
next year the ambassador succeeded in bribing eighteen glass-makers to
go to France and make mirrors for Versailles, the palace of the French
king. And no sooner had these men got well to work and passed the
mystery on to the French than Colbert forbade the French people to
import any more mirrors from Venice, as mirrors could now be made at
home. Some of these early French mirrors are now in the Cluny Museum in
France, my father told me. In consequence of the treachery of these
workmen Germany also soon learned how to make mirrors, and the fame of
the Venetian artisans declined just as the Council had predicted it
would. But it will be long before any other country can equal mine in
the making of filigree or spun glass. You will, señorita, see much of
this beautiful work while you are here in Venice."

"I want to, Giusippe; and I want to get some to take home. May I, Uncle
Bob?"

Mr. Cabot nodded.

"Your story is like a fairy tale, Giusippe," said he.

The boy smiled with pleasure.

"It is a wonderful story to me because it is the story of my people.
And, señor, there is much more to tell, but I must not weary you. Some
of our filigree glass, it is true, became too elaborate to be
beautiful. It is simply interesting because it is wonderful that out of
glass could be fashioned ships, flowers, fruits, fish, and decorations
of all kinds. It shows most delicate workmanship. But the drinking
glasses with their fragile stems are really beautiful; and so are the
vases and tazzas from white glass with enamel work or filigree of
delicately blended colors. It was the Venetians, too, who invented
engraved glass, where a design is scratched or cut into the surface
with a diamond or steel point of a file. And our mille-fiori glass,
which came to us way back from the Egyptians, is another famous
variety. This is made from the ends of fancy colored sticks of glass
cut off and arranged in a pattern. You will see it in the shops here."

"I think you Venetians are wonderful!" Jean exclaimed.

"Ah, señorita, you have yet to see one of the finest things we have
done," was Giusippe's grave reply. "You have to see the San Marco with
its mosaics!"

"Yes, we surely want to go there," put in Mr. Cabot. "Do you think you
could be our guide, Giusippe?"

"I could go to-morrow, señor; because of the festa I am free from work.
I would like to show you San Marco, of all things, because I love it."

"I am sure no one could do it better," replied Mr. Cabot, well pleased.
"To-morrow at nine, then. We will be ready promptly. You shall tell us
the rest of your fascinating Venetian history and make Venetians of
us."

"I will come, señor."

"You shall be paid for your time, my boy."

"Alas, señor! That would spoil it all. I could not then show it to you.
Forgive me and do not think me ungrateful. But my San Marco is to me
the place I love. I show it to you because I love it. I have played
about it and wandered in and out its doors since I was a very little
child. I am proud that you should see it, señor."

"As you will. To-morrow then."

"Yes, señor."

Another moment and Giusippe was gone.

"A remarkable boy! A most remarkable boy!" ejaculated Mr. Cabot. "He
knows his country's history as I fancy few others know it. Could you
pass as good an examination on yours, Jean?"

Jean hung her head.

"I'm afraid not."

"Nor I," Uncle Bob remarked, patting her curls kindly.




CHAPTER IV

UNCLE BOB ENLARGES HIS PARTY


In accordance with his promise Giusippe came promptly the next morning
and the four set out for the San Marco. It was a beautiful June day.
The piazza was warm with sunshine, and as groups of tourists loitered
through it the pigeons circled greedily about their feet begging food.

"Why, Uncle Bob, these pigeons are exactly like the ones at home--just
as pretty and just as hungry," Jean said.

"Should you like to stop a moment and feed them, little girl?"

"Oh, do! It will make Hannah think of Boston," begged Jean. "But we
have nothing to give them," she added in dismay.

"I will find you something, señorita," Giusippe declared.

Darting up to an old Italian who was standing near he soon returned
with a small paper cornucopia filled with grain.

"The pigeons of St. Mark's are very tame. See!"

He put some kernels of corn on the top of his hat, and holding more in
his outstretched hands stood motionless. There was a whirr of wings,
and in an instant the boy was quite hidden beneath an eager multitude
of fluttering whiteness.

"I never saw so many pigeons," Jean whispered. "You have many more than
we do at home."

"We Venetians are very fond of the birds," was Giusippe's reply. "So,
too, are the tourists who come to Venice, for they never seem to be
tired of having their pictures taken surrounded by flocks of pigeons."

"Doesn't this make you think of Boston Common, Hannah?" asked Uncle
Bob.

"Yes, a little. But I should feel more as if I were in Massachusetts if
there were not such a babel of foreign tongues about me." Then turning
to Giusippe she demanded: "How did you come to speak English, young
man?"

"I have been expecting you would ask me that," smiled Giusippe. "You
see, I have an uncle who went to America; yes, to Pennsylvania, to seek
his fortune. He stayed there five years and in that time he learned to
speak English well. When he came back he taught me all he knew. Then he
returned with his wife to the United States, and I got books and
studied. When they found at Murano that I could speak English they
often called on me to show tourists over the glass works. In this way I
picked up many words and their pronunciation. Since then I have found
that I could sometimes serve as interpreter for English or American
travelers if I watched for the chance. I was eager for such
opportunities, for it gave me practice, and I often learned new words."

"And why are you so anxious to learn English, Giusippe?" Jean
questioned.

"I hope, señorita, to go some day to the United States. My uncle told
me what a wonderful country it is, and I desire to see it. Perhaps in
that beautiful great land where everything is in abundance I might grow
rich. I now have nothing to keep me here; my parents are dead and I
have no other kinsmen. I want to join my uncle in Pennsylvania as soon
as I have enough money. Part of my passage I have already saved."

"Why, Giusippe!"

"Yes, señorita, I am in earnest. It is lonely here in Venice now that I
have no people. And Murano is not what it was in the golden days of my
ancestors. I am sure I could find work in your country if I should go
there. Do you not think I could, señor?" He turned to Mr. Cabot.

"It is possible," was Uncle Bob's thoughtful answer. "Especially since
you speak English so well. What sort of thing would you like to do?"

"I know my trade of glass-making," was Giusippe's modest answer. "I
know, too, much of coloring stained glass and of mosaic making. These
things I have known from my babyhood up. There must be such work for
persons going to the United States. Perhaps my uncle, who is in
Pittsburgh with a large glass company, could get me something to do
there."

"Pittsburgh!" exclaimed the other three in a breath.

"Yes. My uncle is with the company of a Señor Thomas Curtis, who has
been very kind to him."

"Uncle Tom! It's Uncle Tom!" Jean cried, laying her hand impulsively on
his arm. "Mr. Curtis is my uncle, Giusippe. Did you ever hear anything
so wonderful!"

"It certainly is a strange coincidence," agreed Mr. Cabot. "But why did
your uncle come back, Giusippe, after he once got over there?"

"Ah, it was this way. He went first alone, expecting when he had enough
money to send it back so that the young girl he loved could follow him,
and they could be married. But when at last he had the money saved her
parents became sick. They were old people. She could not leave them to
die here alone, señor. Therefore she refused to go to America, and so
much did my uncle love Anita that he would not stay there without her.
Back he came and worked once more at Murano. Then the father and mother
died, and my uncle and Anita were married and went to the United
States. They wanted to take me, but I pretended that I would rather
remain here. This I did because I feared that if I went with them and
did not find work I might be a burden. All this was several years ago.
My uncle is now a superintendent in one of the Curtis glass factories,
and is happy and prosperous. Still, there are children, and I could not
let him pay my fare to America. As I said, it will not take me much
longer to save the rest of my passage money. Then I shall go and
perhaps become rich. Who knows, señor!" Giusippe broke into a ringing
laugh.

Mr. Cabot made no reply.

He was thinking.

Fearing that he had offended, Giusippe changed the subject.

"But I weary you with my affairs, señor. Pardon. Shall we go on to St.
Mark's?"

It was but a few steps across the piazza, and they were soon inside the
church. Then for the first time Mr. Cabot spoke.

"This church, Jean," said he, "is the link between the old art of the
Mohammedans and the Gothic art of the Christian era. It was planned as
a Byzantine church, and in it one can see many things suggesting St.
Sofia's at Constantinople. When St. Mark's at Alexandria was destroyed
by the Mohammedans many of its treasures fell into the hands of the
Doge of Venice, who promptly proclaimed St. Mark the new patron saint
in place of St. Theodore and set about building a cathedral in which to
put all the beautiful things he had acquired. Some parts of this
ancient cathedral remain, but most of the church was built by Doge
Contarini between 1063 and 1071. To the next Doge, Domenico Selvo, fell
the task of decorating it. You see, over here the building of churches
takes longer than it does at home."

"I should think it did," answered Jean. "Why, we think it is awful if
our churches are not all done in two years."

Giusippe smiled.

"Ah, we build not that way here, señorita," he said. "Three centuries
did our people spend in building into St. Mark's the marble carvings
brought from the East; erecting the altars; and adorning the walls.
These mosaics alone it took workmen two hundred and fifty years to
fashion. Venice was a rich Republic, you see, and could well afford to
put into this cathedral the money she might have spent on war. Above
the slabs of marble are the mosaics, señorita. So it was in St. Sofia,
my father told me; the slabs of marble near the ground and the
decoration above. This whole cathedral of ours is covered on all the
walls with mosaics--pictures made from bits of glass put together to
form scenes from the Bible or from history. Even the most ignorant
people who had had no schooling could read such stories, could they
not?"

Jean nodded.

She was dazzled by the beauty of the place--by the soft light; the
walls rich in gold and color; by the many wonderful things there were
to be seen. She was interested, too, in the smoothly worn, uneven floor
which showed where the piles beneath the church had settled.

"Mosaic makers, you know, Jean, began crude attempts at making pictures
in glass thousands of years ago, for glass-making was familiar to the
Egyptians as well as to the Phoenicans and Syrians. The Greeks and
Romans, too, were great glass-makers. So glass-making came down through
the ages. The Byzantine churches usually were lighted by a row of tiny
glass windows round the base of the dome. Some of this ancient glass
still remains in St. Sofia. The common way of making such windows was
to cut a design in a slab of marble or plaster, and then insert small
pieces of colored glass. Sometimes, too, a pattern for wall decoration
was worked out by sticking fragments of glass into soft stucco. So the
first mosaic work began. We can see some of it in the museums of
England."

"There seems to be a great deal to see in those London museums, Uncle
Bob," Jean gasped.

"I am afraid you will be more convinced of that fact than ever when you
get there," chuckled Uncle Bob. "But to return to Giusippe's mosaics.
You may remember, perhaps, that when the Mohammedans invaded
Constantinople and found how important a part the glass-makers played
in decorating the churches, they at once handed the artisans over to
the caliphs, that they might be set to work adorning their mosques. Now
the Mohammedans believed it a crime to make a copy of either man or
woman in a picture, a carving, or a statue. It was punishable to pay
reverence to sacred figures; therefore all decoration in their churches
took the form of flowers, fruit, or conventional designs. So no great
mosaic pictures with figures such as these were made. Between the
thirteenth and fourteenth centuries Damascus became the center of
glass-making, and there are in existence in some of the museums old
Arab lamps which hung in the mosques with inscriptions from the Koran
engraved upon them. It is Giusippe's St. Mark's which revived the art
of mosaic making, and served as the bridge between those Pagan days and
the days when with Christianity the arts revived and mosaic makers
began to represent in glass figures of Christ and the saints."

"And then the painters came, as Giusippe has said," put in Jean.

"Yes, the great artists were born, and from that time pictures on
canvas instead of pictures of glass decorated the churches. But the
mosaic makers did an important service to art, for it was they who
indirectly gave to the world the idea of making stained-glass windows.
And in Venice those who ceased to make mosaics made instead the
beautiful Venetian glass of which Giusippe has told us."

"And are there no mosaics made now, Uncle Bob?" asked Jean.

"Yes. When in 1858 it became necessary to restore some of the mosaics
in St. Mark's, a descendant of one of the old Murano glass workers
named Radi, together with a Dr. Salviati, started a factory on the
Grand Canal, where they gradually revived some of the past glory of
Venice. They copied the old time glass products, making Arab lamps such
as hung in the mosques; cameo work similar to the Naples and Portland
vases; and pictures in mosaic. It was they who did The Last Supper for
Westminster Abbey, and the mosaics for Albert Memorial Hall in London."

"But Salviati's mosaics were not like those here, señor," put in
Giusippe, "because the San Marco mosaics were constructed upon the
walls, small cubes of glass being pressed into the moist cement to make
the picture. This gave a rough, irregular surface which artists say is
far more artistic than is Salviati's smooth, glassy work. When Salviati
sent mosaics away he made them here, and then backed them with cement
so they could be placed on a slab of solid material and transported
great distances from Venice. His pictures, it is true, were far more
perfectly done than were the old mosaics--too perfectly, I have heard
glass experts say."

"Undoubtedly they are right, Giusippe, for the roughness in the ancient
mosaics would, of course, break up the great plain surfaces and make
them more interesting. But Salviati did Venice a service, nevertheless,
in reviving the art. And there is, too, another virtue about mosaics,
and that is that they will endure far longer than paintings. Had it not
been for the foresight of Pope Urban, who between 1600 and 1700 had
many of the famous pictures of the Vatican copied in mosaic, these
masterpieces would have been lost to the world."

"I have been told that the church in Ravenna has some fine mosaics, but
I never have seen them," Giusippe ventured.

"I have. They are beautiful, and I hope you may see them some time.
Then there are others scattered through the various churches of Sicily
and Rome; and there are also many beautiful inlays of mosaic decorating
the old churches and palaces of European cities. When we visit
Westminster Abbey, Jean, I must show you the crude early mosaic work on
the tomb of Edward the Confessor. It is very curious, for it is made of
pieces of colored glass set in grooves of marble."

"How much you are to see, señorita," observed Giusippe wistfully.

Mr. Cabot fixed his eyes attentively on the boy.

"Should you, too, like to see all these wonders, Giusippe?" he asked
half playfully and half in earnest.

But Giusippe, who did not catch the banter in his tone, answered
seriously:

"Should I? Ah, señor, it is not for me to envy or be unhappy about that
which I may not have. Some day, perhaps, when I have made my fortune in
your country I can return to the old world and see its marvels. I must
have a little patience, that is all."

The mingling of sadness and longing in the reply touched Uncle Bob;
Jean and the young Venetian chattered on, but Mr. Cabot walked silently
ahead, deep in thought.

"Did I understand you to say, Giusippe," he asked at last turning
abruptly, "that you have no relatives in Venice?"

"None in all the world with the exception of the uncle in America of
whom I told you, señor."

Again there was a pause.

"Suppose I were to take you with us."

"What, señor?"

"Take you with us now, when we leave Venice."

"I do not understand."

"Suppose I asked you to go with us to France and England, and then
across to America."

"But I have not enough money, señor."

"I haven't much, either," Mr. Cabot answered, smiling kindly into the
boy's puzzled eyes. "Still, I think I could get together a sufficient
sum to pay your way until you got to the United States and found work."

"To go--to go with you now, do you mean, señor?"

"Yes. We leave Venice next week for France. You see, I like you,
Giusippe; we all do. And in addition to that you have done us a
service. But more than anything else I feel that, once started, you are
capable of making your way and doing well in life; all you need is a
chance. I have perfect faith that if I took you to America you would
make good. It would cost very little more were you to join us, and no
doubt you could help in many little ways during the trip. Do you speak
French at all?"

"Yes, some; but more German. It is nothing. Many travelers come to
Venice, and one must talk to them. Then, too, here it is not unusual to
speak several languages, because the countries lie near together, and
the people come and go from place to place. With you it is different; a
mighty sea divides you from the rest of the world."

"Despite all your excuses for us, Giusippe, it is quite true that we
Americans are as a rule pitiably ignorant about languages. Here is this
boy, Jean, who knows not only his mother tongue but French, German and
English besides. Isn't that a rebuke to us, with our fine schools and
our college educations? It makes me ashamed of myself. Do you, little
girl, try and do better than I have. Well, young man, what do you say
to my proposition? Will you come with us to America?"

"Señor! Oh, señor! How can I ever----"

"Well, then, that settles it," interrupted Mr. Cabot, cutting him
short. "I will arrange everything. But there is just one condition to
be made, my youthful Venetian patriot. If by chance we see any of those
old mirrors made by the early Frenchmen who stole your art from Murano
you are not to smash them. Remember!"

Giusippe laughed.




CHAPTER V

GIUSIPPE ENCOUNTERS AN OLD FRIEND


It was scarcely a reality to Jean, to Hannah, or to Giusippe himself
when Uncle Bob actually set forth for France with the young Venetian as
a member of the party. Yet every one was pleased: Hannah because she
would not now need her foreign dictionaries; Jean because it was jolly
to have a companion her own age; and Giusippe because he felt that at
last he had friends who were to guide for him the future which had
loomed so darkly and so vaguely before him. Not a full week of the trip
to Paris had passed before Mr. Cabot declared that how he had
previously got on without that boy he did not understand. Giusippe had
such a wonderful way of making himself useful; not only did he see what
needed to be done, but he was quick to do it.

"His enthusiasm alone is worth the money I am paying for his railroad
fares and hotel bills!" ejaculated Uncle Bob to Hannah.

There certainly never was such a boy to take in everything around him,
and to remember what he saw. With mind alert for all that was to be
learned he tagged along at Mr. Cabot's heels drinking in and storing
away every scrap of history and of beauty which came across his path.
And in Paris he found much of both. The Invalides with the tomb of
Napoleon; Notre Dame with its odd gargoyles; the Arc de Triomphe; the
Bois; and the Champs-Elysees shaded by pink horse-chestnut trees--all
these sights were new and marvelous to the Italian lad. But it was
Versailles with its gardens that charmed him and Jean most.

The travelers arrived there on a Sunday, when the fountains were
playing, flowers blooming everywhere, and a gay crowd of sightseers
thronging the walks. It was like fairy-land. The great Neptune fountain
sent into the air a sheet of spray which was quickly caught up by the
sunlight and transformed into a misty rainbow. Within the palace, amid
old tapestries of battles and hunting scenes, and surrounded by
paintings and statues, were the famous early French mirrors of which
Giusippe had previously spoken.

Mr. Cabot pointed them out, half playfully, half seriously.

"Perhaps on further consideration I will leave them," returned the boy,
falling in with the spirit of the elder man's mood. "They seem to fit
the spaces, and I doubt if even our Venetian mirrors could look better
here."

"I think it might be just as well," answered Mr. Cabot. "Besides, you
must remember that those mirrors were not the only sort of glass the
French made. There were many enamel workers at Provençe as early as
1520, and later much cast glass instead of that which is blown came
from France. In fact, up to a hundred years ago the French held the
plate glass monopoly. Then England took up glass-making and cut into
the French market--the same old story of stealing the trade, you see.
In addition to other varieties of glass-making some of the finest and
most interesting of the old stained glass was made by the French
people, and can now be seen in the church of St. Denis, just out of
Paris, and at Sainte Chapelle which is within the city itself.
Fortunately the glass at St. Denis escaped the fury of the French
revolutionists, as it might not have done had it not been at a little
distance from Paris. There is also glass of much the same sort at
Poitiers, Bourges, and Rheims. Amiens, too, has wonderful glass
windows. I hope before we leave for home we shall have a peep at some
if not all of these."

"Isn't much beautiful French glass now made at Nancy, Mr. Cabot?"
Giusippe inquired.

"Yes, some of the finest comes from there."

"But didn't any other people beside the Venetians and the French make
glass, Uncle Bob?" asked Jean, much interested.

"Oh, yes. Almost every European nation has tried its hand at
glass-making. It is curious, too, to notice how each differs from the
others. The Bohemians, for instance, were famous glass-makers, and
their work, which primarily imitated that of the Venetians, is known
the world over."

"What sort of glass is it? Could I tell it if I should see it?"

"Well, for one thing they make beautiful wine glasses and goblets,
having stems of enclosed white and colored enamel tubes twisted
together with transparent glass, which look as if they had delicate
threads of color running through them. Then the Bohemians and the
Austrians make many great beakers or drinking glasses, steins, and
bowls with decorative coats of arms upon them in gold or in colored
enamel."

"Oh, I have seen things like that," Jean replied.

"Yes, we have some of those ornamental goblets at home in the
dining-room. They are very rich and handsome. Beside these varieties
the Bohemians have of late revived the making of old white opaque glass
with colored enamel figures on it. But engraved glass is one of the
kinds for which Bohemia is chiefly celebrated. Even very skilful glass
engravers can be had there for little money. They cut fine, delicate
designs upon the glass with a lathe. Some of this is white, but much of
it is of deep red or blue with the pattern engraved on it in white.
Such glass is made in two layers, the outer one being cut away so to
leave the design upon the surface underneath."

"Wasn't it the Bohemians who invented cut glass?" Giusippe asked.

"No. Sometimes people say so, but this is not true. The fact is that
there chanced to be a glass cutter so skilful that he was appointed
lapidary to Rudolph the Second; he had a workshop at Prague, but though
he did some very wonderful glass cutting, which gained him much fame,
he did not invent the art. It was, by the way, one of his workmen who
later migrated to Nuremburg and carried the secret of glass-cutting to
Germany."

"Isn't it queer how one country learned of another?" reflected Jean.

"Yes, and it is especially interesting when we see how hard each tried
not to teach his neighbor anything. There always was somebody, just as
there always is now, who could not keep still and went and told," Mr.
Cabot said. "And while we are speaking of the different kinds of glass
we must not forget to mention the dark red ruby glass perfected in 1680
by Kunckel, the director of the Potsdam glass works, for it is a very
ingenious invention. The deep color is obtained by putting a thin layer
of gold between the white glass and the coating of red."

"What else did the Germans make?" queried Giusippe.

"Well, the Germans, like the other nations, turned out glass which was
suggestive of their people. And that, by the by, is a fact you must
notice when seeing the work of so many different countries. Observe how
the art of each reflects the characteristics of those who made it.
Italy gave us fragile, dainty glass famous for its airy beauty and
delicacy; Germany, on the other hand, fashions a far more massive,
rough, and heavier product--large flasks, steins and goblets, some of
which are even clumsy; all are substantial and useful, however, and
have the big cordial spirit of fellowship so characteristic of the
German people. These glasses are decorated in large flat designs less
choice, perhaps, than are the Bohemian. The shape of the German goblets
and drinking glasses differs, too, from those made in Italy. They are
less graceful, less dainty. Instead you will find throughout Germany
tall cylindrical shafts, tankards, and steins adorned with massive
eagles or colored coats of arms; often, moreover, both the Bohemians
and the Germans use pictorial designs showing processions of soldiers,
battle scenes, or cavalry charges such as would appeal to nations whose
military life has long been one of the leading interests of their
people."

"Tell me, Mr. Cabot," inquired Giusippe eagerly, "did you ever see one
of the German puzzle cups?"

"Yes, several of them. In the British Museum there are several of the
windmill variety."

"What is a puzzle cup, Uncle Bob?" demanded Jean.

"Why, a puzzle or wager cup, as they are sometimes called, was an
ingenious invention of the Germans during their early days of
glass-making. The kind I speak of is a large inverted goblet which has
on top a small silver windmill. The wager was to set the fans
revolving, turn the glass right side up, and then fill and drain it
before the mill stopped turning. Such wagers were very popular in those
olden days and are interesting as relics of a mediæval and far-away
period in history."

So intently had Mr. Cabot and the others been talking that they had
stopped in the center of the room and it was while they were standing
there that a party of tourists entered from the hallway. Foremost among
them was an American girl who carried in her hand a much worn Baedeker.
As her eye swept over the tapestries covering the walls her glance fell
upon Giusippe.

Instantly she started and with parted lips stepped forward; then she
paused.

"It cannot be!" Mr. Cabot heard her murmur.

At the same moment, however, Giusippe had seen her.

"The beautiful señorita!" he cried. "My lady of Venice!"

He was beside her in an instant.

"Giusippe! Giusippe!" exclaimed the girl. "Can it really be you?"

"Yes, yes, señorita! It is I. Ah, that I should see you again! What a
joy it is. Surely four or five years must have passed since first you
came to paint in Venice."

"Fully that, my little Giusippe. It is five years this June. You have a
good memory."

"How could I forget you, señorita; and the pictures, and your kindness!
But I have left Venice, you see. Yes. Even now I am on my way to
America."

"To America? Oh, Giusippe, Giusippe! And that is why you have discarded
your faded blouse, and the red tie which you wore knotted round your
throat. Alas! I am almost sorry. And yet you look very nice," she added
kindly. "But to leave Venice!"

"It is best," Giusippe explained gently. "I have my way to make, and I
can do it better in your country, my señorita."

"Perhaps. Still, I am sorry to have you leave your home. It is like
taking sea shells away from the sands of the shore."

"And yet you would want me to be a man and succeed in life. Think how
you yourself worked for success."

"I know. And it was you who brought it to me, Giusippe. The portrait I
painted of you was exhibited in America and when I later sold it to an
art dealer there it brought me a little fortune; but the fame it
brought was best of all." The girl put her hand softly on the lad's
shoulder.

"Oh, señorita, how glad I am!"

"I had a feeling that you would bring me luck the morning when I first
saw you in the square near St. Mark's. Do you remember? And how you
stood watching me paint? Do you recall how we got to talking and how I
asked if I might do the portrait of you? You laughed when I suggested
it! And then you came to the hotel evenings when you were free, and I
sketched in the picture. It seems but yesterday. In the meantime you
entertained me by telling me of Venice and its history. What a little
fellow you were to know so much!" The girl smiled down at him. "And now
let me hear of yourself. What of your parents?"

"Alas, señorita, they have died. I am now quite alone in the world. It
is for that that I felt I must leave Venice. It is sad to be alone,
señorita."

"So it is, Giusippe. No one knows that better than I." Impulsively she
slipped a hand into the small Venetian's. "But I must not take you from
your friends. See, we have kept them waiting a long time."

"I want you to meet them, señorita. They are from your country, and
they have been kind to me."

"Then surely I must meet them."

With a shy gesture the boy led her forward.

"Miss Cartright is from New York, Mr. Cabot," said Giusippe simply.
"Long ago when I was a little lad I knew her in Venice, and she was
good to me and to my parents."

[Illustration: "I KNEW HER IN VENICE"]

"It was five years ago," added Miss Cartright. "I went there to paint."

"And little Giusippe, perhaps, made your stay as delightful as he has
made ours," Mr. Cabot said.

"Yes. I was all by myself, and knew no one in Venice. Furthermore, I
spoke only a word or two of Italian. Giusippe was a great comfort. He
kept me from being lonesome."

"And you are now staying in Paris?" questioned Mr. Cabot.

"Yes, I have been here with friends studying for nearly a year; but I
am soon to return home. And now, before I leave you, I want to hear all
about Giusippe's plans. What is he to do?"

Little by little the story was told. Mr. Cabot began it and continued
it until Giusippe, who thought him too modest, finished the tale.

"You see, señorita, Mr. Cabot, Miss Jean, and good Hannah will not
themselves tell you how kind they have been, so I myself must tell it,"
said the boy. "And now I go with them to find a position in America
that by hard work I may some time be able to repay them for their
goodness to me."

Miss Cartright nodded thoughtfully.

At last she said:

"If you should come to New York I want to see you, Giusippe. There
might be something I could do to help you. Anyway, I should want to
have a glimpse of you. And if you do not come and Mr. Cabot does,
perhaps, since he knows how fond of you I am and how much I am
interested in your welfare, he will come and tell me how you are
getting on."

She drew from her purse a card which she handed to the lad.

"Perhaps I'd better take it, Giusippe," Mr. Cabot said in a low tone.
"It might get lost."

Then there was a confusion of farewells, and the girl rejoined her
friends, who had gone through into the next room.

It was not until she was well out of ear-shot that any one spoke. Then
Jean, who had been silent throughout the entire interview, exclaimed:

"Oh, isn't she beautiful! Isn't she the very loveliest lady you ever
saw, Giusippe?"

And Giusippe, answering in voluble English mixed with Italian, extolled
not only the fairness but the goodness of his goddess.

Even Hannah agreed that the American girl was charming, but regretted
that she had not come from Boston instead of New York.

Uncle Bob alone was silent. Turning the white card in his fingers he
stood absently looking at the door through which Miss Ethel Cartright
had passed.




CHAPTER VI

UNCLE BOB AS STORY TELLER


Uncle Bob and his party remained in France several weeks, and during
that time visited the old French cathedrals with their interesting
windows; and saw in the Louvre much glass of early French make as well
as many beautiful Venetian mirrors with all sorts of unique histories.
One mirror was that famous seventeenth century possession of Marie de
Medici, a looking-glass set in a frame which represented a fortune of
over thirty thousand dollars. This mirror was of rock crystal combined
with cut and polished agates, and around it was a network of enameled
gold. Outside this inner frame was a larger one formed entirely of
precious stones. Three large emeralds as well as smaller diamonds and
rubies adorned it.

"Probably," said Mr. Cabot, "this is but one of many such examples of
ancient luxury. Unfortunately, however, most of these extravagant
affairs have been melted up by avaricious monarchs who coveted the gems
and gold. Such ornate mirrors are a relic of the Renaissance when each
object made was considered an art work on which every means of
enrichment was lavished. I do not know that I think it any handsomer
than are the simpler mirrors with their Venetian frames of exquisitely
carved wood, of which there are many fine specimens in the Louvre."

"Is the mirror that was given by the Republic of Venice to Henry the
Third in the Louvre?" asked Giusippe.

"No, that is in the Cluny Museum. You have heard of it, then?"

"Oh, yes; often in Venice. I have seen pictures of it, too," Giusippe
replied.

"We must see it before we leave France," declared Mr. Cabot. "It was,
as you already know, presented to Henry the Third on his return from
Poland. It is set in a wonderfully designed frame of colored and white
beveled glass, and the decoration is of alternating fleur-de-lis and
palm leaves, which are fastened to the frame by a series of screws. It
is quite a different sort of mirror from that of Marie de Medici."

"I should like to see it," Jean said.

"You certainly shall."

How rich France was in beautiful things! One never could see them all.

One of the sights that especially interested Jean and Hannah was the
imitation gems displayed in the Paris jewelry shops. These exquisite
stones, Uncle Bob told them, were made in laboratories by workmen so
skilful that only an expert could distinguish the manufactured gems
from the real, the stones conforming to almost every test applied to
genuine jewels. They were not manufactured, however, for the purpose of
deceiving people, but rather to be sold to those who either could not
afford valuable stones or did not wish the care of them. The imitation
pearls were especially fine, and by no means cheap either, as Hannah
soon found out when she attempted to purchase a small string.

But many as were the wonderful sights in France, the continent had soon
to be left behind, and almost before the travelers realized it the
Channel had been crossed and they stood upon English soil. As Uncle
Bob's time was limited they went direct to London, and when once there
one of the first things that Giusippe wished to see were the mosaics in
St. Paul's Cathedral of which he had heard so much. So they set out. On
reaching the church Giusippe regarded it with awe. How unlike it was to
his well loved St. Mark's. And yet how beautiful!

"These mosaics, like the ones we shall see at the Houses of Parliament,
were not first made and then put up on the walls as were those such as
Salviati and other Venetians shipped from Venice," explained Mr. Cabot.
"No, these were made directly upon the walls, the pieces of glass being
pressed into prepared areas of cement spread thickly upon the brickwork
of the building. The designs are simple, large and effective figures
being preferred to smaller and more intricate patterns. Millions of
pieces have been used to make the pictures, and if you will notice
carefully you will see that they have the rough surface which catches
the light as do all the early Venetian mosaics."

Giusippe nodded.

"There must also be some fine old glass windows in London," he
speculated. "Aren't there, Mr. Cabot?"

"Yes, some varieties that you did not have in Venice, too," declared
Uncle Bob. "You see other people did invent something, Giusippe. Here
in England in some of the older houses there are windows made of tiny
pieces of white glass leaded together; people were not able at that
time to get large sheets of glass such as we now use, and I am not sure
that these windows made of small leaded panes were not prettier. Then
you will find other windows made from what we call bull's eye glass.
These bull's eyes were the centers or waste from large discs of crown
glass after all the big pieces possible had been cut away. As most
glass comes now in sheets crown glass is little made, and therefore we
find bull's eyes rare unless manufactured expressly to imitate the
antique roundels."

"Of course there is lots of old stained glass in England, isn't there,
Uncle Bob?" Jean ventured.

"Yes, indeed. I am sorry to say, however, that much of it has been
destroyed before the public realized its value. At Salisbury Cathedral,
for instance, some of the fine old glass was taken down and beaten to
pieces in order that the lead might be used. At Oxford rare Gothic
windows were removed and broken up to give room for the more modern
work of the Renaissance. But you will still find at Canterbury and in
many other of the English churches stained glass which has escaped
destruction and come down to us through hundreds of years. And speaking
of how such things have been preserved I must tell you the wonderful
story of the east window in St. Margaret's Chapel at Westminster."

"Oh, do tell us!" begged Jean. "I love stories."

"This story is almost like a fairy tale, when one considers that it is
the history of such a fragile thing as a glass window," Mr. Cabot
began. "This window of which I am telling you was Flemish in design,
and is said to have been ordered by Ferdinand and Isabella when their
daughter Catherine was engaged to Arthur, the Prince of Wales. But for
some reason it was not delivered, and a Dutch magistrate later decided
to present it to King Henry the Seventh. Unfortunately the king died
before the gift arrived and it came into the hands of the Abbot of
Waltham. Now these were very troublous times for a stained glass window
to be traveling about the land; Cromwell was in power and his followers
believed it right to destroy everything which existed merely because of
its beauty. So the old abbot was afraid his treasure would be wrecked,
and to insure its safety he buried it."

"How funny!"

"Yes, wasn't it?"

"What happened then?"

"After the Restoration one of the loyal generals of the Crown had the
window dug up and placed in a chapel on his estate. But the house
changed hands and as its new owner did not like the window he offered
it to Wadham College. The college authorities, alas, did not care for
it, so it remained cased up for many years. Then by and by along came
an Englishman who had the courage to buy it and have it set up in his
house."

"Was that the end of it?" queried Giusippe.

"No, indeed. This person died, and his son took down the stained glass
heirloom and in 1758 sold it to a committee which was at that time busy
decorating St. Margaret's Chapel. Here at last it was set up and here
one cannot but hope it will remain. Certainly it has earned a long
rest."

"Shouldn't you think it would have been broken in all that time?"
ejaculated Jean.

"One would certainly have thought so," Uncle Bob agreed. "It seemed to
possess a charmed life. Most of that early glass was made by Flemish
refugees who had fled to England to escape religious persecution. Some
was designed for English monasteries. Houses, you know, did not have
glass windows at that time but depended for protection upon oiled paper
and skins. Glass was considered a luxury, and it was many, many years
before window glass or table glass was in use. Rich English families
bought glass dishes from galleys which, as Giusippe has told us, came
laden from Venice. Sometimes this Venetian glass was mounted in gold or
silver. There was, it is true, a little glass of English make, but no
one thought it worth using; in fact when the stained glass windows were
put into Beauchamp Chapel at Warwick it was expressly stated that no
English glass was to be used."

"How did glass ever come to be made here, then?" inquired Jean.

"Well, in time more Flemish Protestants fled to England and began
making stained glass at London, Stourbridge, and Newcastle-on-Tyne. In
1589 there were fifteen glass-houses in England. Then, because so much
wood had been used in the iron foundries, the supply became exhausted
and sea or pit coal had to be used instead. People were forced to try,
in consequence, a different kind of melting pot for their glass and a
new mixture of material; in this way they stumbled upon a heavy,
brilliant, white crystal metal which the French called 'the most
beautiful glassy substance known.' It was the pure white flint, or
crystal glass, for which England has since become famous. Immediately
it began to be used for all sorts of things. In 1637 the Duke of
Buckingham had flint glass windows for his coach, and he had some
Venetian workmen make mirrors out of it. So it went. A great many more
mirrors were made, great pier glasses with beveled edges. It is said
that some of those very mirrors are even now at Hampton Court. In the
course of time the English became more and more skilful at
glass-making, and when Queen Victoria came to the throne they were
manufacturing enormous cut glass ornaments and bowls, and decorating
their palaces and theaters with glass chandeliers which had myriads of
heavy, sparkling prisms dangling from them. You will remember that in
Venice you saw some glass chandeliers; and you may recall how
delicately fashioned they were and how their twisted branches were
covered with glass flowers in the center of which candles could be set.
But the English chandeliers were far more massive affairs than those.
And no sooner did English workmen find what they could do with this new
material than they went mad over glass-making. Why, in 1851 they
actually built for the first International Exhibit a Crystal Palace
with a big glass fountain in it. Its builder was James Paxton, and he
was knighted for doing it."

"I should think he deserved to be!" Jean said. "Who ever would have
thought of making a palace of glass!"

"This one attracted much attention, I assure you," said Uncle Bob.
"Later it was reconstructed at Sydenham and to this day there it
stands. England now makes the finest crystal glass of any country in
the world; but to-morrow I intend to take you to the British Museum and
show you that in spite of all that European nations have done there
were other very skilful glass-makers in the world before any of them
made glass at all."

"Before the time of the Greeks and Romans--before the people who made
the Naples Vase?" Jean asked.

"Yes, centuries before."

"Who were they?" demanded both Jean and Giusippe in the same breath.

"The Egyptians first; and after them the Phoenicians and Syrians. All
these peoples lived where they could easily get plenty of the fine
white sand necessary for glass-making. In some of the old tombs glass
beads, cups, drinking-vessels, and curiously shaped vials have been
found, many of them very beautiful in color. Some of this color is due
to the action of the soil and the atmosphere, for science tells us that
after glass has been buried in the earth many centuries and is then
exposed to the air it begins to decay and its color often changes. We
have in our museums many pieces of ancient glass which have changed
color in this way and have become far more beautiful than they
originally were. How these races that lived in the remote ages found
out how to make glass no one knows; but certain it is that the
Egyptians could fashion imitation gems, crude mosaics and various glass
vessels. Later the Phoenicians improved the art and afterward, as you
have seen, the Greeks and Romans took it up. There is a strange tale of
how, during the reign of Tiberius, a glass-maker discovered how to make
a kind of glass which would not break. It was a sort of malleable
glass."

"Oh, tell us about it, please, Uncle Bob."

"Certainly, if you would like to hear. This glass-maker made a cup for
the Emperor and tried a long time to get an audience at which to
present his new invention. Then at last the chance came, and thinking
to make himself famous the artisan contrived, as he passed the flagon
to his sovereign, to drop it on the marble floor. Of course every one
thought the glass was broken, and that is precisely what the
glass-maker wanted them to think. He picked it up, smoothed out with
his hammer the dent made in its side, and passed it once more expecting
to receive praise for his wonderful deed. Tiberius eyed him silently.
Then he asked; 'Does any one else know how to make glass like this?'

"'No one,' answered the glass-maker.

"'Off with his head at once!' cried the enraged monarch. 'If glass
dishes and flasks do not break they will soon become as valuable as my
gold and silver ones!'

"Despite his protests the poor glass-maker was dragged off and
beheaded. The rulers of those days were not very fair-minded, you see."

With so many interesting stories, and so many things to see, you may be
sure that neither Jean nor Giusippe found sightseeing dull. And the
next day Uncle Bob was as good as his word, and took the young people
to the British Museum, where he showed them some of the old Egyptian
and Græco-Syrian glass. There were little vases, cups, and flasks of
wonderful iridescent color, as well as many glass beads that had been
found upon Egyptian mummies.

"Now, Uncle Bob," Jean said, after they had looked at these strange old
bits of glass for some time, "you must take us to see the Portland
Vase. You promised you would, you know."

"Sure enough; so I did. I should have forgotten it, too, had you not
mentioned it."

Accordingly they hunted up the Gold Room where the vase stood.

Jean was very proud that she was able to point it out before she had
been told which one it was.

"You see," explained she shyly, "it is so much like the Naples Vase
that I recognized it right off."

It was indeed of the same dark blue transparent glass, and had on it
the same sort of delicate white cameo figures.

"This vase," Mr. Cabot said, "was found about the middle of the
sixteenth century enclosed in a marble sarcophagus in an underground
chamber which was located two and a half miles out of Rome. It was
taken to the Barbarini Palace, but later the princess of that noble
family, wishing to raise money, sold it to Sir William Hamilton, who
chanced to be at that time the English ambassador to Naples. From him
it passed to the Duchess of Portland, and at her death was sold at
auction to the new Duke of Portland. That is the way it got its name.
Now the Duke, desirous of putting his precious purchase in a safe
place, and also wishing to allow others to enjoy it, lent it to the
British Museum. Imagine his horror and that of the Museum authorities
when in 1845 a lunatic named Lloyd, who saw it, viciously smashed it to
pieces."

His hearers gasped.

"To see it you would not dream that it had ever been broken, would you?
Yes, it has been so carefully mended that no one could tell the
difference. It was this vase which the English potter, Wedgwood,
coveted so intensely that he bid a thousand pounds for it; the Duke of
Portland outbid him by just twenty-nine pounds. He was, however, a
generous man, and when at last the vase was his he allowed Wedgwood to
copy it. This took a year's time, and even then the copy was far less
beautiful than was the original. Many copies of it have been made
since, but never has any one succeeded in making anything to equal the
vase itself. You will see copies of it in almost all our American
museums."

"I mean to see when I get home if there is a copy of it in Boston,"
Jean remarked.

"You will find one at the Art Museum. And now while we are here there
is still that other famous vase which I mentioned once before and which
I should like to have you see. It is not, perhaps, as fine as the
Naples or the Portland, but it is nevertheless one celebrated the world
over. Like the Naples Vase it came from Pompeii, and like the Portland
Vase it has been skilfully mended. It is called the Auldjo Vase."

Uncle Bob was not long in finding where this treasure stood. It was
small--not more than nine inches in height, and like the other two was
of the familiar blue transparent glass with a white cameo design cut
upon it. Instead of having a Grecian decoration, however, the pattern
was of vines, leaves, and clusters of grapes.

"The Portland Vase, as I have already told you, was perfect when it was
unearthed," Mr. Cabot said. "And the Naples Vase you will remember was
also whole except that its base, or foot, which was probably of gold,
was missing. But the Auldjo Vase was in pieces, and it was only a
single one of these fragments that was bequeathed to the British Museum
by Miss Auldjo. Now when the Museum committee saw this single piece
nothing would do but they must have the others. They therefore bought
the rest, had the vase mended, and set it up here where people can see
it. It cost a great deal of money to purchase it."

"I think it is splendid of museums and of rich people to buy such
things and put them where every one can look at them!" exclaimed Jean.
"None of us could afford to and if those who owned them just kept them
in their own houses we should never see them at all."

"Yes. Remember that, too, in this day when there are so many persons
who begrudge the rich their fortunes. Remember if there were not
individuals in the world who possessed fortunes the poor would have far
less opportunity to see art treasures of every sort. And that is one
way in which those who are rich and generous can serve their country.
There are many different methods of being a good citizen, you see."

Mr. Cabot took out his watch and glanced at it thoughtfully.

"I think we shall have time to see just one thing more, and then we
must go back to the hotel. We have examined all kinds of glass
objects--so many, in fact, that it would seem as if there was no other
purpose for which glass could be used. And yet I can show you something
of which, I will wager, you have not thought."

"What is it?" questioned the two young people breathlessly.

Full of curiosity, Uncle Bob led them through several corridors until
he came to a large room that they had not visited. He conducted them to
its farther end and paused before a large sand glass.

"Before the days of clocks and watches," he began, "such glasses as
these were much in use for telling the time. Throughout the sixteenth
and seventeenth centuries they had them in almost all the churches,
that the officiating clergyman might be able to measure the length of
his sermon."

Jean laughed.

"I wish they had them now," she declared mischievously.

"Sometimes I do," smiled Uncle Bob. "It is said the glasses were
originally invented in Egypt. Wherever they came from, they certainly
were a great convenience to those who had no other means of telling the
time. Charlemagne, I have read, had a sand glass so large that it
needed to be turned only once in twelve hours. Fancy how large it must
have been. At the South Kensington Museum is a set of four large sand
glasses evidently made to go together. Of course you have seen, even in
our day, hour, quarter-hour, and minute glasses."

"I used to practice by an hour glass," Jean replied quickly. "At least
it was a quarter-of-an-hour glass, and I had to turn it four times."

"It would be strange not to have clocks and watches, wouldn't it?"
reflected Giusippe as they walked back to the hotel.

"I guess it would!" Hannah returned emphatically. "The meals would
never be on time."

"One advantage in that, my good Hannah, would be that nobody would ever
be scolded because he was late," retorted Mr. Cabot humorously.

The three weeks allotted for the London visit passed only too quickly,
and surprisingly soon came the day when the travelers found themselves
aboard ship and homeward bound.

Perhaps after all they were not altogether sorry, for despite the
marvels of the old world there is no place like home. Hannah was eager
to open the Boston house and air it; Jean rejoiced that each throb of
the engine brought her nearer to her beloved doggie; Uncle Bob's
fingers itched to be setting in place the Italian marbles he had
ordered for the new house; and Giusippe waited almost with bated breath
for his first sight of America, the country of his dreams.

But a great surprise was in store for every one of these persons as the
mighty steamer left her moorings and put out of Liverpool harbor.

Across the deck came a vision, an apparition so unexpected that Jean
and Giusippe cried out, and even Uncle Bob muttered to himself
something which nobody could hear. The figure was that of a girl--a
girl with wind-tossed hair who, with head thrown back, stopped a moment
and looked full into the sunset.

It was Miss Ethel Cartright of New York, Giusippe's beautiful lady of
Venice!




CHAPTER VII

AMERICA ONCE MORE


The voyage from Liverpool to Boston was thoroughly interesting to
Giusippe. In the first place there was the wonder of the great blue
sea--a sea so vast that the Italian boy, who had never before ventured
beyond the canals of the Adriatic, was bewildered when day after day
the giant ship plowed onward and still, despite her speed, failed to
reach the land. Sunlight flooded the water, twilight settled into
darkness, and yet on every hand tossed that mighty expanse of waves.
Would a haven ever be reached, the lad asked himself; and how, amid
that pathless ocean, could the captain be so sure that eventually he
would make the port for which he was aiming? It was all wonderful.

Fortunately the crossing was a smooth one, and accordingly every moment
of the voyage was a delight. What happy days our travelers passed
together! Miss Cartright was the jolliest of companions. She dressed
dolls for Jean--dressed them in such gowns as never were seen, dainty
French little frocks which converted the plainest china creature into a
wee Parisian; she read aloud; she told stories; she played games.
Hannah surrendered unconditionally when, one morning after they had
been comparing notes on housekeeping, the fact leaked out that Miss
Cartright's mother had been a New Englander. That was enough!

"She has had the proper sort of bringing up," remarked Hannah, with a
sigh of satisfaction. "She knows exactly how to pack away blankets and
how to clean house as it should be done. She is a very unusual young
woman!"

Coming from Hannah such praise was phenomenal.

Mr. Cabot seemed to think, too, that Miss Cartright possessed many
virtues.

At any rate he enjoyed talking with her, and every evening when the
full moon touched with iridescent beauty the wide, pulsing sea he would
tuck the girl into her steamer chair and the two would stay up on deck
until the clear golden ball of light had climbed high into the heaven.

So passed the voyage.

Then as America came nearer Giusippe witnessed all the strange sights
that heralded the approach to the new continent; he saw the lights
dotting the coast; he watched steamers which were outward bound for the
old world he had left behind; he strained his eyes to catch, through a
telescope, the murky outlines of the land.

"Here is still another use to which glass is put, Giusippe," said Mr.
Cabot indicating with a gesture the red flash-light of a beacon far
against the horizon. "Without the powerful reflectors, lenses, and
prisms which are in use in our lighthouses many a vessel would be
wrecked. For not only must a lighthouse have a strong light; it must
also have a means of throwing that light out, and thereby increasing
its effectiveness. Scientists have discovered just how to arrange
prisms, lenses, and reflectors so the light will travel to the farthest
possible distance. At Navasink, on the highlands south of New York
harbor, stands the most powerful coast light in the United States. It
equals about sixty million candle-power, and its beam can be seen
seventy nautical miles away. The carrying of the light to such a
tremendous distance is due to the strong reflectors employed in
conjunction with the light itself. The largest lens, however, under
control of the United States is on the headlands of the Hawaiian
Islands. This is eight and three-quarters feet in diameter and is made
from the most carefully polished glass. And by the way, among other
uses that science makes of glass are telescopes, microscopes, and
field-glasses, which are all constructed from flawlessly ground lenses.
Often it takes a whole year, and sometimes even longer, to polish a
large telescope lens. Without this magnifying agency we should have no
astronomy, and fewer scientific discoveries than we now have. The
glasses people wear all have to be ground and polished in much the same
fashion; opera glasses, magic lanterns, and every contrivance for
bringing distant objects nearer or making them larger are dependent for
their power upon glass lenses."

"Even when making glass I never dreamed it could be used for so many
different purposes," answered Giusippe.

"I wish we had counted up, as we went along, how many things it is used
for," Jean put in.

"We might have done so, only I am afraid you would have become very
tired had we attempted it," laughed Uncle Bob. "In addition to optical
glass there are still other branches of science that could not go on
without glass in its various forms. Take, for instance, electricity. It
would not be safe to employ this strange force without the protection
of glass barriers to hedge in its dangerous current. Glass, as you
probably know, is a non-conductor of electricity, and whenever we wish
to confine its power and prevent it from doing harm we place a layer of
glass between it and the thing to be protected. The glass checks the
progress of the current. In all chemical laboratories, too, no end of
glass test-tubes, thermometers, and crucibles are in demand for
furthering research work. Science would be greatly hampered in its
usefulness had it not recourse to glass in its manifold forms."

"What a wonderful material it is!" ejaculated Jean. "I never shall see
anything made of glass again without thinking of all it does for us."

"Be grateful, too, Jean, to the men who have discovered how to use it,"
replied Mr. Cabot gravely. "Certainly our mariners many a time owe
their safety to just such warning beacons as the one ahead. We must ask
the captain what light that is. Just think--to-morrow morning we shall
wake up in Boston harbor and be at home again."

A hush fell on the party.

"I shall be dreadfully sorry to have Miss Cartright leave us and go to
New York; sha'n't you, Uncle Bob?" said Jean at last, slipping her hand
into that of the older woman who stood beside her. "Wouldn't it be
nice, Miss Cartright, if you lived in Boston? Then I'd see you all the
time--at least I would when I wasn't in Pittsburgh, and then Uncle Bob
could see you, and that would be almost as good."

"Almost," echoed Uncle Bob.

"But you are coming to New York to see me some time, Jean dear," the
girl said with her eyes far on the horizon. "You know your uncle has
promised that when you go to Pittsburgh both you and Giusippe are to
stop and visit me for a few days."

"Yes, I have not forgotten; it will be lovely, too," replied Jean.
"Still that is not like having you live where you can dress dolls all
the time. Why don't you move to Boston? I am sure you would like it. We
have the loveliest squirrels on the Common!"

Everybody laughed.

"I have been trying to tell Miss Cartright what a very nice place
Boston is to live in," added Mr. Cabot softly.

"Well, we all will keep on telling her, and then maybe she'll be
convinced," Jean declared.

So they parted for the night.

With the morning came the bustle and confusion of landing. Much of
Uncle Bob's time was taken up with the inspection of trunks, and with
helping Giusippe sign papers and answer the questions necessary for his
admission to the United States. Then came the parting. They bade a
hurried good-bye to Miss Cartright, whom Uncle Bob was to put aboard
the New York train, and into a cab bundled Hannah, Giusippe, and Jean,
in which equipage, almost smothered in luggage, they were rolled off to
Beacon Hill.

Nothing could exceed Giusippe's interest in these first glimpses of the
new country to which he had come. For the next few weeks he went about
as if in a trance, struggling to adjust himself to life in an American
city. How different it was from his beloved Venice! How sharp the
September days with their early frost! How he missed the golden warmth
of the sunny Adriatic and the familiar sights of home! During his
journey through France and England the constant change of travel had
carried with it sufficient excitement to keep him from being homesick;
but now that he was settled for a time in Boston he got his first taste
of what life in the United States was to be like. Not that he was
disappointed; it was only that he felt such a stranger to all about
him. The automobiles, subways, elevated roads, all confused his brain,
and the dusty streets made his throat smart with dryness.

Daily, however, he became more and more accustomed to his surroundings,
and when at last he ventured out alone and discovered that he could
find his way back again his courage rose. Then he began going on
errands for Hannah, and was proud and glad to be of use. He accompanied
Uncle Bob to his office and arrived home alone in safety. Gradually the
strangeness of his new home wore away. Every novel sight he beheld,
every custom which was surprising to him, everything that he did not
understand he asked a score of questions about. It was _why_, _why_,
_why_, from morning until night. His questions, fortunately, were
intelligent ones, and as he remembered with accuracy the answers given
him and applied the knowledge thus gained to future conditions he made
amazing headway in becoming Americanized. He got books and read them;
he visited the churches, Library, and Art Museum. And when he saw how
much of its beauty the New World had borrowed from the Old he no longer
felt cut off from his Italian home.

Uncle Bob, in the meantime, had been forced to plunge so deeply into
business that he had had little opportunity to aid his protégé in these
explorations. But one Saturday noon he came home and announced that he
was to treat himself to a half holiday.

"I am not going back to the office to-day," he declared. "Instead I
intend to carry off you two young persons and show you something very
beautiful, the like of which you will see nowhere else in all the
world."

"What is it?" cried Jean and Giusippe.

"Oh, I'm not telling. Just you be ready directly after luncheon to go
with me to Cambridge."

"Cambridge! Oh, I know. It is the University, Mr. Cabot. It is
Harvard!" exclaimed Giusippe, very proud of his knowledge.

"Not quite," Mr. Cabot said, shaking his head, "although, being a
Harvard man, I naturally feel that the equal of my Alma Mater cannot be
found elsewhere. But you are on the right track. It is something which
is out at Harvard. Guess again."

"I don't know," confessed Giusippe.

"Well, you may be excused because you have not been in this country
long enough to be acquainted with all its marvels. But Jean should
know. Where are you, young lady? You at least should be able to tell
what treasures America possesses."

"I am afraid I can't."

"Then we must excuse you also; you are so young. I see plainly that we
must appeal to Hannah. She who is ever extolling Boston can of course
tell us what it is that Harvard University possesses which is
unsurpassed in any other part of the world."

Hannah looked chagrined.

"You do not know?" went on Uncle Bob teasingly. "Oh, for shame! And you
such an ardent Bostonian! Well, so far as I can see there is nothing
for it but for me to take you all three to Cambridge as fast as ever we
can get there. Such ignorance is deplorable."

You may be very sure that during the ride out from the city every means
was employed to get Uncle Bob to tell what particular wonder he was to
display. At last, driven to desperation by Jean's persistent questions,
he answered:

"I will tell you just one fact. The things we are going to see are made
of glass."

"Glass! But we have already seen everything that ever could be made
from glass, Uncle Bob," cried Jean in dismay.

"No, we haven't."

"Is it stained glass windows?"

"No."

"Mosaics?"

"No."

"A telescope?"

"No."

"What is it, Uncle Bob?"

"Never you mind. You would never guess if you guessed a lifetime. You
better give it up," was Mr. Cabot's smiling answer.

Cambridge was soon reached, and after a walk through the College Yard
that Giusippe might have a peep at Holworthy, where Uncle Bob had spent
his student days, the sightseers entered a quiet old brick building and
were led by Mr. Cabot into a room where stood case after case of
blooming flowers. There were garden blossoms of every variety, wild
flowers, tropical plants, all fresh and green as if growing. And yet
they were not growing; instead they lay singly or in clusters, each
bloom as perfect as if just cut from the stalk.

"How beautiful! Oh, Uncle Bob, it is like a big greenhouse!" exclaimed
Jean.

"This is what I brought you to see."

"But you said we were coming to see something made of glass," objected
Giusippe.

"You did say so, Uncle Bob."

"Behold, even as I said!"

"Bu-u-t, these flowers are not glass. What do you mean?"

"On the contrary, my unbelieving friends, glass is precisely what they
are made of. Every blossom, every leaf, every bud, every seed here is
the work of an expert glass-maker."

Mr. Cabot watched their faces, enjoying their incredulity.

"_Glass_!"

"Even so. Shall I tell you about it?"

"Yes! Yes!"

"This collection of flowers is called the Ware Collection, the name
being bestowed out of compliment to Mrs. and Miss Ware, who generously
donated much of the money for which to pay for it. Sometimes, too, it
is known as the Blaschka Collection of Glass Flower Models, for the
making was done by Leopold Blaschka and his son Rudolph, both of whom
were Bohemians. It happened that several years ago Harvard University
wished to equip its Botanical Department with flower specimens which
might be used for study by the students. The question at once arose how
this was to be done. Real flowers would of course fade, and wax flowers
would melt or break. What could be used? There seemed to be no such
thing as imperishable flowers."

Mr. Cabot paused a moment while the others waited expectantly.

"There were, however, in the Zoölogical Department some wonderfully
accurate glass models of animals made by a Bohemian scientist named
Blaschka, who was a rather remarkable combination of scholar and
glass-maker. Accordingly when it became necessary to have fadeless
flowers one of the professors wondered if this same Bohemian could not
reproduce them. So he set out for Blaschka's home at Hosterwirtz, near
Dresden, to see."

"Did he have to go way to Germany to find out?"

"Yes, because in the first place he did not know that Blaschka could
make flowers at all; and if he could he was not certain that he could
make them perfectly enough to render them satisfactory for such a
purpose. So he traveled to Germany and found the house where lived the
famous glass-maker; and it was while waiting alone in the parlor that
he saw on a shelf a vase containing what seemed to be a very beautiful
fresh orchid."

"It was made of glass!" Jean declared, leaping at the truth.

"Yes; and it was so perfect that the Harvard professor could hardly
believe his eyes. At that moment the scientist entered. He confessed
that he had made the flower for his wife; indeed, he had made many
glass orchids--one collection of some sixty varieties which had been
ordered by Prince Camille de Rohan, but which had later been destroyed
when the Natural History Museum at Liège had been burned. Since then,
Blaschka explained, he had given all his attention to making models of
animals. He said that his son Rudolph helped him, and that they two
alone knew how the work was done. It was their knowledge of zoölogy and
of botany added to their skill at glass-making which enabled them to
turn out such correct copies of real objects."

"Of course the Harvard professor was delighted," Jean ventured.

"Indeed he was! Before he left he won a promise from Blaschka and his
son to send to Cambridge a few flowers to serve as specimens of what
they could do. Now you may fancy the rage of the Harvard authorities
when on the arrival of the cases of flowers they found that almost all
of them had been broken to bits in the New York Custom House. There
was, however, enough left of the consignment to give to the Cambridge
professors the assurance that the two Bohemians were well equal to the
task demanded of them. Those who saw the shattered blossoms were most
enthusiastic, and Mrs. Ware and her daughter told the authorities to
order a limited number as a gift to the University. This second lot
came safely and were so beautiful that Harvard at once arranged that
the two Blaschkas send over to America all the flowers they could make
for the next ten years."

"My!"

"Yes, that seems a great many, doesn't it?" Mr. Cabot assented, nodding
to Jean. "But after all, it was not so tremendous as it sounds. You see
Harvard needed a copy of every American flower, plant, and fruit. The
making of them would take a great deal of time. Of course unless the
collection was complete it would be of little use to students. So the
Blaschkas began their work, and for a few years averaged a hundred sets
of flowers a year. Then the father died and Rudolph was left to finish
the work alone. You remember I told you that in true mediæval fashion
they had kept the secret of their art to themselves; as a consequence
there now was no one to aid the son in his undertaking. Twice he came
to our country to get copies of flowers from which to work, toiling
bravely on in order to finish the task his father had begun. He said he
considered it a sort of monument or memorial to the elder man's genius.
There you have the story," concluded Mr. Cabot. "No other such
collection exists anywhere else in the world. Even with a microscope it
is impossible to distinguish between the real flower and the glass
copy."

"How were they made?" Giusippe demanded. "Was the glass blown?"

"No; the flowers were modeled. That is all I can tell you. The brittle
glass was in some way made plastic so it could be shaped by hand or by
instruments. Some of the coloring was put on while the material was
hot; some while it was cooling; and some after it was cold. It all
depended upon the result desired. But one thing is evident--the
Blaschkas worked very quickly and with marvelous scientific accuracy."

"It is simply wonderful," said Giusippe. "Even at Murano there is
nothing to equal this."

"I thought you, who knew so much of glass-making, would appreciate what
such a collection represents in knowledge, toil, and skill. Furthermore
it is beautiful, and for that reason alone is well worth seeing,"
answered Mr. Cabot.

"It is wonderful!" repeated the Italian lad.

All the way home the young Venetian was peculiarly silent. His national
pride had received a blow. Bohemia had surpassed Venice at its own
trade, the art of glass-making!




CHAPTER VIII

JEAN THREATENS TO STEAL GIUSIPPE'S TRADE


It was the next morning while Mr. Cabot and Giusippe were still
discussing the Blaschka glass flowers that the Italian lad remarked:

"I have wondered and wondered ever since we went out to Harvard how
those fragile flower models were annealed without breaking. It must
have been very difficult."

"What is annealing?" inquired Jean, holding at arm's length a doll's
hat and straightening a feather at one side of it.

"Annealing? Why, the gradual cooling of the glass after it has been
heated."

"What do they heat it for?"

"Don't you know how glass is made?" Giusippe asked in surprise.

Jean shook her head.

"No. How should I?"

"Why--but I thought every one knew that!"

"I don't see why. How could a girl know about the work you men do
unless you take the trouble to tell her?" Jean dimpled. "All through
Europe you and Uncle Bob have talked glass, glass, glass--nothing but
glass, and as you both seemed to understand what you were talking about
I did not like to interrupt and ask questions; but I had no more idea
than the man in the moon what you meant sometimes."

"Do you mean to say you know nothing at all about the process of
glass-making, Jean?" asked Mr. Cabot.

"Not a thing."

"Well, well, well! You have been a very patient little lady, that is
all I can say. Giusippe and I have been both rude and remiss, haven't
we, Giusippe? I thought of course you understood; and yet it is not at
all strange that you did not. As you say, how could you? Why didn't you
ask us, dear?"

"Oh, I didn't like to. I hate to seem stupid and be a bother."

"You are neither of those things, dear child. Is she, Giusippe?"

"I should say not."

"Well then, if it is all the same to you, I do wish somebody would tell
me whether glass is dug up out of the earth or is made of things mixed
together like a pudding," said Jean.

Both Giusippe and Uncle Bob laughed.

"The pudding idea is the nearer correct. Glass is made from ingredients
which are mixed together, boiled, baked, and set away to cool. Isn't
that about it, Giusippe?"

Giusippe nodded.

"I think the best remedy we can administer to this young lady, as well
as the most fitting penance for our own discourtesy to her, is to
escort her through a glass factory and let her, with her own eyes,
behold the process. What do you say, Giusippe?"

"A capital idea, señor. Then I, too, should have the chance to visit an
American factory and compare the process you use here with our Italian
method. I should like it above everything else."

"That is precisely what we will do then," declared Mr. Cabot. "On my
first leisure day we will go, and in the meantime I will hunt up the
location of the most satisfactory and nearest glass works."

Not more than a week passed before Uncle Bob fulfilled his promise.

"Make yourselves ready, oh ye glass-makers," said he one morning at
breakfast. "I find after telephoning to the office that I am not needed
to-day; therefore, the moment we have swallowed these estimable griddle
cakes of Hannah's we will hie us forth to instruct Jean in the art of
manufacturing vases, bottles, tumblers and the various sorts of
glassware."

The two young people greeted the suggestion with pleasure.

"Can you really get away to-day, Uncle Bob?" cried Jean. "What fun
we'll have!"

"I think it will be fun. We must, however, make Giusippe captain of the
expedition for he is the one who really knows glass-making from
beginning to end, and can answer all our questions."

"I think I might in Murano," returned the Venetian modestly, "but that
is no sign that I can do it here; your process may differ from the one
we use at home."

"Oh, I do not believe so--at least, not in essentials," Mr. Cabot
answered.

So they started out, and before they had proceeded any distance at all
they got into a spirited debate over the tiny lights of glass set in
the top of the electric car. The panes were of ground glass dotted with
an all-over pattern of small stars which had been left transparent.

"How did they make the stars on that glass?" was Jean's innocent
question. "Did they scratch off the thick surface and leave the design
of clear glass?"

"No indeed," Mr. Cabot replied. "On the contrary they started with the
stars and then made the background cloudy."

"But I don't see how they could."

"Do you, Giusippe?"

"I am afraid not, señor."

"Good! At last there is one fact about glass-making that I can impart
to you. This sort of glass is known as sand-blast glass, and the art of
making it, they say, chanced to be discovered near the seashore. It was
found that when the strong winds rose and blew the sand against glass
window-panes of the houses the small particles, being sharp, cut into
the glass surface, and before long wore it to a cloudy white through
which it was impossible to see out. Often the glass fronts of
lighthouses were injured in this way and the lights dimmed. Finally
some man came along who said: 'See here! Why not turn this grinding
effect of the sand to some purpose? Why not apply it to transparent
glass and make it frosted so one can get light but not see through it?
Often such glass would be a convenience.' Therefore this inventor set
his brain to the task. Strong currents or streams of sand were directed
against a clear glass surface with such force that they cut and ground
it until it was no longer transparent. They called the product thus
made sand-blast glass. Later they improved upon it by laying a stencil
over it so that a desired design was covered and remained protected
from the sand blast. The result was a pattern such as you see--clear
figures set in a background of clouded glass."

"How interesting!"

"Yes, isn't it? As is true of so many other of our most clever
inventions nature first showed man the path. Ground glass in its
modified forms is used for many purposes now; and yet I venture to say
few persons know how it came to be discovered."

Just at this point the car stopped with a sudden jerk, and beckoning
Jean and Giusippe to follow, Mr. Cabot got out and entered a large
brick building that stood close at hand. Evidently he was expected, for
a man came forward to greet him.

"Mr. Cabot?" he asked.

"Yes. I received your note this morning, so I brought my young charges
out at once. It is very good of you to allow us to go through the
factory."

"We are always glad to see visitors. I will put you in the hands of one
of our foremen who will take you about and tell you everything you may
want to know."

He touched a bell.

"Show Mr. Cabot and his friends down-stairs," said he to the boy who
answered his call, "and introduce them to Mr. Wyman. Tell him he is to
conduct them over the works."

Mr. Wyman welcomed them cordially.

"We see many visitors here, sir," said he, "and are always glad to have
them come. Although glass-making is an old story to us scarce a day
passes that some one does not visit us to whom the process is entirely
new; and it certainly is interesting if a person has never seen it.
Suppose we begin at the very beginning. In this bin, or trough, you
will see the mixture or batch of which the glass is made. It is
composed of red lead and the finest of white beach sand. The lead is
what gives the inside of the trough its vermilion color. The sand comes
from abroad, and before it can be used it must be sifted and sifted
through a series of closely woven cloths until it is smooth and fine as
powder. Before we put the mixture into the melting pots we heat it to a
given temperature so that it will be less likely to chill the clay pots
and break them."

"Do you really make glass by melting up that stuff?" asked Jean
incredulously.

The man smiled.

"But isn't it all red?"

"The red comes out in the melting. We have to be very careful, however,
in weighing out the ingredients, for much of our success depends on the
accurate proportions of the materials combined in the batch. Of course
the chemical composition differs some for different sorts of glass. It
all depends on what kind of glass is to be made. Then too the
conditions of the furnaces vary at times, the draughts being better at
some seasons than at others. We take a test or proof of every fresh
melt, and you would be surprised to see how little these differ.
Careful mixing of the raw materials is the first important item of
successful glass-making; the second is the fusion by heat of the
materials."

"The batch is next melted, Jean," explained Giusippe, as they followed
Mr. Wyman into the great brick-paved room where the furnaces were.

Here indeed was a picturesque scene. Numberless men were hurrying
hither and thither, some whirling in the air glowing masses of molten
glass; others standing before the furnace doors gathering balls of it
on the end of long iron blow-pipes which were from six to nine feet in
length. Everybody was scurrying. As soon as a ball of red-hot glass had
been collected on the end of a blow-pipe it was rushed off to the
blower before it cooled. In and out of the throng of moving workmen
young boys, or carriers, swung along bearing to the annealing ovens on
charred wooden trays or forks newly completed vases or pitchers.

Jean glanced about, fascinated by the bustling crowd.

"Here are the furnaces," the foreman said. "Each one has twelve
openings and is built with a low dome to keep in the heat. The flues or
chimneys are in the sides of the furnace. Within, and just beneath the
openings or working-holes, stand the great clay pots of molten batch.
These pots are made for us from New Jersey clay; formerly we used to
make them ourselves, but it was a great deal of trouble, and we now
find it simpler to buy them. They vary in cost from thirty to
seventy-five dollars, according to their size."

"And they are liable to break the first time they are used," whispered
Giusippe in a jesting undertone.

Mr. Wyman caught his words.

"Ah, you know something of glass-making then, my young man?"

"A little."

"The pots are, as you say, a great lottery. Sometimes one will be in
constant use three months or longer, and do good service; on the other
hand a pot may break the first time using and let all the melt into the
furnace. Then we have a lively time, I can tell you, ladling it out,
and taking care in the meantime that none of the other pots are upset."

Giusippe nodded appreciatively.

Many a day just such a catastrophe had occurred when he had been
working; vividly he recalled how all the men had been forced to come to
the rescue.

"Are the pots filled to the top with batch?" asked Mr. Cabot.

"Yes, we charge them pretty solid; but the raw material loses bulk in
melting, so they have to be filled in as the melt settles. At the end
of ten or twelve hours we have a refilling or _topping out_, as we
call it; usually this is enough. The first fill must become fluid and
its gases must escape before any more material is added; we also have
to be sure when we put the pots in the furnace that the temperature is
high enough to melt the batch immediately, or the glass will go bad."

"What do you use for fuel?"

"Crude oil. In the West they can get natural gas, and there they often
melt the batch in tanks instead of pots. But we find crude oil quite
satisfactory. You can readily understand that we cannot burn any fuel
that gives off a waste product such as coal dust or cinders, because if
we did such matter would get into the melt and speck the glass, causing
it to be imperfect. Much of the work done by the earliest glass-makers
was specked in this way, and in fact the genuineness of old glass is
sometimes determined from these very imperfections."

"I see," Mr. Cabot nodded.

"After the melt is in a fluid state it throws to the top, provided the
heat is sufficient, many impurities such as bubbles and scum. These
are, of course, skimmed off--a process called plaining. Afterward the
hot material has to be cooled before it can be worked, and reduced
from fluid to a thicker consistency. This we call _standing off_ or
_fining_."

"How long does it take to melt the batch and get it ready to use?"

"About three days. We run a relay of furnaces--three of them--and plan
so that a melt will be ready to be worked every other day; in that way
we keep plenty of usable material on hand."

"And then?"

"Then we are ready to go ahead and blow it. We make nothing but the
better grades of blown glass here; that is, no window glass or cheap
pressed ware. Of course there are some patterns, such as fluted designs
and their like, which cannot be entirely fashioned by the blower;
therefore these are first blown as nearly the required size as possible
and are then made into the desired form by shutting them inside iron
moulds and squeezing them into the proper shape. You shall see it done
later on."

He now led them up to where a gatherer stood at one of the
working-holes of the furnace.

"This man," explained Mr. Wyman, "is collecting on his blow-pipe enough
glass to make a pitcher. He uses his judgment as to the amount
necessary, but so often has he estimated it that he seldom gets either
too much or too little. He will next carry it to the blower, who will
blow it into a long, pear-shaped cylinder the size he wants the pitcher
to be."

They followed, and with much interest watched a great Swede fill his
lungs and blow into the smaller end of the iron pipe with all his
strength; immediately the ball of soft, red-hot glass began to take
form. With incredible speed the blower flattened its base upon a marver
or table topped with sheet iron. A short iron rod or pontil was next
fastened to the middle of the bottom of the pitcher in order that the
blower might hold it, and after this had been done the blow-pipe was
detached. The glass-maker sat in a sort of backless chair which had
long, flat, metal-covered arms at either side, and as he worked he
rolled the rod with its plastic material back and forth along one of
these iron arms to shape it. He then took his shears and, making an
incision at the middle of the back of the jug, he began to cut the top
into the shape he wanted it, depending entirely on his eye for the
outline. Then quick as a flash he seized a bit of round metal not
unlike a beet in shape and, pressing it inside the soft glass, made the
depression for the nose. All this was done in much less time than it
takes to tell it. A small boy, or carrier, now bobbed up at just the
proper moment and taking the pitcher on his wooden fork carried it off
to a small furnace where it was reheated at the opening or "glory
hole." This little furnace, Mr. Wyman said, was used only for the
purpose of softening glass objects which became chilled in the modeling
and began to be hard and less pliable. As soon as the boy brought the
pitcher back another lad, as if calculating by magic the precise moment
at which to appear, approached with a small mass of molten glass at the
end of his gathering-iron. This he stuck firmly against the pitcher at
the correct spot to form the base of the handle; the modeler snipped
off with his shears as much of the soft glass as he thought necessary,
turned it up, and in the twinkling of an eye fastened the upper end of
the handle in place. Then he surveyed his handiwork an instant to make
sure that it was symmetrical, straightened it just a shade with his
battledore of charred wood, and passed it over to the carrier, who bore
it off to be baked.

"Why do they use so much charred wood for the shaping?" inquired Jean.

"Metal things are liable to mark the glass, leaving upon it a print,
scratch, or other imperfection; charred wood, when worn down, is
absolutely smooth and cannot mar the material."

"Oh, yes, I see. And where have they taken the pitcher now?"

"We will follow it," replied the foreman.

Escorting them across the room he showed them a low oven or kiln. The
door of it was open, and inside they could see all sorts of glassware
which had just been finished.

"Here is where your pitcher will remain for the next three days," said
he. "We build a fire, put the completed glass in the oven, and leave it
there until the fire goes out and the oven gradually cools; we call the
process annealing. It prevents the glass from breaking when exposed to
friction or to the atmosphere. Glass is very brittle, and extremely
sensitive to heat and cold. If it were not annealed it would not be
strong, and would snap to pieces the moment it came in contact with the
outer air. Now it is very difficult to anneal glass, the trouble being
that all hollow ware is one temperature on the inside and another on
the outside. Hence, when heated, the inside takes longer to cool. Any
current of cold air that strikes it will fracture it. So, as you can
readily see, an annealing kiln or oven must be arranged in such a way
that it will allow the two surfaces to cool simultaneously."

"I think I understand," answered Jean. "And you say these things must
stay in the kiln about three days?"

"Yes, the kiln takes about that time. It is a slow process, because we
have practically no way of regulating its heat. A lehr does the work
much quicker. Over here you will see one. It is a long arch or oven
open at both ends. The glassware travels in iron pans along a moving
surface from the hot oven, or receiving end, to the cool, or
discharging end. The temperature of the lehr can be scientifically
tested and regulated, and this is very necessary, because the heavy
glass intended for cutting can stand a greater heat than can ordinary
hollow ware such as vials and table glass. We regulate the oven
according to what we are annealing in it. It does not take so long to
anneal glass in a lehr as in a kiln, and therefore in many factories
only lehrs are used. If you will come around to the cool end you can
see some of the finished pieces being taken out. Each object is made by
a certain set or gang of workmen--a shop, we call it. The work of each
shop when taken from the lehr is put in a box by itself and is then
counted up, and the men paid according to the number of perfect objects
finished. It is piece work. For instance, one shop makes only pitchers,
another wine-glasses, another vases, and so on. Every group has its
specialty, and each workman in the team understands exactly what his
part is in the whole. The common interest of turning out as many
perfect pieces as possible spurs each man to work as rapidly, well, and
helpfully as he can."

"Just like a football squad, Uncle Bob," laughed Jean.

"Exactly," nodded Mr. Wyman. "After the finished glass is taken from
the kiln or lehr it goes to the examining room, where girls dip it in
clear water and hold it to the light to test it for imperfections; then
it is sorted, packed, and shipped."

"And vases, sugar-bowls, tumblers, and most of the hollow glassware is
made in the same way?" inquired Mr. Cabot.

"Yes, practically so. The general scheme is the same. As I told you,
there are some difficult designs which must be squeezed into shape in
moulds. These are of iron, and for the convenience of the blowers are
set in holes in the floor. They are made in two parts joined by a
hinge. The molten glass is blown to the approximate size and then a boy
shuts it inside the mould and the blower blows into it until it has
entirely filled out the mould in which it is confined. When released it
is shaped to the form required."

[Illustration: "IT IS SHAPED TO THE FORM REQUIRED"]

"But doesn't it stick to the mould?"

"Seldom. The moulds are painted over on the inside with a preparation
which prevents the glass from sticking."

"Do you cut any glass here?"

"Oh, yes. Cut glass is made from the heavier crystal variety. The
design is roughly outlined upon it in white and then the cutter places
the part to be cut against an emery-wheel, which grinds out the grooves
and figures and makes the pattern. Just above each cutter's revolving
wheel is suspended a funnel of wet sand, and this drops at intervals
upon the turning disc and cools it; otherwise it would become so hot
from the friction that it could not be used. After the design has been
cut on the emery-wheel all its rough edges are smoothed off on a stone
of much finer grain. I can show you our glass cutters at work if you
would care to see them."

"Oh, do let's see them, Uncle Bob," begged Jean.

"All right; but only for a few moments. We have already taken too much
of Mr. Wyman's time, I fear. And besides, I must be back in town for
luncheon," answered Mr. Cabot.

Accordingly they went on into the next room, where Jean became so
fascinated by the whirring wheels and the men whose steady hands guided
them that it was with difficulty she could be persuaded to leave and
start for home.

"Do you think, little lady, that when you get back to Boston you can
mix up some glass for us and bake it in Hannah's oven?" questioned
Uncle Bob of her when they were at last in the car.

"I am not sure," replied the girl with a bright smile. "But certainly I
have a much clearer idea how to do it than I had before I went out to
the factory. In future when you and Giusippe talk glass-making I can at
least be a bit more intelligent. I think, too, I appreciate now how
wonderful it was that the Egyptians, Persians, and Syrians discovered
in those far-off days how to make glass. I am not at all sure,
Giusippe, that when we go to Pittsburgh I shall not steal your trade
and apply to Uncle Tom for a place in his factory."

Mr. Cabot pinched her cheek playfully.

"I guess you'd better stick to dressing dolls," he said.




CHAPTER IX

A REUNION


At length all too soon for Uncle Bob and Hannah, and indeed far sooner
than Jean and Giusippe had realized, October came, and the time for
starting for Pittsburgh was at hand. To the young people their
departure was not without its anticipations. Jean longed to see Beacon
and Uncle Tom, and Giusippe burned with eagerness to take up the
position his uncle had secured for him at Mr. Curtis's factory.

"How odd it is, Giusippe," Jean mused one day, "that we each have an
uncle waiting for us. And besides that you have an aunt, too, haven't
you? I wish I had. I'd love to have an aunt! As it is I have only
Beacon."

"Maybe you'll have one some day," was Giusippe's vaguely consoling
answer. "But anyway I shouldn't think you would care much. You have
Miss Cartright, and she is almost as good as an aunt."

"I suppose she is something like one," admitted Jean, "only, you see,
she doesn't live where I do, so I can't see her very often. Of course
she has sent me nice letters since she got home to New York and
sometimes she writes Uncle Bob, too; but it isn't really like seeing
her. When I think that the day after to-morrow she is to meet us in New
York it seems too good to be true. Won't it be fun? I love Miss
Cartright! Do you suppose she looks just the same as she did when she
was with us on the steamer?"

"I suppose so. Your uncle said she did when he saw her in New York."

"I know it. He has had lots of chances to see her because he has been
over there so many times on business trips. I wish we had. But we shall
see her now, anyway. Oh, I am so glad!" Jean whirled enthusiastically
round the room. "I think we are to have a pretty nice visit in New York
if we do all the things Uncle Bob is planning to. He says he is going
to take us to the studio of one of his friends and show us how stained
glass windows are made. I shall like to see that, sha'n't you?"

So the boy and girl chattered on little dreaming, in the delight of the
pleasures in store for them, how lonely at heart were Mr. Cabot and
poor Hannah.

"If it wasn't that Jean is coming back in the spring I should be
completely inconsolable," lamented Hannah. "I cannot bear to part with
the child. But she will surely be back again, won't she, Mr. Bob? There
won't be any other plan made? You'll certainly insist that Mr. Curtis
send her home to us in May, won't you?"

"There, there, Hannah, dry your eyes. Of course Jean will be back. I
have no more mind to lose her than you have. No one knows how I love
that child! I'd no more let her leave my home than I would cut off my
right hand," was Mr. Cabot's vehement reply.

"The boy is a splendid fellow, too," Hannah went on. "He has the
makings of a fine man, Mr. Bob."

"Yes. Giusippe is a very unusual lad. As time goes on I am more and
more convinced that we made no mistake in bringing him to America. I am
sure that we are adding a good citizen to the country. I have a feeling
that Mr. Curtis will be much interested in him."

"I wish he'd be sufficiently interested to adopt him and send Jean home
to us," suggested Hannah, smoothing out the edge of an apron she was
hemming.

"I am afraid such a scheme as that would be too good to be true,"
laughed Mr. Cabot. "If, however, he helps place Giusippe in a fine
business position I shall be satisfied. That is all I shall ask."

Nevertheless, brave as Uncle Bob tried to be, he was very solemn the
morning he saw the trunks brought down-stairs and strapped on the back
of the waiting cab.

"Cheer up, Hannah!" he called from the sidewalk. "Why, bless my soul,
if you're not crying! Come, come, this will never do! May will be here
before you know it, and the child will be back again. She is only going
on a visit--remember that. Her home is here. Say good-bye to Hannah,
you young scamps. She somehow seems to have the notion you are never to
return. Tell her she is not to get off so easily. Before many moons she
will find you two in the pantry raiding the cookie jar just as you
robbed it yesterday--you bandits!"

And so with a gaiety he did not feel Mr. Cabot hustled his charges into
the carriage and slammed the door.

The trip to New York was a blur of new impressions and the city itself,
when they reached it, another blur--a confusion of madly rushing
throngs; giant sky-scrapers; racing taxicabs; and clanging bells. To
the children it seemed a maelstrom of horror. Their one thought was to
get safely out of the crowd, have something to eat, and go to bed. But
with the morning light New York took on quite a different aspect. It
proved to be not such a bad place after all. The solitary fact that it
harbored Miss Cartright was quite enough to redeem it in their eyes.
Then there was so much to see which was new and strange! Directly after
breakfast Uncle Bob took them out for a stroll and after a walk in the
brisk air he led them into Tiffany's.

"While we have time and are right here I want to show you one of the
most wonderful glass products of America," said he. "It is called
Favril glass and is made at Coronna, Long Island. Just how, I do not
know. The process is a secret one. You remember, don't you, the
marvelous iridescent colors of the ancient Egyptian glass we saw in the
British Museum? And you recall how exquisite was the turquoise glaze on
some of the old pieces? Well, the Tiffany people have tried to imitate
that, and so well have they succeeded that they have received many
medals in recognition of their skill. Museums all over the world from
Tokio to Christiania have purchased collections of the glass that it
may be exhibited and enjoyed by young and old. I am going to show you
some of it now."

Up in an elevator they sped, and alighting at one of the upper floors
Uncle Bob led the way into a room rich with silken hangings and rare
oriental rugs; all about this room were vases, plates, lamp-shades, and
ornaments of beautiful hues. There were great golden glass bowls
glinting with elusive lights of violet, blue, and yellow; there were
vases opalescent with burning flecks of orange and copper; there were
green glass plates and globes which shaded into tones of blue as
delicate as mother-of-pearl.

"Oh!" sighed Jean rapturously, "I never saw anything so lovely! Look at
these plates, Uncle Bob, do look at them. How ever did they get the
color? It is like a sunset."

"The Tiffanys, like Blaschka the flower modeler, are not telling the
world how they get their results. Rest assured, however, many and many
hours must have been spent in experiments before such artistic products
could be obtained."

"Think of the struggles with color and with firing," Giusippe murmured.

"And the pieces that must have been spoiled!" put in Jean.

"But think of the triumph of at last taking from the lehrs such gems as
these! The results which air, soil, and age have by chance produced in
the ancient Egyptian and Græco-Syrian glass the Tiffanys have created
in a modern ware. It is a great achievement, and a royal contribution
to the art of the world."

The children would have been glad to linger for a much longer time in
the vast shop had not the chime of a clock warned them that the noon
hour, when they were to meet Miss Cartright, was approaching. She had
promised to lunch with them all at the Holland House.

Yes, she looked just the same, "only prettier," Jean whispered to
Giusippe. Certainly there was an added glow of beauty on her cheek and
a new sweetness in her smile. How glad she was to see them! And how
glad, glad, glad they were to see her. Miraculously from somewhere
Uncle Bob produced a great bunch of violets which she fastened in her
gown and then amid a confusion of merry chatter and laughter they went
in to luncheon.

It was indeed a royal luncheon!

Uncle Bob seemed inclined to order everything on the menu, and it was
not until Miss Cartright protested that not only the young people but
she herself would be ill, that he was to be stayed. And what a joke it
was when the waiter bent down and asked her if both her son and
daughter would take some of the hot chocolate!

Oh, it was a jolly luncheon!

And after it was finished and they all had declared that not until next
Thanksgiving could they think of eating anything more, off they shot in
a taxicab to the studio of Uncle Bob's friend, Mr. Norcross, who had
promised over the telephone to show them the window he was making for a
church in Chicago.

They found the studio at the top of one of New York's high buildings,
and it was flooded with light from the west and south; on one side of
the room was an open space large enough to allow an immense stained
glass window to be set up.

Mr. Norcross, who was an old college friend of Uncle Bob's, greeted
them cordially and when Miss Cartright remarked on the airiness of his
workshop he answered:

"Yes, I have plenty of air up here; of course I enjoy it, too. But air,
after all, is not the important factor which I consider. My stock in
trade is light. Without it I could do nothing. Through the medium of
strong sunlight I must test my work, for stained glass is beautiful
chiefly as the light plays through it. It is not a tapestry nor a
picture--it is primarily a window. Its colors must be rich in the light
but not glaring; and its design must be so thoughtfully executed that
the telling figures will stand forth when there is a strong sunset, for
instance, behind them."

"Of course, then, you must take care that the colors you use do not
prove too powerful and overshadow your central figures," said Miss
Cartright.

"Ah, you paint?"

"Yes, but not as I want to," was the wistful answer. "I do portraits.
So I can readily see that your problem is a unique, and far more
difficult one than mine. I have only a changeless color scheme to
consider, while your colors shift with every cloud that passes across
the sky."

Mr. Norcross nodded with pleasure at her instant appreciation of his
difficulties.

"Have you ever seen stained glass in the making?" he asked.

She shook her head.

"Neither have any of the rest of us, Norcross," put in Mr. Cabot. "That
is what we came for. I have been toting these two youthful friends of
mine all over the world and together we have investigated almost every
known form of glass, from the Naples Vase down to an American lamp
chimney."

Mr. Norcross smiled.

"So you see," Uncle Bob went on, "I wanted them to witness this phase
of glass-making."

"They certainly shall. How did you chance to be so interested in the
making of glass?" inquired the artist, turning to Giusippe.

"I am a Venetian, señor. For over six generations my people have been
at Murano."

"Oh, then, what wonder! And that accounts for your own personal color
scheme."

The artist let his eyes dwell upon the Italian's face intently: then
glanced at Miss Cartright.

"I did a portrait of Giusippe," she responded quietly, "when I was in
Venice a few years ago. He did not look so much like an American then."

"Modern clothing certainly does take the picturesqueness out of some of
us," answered Mr. Cabot.

In the meantime Giusippe had wandered off to the distant side of the
studio and now stood before a large glass panel calling excitedly:

"Is this the window you are making, señor? How beautiful! The violet
light behind the woman's head, and that yellow glow on her hair--it is
wonderful! And her white drapery against the background of green!"

Mr. Norcross came to his side, flushing with gratification.

"The mellow tones playing on her hair were hard to get. I spent a lot
of time working at them. It isn't easy to get the results one wants
when making stained glass."

"What did you do first, Mr. Norcross, when you began the window?" asked
Jean timidly.

"I will show you every step I have taken in doing it if you would like
to follow the process. In the first place I went to Chicago and studied
the light and the setting which it was to have. Then I made this small
water-color design and submitted it for approval to the persons who
were ordering the window. The drawing accepted, I set about making a
full-sized cartoon which I sketched in with charcoal on this heavy
paper; the black lines represent the leading and the horizontal
stay-bars necessary to hold the glass in place. After that I sliced up
my cartoon into a multitude of small pieces from which the glass could
be cut and the lead lines decided upon. All this done I went to work
planning my color scheme--thinking out what dominating colors I would
use and where I would place my high lights."

"And then you were ready for your glass?" inquired Mr. Cabot.

"Yes. Now selecting the glass is not alone a matter of color; it is
also a problem of thickness. Sometimes a variation in tone can be
obtained merely by using a bit of heavier glass in some one spot. Again
the effect must be obtained by the use of paint."

"What kind of glass do you use, Mr. Norcross?" Giusippe questioned.

"What we call bottle, or Norman, glass. We get it from England, and
strangely enough there is a heavy duty on it in its raw state. One can
import a whole window free of duty because it is listed as an art work;
but the glass out of which an art work is to be constructed costs a
very high price. Odd, isn't it? As soon as I reach the point of using
glass I arrange it on a large plate glass easel, using wax in the
spaces where the lead is to go. Then I experiment and experiment with
my colors. You probably know that in making modern stained glass a
great deal of paint is used in order to get shading and degrees of
color. It was toward the end of the thirteenth century that the old
glass-makers began to introduce the use of paint into their windows.
First came the grisaille glass, as it was called, where instead of
strong reds and blues most of the window was in white painted with
scroll work in which a few bits of brilliant stained glass were set
like jewels. Then with the fourteenth century came those elaborate
painted canopies and borders within which were the main figures of the
window in stained glass. From that time on the combination of stained
and painted glass was used. Accordingly we all work by that method now.
So, as I say, I paint in my glass and afterward it has to be fired, all
the small pieces being laid out on heavy sheets of steel covered with
plaster of paris."

"Do your colors always come out as you mean to have them?" inquired
Giusippe, his eyes on the artist's face.

Mr. Norcross shrugged his shoulders.

"You know, don't you, how the firing often changes the tone, and how
you frequently get a color you neither intended nor desired. That is
one of the tribulations of stained glass making. Another is when the
cutters must trim down the glass and put the lead in place. You may not
realize that there are three widths of lead from which to select; it is
not always easy to choose for every part of the design the thickness
which will look the best. For instance, sometimes the leading will be
too strong and overwhelm the picture; again it will be too weak and
render the window characterless."

"It must be a fascinating puzzle to work out," mused Miss Cartright.

"Yes; but it is also a great test of the patience."

"Were the old glass windows made in this same way, do you suppose?"
asked Jean after a pause.

"I presume the old glass-makers worked along the same general plan,
although they may not have followed exactly the present-day methods;
certain it is, however, that they knew all the many tricks or devices
for getting color effects--knew them far better than we do now. And
they put endless time and thought into their work, no artist feeling it
beneath his dignity to follow the humblest detail of his conception. He
watched over his art-child until it got to be full-grown. This is the
only way to get fine results. For, you see, there is no set rule for a
glass designer to apply. Each window presents a fresh problem in the
management of light and color. There is no branch of art more elusive
or more difficult than this. I must be able to construct a window which
will be satisfactory as a flat piece of decoration; it must be
sufficiently interesting to give pleasure even when it stands in a dim
light. Then presto--the sun moves round, and my window is transformed!
And in the flood of light that passes through it I must still be able
to find it beautiful."

"I think that I should like to learn to make stained glass," declared
Giusippe, who had become so absorbed that he had moved close beside Mr.
Norcross.

"Would you?"

The artist smiled down kindly at him. "In your country you have many a
fine example of glass. France, too, is rich in rose windows which are
the despair of our modern craftsmen. But we glass-makers are working
hard and earnestly, and who knows but in time we may give to the world
such glass as is at Rheims, Tours, Amiens, and Chartres."

"What sort of paint do you use?" asked Mr. Cabot as he took up a brush
and idly examined it in his fingers.

"A kind of opaque enamel containing fusible material which is melted by
heat and thereafter adheres to the surface of the glass. It must,
however, be used carefully, as it possesses so much body that too much
of it will obscure the light--the thing a stained glass window should
never do. We should have many more successful windows if the people
making them would only bear in mind that a window is not a picture, and
should not be treated as one. For my part, I make my window a window. I
join the pieces of glass frankly together, not trying to conceal the
lead that holds them. I cannot say that I get the results either with
colors or lights that I want to get; but I am trying, with the old
masters as my ideal."

"Certainly you are a long way on the road if you can turn out a window
as beautiful as this one promises to be. None of us reaches the ideal,
Mr. Norcross, but in the past is the inspiration that what man has done
man can do. Perhaps not now, but in the future," Miss Cartright said
softly.

"I wish I might try stained glass making," Giusippe said again.

"Perhaps some time you will, my boy," answered Mr. Norcross, "and
perhaps, too, your generation may succeed where mine has failed, and
give to the world another Renaissance. Remember, all the great deeds
haven't been done yet."




CHAPTER X

TWO UNCLES AND A NEW HOME


Uncle Tom Curtis arrived in New York toward the end of the children's
visit, good-byes were said to Miss Cartright and to Uncle Bob, and
within the space of a day Jean and Giusippe were amid new surroundings.
Here was quite a different type of city from Boston--a city with many
beautiful buildings, fine residences, and a swarm of great factories
which belched black smoke up into the blue of the sky. Here, too, were
Giusippe's aunt and uncle with a hearty welcome for him; and here,
furthermore, was the new position which the boy had so eagerly craved
in the glass works. The place given Giusippe, however, did not prove to
be the one his uncle had secured for him after all; for during the
journey from New York Uncle Tom Curtis had had an opportunity to study
the young Italian, and the result of this better acquaintance turned
out to be exactly what Uncle Bob Cabot had predicted; Uncle Tom became
tremendously interested in the Venetian, and before they arrived at
Pittsburgh had decided to put him in quite a different part of the
works from that which he had at first intended.

"Your nephew has splendid stuff in him," explained Mr. Curtis to
Giusippe's uncle. "I mean to start him further up the ladder than most
of the boys who come here. We will give him every chance to rise and
we'll see what use he makes of the opportunity. He is a very
interesting lad."

Accordingly, while Jean struggled with French, algebra, drawing,
history, and literature at the new school in which Uncle Tom had
entered her and while she and Fräulein Decker had many a combat with
German, Giusippe began wrestling with the problems of plate glass
making.

The factory was an immense one, covering a vast area in the
manufacturing district of the city; it was a long way from the
residential section where Jean lived, and as the boy and girl had
become great chums they at first missed each other very much. Soon,
however, the rush of work filled in the gaps of loneliness. Each was
far too busy to lament the other, and since Uncle Tom invented all
sorts of attractive plans whereby they could be together on Saturday
afternoons and Sundays the weeks flew swiftly along. There were motor
trips, visits to the museums and churches of the city, and long walks
with Beacon wriggling to escape from the leash which reined him in.

Uncle Tom's home was much more formal than Uncle Bob's. It stood, one
of a row of tall gray stone houses, fronting a broad avenue on which
there was a great deal of driving. It had a large library and a still
larger dining-room in which Jean playfully protested she knew she
should get lost. But stately as the dwelling was it was not so big and
formidable after all if once you got upstairs; on the second floor were
Uncle Tom's rooms and a dainty little bedroom, study, and bath for
Jean. On the floor above a room was set apart for Giusippe, so that he
might stay at the house whenever he chose. Saturday nights and Sundays
he always spent at Uncle Tom's; the rest of the time he lived with his
uncle and aunt.

To Giusippe it was good to be once more with his kin and talk in his
native language; and yet such a transformation had a few months in the
United States made in him that he found that he was less and less
anxious to remain an Italian and more and more eager to become an
American. His uncle, who had made but a poor success of life in Venice,
and who had secured in his foster country prosperity and happiness,
declared there was no land like it. He missed, it is true, the warm,
rich beauty of his birthplace beyond the seas, and many a time talked
of it to his wife and Giusippe; but the lure of the great throbbing
American city gripped him with its fascination. It presented endless
opportunity--the chance to learn, to possess, to win out.

"If you have brains and use them, if you are not afraid of hard work,
there is no limit to what a man may do and become over here," he told
Giusippe. "That is why I like it, and why I never shall go back to
Italy. Just you jump in, youngster, and don't you worry but you'll
bring up somewhere in the end."

There was no need to urge a lad of Giusippe's make-up to "jump in"; on
the contrary it might, perhaps, have been wiser advice to caution him
not to take his new work too hard. He toiled early and late, never
sparing himself, never thinking of fatigue. Physically he was a rugged
boy, and to this power was linked the determination to make good.
Before he had been a month in the glass house he was recognized by all
the men as one who would make of each task merely a stepping-stone to
something higher. His uncle was congratulated right and left on having
such a nephew, and very proud indeed he was of Giusippe.

In the meantime Uncle Tom Curtis, although apparently busy with more
important matters, kept his eyes and ears open. Frequent reports
concerning his protégé reached him in his far-away office at the other
end of the works. Indeed the boy would have been not a little surprised
had he known how very well informed about his progress the head of the
firm really was. But Uncle Tom never said much. He did, however, write
Uncle Bob that to bring home a penniless Italian as a souvenir of
Venice was not such a crazy scheme after all as he had at first
supposed it. From Uncle Tom this was rare praise, a complete
vindication, in fact. Uncle Bob chuckled over the letter and showed it
to Hannah, who rubbed her hands and declared things were working out
nicely.

"Some day, Giusippe," remarked Uncle Tom one evening after dinner, when
together with the young people he was sitting within the crimson glow
of the library lamp, "I propose you take Jean through the works. It is
ridiculous that a niece of mine should acquaint herself with the
history of the glass of all the past ages and never go through her own
uncle's factory. What do you say, missy? Would you like to go?"

"Of course, Uncle Tom, I'd love to. I wrote Uncle Bob only the other
day that I wanted dreadfully to see how plate glass was made and hoped
some time you'd take me. I didn't like to ask you for fear you were too
busy."

"I have been a little rushed, I'll admit. We business men," he slapped
Giusippe on the shoulder, "live in a good deal of a whirl--eh,
Giusippe?"

"I know you do, sir."

"And you? You have nothing to do, I suppose. It chances that I have
heard to the contrary, my lad. You've put in some mighty good work
since you came here, and I am much gratified by the spirit you've
shown."

Giusippe glowed. It was not a common thing for Mr. Curtis to commend.

"I didn't know, sir, that you----"

"Knew what you were doing? Didn't any one ever tell you that I have a
search-light and a telescope in my office?" Uncle Tom laughed. "Oh, I
keep track of things even if I do seem to be otherwise occupied. So
look out for yourself! Beware! My eyes may be upon you almost any
time."

"I am not afraid, sir," smiled the boy.

"And you have no cause to be, either, my lad," was Uncle Tom's serious
rejoinder. "Now you and Jean fix up some date to see the works. Why not
to-morrow? It is Saturday, and she will not be at school."

"But I work Saturday mornings, Mr. Curtis."

"Can't somebody else do your work for you?"

"I have never asked that."

"Well, I will. We'll arrange it. Let us say to-morrow then. Take Jean
and explain things to her. You can do it, can't you?"

"I think so. Most of the process I understand now, and if there is
anything that I need help about I can ask."

"That's right. Just go ahead and complete the girl's education in
glass-making so she can write her Boston uncle that she is now
qualified to superintend any glass works that may require her
oversight."

Jean laughed merrily.

"I am afraid I should be rather a poor superintendent, Uncle Tom," said
she. "There seems to be such a lot to know about glass."

"There is," agreed Mr. Curtis. "Sometimes I feel as if about everything
in the world was made of it. Of course you've seen the ink erasers made
of a cluster of fine glass fibres. Oh, yes; they have them. And the
aigrettes made in the same way and used in ladies' bonnets. Then there
are those beautiful brocades having fine threads of spun glass woven
into them in place of gold and silver; it was a Toledo firm, by the
way, that presented to the Infanta Eulalie of Spain a dress of satin
and glass woven together. To-day came an order from California for
glass to serve yet another purpose; you could never guess what. The
people out there want some of our heaviest polished plate to make the
bottoms of boats."

"Of boats!"

"Boats," repeated Uncle Tom, nodding.

"But--but why make a glass-bottomed boat?"

"Well, in California, Florida, and many other warm climates boats with
bottoms of glass are much in use. Sightseers go out to where the water
is clear and by looking down through the transparent bottom of the boat
they can see, as they go along, the wonderful plant and animal life of
the ocean. Such reptiles, such fish, such seaweeds as there are! I have
heard that it is as interesting as moving pictures, and quite as
thrilling, too."

"I'd like to do it," said Giusippe.

"I shouldn't," declared Jean with a shudder. "I hate things that
writhe, and squirm, and wriggle. Imagine being so near those hideous
creatures! Why, if I once should see them I should never dare to go in
bathing again. I'd rather not know what's in the sea."

"There is something in that, little lady," Uncle Tom answered, slipping
one of his big hands over the two tiny ones in the girl's lap.
"Giusippe and I will keep the sea monsters out of your path, then; and
the land monsters, too, if we can. Now it is time you children got to
bed, for to-morrow you must make an early start. You'd better telephone
your aunt or uncle that you are going to stay here to-night, Giusippe.
If you do not work to-morrow you will not need to get to the factory
until Jean and I do; it will be much simpler for you to remain here and
go down with us in the car. I'll call up your boss and explain matters.
Good-night, both of you. Now scamper! I want to read my paper."

                     *        *        *        *

The next morning the Curtis family was promptly astir, and after
breakfast Uncle Tom with his two charges rolled off to the factory in
the big red limousine.

"Your superintendent says you are welcome to the morning off,
Giusippe," Mr. Curtis remarked as they sped along. "But he did have the
grace to say he should miss you. Now it seems to me that if you are to
give Jean a clear idea of what we do at the works you better begin with
the sheet glass department. That will interest her, I am sure; later
you can show her where you yourself work."

The car pulled up at Mr. Curtis's office, and they all got out.

"Good-bye! Good luck to you," he called as the boy and girl started
off.

Jean waved her hand.

"We will be back here and ready to go home with you, Uncle Tom, at one
o'clock," she called over her shoulder.

"We won't be late, sir."

"See that you're not. I shall be hungry and shall not want to wait. I
guess you'll have an appetite, too, by that time."

"Is sheet glass blown, Giusippe?" inquired Jean, as they went across
the yard. "I hate to ask stupid questions, but you see I do not know
anything about it."

"That isn't a stupid question. Quite the contrary. Yes, sheet glass is
blown. You shall see it done, too."

"But I do not understand how they can get it flattened out, if they
blow it."

"You will."

The boy led the way through a low arched door.

Before the furnaces within the great room a number of glass-blowers
were at work. They stood upon wooden stagings, each one of which was
built over a well or pit in the floor, and was just opposite an opening
in the furnace.

"Each of these men has a work-hole of the furnace to himself, so that
he may heat his material any time he needs to do so. The staging gives
him room to swing his heavy mass of glass as he blows it, and the pit
in the floor, which is about ten feet deep, furnishes space for the big
cylinder to run out, or grow longer, as he blows. The gathering for
sheet glass is done much as was that for the smaller pieces. The
gatherer collects a lump on his pipe, cools it a little, and collects
more until he has enough. He then rests it on one of those wooden
blocks such as you see over there; the block is hollowed out so to let
the blower expand the glass to the diameter he wants it."

"But I should think the block would burn when the hot glass is forced
inside it."

"It would if it were not first sprinkled with water. Sometimes hollow
metal blocks are used instead. In that case water passes through to
keep them cool, and they are dusted over with charcoal to keep them
from sticking, and from scratching the glass. After a sufficiently
large mass of glass has been gathered and reheated to a workable
condition the blower begins his task. First he swings the great red-hot
lump about so that it will get longer. His aim is to make a long
cylinder and into it he must blow constantly in order to keep it full
of air. Watch that man now at work. See how deft he is, and how strong.
The even thickness of the glass, and the uniformity of its size, depend
entirely upon his skill. If he finds the cylinder running out too fast,
or in other words getting too long, he shifts it up over his head,
always taking care, however, to keep it upright."

Jean watched.

How rapidly the man worked with the great mass on his blow-pipe! Now he
blew it far down into the pit beneath, where it hung like a mighty,
elongated soap-bubble; now he swung it to and fro; now lifted it above
his head. And all the time he was blowing into it blasts of air from
his powerful lungs.

"The cylinder doesn't seem to get any bigger round," observed Jean at
last.

"No. Its diameter was fixed at the beginning by the wooden block. That
settles its size once and for all; it is the length and thickness of
the cylinder which are governed by the blower. Do you realize how
strong a man has to be to wield such a weight as that lump of metal? It
is no easy matter. Luckily he can suspend it against that wooden rest
if he gets too tired. In England they use a sort of iron frame called
an _Iron Man_ to relieve the blower of the weight of the glass and
the device was also used at one time in Belgium; but the Belgian
workmen gradually did away with it."

For a long time the two children stood there fascinated by the skill of
the blowers.

"Suppose we go on now and see the rest of the process," suggested
Giusippe, a little unwillingly. "I could watch these men all day, but
we have much to do, and if we do not hurry we shall not get through."

The next step in the work was opening out the cylinders, and this was
done in two ways. The end of those made of thinner glass was put into
the furnace while at the same time air was forced inside through the
blow-pipe. As a result the air expanded by the heat of the fire, and
burst open the cylinder at its hottest or weakest end. By placing this
opening downward it was widened to the diameter necessary. The
cylinders of thicker glass were opened by fastening to one end a lump
of hot metal, thereby weakening them at this point. When the air was
forced in by the blower it burst open the mass and the break thus made
was enlarged by cutting it round with the scissors.

"Now come on, Jean, and see them flatten it out," said Giusippe.

Upon a wooden rest or chevalet the cylinder was now laid and detached
from the pipe by placing a bit of cold steel against the part of the
glass that still clung to the blow-pipe. At once the neck of the glass,
which was hot, contracted at the touch of the cold metal and broke away
from the pipe. The small end was then taken off by winding round it a
thread of hot glass, and afterward applying cold iron or steel at any
point the thread had covered.

"The cylinder is now finished at top and bottom and is ready to be
split up the side," said Giusippe. "This they do with a rule and a
diamond point mounted in a long handle. The diamond point is drawn
along the inside of the cylinder and opens it out flat. If there are
any imperfections in the glass the cutter plans to have them come as
near the edge of this opening as possible so there will be little
waste."

Jean nodded.

"Now, as you will see, the glass is ready for the flattener. First he
warms it in the flue of his furnace and then, using his croppie or
iron, he puts it on the flattening-stone; if you look carefully you
will see that the top of this stone is covered with a large sheet of
glass. In the heat of the furnace the cylinder with the split uppermost
soon opens out and falls back in a wavy mass. See?"

Jean watched intently as the great roll of glass unfolded and spread
into billows. The moment it was fairly open the flattener took his
polissoir, a rod of iron with a block of wood at one end, and began
smoothing out the uneven sheet of glass into a flat surface. At times
he had to rub it with all his strength to straighten it. This done the
flattening-stone was moved on wheels to a cooler part of the furnace
and the sheet of glass upon it was transferred to a cooling-stone. When
stiff enough it was taken off and placed either flat or on edge in a
rack with other sheets.

So the process went on.

Cylinder after cylinder was blown, opened up, flattened, and annealed.
So quickly did the single sheets of glass cool that it was not much
more than half an hour from the time they entered the flattening kiln
before they came out thoroughly annealed. They were then carried to the
warehouse for inspection and the especially fine ones were selected to
be polished into patent glass. The sheets were rated as bests, seconds,
thirds, and fourths, and their average size was 48 x 34 or 36 inches,
although the foreman said that sometimes sheets as large as 82 x 42 or
75 x 50 had been made. These, however, were exceedingly difficult to
handle, as they were in constant danger of being broken. The mass of
glass was also very heavy for the blower to wield.

"The great advantage of sheet glass over crown glass is that it can be
made in large pieces. Of course it is not as brilliant as crown, but it
is much more useful," added the workman.

"What is crown glass?" whispered Jean to Giusippe.

"It is a variety of glass manufactured by another process," was the
reply. "We do not make it here. Do you remember the bull's eye glass
windows we saw in England? Well, each of those bull's eyes came from
the center of a sheet of crown glass just where a lump of hot glass was
attached so the blower could whirl or spin it from the middle and make
it into a flat disc. But, as you can readily understand, a sheet of
glass with this mark or defect right in the center will never cut to
advantage, and therefore only comparatively small pieces can be got out
of it; there is much waste. Yet, as the man says, it has a wonderfully
brilliant surface. Now I am not going to let you stay here any longer
or we shall not have time to see the part of the factory where I am
working. I'm in the plate glass department, and I intend to drag you
off to the casting hall this very moment."

Jean laughed.

"Before you go, though, you must understand that plate glass is quite a
different thing from these others. It is not blown at all. Instead the
melt is poured out on an iron table just as molasses candy is turned
out of a pan to cool. You'll see how it is done."

They crossed the yard and entered another part of the works; Giusippe
gave the foreman a word of greeting as they went in.

On each side of the great room were the annealing ovens, and down the
center of the hall on a track moved a casting table which rolled along
on wheels. The pots of molten glass or metal were first taken from the
furnaces and carried on trucks to this casting table. Here they were
lifted by a crane, suspended above the table, and then tilted over, and
the glass poured out.

[Illustration: "THE MELT IS POURED OUT ON AN IRON TABLE"]

"For all the world like a pan of fudge!" declared Jean.

Giusippe laughed.

"I guess you would find it the stickiest, heaviest fudge you ever tried
to manage," said he.

The instant the mass of soft metal was on the table a roller of
cast-iron was passed very swiftly back and forth over it, spreading it
to uniform thickness, and at the same time flattening it.

"The thickness of the glass is gauged by the strips of iron on which
the roller moves," explained Giusippe to Jean. "These can be adjusted
to any thickness. Notice how rapidly the men have to work. The glass
must be finished while it is hot, or there will be flaws in it. It is a
rushing job, I can tell you."

"But--but you don't call this stuff plate glass, do you?" inquired the
girl in dismay. "It does not look like it--at least not like any I ever
saw used as shop windows or for mirrors."

"Oh, it is not done yet. But it is what we call rough plate. That's the
kind that is used where light and not transparency is needed. You often
see it in office doors or in skylights of buildings. To get the
beautiful polished plate glass that you are talking about this rough
plate must be polished over and over again. But before it can be
polished it must first be annealed as rough plate. It goes into the
annealing ovens right from this table and comes out all irregular--full
of pits and imperfections. No matter how flat the casting table is, or
how much care is taken, the surface of the glass after annealing is
always bad. If it is to be made into polished plate it must be ground
down first with sand and water; then ground smoother still with a
coarse kind of emery stone and water; next ground again with water and
powdered emery stone. After that comes the smoothing process done with
a finer sort of emery and water. Last of all the sheet is bedded, as we
call it, and each side is polished with rouge, or red oxide, between
moving pads of felt."

"Goodness!" ejaculated Jean. "Do you mean to say they have to go
through all that with every sheet of plate glass?"

"Every sheet of _polished_ plate," corrected Giusippe. "Rough plate
does not need to be polished or ground down much. It is made merely for
use and not for beauty. Sometimes to add strength, and help support the
weight of large sheets, wire netting is embedded in them. Wired glass
like this was the invention of an American named Schuman and it is used
a great deal; the wire not only relieves the weight of the glass but
serves the double purpose of holding the pieces should any break off
and start to fall. Often, too, insurance companies specify that it
shall be used as a matter of fire protection."

"But I should think if plate glass--I mean polished plate," Jean
hurriedly corrected her error, "has to be ground down so much there
wouldn't be anything left of it. It must come out dreadfully thin."

"The casters have to consider that and allow for it," answered the
Italian. "They expect part of the glass will have to be ground away, so
they cast it thicker in the first place. A large, perfect sheet of
polished plate is quite an achievement. From beginning to end it
requires the greatest care, and if spoiled it is a big loss not only in
actual labor but because of the amount of material required to make it.
Even at the very last it may be injured in the warehouse either by
scratching or breaking. It is there that it is cut in the size pieces
desired."

"How?"

"With a rule and diamond point just such as is used for cutting sheet
glass. The surface is scratched to give the line of fracture and then
it is split evenly."

"I should hate to have the responsibility of cutting or handling it
when it is all done," Jean observed with a little shiver.

"Well you might. Only men of the greatest skill and experience are
allowed to touch the big, heavy sheets. The risk is too great. They
turn only the best workmen into the plate glass department."

"But you work here, don't you, Giusippe?"

"I? Oh, I--I'm just learning," was the boy's modest reply.

"You seem to have learned pretty well," said a voice at his elbow.

Turning the lad was astonished to find Mr. Curtis standing just behind
him.

"I must own up to being an eavesdropper," laughed the older man. "I
couldn't resist knowing whether you were instructing Jean as she should
be instructed, Giusippe. Don't worry. I have no fault to find. I
couldn't have explained it better myself. You shall have your diploma
on plate glass making any time you want it."

Then as the superintendent advanced to speak to him, Mr. Curtis added:

"You had given your pupil a good bringing up, Mr. Hines. He does you
credit."




CHAPTER XI

JEAN'S TELEGRAM AND WHAT IT SAID


The winter in Pittsburgh passed rapidly. For Jean it was a happy year
despite much hard work at school, German lessons with Fräulein, and
long hours of piano practising. It seemed as if the scales and finger
exercises were endless and sometimes the girl wondered which had the
more miserable fate--she who was forced to drum the same old things
over and over, or poor Uncle Tom who had to listen when she was doing
it. And yet as she looked back over her busy days she realized that she
neither studied nor practised all the time. No, there was many a good
time interspersed in her routine. For example, there was the
Shakespeare play at the school, a performance of "As You Like It," in
which Jean herself took the part of "Rosalind." This was an excitement
indeed! Uncle Tom became so interested that he got out his book and
spent several evenings coaching the leading lady, as he called the
girl; one night he even went so far as to impersonate "Orlando," and he
and Jean gave a dress rehearsal in the library, greatly to Giusippe's
delight and amusement. This set them all to reading Shakespeare aloud,
and going to a number of presentations of the dramas then being given
in the city. To the young people all this was new and wonderful, for up
to the present they had been little to the theater.

In the meantime Giusippe was also having his struggles. It was a
rushing season at the factory, there being many large orders to fill;
the mill hummed night and day and in consequence the scores of
glass-makers looked happy and prosperous. No one was out of employment
or on half pay, and none of the workmen dreaded Christmas because there
was nothing to put in the kiddies' stockings.

With Christmas came Uncle Bob and oh, what a holiday there was then!
Was ever a Christmas tree so beautiful, or a Christmas dinner so
delicious? Giusippe brought his aunt and uncle to the great house, and
in the evening there was a dance for Jean and some of her school
friends. Uncle Bob, who was in the gayest of spirits, danced with all
the girls; introduced everybody to everybody; and brought heaping
plates of salad to the dancers. There seemed to be nothing he could not
do from putting up Christmas greens to playing the piano until the
belated musicians arrived. The party could never had been given without
him, that was certain. It was a Christmas long to be remembered!

And when he left the next morning it was with the understanding that
Jean should return to Boston the first of May. Uncle Tom looked pretty
grave when he was reminded that the days of his niece's stay with him
were numbered; and it was amusing to hear him use the very arguments
that Uncle Bob had voiced when Jean had left Boston for Pittsburgh
months before.

"It isn't as if the child was never coming back," he told Giusippe.
"Her home is here; she is only going to Boston for her vacation. We
should be selfish indeed to grudge her a few weeks at the seashore.
Pittsburgh is rather warm in summer."

Thus Uncle Tom consoled himself, and as the days flew past tried to put
out of his mind the inevitable day of parting.

Then came May and with it a very unexpected happening. Jean's trunk was
packed, and she was all ready to leave for the East, when Uncle Tom was
taken sick.

"I doubt if it is anything but overwork and fatigue," said the doctor.
"Mr. Curtis has, I find, been carrying a great deal of care this
winter. It is good to do a rushing business, of course, but when one
has to rush along with it the wear and tear on the nerves is pretty
severe."

"You don't think he will be ill long, do you?" questioned Jean
anxiously.

"I cannot tell. Such cases are uncertain. He just needs rest--to give
up work for a while and stay at home. Recreation, diversion,
amusement--that's what he wants. Read to him; motor with him; walk with
him; keep him entertained. Things like that will do far more good than
medicine."

"But--but--I'm--I'm going away to-morrow for the rest of the summer,"
stammered Jean.

"Away? Humph! That's unfortunate."

"Why, you don't really think I am any use here, do you? Enough use to
remain, I mean," the girl inquired in surprise. "Uncle Tom doesn't--you
don't mean that he _needs_ me; that I could do good by staying?"

A flush overspread her face. That any one should need her! And most of
all such a big strong man as Uncle Tom. The idea was unbelievable.
Hitherto life had been a matter of what others should do for her. She
had been a child with no obligations save to do as she was told. Her
two uncles whom she loved so much had discussed her fate and decided
between them what her course should be. Now, all at once, there was no
pilot at the wheel. The directing of the ship fell to her guidance. In
the space of those few moments, as if by a miracle, Jean Cabot ceased
to be a child and became a woman.

"Mr. Curtis is very fond of you, isn't he?" asked the physician. "He
will miss you if you are not here, I am afraid. Who else is there in
the house to be a companion for him?"

"No one but Fräulein, and of course she is getting older and is not
very strong."

"Unfortunate!" repeated the doctor.

"It is not at all necessary for me to go to-morrow," Jean said quickly.
"I can postpone it and stay here just as well as not, and I think it
would be much better if I did." She spoke with deepening conviction.
"I'll telegraph my uncle in Boston and explain to him that I cannot
leave just now."

What a deal of dignity stole into that single word "cannot."

At last there was a duty to fulfil toward some one else--some one who
really needed her. Jean repeated the amazing fact over and over to
herself. She had a place to fill. She and Uncle Tom had reversed their
obligations; he was now the weak one, she the strong.

With a happy heart the girl went back up-stairs.

Uncle Tom was lying very still in bed, his face turned away from the
door; but he heard her light step and put out his hand.

"My little girl," he whispered.

Jean slipped her soft palm into his.

"Did I wake you?"

"No, dear. I was not asleep. I cannot sleep these days. Last night I
heard the clock strike almost every hour. It has been so right along. I
cannot recall when I have had a full night's rest. No sooner do I go to
bed than my mind travels like a whirlwind over everything I've done
through the day. There is no peace, no stopping it."

"We will stop it, dear. Don't worry, Uncle Tom. The doctor says you are
just a little tired, and he is going to give you some medicine that
will help you to feel better. Then you are to stay at home and rest for
a while. To-morrow you shall have your breakfast in bed and later, when
it is sunny and warm, I shall take you for a nice motor ride."

"But--but you forget, girlie, that to-morrow you won't be here."

"Oh, yes I shall. I'm going to stay. There is no law against my
changing my mind and not going to Boston, is there?"

Jean smiled down at him.

"I've wired Uncle Bob that I am going to postpone my visit," she added.

A light came into the man's eyes.

"Did the doctor----?"

"No, he didn't. I decided it myself. Do you suppose for a moment I'd
leave you just when you are going to be here at home and have some time
to entertain me? Indeed, no! Lately you've been so busy that you
couldn't take me anywhere. Now you are to desert the office and be
under my orders for a while. Oh, we'll do lots of nice things. We'll go
off in the motor and see all sorts of places I've wanted to see; and
we'll walk; and we'll read some of those books we have been trying to
get time to read together. We shall have great fun."

Mr. Curtis looked keenly at the girl for a few seconds.

"Perhaps," he remarked at last, "it won't make much difference to Uncle
Bob if you do postpone your visit for a week or two."

"I am sure it won't."

There was a deep sigh of satisfaction from the invalid.

"I'm glad you've decided to stay, little girl. Somehow it would be
about the last straw to have you leave now. I'd miss you in any case,
of course; but if I have got to be home here and round the house it
does not seem as if I could stand it to have you gone."

"I wouldn't think of going and leaving you, dear. Put your mind at
rest. I intend to stay right here until you are quite well again."

She bent down and gently kissed her uncle's forehead.

It seemed as if that kiss smoothed every wrinkle of worry from the
man's brow.

Quietly Jean tiptoed across the room and drew down the shade; then she
dropped into a chair beside the bed and took up a book. For some time
she sat very still, her eyes intent upon the page. Then at last she
glanced up. Uncle Tom's head had fallen back on the pillows and for the
first time in many days he slept.

                     *        *        *        *

So did Jean Cabot find her summer planned for her. Instead of joining
Uncle Bob and enjoying months of bathing and sailing on the North Shore
she helped nurse Uncle Tom Curtis back to health. For the breakdown
proved to be of much longer duration than any of them had foreseen. The
exhausted system was slow in reacting and it was weeks before the
turning point toward recovery was reached. During those tedious hours
of waiting Jean was the sole person who could bring a smile to the sick
man's face or rouse in him a shadow of interest in what was going on
about him. "Her price was above rubies," the doctor said. She was
better than sunshine or fresh air; she was, in fact, the only hope of
bringing the invalid back to his normal self.

And when those grim days passed and Uncle Tom began to be better, how
he clung to the girl--clung to her with an affection which neither of
them had felt before. It was the realization of his dependence that
made Jean send to Uncle Bob that letter, the last lines of which read:

    "I feel more strongly than I can tell you, dear Uncle Bob, that
    for the present my place is here. Uncle Tom needs me and cannot do
    without me. You have Hannah to help you keep house and you can get
    on; but he has nobody but me. When he is quite strong again I will
    come to Boston, but until I do I am sure you'll understand that
    although I cannot be with you, I love you just the same.

    "Jean."

A reply came back by wire.

"Goodness!" exclaimed Jean as she opened the long telegram. "I hope
nothing is the matter. Uncle Bob never sends telegrams. He must have
been reckless to spend his money on such a long message as this."

    "You are doing just right. Stay as long as needed, but remember
    Boston home waits whenever you wish to come. Hannah has proved
    inadequate housekeeper. Have new one. Miss Cartright and I were
    married in New York to-day.

    "Uncle Bob."

Jean's reading stopped with a jerk. She was speechless. So great was
her joy, her surprise, that not a word would come to her tongue.

Then Uncle Tom remarked dryly:

"I guess your Uncle Bob was a bit reckless about the time he sent that
wire. The only wonder is the telegram wasn't twice as long."

Giusippe was the next to find his voice.

"Well!" he ejaculated. "And we never even dreamed it! At last, Jean,
you've got your wish. Your good fairy has given you an _aunt_!"

"And such an aunt!" Jean added.




CHAPTER XII

JEAN AND GIUSIPPE EACH FIND A NICHE IN LIFE


During Uncle Tom's illness and slow recovery Giusippe became the
messenger between Mr. Curtis's residence and his office. It was,
however, weeks before there was any link connecting the two. But as
health returned there came to the invalid a gradual revival of interest
in affairs at the glass works. Nevertheless the doctor was a cautious
man and at first permitted only the slightest allusions to be made to
business. Later, as strength increased, Mr. Curtis was allowed to look
over at home mail, papers, and specifications and put his signature to
a few important documents, and since Giusippe was almost constantly at
the house what was more natural than that he should become the
go-between? Mr. Curtis dropped into explaining to the boy from time to
time many confidential matters and directing him as to what he wished
done regarding them. The young Italian, as his employer soon found, was
quick to grasp a situation and could be relied upon to fulfil
instructions to the letter and without blundering. Such a person was of
inestimable value during those days of convalescence.

So it came about that Giusippe spent less and less of his time in his
own department in the glass works and more and more in Mr. Curtis's
private office. Before long, boy though he was, he had quite a complete
comprehension of the older man's affairs and proved himself most useful
to the head of the firm who was fighting his way back to health. It was
so easy to say:

"Regarding this letter, I wish, Giusippe, you would see that such and
such a reply is sent. Look it over yourself before it goes out to be
sure that the stenographer has correctly caught my idea."

Or:

"Go and tell Levin of the sheet glass department that I want these
orders filled before any others are shipped. Attend to it yourself,
and make certain he clearly understands."

[Illustration: "I WANT THESE ORDERS FILLED"]

To drop any portion of the detail of his mighty business upon younger
shoulders, or in fact upon any shoulders at all was a thing which, but
a short time before, Mr. Curtis would have considered impossible. But
now, to his surprise, he found himself actually doing it to an amazing
extent, and discovered that no calamity resulted in consequence. On the
contrary it was a positive relief to have a bright, strong, eager boy
lift a part of the burden which had become so heavy for the older man
to bear alone. For Giusippe possessed that rare gift seldom found in
the young and often lacking, even, in elder persons--he could hold his
tongue. He never prattled of Mr. Curtis's affairs; never boasted of his
knowledge of the innermost workings of the firm. He did as he was told,
gave his opinion when asked, and kept whatever information was doled
out to him entirely to himself.

Hence it followed naturally that when Uncle Tom began going to the
works for a few hours each day he took Giusippe with him, and when he
came home left the boy to see carried out the instructions he gave.
Slowly the office force began to defer to the youthful Italian.

"Did Mr. Curtis say anything about this matter or that?"

"Was such and such a price the one Mr. Curtis wished quoted?"

Having discussed many of these very matters with his employer Giusippe
was usually ready with an answer or he could get one. For it was he
alone who was sure to receive a telephone reply from the Curtis
residence; he was the only one who knew at just what time of day Mr.
Curtis could be reached, and whether he was well enough that morning to
be disturbed. Men desiring interviews with the head of the firm soon
found themselves inquiring for Mr. Cicone and asking him if possible to
arrange things so they could have a few words with Mr. Curtis. Giusippe
was the recognized buffer, the go-between who guarded the capitalist
from annoyance and intrusion of every sort.

"You talk with this fellow, Giusippe," Mr. Curtis would often say.
"Tell him--well, you know--get him out of the office. You can do it
politely. Tell him I'll give him a hundred dollars toward his hospital,
but keep him out of my way."

Then Giusippe would laugh.

He had begun to understand that the life of a rich man was no easy one.

Scores of persons came to see Mr. Curtis: persons applying for business
positions; persons begging money for various good causes; customers;
salesmen; men wanting newspaper interviews. From morning until night
the throng filed in and out of the office. Up to the present Mr. Curtis
had been content to remain in the security of his inner domain and rely
on his stenographer to fill many of the gaps. But with illness a change
had come and it was to Giusippe that most of these duties fell.

And yet, strangely enough, nothing had been further from the older
man's original plan than to transform this foreign-born lad into his
private secretary. But so it came about.

"I seem to just need you all the time, Giusippe," he declared one day.
"When you leave the house and return to your uncle's I am always
discovering something I meant to ask you and having to send the car
after you; and the moment you go back to your own job in the casting
department, without fail some matter comes up and you have to be
telephoned for. It is no use to try to get on without you. I need you
all the time. I need you here at home and I need you at the office."

Giusippe smiled.

"I'm glad if I can be of help to you, sir."

"You are of help; you are more than that--you are---- See here, what do
you say to throwing up your position at the works and coming into my
private office as my--well, as my general utility man? I've never had a
secretary--I've never wanted one; and if I had I never before have seen
the chap I'd trust with the job. But you are different. You're one of
the family, to begin with. Moreover, you've proved that you can be
trusted, and that you have some common sense. What would you take to
move into your room up-stairs for good and all, and live here where I
can get hold of you when I want you? Are you so wedded to your aunt and
uncle or to your work in the factory that you would be unwilling to
make the change?"

A flush suffused the boy's face.

"If you really think that I could do for you what you want done, Mr.
Curtis----"

"I don't think, I know!"

"Then I'd like to come, sir."

"That's right! It will be a weight off my mind. The doctor says that
for some months I must still go easy. You can save both my time and my
strength. I like you and I believe you like me; that is half the battle
in working with any one. We will send to your uncle's for your trunk
and whatever else you have."

"There isn't much else but some books," answered Giusippe. "I have been
buying a few from time to time as I could afford them."

"Box them up and send them over. Send everything. This is to be your
future home, you understand. And by the by, we'll give you that other
room adjoining your bedroom. You will need a bit more space. I will
have a desk and some book-shelves put in there."

"Thank you, sir."

"We'll call that settled, then. It is going to be very helpful to have
you right here on the spot. It is the person who aims to be of service
who is really valuable in the world. Look at Jean. In her way she has
been doing the same thing that you have. When she found I was in a hole
and needed her she gave up her vacation in the East without a murmur. I
sha'n't forget it, either. Come in, missy. I'm talking about you."

Jean, who had paused on the threshold of the room, entered smiling.

"You caught me at just the right moment, little lady. I was slandering
you," went on Mr. Curtis. "I was saying to Giusippe that I never again
can get on without you two young persons. Why, this old house was quiet
as the grave before you came into it. I cannot imagine how I ever
existed here alone all these years. The piano wasn't opened from one
end of the year to the other, and when I unlocked the door and came in
there wasn't a single sound anywhere. As I look back on it I guess I
spent about all my time at the Club. But since you came it has been
different. I've liked it a whole lot better, too. Now I feel as if I
really had a home."

Jean bent down and kissed him.

"When I get older," she said, "I mean that you shall have even a nicer
home. Fräulein will be an old lady soon, Uncle Tom, and will not be
able to take care of things as she does now. Then I'm going to ask her
to teach me to market and to keep house. If you are to make Giusippe
your secretary it is only fair that you should give me a position, too.
I'll be your housekeeper. You'll see what a good one I shall make after
I've learned how. I should love to do it. A girl--a really, truly girl,
Uncle Tom, can't help wanting to keep house for somebody."

"No more she can, dear, and she ought to want to, too. It is her work
in the world to be a homemaker--the one who touches with comfort and
with beauty the lives of those about her. You shall be housekeeper for
Giusippe and me, little girl, and shall make out of these four walls a
real home. That is what your new Aunt Ethel is to do for your Uncle
Bob."

"I know it," answered Jean softly. "Even Uncle Bob couldn't get on
without some one to look after him, could he?"

"No," answered Mr. Curtis, "and it is fortunate he has found some one
if you are to be my housekeeper. If he makes any trouble we'll just
remind him that it was only your summers that you were to spend with
him. Your winters belong to me."

"I don't believe he will quarrel about it," was Jean's answer. "He
won't need me now, and he will understand that you do."

"I sure do," replied Uncle Tom, drawing the girl to his side. "I need
both of you--my boy and my girl."




The stories in this series are:

THE STORY OF COTTON
THE STORY OF GOLD AND SILVER
THE STORY OF LUMBER
THE STORY OF WOOL
THE STORY OF IRON
THE STORY OF LEATHER
THE STORY OF GLASS
THE STORY OF SUGAR






End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Story of Glass, by Sara Ware Bassett

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE STORY OF GLASS ***

***** This file should be named 20698-8.txt or 20698-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/0/6/9/20698/

Produced by Sigal Alon, La Monte H.P. Yarroll and the
Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

The Project Gutenberg EBook of A Course of Lectures on the Principles of
Domestic Economy and Cookery, by Juliet Corson

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: A Course of Lectures on the Principles of Domestic Economy and Cookery

Author: Juliet Corson

Release Date: March 13, 2011 [EBook #35567]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK A COURSE OF LECTURES ***




Produced by Julia Miller and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
produced from images generously made available by The
Internet Archive/American Libraries.)





Transcriber's Note

Obvious typographical errors have been corrected. A list of corrections
is found at the end of the text. Inconsistencies in spelling and
hyphenation have been maintained. A list of inconsistently spelled and
hyphenated words is found at the end of the text.




  A COURSE OF LECTURES

  ON THE

  PRINCIPLES OF DOMESTIC ECONOMY

  AND COOKERY,


  BY MISS JULIET CORSON,

  Superintendent of the New York School of Cookery.


  DELIVERED IN THE FARMERS' LECTURE COURSE OF THE
  COLLEGE OF AGRICULTURE OF THE
  UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA.


  APPENDIX TO SUPPLEMENT I.

  FOURTH BIENNIAL REPORT OF

  Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota.

  1886.


  ST. PAUL, MINN.:
  THE PIONEER PRESS COMPANY.
  1887.




PREFACE.


The following lectures were delivered in the "Farmers Lecture Course,"
at the College of Agriculture, Minneapolis, during the session of 1884.
The topics selected at previous sessions had been such as to especially
interest the male members of the large classes in attendance, and it was
considered no more than fair to the women of the State that attention
should be given to such matters as would aid them in the conduct of home
duties. Influenced by this desire, I secured the services of Miss Juliet
Corson, the superintendent of the New York School of Cookery, and so
widely known wherever the English language is spoken, by her
publications and writings upon all topics relating to domestic economy.
The interest manifested in this course of lectures by the ladies of
Minnesota was shown by the crowded audiences present at each exercise,
nearly 1,200 of whom registered their names and addresses, a list of
which is appended to this report.

The lectures were familiar, extemporaneous discourses upon the topics
under discussion, and the lecturer was surrounded by all the
appointments of a well-ordered kitchen. The dishes as prepared were
passed to the audience for examination and criticism, and full
opportunity allowed for discussion. This statement is necessary to
explain the colloquial character of the discourses.

In placing these lectures before the public the editor does but simple
justice to Miss Corson in stating that circumstances have prevented the
preparation by her of a finished report, and have compelled the
publication of the notes taken at the "cooking lessons." But if the
_form_ of the instruction is devoid of rhetorical style, the editor
guarantees its _accuracy_.

Although Miss Corson is a steady worker, her usefulness is curtailed by
serious illness. In this instance, therefore, indulgence is claimed for
the method. Whatever graces of literature the reader seeks, may be found
in the author's other published works; here the public is entreated to
accept a very plain record of the work done at the State University by
Miss Corson.

A word of explanation is due to the members of the class, who were
promised copies of these lectures. I had full reports taken at the time,
by a stenographer. They were written out shortly after, and sent to Miss
Corson, as by her request, for review; but owing to her protracted and
nearly fatal illness and very slow recovery, these notes have only
recently been returned to me. I hope this statement will relieve me from
any charges of neglect, which the ladies might otherwise be disposed to
make.

  EDWARD D. PORTER,
  _Professor in Charge_.




INTRODUCTION.


This course of lectures is designed to meet the wants of two classes of
persons:

_First_--Those who are experienced housekeepers, familiar with the
principles and practice of cookery, but who desire information
concerning the preparation of the finer dishes of the modern school.

_Second_--The young ladies in attendance at the University and others
like them, who have had their time and attention so engrossed with
studies and other duties that they have not had the opportunity to
qualify themselves in this most important branch of a woman's education.

To meet the wants of the first class, the morning exercises will be
devoted to the preparation of palatable and nutritious dishes, suitable
for every day use in families of moderate means, and some of the finer
dishes will be introduced.

As the afternoons are the only times at which the young ladies of the
University can be present, these sessions will be devoted to practical
illustrations of the elementary principles of household management and
cookery. As time permits, some of the salient points in the chemistry of
food and the physiology of nutrition will be briefly discussed.




BILL OF FARE

FOR

THE HOUSEKEEPERS' COURSE.


FIRST DAY.

                          Soup Stock.
  Boiled Salmon, with Cream Sauce.
                  Potatoes, Stewed in Butter.
                                      Quail, boned and broiled.
                          Omelettes.


SECOND DAY.

                              Clear Soup.
                  Caramel for coloring Soups and Sauces.
                            Baked Whitefish.
  Beefsteak, broiled and fried.              Baked Apple Dumplings.


THIRD DAY.

                    Cream of Salmon.
          Shoulder of Lamb, boned and roasted.
  Forcemeat for Meats.
                          Potatoes, broiled and baked.
                      Cheese Crusts.


FOURTH DAY.

                      Pea Soup with Crusts.
      Salt Codfish, stewed in Cream.
                              Venison with Currant Jelly.
  Stewed Carrots.                            Cabinet Pudding.


FIFTH DAY.

  Tomato Soup.                                         Fried Pickerel.
                          Beef, _a la mode_ Rolls.
            _Puree_ of Spinach.
                                            Caramel Custard.


SIXTH DAY.

                          Oyster Soup.
                  Oysters, broiled and fried.
  Oysters with Bacon.                  Mobile Roast Oysters.
                        Welsh Rarebits.




THE UNIVERSITY COURSE.


AT 2 P. M. DAILY.

_First Day_--Soup Making, and Stews.

_Second Day_--Good Breads, Plain Pastry and Puddings.

_Third Day_--Fish and Poultry.

_Fourth Day_--Meats and Vegetables.

_Fifth Day_--Cheap Dishes and Rewarmed Foods.

_Sixth Day_--Cookery for the Sick.

Tea, Coffee, Omelettes, Sauces, and various small dishes will be treated
when the occasion offers.

       *       *       *       *       *

The last half hour of each day will be devoted to the discussion of
questions referring to the subject in hand, and to the testing of dishes
cooked.




FIRST LECTURE.


Our lesson this morning, ladies, will consist of the preparation of what
is called soup stock, or beef broth, which is the basis of many kinds of
soup; it is very easily made, simple in its composition, and exceedingly
nutritious; the other dishes to be made are boiled salmon with cream
sauce; potatoes, stewed in butter; and quail, boned and broiled. I give
you the boned quail to show you what an exceedingly simple operation
boning is. It is supposed to be very difficult, and it is done sometimes
in curious ways; but the best way is the simplest and easiest. If we
have time we will prepare a few omelettes.

As I shall begin with soup stock, you will take your receipt for that.
For each quart of soup stock or broth which you intend to make, use one
pound of meat and bone. By that I mean meat and bone weighed together.
The cut which I have here is from the upper part of the leg, next to the
round. You can use any cut of the leg, the shank, which is the lower
part of the leg, or the neck; any of the cheaper parts of meat will
answer for soup meat. First, cut the meat from the bone; the butcher
will always do that for you; then have the bone broken in small pieces.
The butcher, of course, will do that very much more easily than you can
do it. Do not wash the meat; wipe it all over with a towel wet in cold
water. Put the bones in the bottom of the soup kettle, laying the meat
on the bones; then add cold water in the proportion of a quart to each
pound of meat and bones. Set the soup kettle over the fire, and let the
broth slowly heat and boil. As it boils a scum will rise to the surface,
which is to be removed in case you are preparing stock for clear soup.
The scum is composed of the blood and the albumen of the meat, and is
only removed for the purpose of clarifying the soup. It is nutritious,
and for that reason it should always be saved. In France, and in
kitchens where French cooks are employed, this scum is used either in
thick soup--for instance, in vegetable soup, such as I shall make this
afternoon--or put into brown sauces or gravies. Remember, it is nothing
that is to be thrown away; it is to be saved because it is both
nutritious and savory. It adds flavor and nutriment to any dish to
which it is added. While the soup meat is being boiled for the first
time, prepare the vegetables. For three or four pounds of meat, which
will make as many quarts of soup, use one medium-size carrot, which is
to be scraped, a turnip, which is to be peeled, and an onion, which is
also to be peeled, in such a way as to prevent breaking apart; take off
the outer dry skin of the onion without trimming it closely; do not cut
it off at the top, because in that way you will cause the layers to
break apart. After the onion is peeled stick a dozen whole cloves into
it. The cloves are added to the soup for the purpose of flavoring it.
You very often hear the remark made that the cookery of certain people
has an indefinable taste, exceedingly nice, but something that you do
not exactly understand. It is always produced by a combination of
seasonings and flavorings. In this soup I shall use for seasoning not
only the cloves in the onions, but a dozen peppercorns--that is,
unground grains of pepper, instead of ground pepper, because I want the
soup to be perfectly clear. I shall use also bay leaves, which may be
new to some of you; they are the dried leaves of the laurel or bay tree,
and can be bought at any drug store. You can buy five cents' worth of
them and they will last you a year or more. The seasoning is slightly
aromatic; for four quarts of soup use only a little leaf, or a piece of
a large leaf; use also a blade of mace, and a sprig of any dried herb
except sage.

The peppercorns, the bay leaf, the blade of mace, and the sprig of sweet
herb are tied in the midst of a little bunch of parsley, the stalk with
all the leaves on, and if it is ever marketed here with the root on, use
that as well; the root of the parsley has all the flavor of the leaf
intensified, and you have only to thoroughly wash it, and then use it.
All these dried herbs are to be gathered inside of the parsley and tied
in a little bunch; tie the parsley by winding string around it,
inclosing all the dried herbs; this little bunch is called in cooking
books a _fagot_ or bouquet of herbs; it is what gives soups and sauces
that indefinable spicy, delicate flavor so much liked.

After the soup stock boils remove whatever scum has risen, put in the
_fagot_, the turnip, the carrot, the onion stuck with cloves, and for
the four quarts of soup a heaping tablespoonful of salt. Keep the soup
stock covered as much as possible while it is heating; and after you
have put in the vegetables keep it covered all the time. Let it boil
very slowly. After all the vegetables are in set the kettle back so that
the heat of the fire strikes from one side; let it boil from one side
and gently; in that way you begin the clarifying. You will find if you
boil the stock from one side, and very gently, then when you strain it
after it is done it already will be as clear as most clear soup. After
it has been strained, to-morrow, we shall clarify it in order to show
the process, which is very simple. Then it will be what is called on
hotel bills of fare clear soup.

After the vegetables have been added let the stock boil for at least two
hours. In that length of time the flavor of the vegetables and the
nourishment from the meat will be extracted, but not the gelatine from
the bones. It is the gelatine in the bones which makes broth or stock
jelly when it is cold; in order to extract the gelatine it is necessary
to boil the soup meat and bones at least five hours. The soup can be
strained at the end of two hours, or boiled five or six hours, keeping
it covered so that none of it wastes or evaporates. When the soup is
boiled, strain it; use an earthen bowl or jar; set a colander in it, and
lay a towel folded twice in the colander, having the colander either
over the bowl or jar; pour the soup into the towel, and let it run
through without squeezing, because if you squeeze the towel you will
force small particles of scum through, and thus cloud the soup. After
the soup has run through the towel let it cool; do not cover it while it
is cooling unless you are afraid of flies or insects getting into it; in
that case cover it with a sieve. If you cover it with a solid earthen
cover or plate the steam arising from the soup will condense on the
under part of the cover and fall back into the soup; if the weather is
warm, or if it is a close, rainy day, the steam condensed falling back
into the warm soup will cause it to sour. For this reason when you put
away a dish of meat or vegetables after dinner do not cover them until
they are cold.


BOILED SALMON WITH CREAM SAUCE.

In boiling a whole fish, or a large piece, use cold water. If you put a
large piece of fish into boiling water, the outside will be cooked
before it is done near the bone. Nothing is more disagreeable than a
piece of fish half raw at the bone; it is uneatable. For a small piece
of fish, such as I have here, use boiling salted water enough to cover
it, and boil it until the flakes begin to separate, or until, by testing
a fin, you can easily pull it out. That will probably be, if you use
cold water, soon after the water boils; if you put the fish into
boiling water, it may be five or more minutes. Boil the fish, whether it
is large or small, until you can pull out a fin, or until the flakes
separate. Then drain it, and serve it with any nice sauce. To-day I will
make a very simple one--cream sauce. Of course you would always make the
sauce while you were boiling the fish, taking care to have both done at
the same time. For a pint of sauce, use a heaping tablespoonful of
butter and a tablespoonful of flour; put them in a saucepan over the
fire, and stir them together until they are smoothly mixed; then begin
to add hot milk, half a cupful at a time; when the first half cupful of
milk is stirred in, put in another half cupful and again stir until it
is smooth; continue to add milk until you have used a pint, or until the
sauce is about the consistency of thick cream. There will always be a
margin there for a little discretion, because some flour will thicken
very much more than others. Flour that is very rich in gluten will
thicken more than that which has most starch in it. But you have there
about the right proportions--a tablespoonful of flour, a tablespoonful
of butter, a pint of milk. Add more or less milk as is required to make
the sauce the consistency of thick cream, or of a thickness which will
coat the spoon; that is, if you dip a spoon in and hold it up, the sauce
will not all run off like water; when all the milk has been used, season
the sauce with a level teaspoonful of salt and about a quarter of a salt
spoon of white pepper. I speak of white pepper particularly because in
making a white sauce, if you use the ordinary black pepper, the sauce
will be full of little black specks. The white pepper is quite as cheap,
quite as plentiful as the black pepper; all the grocers keep it, and its
flavor is nicer, rather more delicate, scarcely as pungent as the black
pepper; there is a certain biting, acrid flavor in the black pepper
which does not exist in the white pepper; the latter contains all the
stimulating property and all the aromatic flavor.

After the same is finished, keep it hot by setting the sauce pan
containing it in a pan of hot water, on the back of the stove. A
perfectly plain white sauce (which can be made the basis of an infinite
variety of other sauces) is made by substituting water for milk; by
leaving out the pepper and salt, and using sugar for sweetening, you can
make a nice pudding sauce. If you add a tablespoonful of chopped parsley
to a pint of white sauce, you make parsley sauce. Putting a few capers
into it, makes caper sauce. A teaspoonful of anchovies dissolved in it
makes anchovy sauce. It is easily made the basis of a great many sauces,
the name of which depends on preferred addition to the white sauce. Egg
sauce is made by adding chopped hard boiled eggs to white sauce.

_Question by a Lady._ Would you ever substitute cornstarch for flour?

MISS CORSON. You can if you wish. You must use your own discretion about
the quantities. Simply get the thickness of thick cream.

_Question._ Is it better to use a porcelain vessel, or will tin do?

MISS CORSON. Use any saucepan made of material thick enough to prevent
burning.

_Question._ Do you put the fish right into the water, or have you a fish
kettle?

MISS CORSON. If you are using a fish kettle you will have a little wire
frame. You can lay the fish on that, or you can tie it up in a cloth, if
you wish to.

_Question._ Then how can you tell when it is done?

MISS CORSON. If you tie it in a cloth you must leave a little space so
that you can test it.

_Question._ How much pepper did you say to put in the sauce?

MISS CORSON. About a quarter of a salt spoon; that is, a good pinch of
pepper. One of the ladies asked me about using a thick sauce
pan--porcelain-lined sauce pan; you will find the advantage of thick
sauce pans of all kinds is that they are less likely to burn than thin
ones. The thinner the metal the sauce pan is made of, the more likely it
is to burn. There are so many different kinds of utensils that every
lady can take her own choice. Black sauce pans, lined with tin or with
porcelain; tin sauce pans, thin ones, and thick ones made of block tin.
You notice that I use copper sauce pans. Coppers are the most durable;
they are lined with tin, and they have to be relined about once a year;
the cost of relining is very little--comparatively little; I think it
costs me about three cents a foot to have them relined, and the copper
never wears out. If you buy a copper sauce pan you have got something
that lasts you all your life, and you can leave it as an heirloom; if
you don't want to do that, you can sell it for old copper for nearly as
much as you paid for it. In using copper, you must never let them become
bare on the inside. If the tin wears off and the copper is exposed to
any acid in the food cooked, it is apt to form a poisonous combination.
But with proper care and cleanliness, copper sauce pans are perfectly
safe.

_Question._ Do you prefer them to the galvanized iron?

MISS CORSON. Yes, I do, on the score of cleanliness, economy and ease in
cooking.

_Question._ Do you use a wooden spoon from choice?

MISS CORSON. Yes; of course you can understand, ladies, that I could
very soon scrape the tin off of the inside of a sauce pan with a metal
spoon, a knife, or anything of that sort. Copper sauce pans should be
cleaned with a rag, a little Sapolio and hot water. If they are cleaned
as fast as they are used they are no more trouble to keep clean than any
other sauce pan. I use in stirring simply a small pudding stick--an
old-fashioned wooden pudding stick. It does not scrape the sauce pans,
and there is no danger of uncooked flour accumulating on the sticks, as
it does in the bowl of a spoon. If you are stirring with a spoon, some
of the half-cooked flour might get in the bowl of the spoon, and then
your sauce would have the taste of the raw flour. I will leave the stick
in the sauce pan and pass it about so that you can see what I mean.
Anyone can whittle these little sticks out, using any kind of hard wood.
Do not use soft wood. You will have noticed, ladies, if you have ever
put sauce of this kind, thick sauce, to keep hot, it may have grown very
much thicker by standing; in such case add a little more milk or water,
and a little more seasoning when you are ready to use it.

_Question._ How do you make perfectly clear sauce?

MISS CORSON. You can make a nearly clear thick sauce by using arrow
root. Of course, a clear thin sauce is simply sugar dissolved in water,
with butter or flavoring as you like.


POTATOES, STEWED IN BUTTER.

The potatoes are peeled and sliced in rather small slices of even size;
put them over the fire in enough salted boiling water to cover them,
boil them until they begin to grow tender; not till they break, but just
till they begin to grow tender; after the potatoes are boiled tender
drain them, and suppose you have a pint bowl full of potatoes, use about
two heaping tablespoonfuls of butter; melt the butter in a scant half
cupful of milk. When the butter is melted put the potatoes into it, and
with a spoon lift them very carefully from the bottom, always without
breaking them, until they have absorbed the milk and butter; then season
them with salt and white pepper, and they will be ready to serve. Season
them palatably; I could not give you the quantity of seasoning because
it would depend upon the salt that the potatoes had absorbed from the
water. You should taste them first before seasoning at all, and then if
they need any more salt add a very little at a time. If you simply want
the potatoes nicely stewed you don't add so much butter, a scant
tablespoonful, and milk enough to moisten them; but this receipt is an
exceedingly nice one--rather rich, but very nice.

(At this point the fish was done, and Miss Corson continued.)

You notice, ladies, that I take off the skin of the fish before taking
it up. That is very easy; it slips off easily, and without it the fish
is much nicer to serve at the table. In serving sauce with fish you pour
some around it, not over it; or you serve the fish on a napkin, and the
sauce in a dish, as you prefer. If you serve the fish in a folded napkin
garnish it with a few sprigs of parsley, if you can get them, or with a
lemon sliced, if you do not live--as some unfortunate people do--"fifty
miles from a lemon." Lemons are very nice always with any kind of fish.
Parsley can be bought here all winter long. I have learned that from the
advertisements in the papers already; and a little of it makes a great
difference in the appearance of a dish.

_Question._ Can you tell us how we can tell whether a frozen fish is
stale or fresh?

MISS CORSON. You can after you have thawed it in cold water; you can
tell by the smell. (Laughter.) The way to thaw frozen fish is to put it
into perfectly cold water and keep it in a cold place until all the
frost is drawn out. Of course the most of the fish in this market would
be frozen in the winter. This one has been frozen.

_Question._ Can you tell us how to carve a whole fish?

MISS CORSON. You would have a rather sharp knife and spoon; a fish
knife, though it looks pretty, is not good to serve fish with because it
is apt to be dull; you want a knife that will cut down through the fish
without tearing it, without attempting to cut down through the bone,
unless you know where the joints are located.

_Question._ Would you cook a fish with the fins?

MISS CORSON. The latest fancy of fish lovers in New York, the members of
the Ichthyophagous Club, who are supposed to be the leaders in the
fashions of fish, is to have the fish served with the fins, head and
tail on; and with some fish they want even the scales; and then they
simply lift off the skin, the entire skin, before they begin to serve
it. They have the fish thoroughly washed and drawn, and then cooked
with the scales and fins on. You can judge how easy it would be to do
that, because you saw how easily that skin came off this fish. The skin
comes off-easily if the fish is properly cooked--cooked enough.

_Question._ What kind of fish can be cooked with the scales on?

MISS CORSON. I think the black bass, and some kinds of sea fish. The
idea is that if the fish are not scaled they will keep their flavor; a
fish properly dressed retains enough of its flavor even if it is scalded
before it is cooked.


OMELETTES.

First, I will make a plain breakfast omelette. Use for two or three
people not more than three eggs. You can not very well manage more than
three in an ordinary pan. It is better to make several omelettes,
especially because people are not apt to come to the table all at once,
and an omelette to be nice must be eaten directly it is cooked. Say
three eggs; break them into a cup or bowl; add to them a saltspoonful of
salt, quarter of a saltspoonful of pepper, and mix them just enough to
thoroughly break the whites and yolks together. Put over the fire a
frying pan with a heaping teaspoonful of butter in it. Let the butter
get hot. If you like an omelette brown let the butter begin to brown.
After pouring the eggs into the hot frying pan break the omelette on the
bottom of the pan with a fork, just a little, so that you let the
uncooked part run down on the bottom of the pan. I do not mean to stir
the omelette as you would scrambled eggs, but just break it a little
until it is cooked as much as you want it. French breakfast omelettes
are always cooked so that they are slightly juicy in the middle; in
order to accomplish that result of course you have them still liquid
before you begin to turn them. When the omelette is done as much as you
want it run a fork under one side of it and fold it half over, then fold
it again; loosen it from the pan; have a platter hot, and turn the
omelette out. Serve it the moment it is done.

Next I will make a light omelette. The same rule--three eggs, whites and
yolks separate; beat the whites to a stiff froth; add seasoning to the
yolks in the same proportion as before; mix the yolks slightly with the
seasoning; after the white has been beaten quite stiff and the yolk
seasoned, mix them very lightly together; have a heaping tablespoonful
of butter in the frying pan over the fire, hot, just as for the plain
omelette; mix the whites and the yolks together, without breaking down
the white. Of course the lightness of the omelette depends on keeping
all the air in the white of the egg that you have beaten into it. Put
the eggs into the hot frying pan; run the fork under the omelette and
lift it from the pan as it cooks; lift the cooked portions from the pan,
and let them fall back on the top of the omelette, taking care not to
pat the omelette down at all; but just lift the cooked portions and let
them fall back on the top of the omelette, until it is done as much as
you like. Usually this omelette is served soft--as soft as ice cream.
When it is done as much as you want it, push it to the side of the pan,
gently, and then turn it out on a hot platter. Always remember that the
success of an omelette depends upon the quickness with which it is made
and served; because, in the first place, you make it light by beating
air into it; then, of course, the heat expands the air, and that makes
the omelette still lighter; and you must get it served before the hot
air escapes.


BONING QUAIL.

After the quail have been picked, cut the wings off at the first joint,
cut the legs just above the joint of the drum-stick. Cut off the head,
take out the crop, cut the quail down the back bone; from the inside,
cut the joint where the wing joins the body; and having cut that wing
joint, begin and cut close to the carcass of the bird till you get down
to the leg joint, where the second joint of the leg unites with the
body; break that joint, and keep on cutting the flesh from the carcass,
taking care not to cut through the carcass so that you strike the
intestines until you reach the ridge of the breast bone; close to the
breast bone you will find that little division in the flesh of the
breast which you have noticed in carving chickens and turkeys; it is
called the little filet, and lies close to the breast bone; separate
this natural division from the outside of the breast. Then beginning
again on the other side, cut close to the carcass of the bird until you
have reached the breast, as on the other side. Now the flesh is loose on
both sides of the bird, and needs only to be taken off without breaking
the skin of the breast. You would bone chickens and turkeys in the same
way. Take the carcass out entire. Now take out the wing and leg bones
from the inside. Do not tear the skin of the bird any more than you can
help. Now lay the flesh on the table, with the skin down, and
straighten it out a little, distributing the flesh evenly over the
skin, and it is ready to stuff. If I were making boned turkey I should
have it all ready, just like this, and then put the force meat in, draw
the bird up over the force meat, and sew it down the back. This bird is
simply going to be broiled. Season with salt and pepper. In preparing
boned birds you can use any kind of force meat--a layer of sausage meat,
or any kind of chopped cold meat; season it with salt and pepper. Put
the birds between the bars of the wire gridiron, and broil them with a
very hot fire. The gridiron should be well buttered, so that the birds
can not stick. By the time the bird is broiled brown on both sides it
will be done. Of course you do half a dozen or a dozen in the same way
precisely. Remember, ladies, always, that to broil you should use the
hottest fire you can get--the hottest and the clearest fire, because
part of the success of broiling depends upon quickly cooking the
outside, while the inside of anything you are broiling still remains
juicy. If you had a wood fire you would broil over the fire. If you
broil over the fire you must expect the blaze to rise, and you must
naturally suppose the meat will be smoked; but you can make your fire
clear--that is, have it alive; do not have it smoky and full of unburnt
wood or coal; have a clear bed of coals if you are going to broil over
the fire.

_Question._ Do you never wash the birds before boiling?

_Answer._ No; you will find that I am very _un_-neat about that. In the
first place, I would not use a piece of meat or a bird of any kind that
was really dirty enough to need washing. If it had anything on it that I
could not get off by wiping with a wet cloth, I simply wouldn't use it.
If you wash meat or poultry you destroy a certain amount of its
flavoring and take away some of its nourishment.

_Question._ Sometimes a bird shot will have a great deal of the blood
settle in the breast or in the flesh.

MISS CORSON. Yes; you want the blood; you want to keep the blood there.
The blood is a part of the nourishment. The idea of washing meat comes
from the old Hebrew prohibition which involved the removal of every
particle of blood. You know that the Hebrews believed that the blood was
the life and even to this day every particle of blood is taken away from
their meat, not only by washing after it comes into the house, but
before that by the treatment it receives from the butcher. The blood is
a part of the nourishment, and you want to keep as much of it as you
can; in some cooking it forms a very important part; for instance, in
cooking a hare or rabbit, the blood which escapes in the dressing is
saved and used.

_Question._ Would you treat prairie chicken, grouse or partridge in this
way?

MISS CORSON. Yes, in the same way.

_Question._ Not if you were going to roast turkey?

MISS CORSON. One of my good friends in the far Northwest several years
ago sent me a nice recipe for making a fricassee of chicken which I will
tell you. The recipe said that after the chicken was picked you might
wash it thoroughly with _nice soap_, then rinse it. (Laughter.) Now if
you like you can prepare it that way. No, you will find, ladies, that if
you use a cloth well wet in cold water you can remove all objectionable
matter from the outside of meat or poultry. Indeed, if a piece of meat
or poultry can not be cleaned with a wet cloth, it is not clean enough
to use. One lady asks me about keeping meat for a long time. Of course
that is a question of taste entirely, whether you like meat hung a long
time or whether you like it fresh. All meat, when it is first killed,
whether it is poultry, or game, or the ordinary domestic meat, is very
tender. It is tender until the flesh begins to grow cold, until the
animal heat, etc., parts from the flesh. Then it becomes tough, rigid
and hard, and remains so until the process of decomposition begins. I do
not mean until it begins to taint, but until it begins to decompose; at
that point it begins to grow tender; it is still fresh and good enough
for food. Remember that the hanging of meat is for the purpose of
allowing it to begin to decompose.




LECTURE SECOND.


Our lesson this afternoon will consist of some plain soups and stews of
meat. I shall begin with a soup,--of yellow split peas. For four quarts
of soup use an ordinary cupful of yellow split peas; pick them over and
wash them in cold water, put them in a saucepan or a soup kettle with
two quarts of cold water. Set the saucepan or soup kettle over the fire
and let the water very gradually heat. When it boils put in some cold
water,--part of a cupful, let them boil again; keep on putting in cold
water every fifteen or twenty minutes, until you have used two quarts
of cold water besides the first two quarts. The object of adding cold
water slowly is this: You soften the peas by the gradual heating of the
cold water. After the first boiling the addition of a little cold water
lowers the temperature, and as the water heats again the peas are
gradually softening; so that within an hour and a half or two hours you
will find them quite tender enough. You will notice that I have used no
salt; the salt would tend to harden the peas. You add salt after the
soup is nearly finished. The old way of soaking the peas over night is a
very good one, but this is rather better, for this reason: If you soak
the peas over night you destroy a small portion of their nutritive
properties; especially if you make the soup in warm water, there will be
a slight fermentation. The object of soaking them over night is simply
to soften them, and as you can soften them in this way you accomplish
the same purpose by adding cold water gradually. You will notice that
this is for perfectly plain pea soup. You can vary it by adding bones of
cold ham, or of cold roast beef; you can boil the bones with the peas.
In that way you get the flavor of whatever meat you add. A very nice
soup is made simply with the peas without any meat, by the addition of a
fried onion, for that soup you would peel and slice an onion and put it
in the bottom of the soup kettle with a tablespoonful of butter or
drippings,--beef drippings or poultry drippings,--and fry it light
brown; then put on the peas and cold water and proceed just as we do
to-day for a plain pea soup, without any addition except a seasoning of
salt and pepper, and by and by a little flour and butter, which I shall
put in at the close, the object of which I will explain to you then.


BEEF AND VEGETABLE SOUP.

For four quarts of soup use one cupful each of the ingredients which I
shall name: lean beef cut in half-inch pieces; carrot, which must first
be scraped and then cut in half-inch bits; turnip, which must be peeled
and then cut in small pieces; rice, picked over, washed in cold water;
tomatoes, peeled and sliced if they are fresh; but if you use canned
tomatoes simply cut them in small pieces; half a cupful of onion, peeled
and chopped rather fine; and four quarts of cold water. First put the
water over the fire with the beef in it, and let it gradually heat;
while it is heating get ready all the other ingredients that I have
spoken of, and add them when the water is hot. Don't add salt for
seasoning until after the soup has been cooking for a little while,
because it would tend to harden the meat. When the soup is boiling, put
in all the other ingredients; and after the soup has cooked for an hour,
season it with salt and pepper. Cook it slowly for about two hours, or
until the vegetables are tender. The length of time will depend somewhat
on the season of the year. You will find that carrots and turnips, like
all vegetables which have woody fibre in them, will cook more quickly
early in the winter while they still have their natural moisture in
them. The later in the winter it grows the drier they get, the harder
the woody fibre is, and the longer it will take to cook them tender. So
you will cook the soup until the vegetables are tender; and then, having
seen that it is palatably seasoned, serve it with all the vegetables in
it. You notice that this is a thick soup, made in an entirely different
way from that which I made this morning. I think some of the ladies are
here who were here this morning. Then we were making clear soup which is
to be served without any vegetables in it. This is a good hearty soup
for every-day use; in fact it is so hearty that you can make the bulk of
a meal using this and bread or potatoes. When all the vegetables are
quite tender then the soup simply is to be served.

Now, while I am preparing the soup, I want to say a little about the
value of soup as a food. This comes properly into our afternoon course
of instruction. Many of the ladies may not have thought of it in
precisely the connection in which I am going to speak of it. Habitually,
Americans do not use soup. Some have grown gradually accustomed to have
soup as a part of their every-day dinner, but as a rule people have it
once or twice a week. I am speaking now of average families. As a matter
of fact, it ought to be used every day, because it is not only a very
easy form in which to obtain nourishment, but you obtain from soup that
which you would not get from any other dish; that is, you get every
particle of the nourishment there is in the ingredients which you put
into the soup. You can make a perfectly nutritious and palatable meal
with soup at about one-half the cost of a meal without soup, because the
soup, if it is savory, will be eaten with a relish; and it will satisfy
the appetite for two reasons; the first I have already spoken
of--because you get every particle of nourishment there is in the
ingredients; and second, because directly you eat it--that is, directly
it reaches the stomach, some of its nutritious liquid properties will
begin to be absorbed at once. They pass directly into the system, by the
process which is known in physiology as _osmosis_--that is, absorption
by the coats of the stomach; so that the liquid part of the food is
actually absorbed and passes into the circulation in less than five
minutes after you have eaten it. A very familiar illustration of that
fact was made by Sir Henry Thompson several years ago, in his
exceedingly valuable article called "Food and Feeding," where he said
that a hungry man eating clear soup for his dinner would feel a sense of
refreshment in less than three minutes; that is, he would feel the
effect of his plate of clear soup almost as soon as he would feel the
stimulus which he would receive from a glass of wine. He would feel
refreshed at once; his sense of hunger, which is the indication that his
system needs food, would be practically appeased within three minutes
from the time he had taken his soup.

Then there is another very important question; and that is the effect of
soups and liquid foods on the appetite for stimulants. I am not a
temperance advocate in the sense in which the word is usually
understood. That is, I neither believe in nor advocate total abstinence;
but I do believe in temperance--in the temperate use of everything; no
matter whether it is drink, or food, or pleasure, in a life of work, so
that I speak solely from the standpoint of an advocate of the moderate
use of everything. The system requires a certain amount of liquid
nourishment. We have to get that in the form of liquid, and many people
take it by using water to excess--drinking quantities of water. On the
other hand, there are some people who never drink more than a glass of
water all day long. They must drink something--some kind of liquid--to
make up the quantity of water that is absolutely required by the system
in the course of twenty-four hours. Some persons take it in the form of
tea and coffee; others drink beer and wine; but a certain amount of
liquid the system must have. Now, you can easily see that you can supply
a part of that liquid in the form of soups and stews. It is not possible
for many people to drink much cold water: it does not seem to agree with
them. The advocates of the latest craze, for hot water, will get their
quantity of liquid, but they will get it in a form that by and by will
make serious trouble for them; because, while under certain conditions
the entire mucous membrane or lining of the digestive tract, warm water
may be desirable, still the excessive use of it is very apt in time to
produces a serious congestion. Now, the fact once admitted that we must
have a certain amount of liquid supplied to the system every day, then
the question comes of giving it in a form that will be the least
injurious to the system. I think I have shown you one or two good
reasons why soup supplies it well. On the score of economy there is no
food which can be as cheaply prepared as soup--that is, no palatable,
enjoyable, nutritious food. It is possible to make this soup, this thick
soup which I am making now, in New York, and here also, I suppose, for
less than ten cents a gallon, buying the materials at retail; and I am
sure a gallon of this soup will go very far towards satisfying one's
hunger. I presume, from what I have seen of the market reports in the
papers, that it can be made here quite as cheaply as it can in New York.

_Question._ Does that make very strong soup--does it give a very good
rich flavor of the meat, with one cupful of meat to a gallon of water?

MISS CORSON. That gives a perfectly nutritious soup. It gives as much
nutriment from the meat as is needed by the system.

_Question._ Wouldn't a bone or two thrown in be a good thing?

MISS CORSON. You can put in bones if you want to. But I am giving you a
recipe for a perfectly nutritious soup, made upon the most economical
principles. The proportion of meat which I use here is all that is
required by the system in connection with the other ingredients. We
Americans have, as a rule, the idea that there is no nutritious food
except meat. We think that we get all our nourishment from meat; and the
other things--the vegetables and bread, and all those other articles of
food that we eat, are what the dressmakers would call "trimmings." We do
not regard them as real nourishing food, when in reality there are some
vegetables which are nearly as nutritious as meat. Take for instance,
lentils; I do not know if you are familiar with them. They are a variety
of vetch or field pea, little flat, dried peas, that grow very
abundantly; in fact, if they are once planted in a field it is almost
impossible to root them out. They have been for ages used in all older
countries, in Egypt, in Asia, all through Europe, especially in Germany.
Within the last ten years they have become known in this country.
Lentils, with the addition of a very little fat in the form of fat meat,
suet drippings or butter, are quite as nutritious as meat; that is, they
sustain strength, and enable people to work just as well as meat. So,
you see, that so far as actual nourishment is concerned, vegetables
approach closely to meat. Next to lentils come peas and beans, dried
peas and beans. I have not graded the different articles of food, but
some day when we have more time I will give you a table of nutritive
values of different articles of food so that you can form some
comparison in your own mind. Remember this, that meat is not the only
nutritious article of food in use, and we only need a certain quantity
of it. For instance, for the purpose of health meat once a day will
answer. It is very nice to have it two or even three times if we want
it, or if we can afford it; but if we have it once a day we answer all
the requirements of health, and in communities where it is not possible
to have an abundant supply of fresh meat, a very small proportion of
salt meat used in connection with the most nutritious vegetables keeps
the health and strength of the really active laborers up to the working
point.


MEAT STEWS.

For a brown stew, use any kind of dark meat. To-day I am going to use
some of the cooked round of beef; but you can use fresh beef; you can
use raw beef, rare roast beef, or any of the dark meats; always use
white meats for white stews. Presently we will make a white stew of
veal; but for a brown stew use dark meats. Cut the meat in pieces about
an inch and a half square, put it over the fire with enough fat of some
kind to keep it from burning; use the fat of the meat, or drippings, or
butter, and brown it as fast as possible. If you make a stew large
enough for four or five people, use about three pounds of beef. As soon
as the meat is brown, sprinkle a heaping tablespoonful of flour over it;
then add enough boiling water to cover the meat, and three teaspoons of
vinegar. The vinegar is used for the purpose of softening the fibres of
the meat and making it tender. You will find that by adding vinegar to
meat in cooking, you can always make it tender. When we come to treat of
steak, I shall explain that. After the vinegar has been used, season the
meat palatably with salt and pepper, cover it, and let it cook very
gently for at least an hour, or until it is tender. To the stew add any
vegetable you wish, or cook it perfectly plain, having only the meat and
the gravy. To-day I am going to use carrots with it. For three pounds of
beef use carrots enough to fill a pint bowl after they are cut in little
slices, or in little quarters. Of course, if you add vegetables of any
kind, carrots, turnips, or potatoes, you want to put them in long
enough before the meat is done to insure their being perfectly cooked.
For instance, carrots take from one to two hours to cook; I shall put
the carrots in directly I make the gravy. Turnips, if they are fresh,
will cook in about half an hour. Potatoes will cook in twenty minutes;
small onions will cook in from half to three-quarters of an hour. The
meat usually needs to cook about two hours. The meat being brown, I
shall put in a tablespoonful of flour, stirring it, and then send it
down to you so that you can see what it is like. The question naturally
would arise about the color of this stew, throwing in raw flour, the
white, uncooked flour. You can see for yourselves what the effect is.

_Question._ Does cold meat cook as long as raw?

MISS CORSON. If you use cold meat, brown it just in the same way, just
exactly as we browned this, first in drippings or butter and then
putting in the flour; only if you use meat which already has been
cooked, it will not take it so long to cook as it does this raw meat.

For a _white stew_, use any kind of white meat--veal, pork, poultry, or
lamb. To-day I shall use veal. To go back to the question which was
debated this morning about washing meat: first, wipe the meat all over
with a wet towel. It is important to have the towel clean. Wet the towel
in cold water and wipe the meat, then cut it in little pieces about two
inches square. The butcher will crack all the bones, and if you wish he
will cut the meat for you. At least he will crack the bones so that the
meat can be easily cut in pieces about two inches square. Put it over
the fire; suppose you have three pounds of meat; put it in cold water
enough to cover it. Let it slowly boil; when it boils, add about a
tablespoonful of salt and a dozen grains of peppercorns, or a small red
pepper, or if you have not either of those seasonings, about half a
saltspoonful of ordinary pepper; and let the meat boil slowly until it
is tender. That will be in from an hour to two hours, according to the
tenderness of the meat in the beginning. When the meat is tender lay a
clean towel in a colander, set over a bowl or an earthen jar, and pour
the meat and broth directly into the colander. Let the broth run through
the towel. If the meat has any particles of scum on it, wipe the pieces
with a wet towel to remove the scum. You can, in making the stew, remove
the scum as you would from clear soup, but in that case you have not
quite so richly flavored a stew. The better way is to wipe off the
little particles after you have taken up the meat. Now you have the meat
cooked quite tender and the broth strained. Then you make the sauce. Any
of the ladies who were at the lesson this morning and saw the white
sauce made, will understand the principle upon which the sauce is made
for the stew. Put a heaping tablespoonful of butter and a heaping
tablespoonful of flour into a saucepan for the quantity of broth which
you would be likely to have from about three pounds of meat; that would
be broth enough to cover it. Stir the butter and flour until they are
smoothly mixed; then begin to add the meat broth gradually until you
have used enough of the broth to make the sauce like thick cream. If you
find that you have not enough broth from the meat, add a little hot
water, to make the sauce or gravy like thick cream; then put the meat
into it. Season it palatably with salt and pepper, remembering that you
already have some seasoning in it. Stir the meat in the saucepan over
the fire until it is hot, and then serve it. That gives you a plain
white stew of meat. You can transform that into a dish called in French
cookery books _blanquette_, or white stew of meat, by adding to it just
before you take it off the fire a tablespoonful of chopped parsley and
the yolk of one egg. You will add the egg by separating the yolk from
the white, putting the yolk in a cup with two or three tablespoonfuls of
gravy from the meat and mix it well; then turn it all among the meat,
stir it and dish it at once. Don't let the stew go back on the fire
after you put in the yolk of egg; it may curdle the egg if the sauce or
the stew boils after the egg is added. So you see you have a plain white
stew, or a stew with the addition of chopped parsley, or chopped parsley
and the yolk of an egg. Do not use the white of the egg.

_Question._ Why is not the fat meat as good as the lean?

MISS CORSON. Do you mean why is it not as nutritious? Lean meat
nourishes muscle and flesh. Fat meat affords heat to the system. That is
the reason why we naturally crave more fat meat in cold weather. It is
not so strengthening; it is heating and in that nutritious. A great deal
of its substance, of course, is wasted in the cooking. That is another
reason why, weight for weight, fat meat is not so nutritious as lean.

_Question._ In making this stew brown or white do you use bones?

MISS CORSON. You can use bones. In making the soup to-day I used cooked
lean meat that was on hand over from the soup this morning. You can use
the breast of any kind of brown meat; you can use the ends of the ribs
of roast beef; you remember the rather fat ends of the ribs of roast
beef? After cooking the beef have these cut up in small pieces; after
you have cooked them in the stew if there is any excess of fat, as there
probably will be, skim that off and put it by to add to any brown stew
or gravy; the fat replaces drippings in that case. That is a very good
way to use ends of ribs of beef. Cold beefsteak makes a nice brown stew,
treated in this same way.

_Question._ Do you skim the stew?

MISS CORSON. No. Not unless you are going to make a perfectly clear soup
need you ever skim; because, as I explained this morning, the scum which
rises on the surface in boiling meat is not dirt, it is albumen and
blood, with the same nutritious properties as the meat itself, and you
do not want to remove them. If the water boils away in cooking soups and
stews always add a little more; it will save time if you add boiling
water, unless as in the case of peas, you add cold water for the purpose
of softening them. You will find, if you are trying to cook dried beans,
that it will be well to add cold water, and boil them gradually.

_Question._ In cooking beans isn't it a good way to let the beans come
to a boil and then pour off the water and put on more cold?

MISS CORSON. That is simply a question of taste. It is not necessary to
do it. If you pour away the first water in which they come to a boil,
you pour away a certain amount of their nourishment, which already has
escaped in the water. Some people say that they like to pour away that
first water, because it carries off the strong taste of the beans. That
is a question for any one to settle individually. The water would not
have the strong taste of the beans if there were not some of the
nourishment of the beans in it. While we are on the subject of beans I
might tell you a good way to cook beans plainly, a favorite way in the
south of France, the beans to be served with roast mutton. Cook them in
just water enough to cover them, after having first washed them, adding
only water enough to keep them covered all the time. They are dried
white beans. Then at the last, when the beans are tender, leave off the
cover of the sauce pan and let the beans cook, so that nearly all the
water is evaporated, and the beans have about them simply water enough
to form a very thick sauce, just enough to moisten them. Then they are
seasoned with salt and pepper. In that way they are served as stewed
beans, with roast mutton or roast lamb.

In regard to the lentils that I was talking to you about, I think you
may be able to learn something more about them from Prof. Porter. He
probably would know. You long ago have made their acquaintance in the
form of the _tares_ that the enemy sowed among the wheat. Lentils are
really a species of tare or vetch. If you do not know about them--if
they are not known in the market--it really would be worth while to make
some inquiry which would lead to the introduction of them; but very
likely if there are German people here, as I suppose there are,--there
are always German people in every thriving city,--they will already have
had them for sale in their special groceries; you can get them in that
way, and they make a very good winter vegetable to use alternately with
others. You cook them either by soaking them over night, or boil them
just as we boiled the peas, until they are tender, and then drain them,
and either heat them, with a little salt and pepper and butter, after
they are drained, or fry them. They are exceedingly nice fried with a
little chopped onion or parsley. If you have a pint bowl full of
lentils, use a tablespoonful of chopped parsley, a tablespoonful of
onion, very finely chopped; put the onion in the frying pan with a
tablespoonful of butter or drippings, and let it brown; then put in the
lentils and chopped parsley, a little salt and pepper, stir them till
you have them hot, and serve them. They are exceedingly good.

PROF. PORTER. I may say that the first cousin of the lentils is well
known among our Minnesota farmers in our wheat fields, and they are such
an intolerable pest that we prefer paying the duties on the German
article and importing them.


PEA SOUP--_Continued_.

     (The pea soap being now about ready to take up, Miss Corson
     continued:)

You know how the flour of the peas settles to the bottom of the soup
tureen or plate, and leaves the top clear? Prevent that by adding to the
soup, just before it is dished, a little paste made of flour and butter.
For four quarts of soup a tablespoonful of flour and a tablespoonful of
butter; mix the flour and butter to a smooth paste just before the soup
is done. After the peas are soft pour them into a fine sieve and rub
them through the sieve with a potato masher; just a stout wire sieve.
After you have rubbed them through the sieve put them back into the soup
kettle with the soup, and mix the flour and butter in with them over the
fire; stir them until they come to a boil, then season palatably with
salt and pepper, and the soup is ready to serve. Remember this is a
perfectly plain soup I am making to-day, without the addition of meat of
any kind; but of course you will vary the flavor of the soup by adding
the bones of ham or other meat, or a very little fried onion. Now, you
can count for yourselves how cheap a soup that is.

_Question._ Can you give us your experience with regard to pea meal for
soup?

MISS CORSON. I have used one form that has been put on the New York
market. It was made of dried green peas. I do not know whether there is
on this market a meal made of the yellow peas. There is a German
preparation which is admirable. In New York it is for sale at the German
stores; but the meal of which I speak, the meal made of dried green
peas, was not at all satisfactory to me. Of course the meal of the green
peas has not the flavor of the split peas. You will find in rubbing the
peas through the sieve that if you moisten them a little once in a while
they will go through more readily.

       *       *       *       *       *

I have left the brown stew with all the fat on. It is a question not
only of taste but of economy whether you leave on the fat in addition to
the first butter in which you browned the meat, a question of economy
and nourishment. If the people you are cooking for have good strong
digestions you do not need to remove the fat. The bread or potatoes
which are eaten with the stew will absorb it and will render it
perfectly digestible; and, of course, as I have already told you, the
fat serves certain purposes in nutrition. If you are cooking for people
having weak digestions then you would take the fat off the stew. The
white stew I am going to finish plain, without any parsley or
egg--simply seasoned with salt and pepper.




LECTURE THIRD.


Our lesson this morning is the clarifying of soup, or the soup stock
that we made yesterday; caramel for coloring soup, gravy and sauces;
baked whitefish, after a very nice Western fashion; beefsteak, broiled
and fried; and baked apple dumplings.

The first thing I prepare will be the whitefish, after a method which I
learned from one of my Cleveland friends, who, by the way, is one of the
nicest cooks I know of. I shall use only a little butter, and tell you
about the wine which the recipe calls for. When the fish is prepared
especially for gentlemen, wine is considered exceedingly nice, but that,
as in all other cookery, is a matter of choice. We to-day will use some
butter, pepper and salt. I will tell you the kind of wine, and the
quantity that is used, when I come to cook the fish. In the winter, of
course, all the fish is frozen. We were speaking of that yesterday, how
to prepare frozen fish. In the first place, thaw it in plenty of cold
water. Put it in a large pan of cold water and let it stay till it is
perfectly thawed. Then cut it from the bone and take off the skin. Now,
please write down the directions, and then watch and see how I do it.
The fish simply has been scaled; to cut it from the bone, make one cut
down to the bone through the middle of the side of the fish, lengthwise;
having made that line, cut round under the head, to the bone; now lay
the knife against the bone of the fish, and turn it until you have the
blade cutting against the bone, holding the knife flat; it will take
that entire piece of the fish off; cut two pieces from one side of the
fish. Now I am going to cut from the other side in the same way, and
then I shall take the skin off. First take the four pieces of fish off
the bone; you will not find this at all difficult to do, ladies; after
you have done it once or twice it will be very easy, and if you have
fish that has not been frozen it will be much more easy to do than if
you have frozen fish, which, of course, will break a little. It is not
possible to keep the pieces entire, cutting from a frozen fish. One of
the ladies asks if this can be done as well if the fish has been dressed
by the fishmonger; that is, if the entrails have been taken out. Yes,
quite as well. This is not dressed simply because it had been sent from
market without being dressed. I did not take the trouble to have it
dressed here, as I am not going to use the bone of the fish. After I
have finished giving you the direction for taking off the skin, I am
going to tell you how you could use the bone of the fish. To cut the
skin off the fish, lay the pieces of fish skin down on the board; then,
holding the knife down straight, cut through the fish until you feel the
skin under the knife; as soon as you feel the skin under the knife,
flatten the knife out so that it lies against the skin; cut away from
you, holding the knife perfectly level, leaving the skin between the
board and the knife. Hold the piece of fish in your fingers; lay it flat
on the board, skin down, keeping hold of the skin all the time. That
takes the skin off, and none of the fish; there is no waste there, and
it certainly is very much easier to eat fish in this shape than it is if
you have the skin and bone on it. Now, I assure you, ladies, if you only
hold the knife flat, you will have no trouble whatever in taking the
skin off. If you slant it you will cut through the skin of the fish, but
if you hold it perfectly flat you will have no trouble. Of course, with
certain kinds of fish there are bones that run transversely from the
spine out through the sides of the fish. You do not take these bones out
by this operation, but you take out the large back bone. It comes out
every time, and I assure you it is a very easy operation.

After you have taken all the skin and bones from the fish, then, for
this special dish, cut it in small slices three inches long and a couple
of inches wide. Use two soup plates, or two dishes of the same size,
deep dishes that you can send to the table. Butter them very thickly,
both of them. Lay the fish in one of the dishes, season the layers with
salt and pepper, and put a very little butter between each layer, and
plenty of butter on the top. Turn the second plate over the first one,
upside down on it. Put the dishes with the fish between them into the
oven to bake for about twenty minutes, or until the fish flakes. You can
tell about that by opening the oven at the end of twenty minutes, and
lifting off the top plate; then you can see whether the fish is done or
not. Now, in the recipe of which I spoke to you first, the addition of
Sauterne wine is made. After the fish is put into the dish, being
seasoned as I have told you, using less butter than you would without
the wine, with half as much butter on the layers, pour on Sauterne
wine,--that is a light, rather acid wine,--just enough to moisten the
fish. In placing the fish into the dish it does not make any difference
which side you put down. You simply want to put the pieces nicely
together so that when you come to help them you can lift each piece out
with a spoon. There is no acid that will take the place of the wine and
give the same taste. The fish is very nice cooked simply with the
butter, pepper and salt. You do not need the wine to make a nice dish,
only wine is used by the lady of whom I speak. That is her special
preparation of the dish. The wine is put in after the fish is in the
dish, just enough wine to moisten it. You will notice that often I will
make dishes that have no wine in them; if I make dishes that require
wine, I of course put it in, saying that you may use the wine or not, as
you please. In this instance I use butter, pepper and salt because it
makes a very nice dish, a very nice plain dish, but it is a distinct
dish, entirely different to the dish cooked with wine; simply two ways
of cooking fish, making two different dishes. For a fish of this
size--which probably weighed nearly three pounds--you may use about a
heaping tablespoonful of butter in all; that is, besides what you put on
the plates. You will butter the plates, and distribute butter throughout
the dish. The oven should be moderately hot, not hot enough to brown
it--hot enough to heat the plates, which are very thick, and to cook the
fish within twenty or twenty-five minutes.

If you wash the board on which the fish is cut, at once, in plenty of
hot water, with soap and a little soda or borax all the odor of the fish
will be removed. Don't let any of the utensils stand with the fish
drying on them, because if you do it will be very much harder to destroy
the odor. And, by the way, ladies, the odor of onions is another thing
that troubles some persons. The odor of onions on boards, knives and
dishes you can do away with entirely by using parsley. If you take a
knife with which you have cut onions, and chop a little parsley with it,
or draw the knife through the root of parsley two or three times, it
entirely destroys the odor of the onion. So that you see you never need
have any trouble in that way in the kitchen.

One of the ladies asks me how to prevent the odor of onions going
through the house when you are cooking them. What makes onions, cabbage
and turnips smell when you are cooking them is the escape of an
exceedingly volatile oil which they all contain; in all of them it has
the same characteristics; it does not begin to escape until they are
tender. The oil does not begin to escape until the vegetables are
tender; if you continue to boil them after that, it will escape. If you
take up cabbage or turnips as soon as they are tender, that is, as soon
as their substance begins to grow tender, you will notice there will be
comparatively little odor; but if you keep on boiling them, according to
the old-fashioned rules, for an hour, two hours, or three hours,--you
know you sometimes boil cabbage all day long,--you will be sure to have
a nice odor through the house. In cutting the onions, of course, if you
bend over them, that same oil rising from them escapes as you cut into
their substance, and will be sure to make you cry; but if you hold them
a little away from you in peeling them, or under water, or if you stand
where there is a draught blowing over your hands, it will blow that oil
away. In eating onions at the table, if you will subsequently eat
parsley dipped in vinegar, you will find that there will be very little
odor of the onion remaining in the breath.

Now to return to our fish. After you have taken the flesh of the fish
off the bone, you still would see a little of the fish remaining, even
if you cut closely. Then draw the fish, and trim the bone; that is, cut
off the head, and the fins, and the tail, and take out the entrails of
the fish; then make a paste of dry mustard, salt, and a dust of Cayenne
pepper. For a bone the size we have here, a long bone like that, use two
heaping tablespoonfuls of mustard, a dust of Cayenne pepper and enough
vinegar, or Worcestershire sauce, to moisten the mustard to make a
paste, which is to be spread over the fishbone. Have the double wire
gridiron very thickly buttered, put the bone into the gridiron, brown it
quickly at a hot fire, and serve it simply as a relish. A sort of
Barmecide feast, but I assure you it is very nice with bread or crackers
and butter. It makes a very nice little relish. I might say, ladies,
that you can treat any kind of bones in this way. Cold roast beef bones
are exceedingly nice. Of course there will be more flesh on the beef
bones than on the fish bones.


PLAIN PASTRY.

Use butter, or lard, or very finely chopped suet. If you can get good
lard it makes nice pastry; by that I mean lard which has a very little
water in it. A good deal of the lard that you buy in the stores has a
large proportion of water in it, and I believe in these days it is apt
to be sophisticated with several articles which are not exactly lard, so
that home-made lard is decidedly the best; that which you try out
yourself. First take the butter, or whatever shortening you
use,--butter, lard, or suet,--and mix it with twice the quantity of
flour. For instance, if you are going to use a pound of flour allow half
a pound of shortening. Take half the shortening and mix it with the
flour, using a knife. Then wet the mixed flour and butter with just
enough cold water to form a paste which you can roll out. If you mix
with a knife or spoon you avoid heating the pastry. After the flour and
the first half of the shortening have been mixed to a paste roll it out,
about half an inch thick, and put the rest of the shortening in flakes
on it. One of the ladies asks about putting flour on the pastry board:
Extra flour, of course, besides the quantity that you put in the pastry.
The only object in washing the butter is to get out any buttermilk that
there may be in it. After putting the butter--the second half of the
butter--over the pastry in rather large pieces, put just a little flour
over it, fold the pastry in such a way that the edge is turned up all
round to inclose the butter; that is about an inch and a half all round.
Fold the pastry together thin, and roll it out, and fold it several
times. Remember that the oftener you fold it and roll it the more flakes
you will have in the cooked pastry. Take care to use flour enough to
keep it from sticking to the board or the roller. You will remember the
pastry is not salted and unless the shortening has enough salt in it to
salt the flour, you must add it. Good lard makes a more tender pastry
than butter.

_Question._ Do you ever mix them?

MISS CORSON. Yes, you can mix them if you like, using part lard and part
butter. To roll out the pastry, roll it in a rather long strip, that is,
a strip about three times as long as it is wide. That enables you then
to fold it and keep it in a nice shape. It does not make any difference
whether you roll it from you or towards you. As many times as you roll
and fold it you give it three additional layers. Now I might keep on
rolling and folding indefinitely, and I simply should make the pastry
have more layers than this has, but I think you thoroughly understand
that, so that I will roll it out, and make our dumplings now. Only
remember that the more times you roll it the more folds you make, the
more layers you have in the pastry. Keep it as cool as possible all the
time. If you roll and fold it three times remember that you have nine
layers of butter and pastry. You can roll it out more than that if you
want to. Puff paste, which is rolled and folded in this way, has what is
called nine turns. Rolling and folding it three times makes a turn. The
object of using marble or stone pastry slabs is to keep the pastry
cool. If you make more pastry than you want to use, wrap it in a
floured towel and put it in a very cool place; then when you are ready
to use it roll and fold it two or three times, and it will be very much
better than when first made. I am going to roll up a strip of the pastry
that I cut off the edge in such a way that you will see how the layers
are formed, and you can pass it about. One of the ladies has asked me
about heating the flour. It is not necessary to heat the flour for
pastry, on the contrary, it would rather tend to spoil it. You want to
keep it as cool as possible. But in the winter when you are going to
make bread, if you heat the flour it facilitates the rising of the
bread; there you need the heat.


BAKED APPLE DUMPLINGS.

For apple dumplings, after the pastry is made, cut it in pieces about
four inches square and about a quarter of an inch thick. One of the
ladies asks about sifting the flour. That is necessary, always. For
apple dumplings, peel the apples and take out the cores, leaving the
apples as whole as possible. The corer that I have here is nothing but a
round tin cylinder. Use any apple corer that will take the core out
without breaking the apple. For this purpose Greening apples are the
nicest. These are table apples. Put an apple on each piece of pastry. In
the core of the apple put as much sugar as it will hold, and a very
small pinch of powdered cinnamon--about a quarter of a saltspoonful of
powdered cinnamon, or any powdered spice you prefer. Then fold the
corners of the square pieces of pastry up over the apple so that they
will lap over on the top of the apple. Fasten the corners by moistening
them a little with cold water. After the dumplings are all made, brush
them over the top with water, or with melted butter, or with egg,
beaten; the entire egg, or if you have the white or the yolk, you can
beat that up; of course if you use just the yolk you make them a little
yellower. If you use the yolk of an egg, beat it with a little water.
Ladies are asking me about that little rolling pin. It is like that
little knife, it is bewitched, but the magic consists simply in keeping
the rolling pin perfectly smooth, and the knife sharp. That is made of
hard wood, and is polished so that it is perfectly smooth, and of course
I keep it so by not having it soaked in water. Instead of putting water
and soap on to clean it, it simply will be wiped with a wet cloth, and
then with a dry one. The thousand dents it has in it it has got by
travel; it has been knocked around in my traveling trunk for the last
five years. The dents did not get in it by using it. It may be made of
any hard wood. One of the ladies asks me why I leave the corners of the
dumpling open. I could pat the crust around and bring it right up close
to the apple, but it would not be so light in the first place. The crust
will hold together, it will not break apart in baking, and you leave the
ends nice and light; and it makes a nicer-looking dumpling. The idea
seems to be that if I should close up the corners the juice of the
apples would stay in. It won't boil out much, anyway.

Now, ladies, I am going to take a little of the soup stock that we made
yesterday out in a cup and pass it, so you can see what it looks like
before it is clarified. That is the soup stock or broth that we made
yesterday. You will remember where your recipe ended yesterday, about
the soup stock being poured into a bowl and allowed to cool. That is the
condition in which the stock is now. After a little, I am going to tell
you about the clarifying of it, but now I want to finish telling you
about dumplings, so you will have all your dumpling recipes in one
place.

The question was asked, I believe, about the temperature of the oven.
About the same as for the fish--a moderate oven, so you can put your
hand in and count, say fifteen, quickly. It takes from half an hour to
three-quarters to bake the dumplings. Be careful not to brown them. If
the pastry seems to be browning before the apples get done,--and
something will depend upon the kind of apples you use,--cover the pastry
with a buttered paper. The object of the egg on the dumplings is to make
them a little glossy. Use either butter, or egg, or water for brushing
over the tops.


STEAMED APPLE DUMPLINGS.

For steamed dumplings usually a suet crust is used. You could use this
crust if you wanted to, but it would not be sure to be light. It might
possibly absorb a little of the steam. For suet crust you would use half
a pound of suet chopped very fine, a teaspoonful of salt and a pound of
flour. Mix carefully the flour and suet and salt with enough cold water
to make a pastry just soft enough to roll out. Roll it out about a
quarter of an inch thick, and then cut it in little squares; prepare the
apples just as I prepare them for the baked dumpling; instead of folding
the crust up and leaving the corners open, pat it with your hands so
that you entirely inclose the apple. Just roll the pastry out once and
then inclose the apples in it, and put the dumpling into the steamer;
that is, an ordinary tin steamer; set over a pot of boiling water and
steam the dumplings until they are done. You must decide that by running
a trussing needle or knitting needle through the pastry into the apple.
It may take an hour and a half to steam the dumplings; be sure they are
done.

For another kind of pastry that has been described to me by enthusiastic
gentlemen who used to have mothers, a kind of pastry "that melted in
your mouth;" it is very easy to make that; not a flaky pastry, but a
soft, exceedingly tender pastry that really crumbles. To do that you
simply rub all of the shortening into the flour. Half a pound of
shortening and a pound of flour; put the shortening into the flour with
the salt; rub them with your hands till you have the shortening
thoroughly mixed with the flour. It looks like meal; the ingredients
must be thoroughly mixed, but not melted together; then use just enough
cold water to make the pastry, and roll it out just once, and use it; be
sure to keep it cool.

_Question._ Did you say an hour and a half for steamed dumpling?

MISS CORSON. It will take nearly that, but you must try them; try them
at the end of an hour. For the dumpling you can use one of the sauces I
told you of yesterday morning, white cream sauce, or you can use simply
powdered sugar, or powdered sugar mixed with a little cinnamon. You can
use a hard sauce, which is butter and sugar mixed together in equal
quantities, with any flavoring you like.


FRIED BEEFSTEAK.

That is supposed to be the great abomination of American cooking, so
that we are going now to see whether it can not be nearly as nicely
fried as broiled. It seems a heresy, but it is true, and there are very
many occasions where it is not possible to broil in an ordinary kitchen;
the fire may not be good, or uncovering it may cool the oven. There is a
very important secret in frying beefsteak, or chops, and that is to have
the pan hot before you put the meat into it. It doesn't make any
difference what kind of a pan you use. Use the ordinary iron frying pan,
the old-fashioned spider, or dripping pan, if you wish to; but have the
pan hot; have the pan hot enough to sear the outside of the meat
directly it touches it; after the pan is hot put the beefsteak, or
chops--because they are both cooked in the same way--into the hot pan.
If the meat is entirely lean, if there is not a particle of fat on it,
you may put not more than half a teaspoonful of butter in the pan; run
it quickly over the bottom of the pan. But I never saw meat yet so lean,
unless the fat was all trimmed off, that there was not fat enough to
cook any chop or steak. The portion of fat you will usually find on meat
is about one-third, unless you take the meat from the short loin; that
is called the porterhouse, or tenderloin steak. In that case you have an
excess of fat; there is more than one-third, reckoning in the kidney
fat, or suet. You may cut away some of the fat, unless the butchers have
cut it away. The butcher has already cut it away from this piece, and,
by the way, I notice that Minneapolis butchers cut a very long and thin
steak. Now I would not advise the cooking, broiling or frying of that
thin end. I would rather buy two steaks of that kind and cut off that
and use it for stewing, because it would stew very nicely; broiled it
will be rather tough.

As my frying pan is small I am going to cut the steak short. These
steaks are cut too thin. A beefsteak to be nice should be over an inch
thick--an inch and a half thick. You can easily economise on a thick
steak by simply cutting it in halves, and using only as much of it as
you want at once, because in almost any weather steak will keep at least
over night. Have it too thick rather than too thin. Have it just the
thickness you want and then cut it in two, using part only if you only
need part of it. Trim off the outside skin, the tough skin; scrape the
steak to make sure that there are no particles of bone on it. That bone,
of course, comes in sawing the steak. Cut off the cartilage at the top
of the steak, otherwise the steak may curl up. Have your pan hot enough
to make it sear. Put the steak in and brown it quickly, first on one
side and then on the other. In turning the steak run a knife or fork
under it and lift it. Don't stick a fork into it, because by doing that
you make little holes in the fibre of the steak and so let the juice
escape.

_Question._ Will you pound your steak?

MISS CORSON. No, decidedly not; that lets out the juice. You make little
holes in the steak if you stick a fork into it, and by pounding you let
the juice out. Now, you want to keep all the juice in the steak, all the
juice that you can; so that, in turning the steak simply lift it with a
fork or knife and turn it over; when it is brown on both sides push the
frying pan back toward the back part of the fire, and finish cooking it
until it is done to your taste. After it is brown on one side, turn it
over; and then, after that, you can turn it once or twice; the frequent
turning does not make any difference after you have got it browned on
both sides and you can keep all the juice in. Turn it as soon as it is
brown at first; have the hottest kind of a fire; get it brown on the
under side as fast as you can; don't be afraid of burning it; then turn
it over and brown it on the other side; after that you can turn it as
often as you please. Some people like their steak rare, some medium
rare, and some well done. To test steak, do not cut into it to see if it
is done, but press your finger on it, on the substance of the steak. If
you do that quickly you won't burn your finger. As long as the steak is
very rare the fibre of the meat will be elastic, and directly you take
your finger up the fibre will press up again; there will be no dent
there. When it is medium rare just a little dent will remain from the
pressure, because the fibre is less elastic. When it is well done you
can press on it and make a little hollow that will stay there. Do not
season the meat until after it is done; don't put salt on any meat
before cooking; you draw out the juice by salting it.

Now for the seasoning of the steak. I have already said that to apply
salt to the cut fibre of meat will be sure to draw out the juice, so
that you do not want to season a steak until it is done. When it is done
season it with salt, pepper and butter. The quantities you use depend
upon the taste. That rule applies whether steak is broiled or fried. On
that plate you will see the drippings, all that was in the frying pan.
There is no juice of the meat there; it is simply browned fat. Whatever
juice there was in the meat is still there. Broiled steak is cooked on
precisely the same principle. It is to be put just as near the fire as
you can get it. After the broiled steak is browned on one side and then
on the other, just as fast as you can brown it; don't be afraid of
burning it; you need to watch it; then move it away from the fire, and
let it cook as much as you like. Test it in the same way I told you to
test fried steak. When it is done put it on a hot dish; put butter,
pepper and salt on it, and serve it hot.

_Question._ What do you do when the fat drops in the fire and blazes?

MISS CORSON. Of course it will do that, but that will help brown the
steak. If it is possible to broil under the fire it is very much nicer.
Sometimes the front of the stove is so arranged that you can let it down
and run the gridiron under it; before you begin to broil over the fire
you can get the top of the fire very red and clear by throwing a little
salt upon it; that will help to destroy the odor. If the meat is frozen
you should put it in cold water to thaw before cooking it; you can not
avoid in that case washing the meat. To return to the matter of pounding
steak: If you pound or break the fibre of meat in any way you let the
juice escape; that makes the meat dry.

_Question._ What do you say to the notion that so many have, that
pounding the meat makes it tender?

MISS CORSON. You do nothing but break the fibre and save yourself the
trouble of chewing the steak. To encourage laziness it is a very good
idea. But remember, if you drive the juice out of the steak by pounding
you destroy its nutriment. You need the juice in the steak. Now, there
is a remedy for the toughness of steak, which I can give you, depending
upon whether you like salad oil. If you do not, you ought to learn to,
because it is one of the most nutritious and purest of the fats when it
is perfectly good. Good sweet salad oil is preferable to any animal or
vegetable fat for purposes of nutriment. There is no reason why you
should not use salad oil on the score of health. A great many people
object to it; they do not like the idea; they think it is rather
foreign, and to some people it is distasteful, but they have very strong
memories of childhood and another kind of oil. You know even that kind
of oil in these days does not taste badly. Olive oil, the peanut oil, or
lard oil, when they are fresh and sweet, are very desirable. To soften
the fibre of the meat with vinegar and salad oil put on the platter
about three tablespoonfuls of salad oil, and half a teacupful of vinegar
and a pinch of pepper; no salt. Put these on the platter; then lay the
raw steak on the platter, and let it stand at least an hour; then turn
it over and let it stand another hour. The longer you can let it stand,
if it is in the daytime, turning it over every hour, the tenderer you
will make it. The vinegar makes the fibre of the meat tender, and the
oil keeps it so. That is, the vinegar softens the fibre of the meat and
the oil keeps it soft. If you want to prepare it for over night put it
in the oil and vinegar about 6 o'clock, about supper time, and let it
stand till bed time, then turn it over, and let it stand till morning.
When you come to cook the steak do not wipe the oil and vinegar off;
simply let what will run off, and then lay the meat on the gridiron and
broil it, or fry it; there will be no taste perceptible if the oil is
good.


CARAMEL FOR COLORING SOUP.

A heaping tablespoonful of common brown sugar if you have it; if not,
use any kind of sugar; put it in the frying pan and stir it until it is
dark brown; that is, until it is on the point of burning; see that it
browns evenly. Then put in a tablespoonful of water, either hot or
cold--it does not make any difference; stir that until it is mixed with
the sugar; then another tablespoonful, until you have used about half a
cupful of water. If you should pour the water all in at once the sugar
would simply boil over and burn you. Use about half a cupful of water,
adding it gradually, and stirring until the burnt sugar is dissolved.
That gives you the caramel. Now, while I am making the caramel, I will
describe to you the clarifying of the soup.


CLARIFYING SOUP.

To clarify soup stock: For each quart use the white and shell of one egg
and one tablespoonful of cold water. Put the white and shell of the egg
and the cold water into the bottom of the saucepan, and mix them
together. Then put in the soup stock. Set the saucepan over the fire and
let it boil gradually, stirring it every minute to mix the egg
thoroughly so that it will not cake on the bottom of the pan before it
begins to boil. When you have the stock made quite hot, when it begins
to boil, then you do not need to stir it; but let it boil until the egg
rises to the surface in the form of a thick, white scum, and the soup
underneath looks perfectly clear, like sherry wine. Then strain it. When
the egg is thick and white, as you see this, and the soup is clear
underneath, set a colander in an earthen bowl, put a folded towel,
doubled, in it, pour the soup into the bowl, and let it run through the
colander without squeezing the towel. You see that is a repetition of
the direction I gave you for straining the soup in the first place. The
egg is in the towel. Now, I am going to put some of the soup into a
goblet before coloring it, so that you can see the natural color. A
light straw-color is the proper color for clear soup. You will very
often find clear soup served to you, even at nice hotels, much darker
than that; as dark as what I am going to make now, which is the proper
color for the luncheon soups called _bouillon_. The coloring is a matter
of taste. The clear soup, or _consomme_, is to be served plain like
that, or with the addition of any macaroni paste, or poached eggs, and
then it takes its name from the additional ingredient which goes into
the clear soup. Julienne soup is served with strips of vegetables in it,
as I may tell you in some subsequent lesson.




LECTURE FOURTH.


SLICED APPLE PIE.

Half a pound of shortening to a pound of flour, the shortening to be
rubbed into the flour with the hands until it is so thoroughly mixed
that it seems like meal, but not at all melted or softened; then just
enough cold water to make a pastry which will roll out. Roll out the
pastry and use it at once to line the pie plates. Fill the plates with
sliced apples, or with any fruit or mince meat. To-day I shall use
sliced apples. Sprinkle flour over the pastry, and then roll it out and
line the plates; wet the lower crust to make the upper crust stick to
it. Cut two or three little slits in the upper crust. Take care not to
press the outer edges of the crust together. After the upper crust has
been put on the pie brush it with beaten egg, if you wish it to be
glossy when it is done. Then put it in a moderate oven and bake it for
three-quarters of an hour, until you are very sure that the apple is
done. You can tell that by trying the apple through the little cuts that
you make in the pastry. This morning, in making pastry, you remember
that we rolled and folded it a number of times. I simply roll this out
once, just enough to get it thin enough to use for my pie. First roll
out the pastry, and cut off the cover for the top of the pie. Lay it one
side, and then roll out the rest and use it for the pie, as I have
already directed. Use Greening apples if you can get them. These are
table apples. They are not so good for pies for two or three reasons.
They will not keep their form when they are baked in the pie, and they
may not be perfectly tender. These will break and grow very soft as soon
as they begin to cook.

I might, while I am making our pie, say a little about flour in general
use in the family. As a rule I use what is called pastry flour, best for
pie crusts. Pastry flour has more starch in it than ordinary family
flour, or bread flour. The starch is the interior of the grain. The
family flour is the grain ground entire, only the husk being removed.
From grain ground in that way none of the nutritious elements are
removed. You get a greater proportion of gluten, and some of the mineral
elements of the grain that lie close to the husk; the flour that has an
excess of gluten in it will absorb more water than pastry flour, or
flour composed chiefly of starch, and it will make a tougher dough,
either in the form of pie crust or bread than a flour which has the most
starch in it. It is more nutritious than starchy flour, so that if you
want tender, rather white pastry and bread, you must make up your minds
to sacrifice some of the nutritious elements of the flour. All through
the West the flour which is marketed is made, I think, from the entire
wheat, and that is more thoroughly good, and more nutritious, than the
so-called choice pastry flour. In the West you have a better flour than
we at the East do, if we depend upon the Eastern mills. There are some
very good brands of flour made in New York State, but as a rule they are
not so full of gluten and not so nutritious as the Western flours. Where
flour is made from winter wheat, which lies in the ground all winter
long and gathers more of the mineral elements of the soil than spring
wheat does, the flour is superior.

The pie is now heaped full of sliced apples by using about half a dozen
rather small apples. I suppose you think this is a rather extravagant
way to make a pie, but you do not need to put so many apples in unless
you want to; we want a nice thick pie. This is cinnamon that I am using
for flavoring. Put two heaping tablespoonfuls of sugar on top of the
apples in the pie. Finally brush the top of the pie, either with beaten
egg or with a little sugar and water dissolved, and put it into the oven
to bake.


BREAD MAKING.

Now take your recipe for bread making. Use the compressed yeast which
you buy at the grocery store. For two small loaves of bread or a large
pan of biscuit use a whole cake of yeast. Dissolve the yeast in lukewarm
water, a cupful of lukewarm water. Then add enough flour to form a thick
batter; that will be about a cupful of flour; a thick batter which will
cling to the mixing spoon when you lift the spoon and let a drop fall
on the surface. Cover the bowl with a towel folded several times, or a
thick cloth, so that all the heat can be retained. Then set the bowl
somewhere near the fire, in a place not too hot to bear your hand, and
let it stand for about half an hour, or until the batter is light and
foamy. Keep the bowl covered all the time, and take care that you do not
have it in too hot a place. Don't have it in a place where you can not
bear your hand. After the sponge--as the batter is called--is light and
foaming, mix in another cupful of lukewarm water in which a teaspoonful
of salt is dissolved. After the second cupful of lukewarm water with the
teaspoonful of salt dissolved in it, add enough flour to form a dough
stiff enough to knead with the hands. Knead the dough on the board for
just five minutes. Some good housekeepers would declare that just five
minutes' kneading is flying in the face of Providence in the way of
bread making, but I assure you it is enough. That is, it is enough to
give you bread of a firm, fine grain, perfectly even in its consistency.
It won't be full of large, uneven holes; it will be firm, fine bread.
After you have kneaded the bread five minutes make it up in a little
loaf, or two loaves, as you like; put them in small iron pans,
buttered--black iron bread pans--and set them again by the fire, where
you can bear your hand, and let the little loaves of dough rise until
they are just twice as large as when you put them down. That generally
will take about half an hour if the yeast is good. Brush the loaves over
the top with a little melted butter, or with a teaspoonful of sugar
dissolved in water. Put them in the oven and bake them. The bread is to
be baked until you can run a sharp knife or trussing needle in through
the thickest part of the loaf without the bread sticking in any way. If
the needle or knife comes out clean and bright the bread is done. It may
take from half an hour to an hour to bake the bread. In the stove that I
used the first morning over in the other building I have baked a loaf of
bread, the size of those I am going to show you, in eleven minutes. I
had not realized that bread could be baked thoroughly in so short a
time, but one day in Northampton, Mass., one of my class timed the
baking of the bread. A loaf of bread of that size was baked in eleven
minutes. This same bread dough you can make up in the form of little
rolls. I will make part of it up in rolls. Of course you will understand
that the smaller the piece of dough the more rapidly it will rise the
second time, and the quicker you will be enabled to bake it. So if you
are in a hurry, and want bread baked quickly, you will make it in the
form of little rolls; when I make the rolls I will describe the process.

_Question._ Should bread be baked a long or a short time?

MISS CORSON. The sooner it can be baked the better. There is no special
object to be gained in the baking of bread except to thoroughly cook the
dough. It can not affect the nutriment of the flour very much whether it
takes a longer or a shorter time. The nutriment of the flour might be
slightly wasted if it took a very long time. There is no objection to
baking bread as quickly as it can be done.

Now before I begin to make the pudding I will answer a question that has
been asked about the best yeast and the quick rising of bread. The
object of raising bread is simply to make it digestible by separating
the mass of the dough. If it is firm and solid, that is, if the bread is
heavy, it can not be easily penetrated by the gastric juice, and
consequently is indigestible. So that the most healthy bread is that
which is sufficiently light and porous to allow the gastric juice to
penetrate it easily. Only a mechanical operation is required to make the
bread light. Now that process which will most quickly make the bread
dough light is the most desirable. The longer you take to raise bread,
the more slowly you raise, the more of the nutriment of the flour you
destroy by the process of fermentation that lightens the bread. The
yeast combining with water at a certain temperature causes fermentation,
and from that fermentation carbolic acid gas is evolved, which forces
its way up through the dough and fills it with little bubbles,--in other
words, makes it light. Now the more quickly you can accomplish that
fermentation, or rather lightening of the dough by the formation of
little air cells, the more you will preserve the nutriment of the flour.

The idea prevails to some extent that if ladies use as much yeast as I
have to-day the bread will taste of the yeast. It will not if the yeast
is fresh. If the yeast is old or sour it will taste. But you can use as
much as I have shown you and not have the bread taste after it is done.
You see my object in using a great deal of yeast, proportionately, is to
accomplish the lightening of the dough in a very short time. The best
bread that ever was made or that ever was put on the market was raised
mechanically, without the action of yeast; it was called aerated bread.
It was bread dough lightened by a mechanical process. Carbonic acid gas
was driven into the dough by machinery after the flour was mixed with
salt water; and the bread made was very light and every particle of the
nourishment preserved in that way.

_Question._ Do you ever put sugar in bread?

MISS CORSON. You can put in anything you like. You can put sugar, or
milk, or anything you like in the bread to vary it. I will use nothing
to-day but yeast, flour, water, and salt. This is perfectly plain,
wholesome bread. You put milk in bread and it makes it dry quicker.
Vienna bread, which is made partly of milk, dries more quickly than any
other bread that is made. You can make any variation you like from the
recipe I have given you. I have given you a perfectly plain home-made
bread.

_Question._ Do you ever scald the flour for bread?

MISS CORSON. You can scald the flour if you wish, but you do not
accomplish any special purpose by it. In the winter time, if you heat
the flour before you mix it with yeast and warm water, you increase the
rapidity with which the bread dough rises.

_Question._ How would you make brown bread--ordinary graham bread?

MISS CORSON. Use graham flour; mix your white flour with it, if it is
for graham bread proper; if it is for graham gems use simply graham
flour, water and salt, beaten together. Graham flour, salt and water
beaten together into a form and baked in little buttered tins is the
graham bread pure and simple of the Grahamites. It is not necessary to
knead bread more than once to secure lightness. I have already said that
the longer you prolong the process of bread making the more of the
nourishment of the flour you destroy. You will see when the bread is
baked to-day, if we are fortunate in our baking, that the bread is
perfectly light and of even grain.


BREAD AND APPLE PUDDING.

Stale bread cut in slices or small pieces, fill a pudding dish of medium
size, only three eggs, or if eggs are very dear, four tablespoonfuls of
sugar, and a pint of milk, or enough more milk to saturate the bread. If
the bread is very stale and dry you will have to use a pint and a half
of milk. Three eggs, a pint of milk, four tablespoons of sugar, will
make about a quart of liquid. The custard you pour over the bread; let
the custard soak into the bread; then on the top of the pudding put a
layer of fruit about an inch thick. You may vary the fruit, using sliced
apples, or dried apples which have been soaked over night, and then
stewed tender, dried peaches treated in the same way, or canned peaches,
canned pears--any fruit you like. In the summer, in berry season, use
berries. If the fruit is sour sprinkle it with sugar; then put the
pudding in the oven and bake it. You can use dried fruit with this
pudding, such as raisins or currants, but you put the fruit in through
the pudding instead of on top. If you want to make the pudding
particularly good you will separate the white and yolks of the eggs, mix
the yolks of the eggs with the milk and sugar; save the whites until the
pudding is done; in that case you have to use a little more milk
proportionately. Save the whites until the pudding is done, then beat
them to a stiff froth and add to it three heaping tablespoons of
powdered sugar, very gently mixing them, just as I mixed that light
omelette yesterday. That makes what is called a _meringue_. Put the
_meringue_ over the top of the pudding after it is done; run it through
the oven for about a minute, just long enough to color it slightly, and
then serve the pudding.

If you want the pudding entirely smooth when it is done, you must break
the bread up in the custard before you bake it. My way is simply to
saturate the bread with the custard. You can beat it if you wish. The
pudding will be slightly liquid, like bread pudding, and then the fruit,
if it is juicy, makes it still more liquid, and if you add the
_meringue_, that of itself is a sauce. You will notice, as a rule, that
I make everything as plain as possible, because I wish to demonstrate
that plain dishes cooked with simple and few materials, can be very
good. Perforated tin pie plates bake very nicely. Of course you want to
take care to have the bottom crust thick enough, so that none of the
juice from fruit pies will run through. If the oven is very hot on the
bottom, it will not do to set a pie on the very bottom; a grating must
be used. You will have to use your judgment about baking, watching the
pie, and taking care that it does not get burnt.

(Returning to the bread making, Miss Corson continued:)

Now I am going to put the second cup of water and flour into the dough.
You want to remember, in raising bread, to keep it always at the same
temperature until you get it light. It should be set where you can put
your hand without burning. Keep the bowl, containing the sponge, just
warm. You don't want it anywhere where it will get so hot as to scald
the sponge. You can set the bowl in winter over boiling water to keep
the temperature equal.

(A question was asked in regard to rhubarb pie.)

MISS CORSON. Some ladies put the rhubarb raw into the pies when they
make rhubarb pies, trusting to its cooking while the crust is baking;
others stew it with sugar before they put it in the pies. When it comes
in from the market it should be cut in little pieces about half an inch
long, and the outside, or thin skin, stripped off. It requires a great
deal of sugar, whether you put it into the pie uncooked, or you first
cook it. It makes an exceedingly nice acid pie. Usually the best way is
to stew it first before you put it in the pie. That gives it to you in
the form of a pulp. If you put it raw into the pie, to a certain extent
the form is perfect, that is, it retains its little block-like shape
after it is cooked.

(The bread now being ready to knead, Miss Corson recurred to that
subject.)

I will take for the dough three cups of flour, about three heaping
cupfuls besides the first one. There was an old adage to the effect that
some imaginary substance called "elbow grease" was necessary in kneading
bread. I presume that is another name for force. But there is no special
strength necessary. The bread is kneaded for the purpose of entangling a
little more air in it, and you accomplish that by folding and refolding
it, as I am doing; just using enough flour to keep it from sticking to
your hands. In five minutes you will find that you have a rather smooth,
soft dough, that does not stick to your hands. That is all you want. You
will always find perfectly good yeast in any town, or you can make the
yeast yourself.

_Question._ If you use twice as much flour would you use twice as much
yeast?

MISS CORSON. If you want to raise the bread quickly you can increase the
quantity of yeast in the same proportion that I have given it you here
to-day, until you reach as much as six or seven pounds of flour, and
then you would not need to use proportionately as much yeast. You could
diminish the quantity a little. You see, the object of using plenty of
yeast is to get the bread raised quickly.

_Question._ Doesn't home-made yeast make heartier bread than the other?

MISS CORSON. It makes bread less digestible--it may be heartier in that
sense; the Irishman does not like his potatoes quite done; he thinks
them heartier when they are somewhat indigestible. There could not be
more nutritious or wholesome bread than this quickly raised bread. I
have given you several very good reasons for raising bread as quickly as
possible. Bread raised more slowly is not so nutritious, because some of
the nutritive elements are destroyed in the fermentation which goes on
in the slow process.

To make rolls, take small pieces of dough and make them round, and cut
them nearly through the centre. Put the rolls in a buttered pan; cover
them up with a cloth and let them rise double their original size, where
you can bear your hand. Then bake them. Let the dough always rise until
it is twice its size before baking. I think I have already explained to
you that if you want the bread or roll glossy you can brush it with
sugar and water, or melted butter. These rolls will be set on the top of
the stove to rise, just like bread. As soon as they are twice their size
they go into the oven to bake.

_Question._ Do you ever use any shortening in the rolls?

MISS CORSON. You can use it if you want to. Knead butter in the part of
the dough that is designed for rolls--say a tablespoonful of butter; put
it in when you are doing the five minutes' kneading. There is no reason
why you should not knead in anything that your fancy calls for,
providing it is edible.

Now I will show you how you can prevent the juice running out of fruit
pies. For fruit pies--pies made in the summer time, of juicy
fruits--better use no under crust. Take a deep dish; put the fruit into
the dish, heaping it a little, just as I heaped the apples; wet the
edges of the dish with cold water; lay the pastry on the dish and press
it very slightly, _not on the edge itself_, because that makes the
pastry heavy, but just inside of the edge. As I press it I leave the
edge intact; press the pastry against the dish all the way round; then
with your finger make a little groove all the way round your pie, inside
the edge of the crust; then, with a little knife, cut holes in the
groove. Now, when the juice of the fruit boils out, as it will, instead
of forcing its way out of the edges, the crust will be held upon the wet
dish, and the fruit juice will boil out in the little groove and stay
there. To serve the pie, you cut the upper crust with a sharp knife, and
serve with a spoon, taking a piece of crust and plenty of fruit out on
each plate. No under crust is there. If you have an under crust with
very juicy pie it will be pretty sure to be soggy and heavy. The
English way of serving these pies is a very nice one, and is, as I have
described, with whipped cream. Serve whipped cream with a fruit pie.
Among other nice things that we can not get in this country is
Devonshire cream, which is a cream almost as thick as the hard sauce you
make by mixing powdered sugar and egg together; it is thick enough
almost to cut. We can not get that cream here, but use thick, nice
cream, sweetened or not, as you like. One of my English friends, who
first taught me this way of serving pie, said that at her home they
never sweetened the cream; they simply whipped it to a froth and served
it piled up on a dish by the side of the pie. The pie was taken out on a
plate, and then two or three spoonfuls of this whipped cream laid on the
plate by the side of the pie. You can sweeten it if you like.


MERINGUE.

I will next make a _meringue_. I have already told you to use the whites
of three eggs, three tablespoonfuls of powdered sugar--and that really
must be pulverized very fine and sifted. In beating the eggs you can
always get them light very quickly, if they are reasonably cold in the
beginning, by beating with a change of movement. Beat until your hand
grows tired, and then simply change the way you hold the beater. Don't
stop beating. Of course you can use any kind of an egg-whip you like.
This which I use is made of twisted wire. Only take care to have the egg
beaten entirely stiff. Do not have any liquid egg in the bottom of the
bowl. In the summer time you can cool the egg by putting in a little
pinch of salt if it does not beat stiff at once. I would not advise
using an egg that had the least odor about it. As soon as the custard in
the pudding is done we are going to take the pudding out of the oven,
and put the _meringue_ on the top, whether the apples are done or not.
It does not do any harm to stop beating for awhile. Mix this, using a
cutting motion, not a stirring motion. Mix until the sugar and egg are
smoothly blended, and the _meringue_ is ready to use.




LECTURE FIFTH.


Our lesson this morning is cream of salmon; shoulder of lamb, boned and
roasted; force meat or stuffing for roast meats; potatoes, boiled and
baked; and cheese crusts. I shall begin with the lamb or mutton.

Remove the bone first, then stuff and bake the meat, as I have no
facilities for roasting with this stove; but I will have something to
say about the process of roasting in the course of the lesson. A great
many of the ladies think that the shoulder or fore quarters of meat is
not so desirable a piece for use as the loin or hind quarter, but that
is a mistake. In the first place the proportion of bone in the fore
quarter is very much less than in the hind quarter. In one lesson that I
gave, about a week ago, at Cleveland, I had a butcher remove all the
bones from a fore quarter weighing between five and six pounds, and then
weighed the bones: They weighed a pound and a quarter. I also had him
remove the bones from the hind quarters and weighed them, and they
weighed more. The meat of the fore quarter is sweeter, and quite as
nutritious as the meat of the hind quarter, and the fore quarter is
always cheaper. So that, you see, on the score of flavor and economy,
the fore quarter is more desirable for use than the hind quarter. In
England, where mutton is always in perfection, it is the fore quarter or
shoulder of mutton that is served to guests, and the hind quarter is the
one that is used for the family dinner.

To make the dish which I am going to prepare this morning, I have had
the whole quarter brought in so that I can show you how the shoulder
should be cut off. Simply with a large piece of the outside skin
attached. Usually the butcher might cut the shoulder square off close,
but I want this large piece of skin for stuffing. There is a natural
division between the shoulder and the ribs, so that the shoulder comes
off with perfect ease. If you buy an entire fore quarter like that you
will have the butcher cut off the shoulder for roasting or baking, then
let him cut the neck in rather small pieces for stews or mutton broth.
What is called the rack or ribs would be cut into chops for broiling or
frying, and the breast would be cut off entire to be stewed or roasted
or baked. A very nice way to prepare the breast is to have the bones all
taken out, spread a layer of nice force meat or stuffing over it, roll
it up, and tie it. Then it can be baked, or roasted, or stewed. Another
nice way to cook the breast is to boil it until it is tender enough to
enable you to pull the bones out without any difficulty; then take out
all the bones, put it on a platter, set another platter on top of it
with a heavy weight on the top platter, and press it until it is cold.
Then cut it in rather small pieces, about two or three inches square,
and bread and fry it. The process of breading and frying is accomplished
in this way. You have cracker crumbs--cracker crumbs rolled and
sifted--or bread crumbs, stale bread, dried in the oven and rolled and
sifted, in a large dish. In another dish beat a couple of eggs until
they are liquid. It does not need to be frothy, but simply to have the
substance of the egg well broken; then dip the little pieces of boiled
lamb, first in the cracker dust, then in the beaten egg, then again in
the cracker dust. That is called breading. To fry properly, so that you
have no grease, you want the frying kettle half full of fat. You don't
want a little fat in a frying pan, but a frying kettle like that which
you use in frying doughnuts. Put the kettle over the fire and let the
fat get hot, that is, let it get so hot that it begins to smoke. When
the fat begins to smoke you plunge whatever article you wish to fry into
it. If you take the precaution to do that, have plenty of fat and let it
get smoking hot and then fry in it, you will never have anything greasy.
The action of the hot fat at once so carbonizes the surface of what you
wish to fry, and prevents the soaking of the fat. Fry whatever article
you are treating until it is a light brown, then take it out of the fat
with a skimmer, and lay it on brown paper for a moment--coarse brown
paper--and that will absorb the very little fat on the surface. It will
be perfectly free from grease. You can season before you bread an
article, or you can season the bread crumbs or cracker dust which you
use in breading, just as you like. Or, after the article is fried you
can season it with salt and pepper. Some things are seasoned after the
frying--for instance, Saratoga potatoes--they are always salted after
frying. You can make bread crumbs very fine by using a fine sieve and
sifting. If you have cracker meal already prepared you will see that it
is as fine as Indian meal; it is sold in the grocery stores and at the
cracker factories, and it is cheaper to buy cracker dust or cracker meal
than it is to make it at home, if you buy the whole crackers, because,
of course the manufacturers can afford to use their broken
crackers--they are all perfectly good--in making cracker meal and sell
that very much cheaper than they can sell the whole crackers. The
question of the digestibility of fried articles of food is very often
raised. You understand that the hard fried surface is less digestible
than any soft surface, and many fried articles are indigestible because
of the quantity of grease they contain. If you fry in the way I have
told you, you will not have that excess of grease.

To take the bone from the shoulder, first cut from the inside and take
out the shoulder blade, cutting from the inside, avoiding as far as
possible cutting through the skin on the outside. The butcher will
always do this for you probably, if you tell him about what you want
done. First, the shoulder blade is taken out, then the bone which
follows down along the leg. After the shoulder blade is taken out put it
into a kettle of water, over the fire, and boil it for awhile until you
can scrape all the meat off of it. You will have to use it in finishing
the dish. After taking out the shoulder blade the cutting must all be
done from the inside. There will be two or three places where you may
possibly cut through the skin, where it is drawn very close over the
bone, but cut as little as possible. When the meat is freshly killed
before the skin is dried, you may not always cut through there, but
where the skin is dried fast to the bone you will have to. This may seem
a slight waste of time, but this dish is desirable for several reasons.
In the first place, the bone being entirely taken out you can carve it
without any waste whatever and with a great deal of ease. In the next
place it gives you a very ornamental dish. In fact, I am going to show
you how to make a duck out of it. And as I say, if you get the butcher
to do it, it will not make any difference to you if it does take time.

Always in sewing meat or poultry, ladies, take very large stitches, not
with fine thread. Use cord, so that you can see where the threads are
when the meat is done. Any kind of a large needle will answer for
sewing, large enough to carry your cord. Always leave long ends too.

To stuff the meat, season it nicely with pepper and salt and any herb
that you are going to use in making stuffing. Sage, of course, would be
very good with fat meat; put onion in the stuffing to make it imitate
duck. For a force meat of bread, a teaspoonful of chopped onion; fry it
in a tablespoonful of butter until it is light brown. While the onion is
frying soak a cupful of stale bread in cold water until it is soft, then
squeeze out the water. Put the soaked bread with the fried onion, add a
teaspoonful of salt, a teaspoonful of any herb that you decide for
seasoning, any dried sweet herb, half a saltspoonful of pepper, and stir
all these ingredients over the fire until they are scalding hot. Use
that force meat for stuffing any kind of meat or poultry. Of course
there are a great many ways of making force meats; this is only one, and
a very simple one. Another good stuffing for duck or for this dish, if
you wish it more closely to imitate duck, would be to increase the
quantity of onion--use much more onion, half a cupful of onion, or even
more when you want to make onion stuffing. Another way is to use dry
bread without cooking, a chopped onion, herbs, butter; some ladies like
to put an egg in stuffing. There are a great many different methods of
making it. Cold, chopped meat is very nice added to stuffing or
dressing.

After the shoulder is stuffed thus, run a needle entirely round the edge
in a large, over-hand stitch, so that you can draw it up like a purse;
stitches at least an inch and a half long. That draws the edge up. Then
take two or three stitches in such a way as to hold the stuffing in.
Remember always to leave long ends in tying the cord used in sewing.
Then curl the leg up like the neck of a duck and fasten with a cord.
After it is prepared like that it is to be put into a pan in the oven,
or before a hot fire, and browned quickly on the outside. It may be
seasoned after it is browned. There will be a little drippings in the
pan; baste it with the drippings; bake it or roast it, allowing, if you
want it well done, about twenty minutes to the pound. A shoulder like
that will weigh about two pounds and a half or three pounds. It will do
in an hour's time in a pretty quick oven; in an hour and a half in a
moderate one. Use no water in the baking pan, because water never can
get as hot as the fat outside of the meat. The temperature of the hot
fat is higher than the temperature of hot water, and the result of
putting water around meat in a baking pan is to draw out the juice. The
object is to keep all the juice in the meat. You will always find that
there will be drippings enough from any ordinary cut of meat for the
purpose of basting. If you have an absolutely lean piece of meat pour
about a couple of tablespoonfuls of drippings, or butter, in the baking
pan, but no water, and use the drippings for basting. A nice gravy is
very easily made from the drippings in the pan. I will tell you about
that later. If the meat appears to be baking too quickly, if there is
any danger of its burning, put a sheet of buttered paper over it. Baste
the meat every fifteen or twenty minutes. You can drench it with flour,
just before basting, if you want to. That gives it a rough surface. The
flour browns with the fat. If you are basting with water of course the
flour would not brown so quickly. I think I have given you good reasons
for not basting it with water.


CREAM OF SALMON.

A cupful of boiled salmon separated from the skin and bone and rubbed
through a sieve with a potato masher, mixed with a quart of cream soup,
gives you cream of salmon. Any of the ladies who have seen cream sauce
made will understand the making of the cream soup. Put a slice of salmon
that will make a cupful, over the fire in enough boiling water to cover
it, with a heaping tablespoonful of salt, and boil it until the flakes
separate. That will be perhaps ten minutes. Watch it a little. When the
flakes separate drain it, take away the skin and bones and put it into a
fine colander or stout wire sieve, and rub it through with a potato
masher.

_Question._ Do you use canned salmon?

MISS CORSON. Yes, you can use canned salmon. That is already cooked, and
you simply would rub it through the sieve. The fresh salmon is to be
boiled in salted water. If you use canned salmon you do not need to boil
it. After the salmon is rubbed through the sieve it is called _puree_ or
pulp of salmon.

Now to make a quart of cream soup: For each quart of soup put in the
sauce pan a heaping tablespoonful of butter, a heaping tablespoonful of
flour; put them over the fire and stir them until they are quite
smooth. Then begin to add hot milk, half a cupful at a time, stirring
each half cupful smoothly with the butter and flour before you add any
more, till you have added a quart, or if milk is scarce a pint of milk
and a pint of water. If you haven't any milk at all, a quart of water.
That gives you a white soup, if you add simply water; if you add milk
it is called cream soup. If you are very fortunate and have lots of
cream, in place of some of the milk, use cream, and then you will have
genuine cream soup. After the milk or water is all added, then season
the soup palatably with salt and pepper--white pepper. I have told you
about white pepper. It is to be had at all the grocery stores; it costs
no more than black pepper and is very much nicer for any white soup or
white sauce. Salt and pepper to taste, and a very little grated
nutmeg; a quarter of a saltspoonful, a little pinch of grated nutmeg.
After the soup is seasoned stir in the salmon. I have told you already
how to prepare the salmon. Stir the soup constantly until it boils for
a couple of minutes. By that time you will find that the salmon is
stirred smoothly all through it. Then it will be ready to serve, and it
is very good. You can use any other kind of fish in the same way, and
your soup will take its name from the fish that you use. Halibut or
codfish, trout or any fish. Only remember if you want the soup to be
white you must use the white part of the fish. For instance, if you had
a large dark fish you would want to take off the brown parts and use
only the white parts. Otherwise the brown parts of the fish will color
the soup. You can use cream soup as the basis for vegetable soups that
are very nice. Prepare the vegetables in the same way; boil them, and
rub them through a sieve with a potato masher. Then stir them into the
cream soup. Use asparagus, celery, cucumbers, green peas, string beans,
Jerusalem artichokes,--those little root artichokes,--any vegetable, in
fact, varying the quantity of vegetable in this way. You will find that
some vegetables will give a much more decided flavor than others. For
instance, celery has a very strong flavor, and cucumbers have rather a
decided flavor. You want to use enough vegetables to flavor the soup,
if it is a white vegetable. If it is a vegetable that has a decided
color like carrots, for instance, or beets,--by the way, beets make a
delicious soup, and a very pretty one is made with spinach,--you want
to use enough to color the soup. The beets, boiled so that all the
color is preserved, and then rubbed through a sieve, make a very pretty
soup. One of our New York pupils calls it a "pink velvet soup." Spinach
makes a very nice green soup if it is properly boiled. We shall try to
get some spinach for one of the lessons. We have _puree_ of spinach on
our list, and if we can get any spinach I will show you how to boil it
so as to keep its color.


BOILED POTATOES.

The boiling of potatoes is a very simple operation, but there is a good
deal of talking to be done in connection with it. It does not make any
difference whether you use hot water or cold in boiling potatoes. What
you want to watch is the stage at which you take the potatoes out of the
water. That is what determines whether they are to be mealy or not. The
cause of the potatoes being mealy is the rupture of the starch cells
and the escape of the steam just at the right moment, just when the
potatoes are tender; and if you leave them in the water after they are
tender, then the membrane of the starch cells being broken permits the
water to penetrate; even if the skins are not cut or broken, the
moisture in the starch cells themselves will condense and make the
potato heavy, so that you want to give the steam a chance to escape as
soon as the potatoes are tender. If you will do that you are sure of
mealy potatoes, provided the potatoes are ripe. Unripe potatoes, or new
potatoes, or sprouted or frosted potatoes, you cannot well make mealy,
because the starch cells in the new potatoes are not fully matured, in
the old sprouted potatoes they are disorganized, especially as the
little sprouts take up the nutritive properties which enable them to
grow. But if you use ripe potatoes, before they are beginning to sprout,
and pour the water off of them when they are tender and allow the steam
to escape, you will be sure to have the potatoes mealy, unless they are
watery potatoes; the ordinary market potatoes will be sure to be mealy.
Now you can insure the escape of the steam by draining the potatoes and
covering them with a towel folded several times; that is, draining off
all the water as soon as the potatoes are tender enough to enable you to
run a fork through them. Do not wait until they begin to break apart,
because by that time the starch cells are being broken up, and the water
will have begun to penetrate to the interior of the potato.

After boiling the potatoes, either in cold or hot water, until they are
tender, drain them and put a folded towel over them in the sauce pan.
Set the sauce pan on the back part of the stove where the potatoes can
not burn, or put it up on a brick on the back part of the stove. The
potatoes may be peeled or not, as you choose; if you peel the potatoes
in the most careful way, that is, cutting the thinnest possible skin
off, you will waste at least an ounce in every pound. A very good way to
peel potatoes is to take off just a little rim of the skin all around
them and boil them; then if you want to peel them before they go to the
table, it will be easy to strip off the two pieces of skin remaining. In
order to save time I shall put the potatoes into boiling water enough to
cover them, with a tablespoonful of salt. Take about a quart of water
and a tablespoonful of salt. I have already said that as soon as the
potatoes are tender enough to pierce with a fork, not when they are
beginning to break, and they are drained, cover them with a cloth and
keep them hot as long as you like. In about three or four minutes after
they have been covered with the cloth they will begin to grow mealy, as
the steam escapes; and you can keep them hot and mealy for three or four
hours. It makes very little difference with potatoes, although with some
kinds of vegetables it makes a decided difference, whether you boil them
in hard or soft water. But as a rule soft water is best for boiling
vegetables. You can always soften the water by putting a very little
carbonate of soda in it, to counteract the extreme hardness of the
water, which is caused by lime or mineral elements. The hardness of
water slightly hardens the surface of vegetables, but it has an entirely
different action on meats. It slightly hardens the surface--not enough
to make the vegetable tough, by any means, but enough to retain all the
juices and all the flavors. Do not have the potatoes tightly covered
after they are cooked, because the steam will condense on the inside of
the cover and fall back on the potatoes, thus making them watery. In
serving potatoes on the table after they are cooked, do not put a cover
on the dish; put a folded napkin over the potatoes. Do not put the dish
cover on--it will have the same effect that it would have if you put the
cover on the pot. The steam arising would condense, and fall back on the
potatoes in the form of moisture, and make the potatoes watery.

In baking potatoes, the same general principles apply. That is, at the
moment when the potatoes are tender--and that of course depends upon the
oven in which you bake them--the starch cells are ruptured and the
moisture is at the point of escaping if you give it vent by slightly
breaking the potato, then the potatoes will keep mealy for a little
while. But baked potatoes deteriorate every moment they stand after they
are tender. You should serve baked potatoes just the moment they are
done, if you want them to be perfect. If you wrap them up in a napkin it
keeps in the steam. The longer they stand, the more of the hard skin
forms on them, and if you let them stand for half an hour or more you
find the skin sometimes a sixteenth of an inch thick. You can take a
little slice off the end without breaking them, to permit the escape of
the steam. But serve them just as quick as you can. In sending them to
the table do not put the dish cover on them. Throw a napkin over them to
keep the heat in. I have found that in baking potatoes that the hotter
the oven the better the potatoes would be; that is, the more quickly
they would be baked. I have been able to bake them sometimes in twenty
minutes.

To soak potatoes in cold water restores a little of their moisture that
may have been lost by the natural evaporation. For instance, late in the
winter you will find potatoes slightly shriveled. That is caused by the
escape of the moisture. If you had weighed them in the fall, and weighed
them again at that time you would find they weighed less. To soak them
for an hour or more before you cook them is to restore that wasted water
and to increase the substance of the potato. There is very little
nutriment lost in the waste of the moisture; it is only the bulk of the
potato. You do not need to salt the water in which the potatoes are
soaked. The only effect of salting water would be to make it colder. In
soaking green vegetables it is well to salt the water, because if there
are any insects in the vegetables they are killed by the action of the
salt. In lettuce, or cabbage, or cauliflower, there are insects that
hide away among the leaves, and salt kills them. In regard to the
soaking of the green vegetables, of course, directly the insects are
dead they naturally fall of their own weight from among the leaves. But
if the leaves are closely packed, as sometimes they are in cabbage or
lettuce; you want to hold the vegetable by the root and turn it up and
with your hands separate the leaves without tearing; if lettuce is used,
take care not to tear them; if cauliflower is being washed, take hold of
the root and shake it well through the water, so that the motion will
dislodge the little creatures.


CHEESE CRUSTS.

For cheese crusts use bread that is a day or two old, baker's bread or
home-made bread; baker's bread is the best for toast of all kinds, and
this is a sort of toast. Cut the bread in even slices, rather small,
cutting off the crusts. There is no waste in doing that, for I have
already told you how to use up pieces of stale bread by making them into
crumbs. Grate some cheese so that you have a tablespoonful of cheese for
each little slice of bread. On each of the little pieces of bread put a
tablespoonful of the grated cheese, a very little dust of pepper and
salt and a small piece of butter not larger than a white dried bean. Put
the pieces of bread in a pan, set the pan in a rather quick oven, and
just brown the cheese crusts. If the oven is in a good condition it will
toast the bread and brown the cheese in about ten minutes, or even
less; they are very good, those little cheese crusts. You can use them
either hot or cold. They are a very nice supper dish. They are very good
with salad at dinner, with any green salad. Of course, if you serve them
hot the cheese is a little more tender. Any kind of cheese will answer
for making the crusts. I think that the ordinary American factory cheese
is about as good as any other cheese. You do not want a rich expensive
cheese for cheese crusts.

(At this point the stuffed shoulder of mutton was brought forth, done,
the fan-shaped shoulder blade being stuck in to represent the tail of
the duck, which the whole dish strongly resembled.)


GRAVY FOR MEAT.

There are about two tablespoonfuls of drippings in the pan. I am going
to put a heaping tablespoonful of flour with it and stir until it is
brown; then I am going to stir in gradually about a pint of boiling
water, and season it with salt and pepper, and then I will send it down
and show it to you. Make gravy in this way for any baked meat.




LECTURE SIXTH.


Our first dish this afternoon, ladies, will be roast chicken. The lesson
will include fish and poultry. First, to choose a tender chicken,
examine the tip end of the breastbone--the lower end of the breast bone,
to see if it is soft; if it bends without breaking under pressure; in
other words, if the cartilage has not hardened into bone, you may be
sure that the chicken is young, and consequently probably tender. The
market people have a favorite way of showing you that the chicken is
tender by taking hold of the wing and giving the joint a twist. They
say, "You see how tender it is!" But that is no test except of strength.
But there is no ingenuity which can simulate that soft cartilage on the
end of the breast bone. That is always a sure test. After choosing the
chicken--of course now I am speaking of dressed chicken, or chickens
that are killed--after choosing the chicken, have it carefully picked
and singed; then, if it is undrawn, wipe it with a wet towel, and
proceed to draw it carefully without breaking the intestines. If it is
drawn already the chances are that it will be imperfectly drawn and you
will have to wash it. There is the disadvantage of having poultry drawn
before it goes to the market, because where people draw poultry in large
quantities they are very apt to do it carelessly. In that case it is
necessary to wash it, but if you draw it carefully yourself you will not
have to do that. By washing, you of course take away the flavor, as I
told you the other day, because you lose more or less of the blood.

Cut the skin of the back of the neck and take out the crop, then out off
the neck close to the body, that leaves the skin so that you can draw it
up and fasten it back. If this chicken was not already cut for drawing I
should cut it at one side under one of the legs, so that when I came to
sew it up and dress it I could hide the cut. This chicken has been drawn
carefully and does not seem to need washing. The liver and gizzard have
been laid back inside. The entrails are all taken away. You can always
tell by looking at the chicken whether the entrails are broken and
whether it needs washing. After you have drawn the chicken very
carefully separate the gall from the liver. The gall is that little
greenish bag that lies on one side of the liver; and you want to cut it
off without breaking, because if you break it it will make bitter
everything that it touches. Save whatever fat there is about the
entrails, and put it in the baking pan with the chicken. The gizzard has
been cut open from one side and the inside bag which contains gravel and
straw taken out. But a very much easier way to dress the gizzard instead
of opening it, is to cut away the bluish skin which lies on the outside,
on both sides, without opening the gizzard at all, and cut out that
piece of flesh. That is the only valuable portion of the gizzard; if you
dress the gizzard in this way when it is not already opened you save
yourself a great deal of trouble, for it is a very hard matter to open a
gizzard like that and take away the bag which contains the gravel,
especially if the poultry has been frozen, as the bag is apt to break
and let out the gravel. Use the gizzard and liver for making gravy, and
the neck also. Cut out the oil sac or bag which lies at the back of the
tail. Then the chicken is ready for stuffing. In cutting off the feet
cut them below the joint, not just at the joint. If you cut them just at
the joint the skin and flesh will draw up in cooking. But if you cut
them just below the joint you will find that they do not draw up. After
cutting off the feet scrape the skin all round to make sure that there
are no bits of feather or anything of that sort, and wipe it with a wet
towel and you have the chicken in readiness to stuff.

Stuff it with any force meat that you like. You remember this morning
that we made force meat by chopping a teaspoonful of onion and frying it
in a tablespoonful of butter, then putting in with the fried onion a
cupful of stale bread soaked in cold water, seasoning with salt and
pepper and sweet herbs. I said also that you could add chopped meat,
cold meat or eggs, or to make any desired addition to the force meat in
the way of seasoning. A little grated cheese in stuffing is very nice.
You scarcely will realize what the seasoning is. I will use a little
grated cheese this afternoon to make a force meat--very like what I made
this morning, except in addition to the chopped onion, fried in a
tablespoonful of butter, seasoned with salt and pepper, I shall put in
half a cupful of grated cheese. You may like to know my way of chopping
onion. In the first place, I make a lot of little cuts in one direction
as far down as I think I shall need in order to get my teaspoonful; then
I make little cuts in the other direction, and then by slicing it across
you get your chopped onion. A very nice addition to force meat is
chestnuts, either our ordinary American chestnut, or French or Italian
chestnuts. These are quite large. I presume they are for sale at the
fruit stores here. Our ordinary American chestnut is very good. Choose
rather large chestnuts and either roast or boil them; take off the husks
and skins and thus use them to stuff the chicken with, either simply
using the chestnuts seasoned with salt, pepper and butter, or if you
have boiled or roasted and skinned them, mix them with bread and
seasoning. Then, after having prepared the force meat, you put it into
the chicken, sew it up and truss it into shape. I will show you directly
how to do that so as to keep the chicken plump, and so that it does not,
in roasting, spread apart. I shall sew it with a trussing needle and a
cord, or you might accomplish the same purpose, by using skewers,
putting the skewers just where I put the cords. In sewing up a chicken
after it is stuffed, remember what I said this morning; take large
stitches with coarse cord so that you can easily see where to take the
threads out when the chicken is done. After the chicken is trussed, if
you are going to bake it, put it into a pan without any water, for the
same reason that I gave you this morning. The water will soak it, half
simmer it; you do not need water to keep it from burning, because a
little drippings will soon come from the chicken; brown it and then
dredge it with flour, and baste it every fifteen minutes or so. Bake it
until it is tender and nicely brown; the time of course depends upon the
heat of the oven. Truss the chicken first, pushing the legs as far up as
you can towards the breast, and run the trussing needle, which is simply
a long needle, through so as to hold the legs fast. Then either bend the
wings back in turning them, or simply fold them together and secure them
with the same string. By drawing the string tight, you keep the bird
plump; keep it drawn together, and when the bird is done all you have to
do is to take these two ends of string in one hand, make one cut and
pull the string out.

The liver, the gizzard, the heart, the neck and the feet, use in making
gravy. Of course the gizzard, liver and heart are all right as they are
now prepared. If you wish to add the feet, you will scald them and
scrape off the skin. Then cut off the ends of the claws, and you have
the feet perfectly clean; put them with the gizzard, liver and heart to
boil as the basis of your gravy. The French people always save all the
feet of all kinds of poultry. They prepare them in this way and put them
into soups; sometimes they cook them till the bones grow gelatinous,
till they are very soft and tender; they dress them with sauce and serve
them as what they call an _entree_ or side dish. They make a dish which
is more delicate than pigs' feet. Of course in a large kitchen where a
great deal of poultry is used it is possible to make a very good-sized
dish of them.


FRICASSEED CHICKEN.

I shall use this chicken for fricassee; it has been singed, picked and
wiped with a wet towel.

First, cut the skin down back of the neck, and cut off the neck. I shall
talk about this chicken as if it was not drawn at all. Showing you how
to cut it up and draw it at the same time. Cut off the neck and take out
the crop, as I showed you with the other chicken. Then cut off the
wings, taking a little of the breast with the wings. Find the joint
where the wings join the body, cut at that joint; then, instead of
cutting the wing right off short, take a little piece of the breast with
it. That gives you a nice piece. Then cut the wing in two, and cut off
the tip, which is dry; that you can cook in the fricassee, or not, as
you please. It flavors, but there is very little meat on it. The other
part of the wing you want, of course, to use. Put the pieces of chicken
on two plates, putting the good pieces on one plate and the inferior
pieces on the other. Having taken off the wing, take off what is called
the wing side bone. Then cut forward and break off the shoulder bone.
The idea is to cut the breast into several good-sized pieces. Cutting in
this way you sacrifice what is called the merry-thought or wishbone. You
either can cut off the side bone or not. Cut off the other wing in the
same way. Then cut off the leg and second joint together. Instead of
cutting the leg in two pieces at both joints, cut it in three pieces,
that gives you two pieces of the second joint. In cooking chicken for
fricassee you want to have the pieces about one size, so that they will
cook easily. Then if they are one size they are much easier to help.

Next, to separate the breast from the back bone, cut down through the
ribs on each side. If the chicken has not been drawn be careful with
your knife, not to cut into the entrails. Then you can take the breast
off, and if the chicken is not drawn, all the entrails will be exposed,
and you can draw it with perfect ease. The lungs of the chicken, which
are those light red organs on the side of the back bone, are always used
by the French in cookery, not only those organs in chicken but in the
larger carcasses of meat. They are quite as much food as the heart or
liver. I am not in the habit of using them, but they are quite as
available. After the breast has been taken off, cut it up in several
pieces. First, cut off the entire tip, leaving that in one piece. Then
cut the remainder in two or four pieces, according to its size. Next cut
the back bone. There is a natural division in the upper part of the back
bone that breaks there; cut that off and trim off the ribs. In cutting
the lower part of the back bone, instead of cutting it just in two,
making rather queer pieces to help, cut off the upper part of it leaving
it entire, not splitting that part of it. In that way, cut off the
portion called the "oysters,"--two little pieces of flesh in the upper
part of the back bone, that are considered very nice. On one plate we
have the inferior parts, on the other the nice parts of the chicken,
being all cut in pieces of one size. It is easy to help, it cooks more
evenly, and is rather nicer than if you had it in two or three sizes.
Part of the chicken I am going to make into a brown fricassee, and part
of it I am going to fry. There would be thirteen pieces if we counted
the two pieces of the back bone. There are half a dozen of the poor
pieces, not counting the wing pieces or neck. The question is asked
whether the cords or sinews should be drawn from the legs. You can do
that with old poultry if you want to, because those cords never get very
tender. It is not necessary to do it with medium tender poultry.

First brown the chicken, using either some of the chicken fat, or
butter, or salad oil for browning it. Now, since the question of using
salad oil in cooking has come up, suppose I cook this chicken with salad
oil so that you can taste it. After all, that is the best test you
possibly can have as to whether you like salad oil in cooking. I shall
put in just salad oil enough to cover the bottom of the sauce pan. That
is enough to prevent sticking. For a chicken of three pounds take about
three or four tablespoonfuls of salad oil; just enough to cover the
bottom of the sauce pan. First put the sauce pan containing the salad
oil over the fire and let it get hot; then put in the chicken and brown
it. Now, can you notice the slightly aromatic odor? That is the oil, and
directly you notice that odor, and the oil begins to smoke, it is hot
enough. As soon as the chicken is brown,--and you can brown it just as
fast as you want to,--then put a heaping tablespoonful of flour over
it--some of the ladies will have seen the same process in making the
brown stew of meat the other day--and stir the chicken until the flour
is brown. When the flour is brown on the chicken,--and that will be by
the time you get it well stirred up,--then add boiling water enough to
cover it. When the flour is brown among the chicken, put in boiling
water enough to cover it, season it with pepper and salt, palatably, and
let it cook until it is tender. That will take from half an hour to two
hours, according to the toughness of the chicken. Remember the more
slowly you cook it after it once begins to cook, the nicer it will be.
Cover up the sauce pan after the fricassee is seasoned, and cook it
until it is tender. In the cooking of chicken the gravy that you make by
putting boiling water on seems to boil away, and you may want to add a
little more; just keep enough gravy over it to cover it, and when it is
tender it is ready to serve. The odor you notice now is the aromatic
odor of that salad oil, and is all that you will get in cooking with
olive oil.


FRIED CHICKENS.

Next the fried chicken, Maryland style, will be prepared. We will fry
the chicken, and then I will tell you about hominy. The Southern cooks
use lard for frying, either lard entirely or half lard and half butter;
enough to cover the bottom of the frying pan about half an inch. Let the
fat get hot, put some flour on a plate, season it with salt and pepper,
and roll the pieces of chicken in it. When the fat is hot in the pan and
the chicken has been rolled in the flour, put it into the hot fat and
fry it brown, first on one side and then on the other. Of course tender
chicken is generally used for this dish so that by the time it is fried
brown it is done. Fry the chicken until it is tender and brown. Take up
the chicken when it is brown, put it on a hot dish; in the frying pan
where it was fried, put enough cream to make a good gravy, stirring it
constantly. You see there will be flour on the pan off the fried chicken
that will thicken the gravy. Season the gravy with salt and pepper, pour
it over the chicken and serve it. Some of the colored cooks whom I have
seen prepare this dish first dip their chicken in water before rolling
it in the butter and flour. That is for the purpose of making more flour
stick to it; but there is always this disadvantage, if you do that there
will be some particles of water remaining, and when you put it in the
hot fat it will sputter very much. You can do that or not as you like.
While the chicken is being browned I will tell you how to prepare the
hominy. Of course the chicken is to be seasoned with more pepper and
salt if you wish, in addition to what you put on in the first place with
the flour.


HOMINY.

First pick the hominy over and wash it. Fine hominy is generally used
for this dish. Put it over the fire in cold water, a cupful of hominy to
about four cupfuls of water. Boil it and stir it often enough to prevent
sticking, until it begins to be tender. Boil it for an hour, until it
begins to grow tender. Then place it where there is no danger of
burning, pour off the water, or leave off the cover of the sauce pan so
that the water will evaporate. The hominy will need to cook pretty
nearly an hour, and when it is done or nearly done it should be as thick
as hasty pudding. If you have a double boiler you can put in very much
less water, for there is no danger of burning. I think you would need
only about half or a little more than half as much water. Only take care
to leave the cover off the kettle if you find that the hominy is going
to be thinner than hasty pudding when it is nearly done. If the hominy
is used rather coarse, about five minutes before it is done mix a
tablespoonful of flour with just enough water or milk to make it a thin
liquid, and stir it into the hominy. That will hold it together when it
is cold, so that it can be cut into slices. In making hasty pudding you
can put that tablespoonful of flour in to hold it together when it is
cold. You want to allow long enough for the flour to boil thoroughly;
before dishing the hominy when it is tender pour it into an earthen dish
or shallow tin pan wet with cold water, and let it get cold and hard.
Always make this in advance of your fried chicken. You want the hominy
cold and solid so that you can cut it. Cut it in little cakes about an
inch thick and two inches square. These little cakes of hominy are to be
fried either in the pan with the chicken or in another pan by the side
of the chicken, and served on a dish with the chicken.


FRIED FISH.

I have here some fish which I shall fry. We will not try broiled fish,
because this has been frozen; we will do that some other day. In frying
fish use either Indian meal or flour, seasoned with salt and pepper, to
roll the fish in. Fry the fish in lard or the drippings from salt pork.
In case you use salt pork, fry it brown. Olive oil is one of the nicest
fats for frying fish. You may have your choice whether I fry with lard
or oil. We will fry in oil. If you use lard at all you want it to be
very nice. In the frying pan I shall put about half an inch of oil; that
is less than half a cupful. Put it over the fire and let it get hot,
just as I did for the chicken. This is frozen fish that has been thawed.
Cut the fish in pieces about two inches square and roll them either in
flour seasoned with pepper and salt, or Indian meal, as I told you; put
them into the oil when the oil is hot. As soon as the fish is browned
nicely it will be done. You can add more seasoning than there is in the
flour. Use Indian meal with pork; it is particularly nice.




LECTURE SEVENTH.


Our lesson this morning, ladies, will begin with pea soup with crusts.
This soup I shall make with the addition of a little onion. You remember
the other day we made pea soup perfectly plain. We shall cook salt
codfish stewed in cream, venison with currant jelly, stewed carrots, and
cabinet pudding. First the peas will be put on the fire to boil, and I
shall begin to make the pudding.


CABINET PUDDING.

The cabinet pudding as I shall make it to-day will be rather elaborate.
You can make it more plainly. It is made of cake,--sponge cake is the
best,--French candied fruit, eggs and milk. So that, first, I shall give
you the recipe for the pudding as I make it to-day, and then I will give
you the recipe for the plainer form. For the pudding use a pudding mould
of the size I have in my hand (holding about a quart), about half a
pound of French candied fruit, which you can get at the confectionaries
here; I have to-day candied cherries, a little candied pear, a green
lime candied, a small orange, and an apricot. I shall also use a very
little citron, about an ounce of citron. That I want simply for the
effect of the green part of the citron. Put the citron in the form of
small leaves. The large fruits cut in slices, which you may leave round
or cut in the form of stars or to imitate a flower bud. After you have
cut the fruit, butter a perfectly plain tin pudding mould thickly with
cold butter,--quite thickly. Have the butter cold; lay the fruit against
the mould in the form of a wreath, or a star, or any fanciful form you
like, some on the bottom of the mould and some on the sides. The cold
butter will hold the fruit in place. After part of the fruit is laid
against the sides and bottom of the mould, then cut the sponge cake in
large slices about half an inch thick, one slice the size and shape of
the bottom of the mould, and either one long slice that will go round
the sides of the mould inside; or two or three pieces, according to the
size of your cake. Generally, in cities where there are confectionaries,
you can buy sponge cake baked in large thin sheets. You know the form in
which it is used for the bakers' _charlotte russe_. This is baked in
large sheets; cut it in small sheets and fit it into the moulds.
Because it is very thin you can work with it very much better than you
can with that which is thicker. This will be very apt to break, because
it is very stiff. If you are to shape the cake to your mould the cake
should be perfectly soft and flexible.

After the first layer of cake is put against the mould, then use the
rest of the cake cut in small pieces, or broken, and put into the mould
in layers with the rest of the fruit. You see, first you use some of the
fruit to ornament the inside of the mould, then some of the cake to line
the inside of the mould. That gives you what will be the outside of your
pudding when it is done. Then when the mould is decorated with fruit and
lined with cake, put the rest of the cake and fruit into the mould in
layers. Make a custard of a pint of milk and six eggs, because for this
pudding the custard must be firm enough to hold the pudding in shape so
that it can be turned out of the mould; also a quarter of a pound of
sugar; that is about four heaping tablespoonfuls of sugar.

After the custard is made, pour it into the mould which you have filled
with cake and fruit, and let it stand so that all the custard may be
absorbed by the cake. When the custard has been entirely absorbed by the
cake, set the mould in the steamer or in the sauce pan with water to
reach two-thirds up the side of the mould. Put the cover on the steamer,
or sauce pan, and steam it until the custard is firm. That will
generally take about an hour and a half. It may take a little longer,
but be quite sure that the custard is firm. Do not cook the custard
first, just mix it up. In order to be sure that the custard is firm
before you attempt to turn the pudding out, you want to run a fork or a
small knife down through the thickest part in the middle of the pudding;
move it backward and forward; look into the pudding to make sure that
the custard is done. As long as the custard looks liquid at all, you
must keep on cooking. When the pudding is done take the mould out of the
steamer, using a towel, because the mould will be hot. Take a dish or
platter that fits just over the top of the mould; have the inside of the
platter the size of the top of the mould; put the platter over the mould
and turn it upside down; then you will find that you can lift the mould
from the pudding without any trouble, and the pudding will remain there
on the platter. This pudding I shall serve with-powdered sugar. It is
exceedingly rich. It is not necessary to have a sauce with it because it
is so rich. But you can use, if you wish, any of the nice pudding
sauces that I have told you of. This is a pudding which in Europe is
served as the greatest luxury. It takes its name "cabinet" pudding from
the fact that it is served in the little rooms, or cabinets, that is,
the private rooms where special dinners or suppers are given in the
European restaurants. What is called cabinet pudding in the restaurants
and hotels in this country is usually a nice bread pudding made with
fruit, and it is not decorated in this way. Trouble is not taken to
decorate the mould. It is simply a nice bread pudding made with custard,
with some raisins or currants in it. That is what is called cabinet
pudding in this country in the restaurants and hotels. So you can make
the memorandum that you can use instead of the cake, bread; and instead
of the French fruit, simply raisins, currants and citron. You can spend
as much time and ingenuity decorating the pudding as you like, but I
have done this very quickly and very simply. The pudding can be served
hot, or it can be cooled and then put on the ice and made very cold. You
noticed that in filling the mould I pressed the cake down on the inside,
because, as it is saturated with the custard, of course it would sink
down. You want to press the cake well down in the mould, and have a
layer of cake on top, the last layer of cake.

_Question._ If you made it of bread wouldn't you have to use more sugar
in it?

MISS CORSON. Yes, if you use bread you would have to use more sugar.

_Question._ Do you have any salt in it?

MISS CORSON. You don't need to put any salt in it. You can if you want
to. There is no necessity for it, because there will be salt both in
your bread and in your cake.

_Question._ Do you flavor the custard?

MISS CORSON. No, just the plainest custard. You will find that the
French fruit will give the custard all the flavor you require. You will
find that if you put the custard into a pitcher after it is made you can
pour it into the pudding very much more readily than if you try to pour
it from the bowl. Either put it into a pitcher or use a cup, because you
will have to pour it slowly in order to let it thoroughly absorb.


PEA SOUP WITH CRUSTS.

Next take the recipe for pea soup. Some of the ladies who were at the
Monday afternoon lesson will need only to make one or two notes, and
the others will take the full recipe. For pea soup, four quarts, use a
cupful of dried peas, yellow split peas. Pick them over, wash them in
cold water, put them over the fire in two quarts of cold water and let
them heat slowly. As the water heats it softens the peas. When it is
boiling add half a cupful more of cold water and let that heat; then add
more cold water; continue to add cold water, half a cupful at a time,
until you have used two quarts more of cold water in addition to the
first two quarts. The object of adding cold water slowly is to soften
the peas, by reducing the heat of the water and then gradually
increasing it again you soften the peas so that you can cook them in
from an hour and a half to two hours. Boil them very slowly without the
addition of salt until they are soft enough to rub through a sieve with
a potato masher. After they are rubbed through the sieve put them again
into the soup kettle with a tablespoonful of butter and a tablespoonful
of flour rubbed to a smooth paste. Stir the soup over the fire until the
butter and flour are entirely dissolved; then season the soup palatably
with salt and pepper and let it boil for two or three minutes. While it
is boiling cut two slices of stale bread--bakers' bread is the best, or
very light home-made bread--in little dice about half an inch square.
Put a couple of tablespoonfuls of butter in a frying pan over the fire
and let the butter begin to brown, then throw the dice of stale bread
into the butter and stir the bread until it is brown. Take it out of the
butter with a skimmer, if it has not absorbed all the butter, and lay it
for a moment on brown paper, and then put it on a hot dish to send to
the table with the soup. Do not put the bread into the soup unless you
are going to serve at once, because it will soften a little; but you
will find that fried bread will soften less quickly than toasted bread.
A great many people put small squares of toast in the pea soup, but that
softens at once. If you have a frying kettle which you use for doughnuts
or fritters, or anything of that sort, partly full of frying fat, you
can heat it and fry the bread in that instead of frying it with the
butter in a frying pan. Have the fat smoking hot; the bread browns very
quickly; take it out on a skimmer and lay it on a brown paper for a
moment; then it is ready for the soup. These little fried crusts of
bread are called _croutons_ or crusts in the cookery books. I am going
to add an onion fried in butter to the soup to-day. Put that in, if you
use it, when you first begin to cook the soup. One onion, peeled,
sliced, and fried light brown in a tablespoonful of butter. You could
also use the bones from ham, cold roast ham, cold boiled ham, or the
bones of beef either raw or cooked, in the place of the onion, or in
addition to the onion, as you like. Remember all those things give
distinct flavors to the pea soup. If you put any kind of bones in, put
them in with the peas at the beginning and boil them with the peas.


SALT CODFISH, STEWED IN CREAM.

Next take the recipe for salt codfish, stewed in cream. First, to
freshen salt codfish; that, of course, is always the first thing you do
with salt codfish, no matter how you finish. You can do that by soaking
it over night in cold water; if it has any skin on it be sure to have
the skin side up. If you put it in the water with the skin side down,
the salt which soaks out of the fibre of the fish simply falls against
the skin and stays there. The fish does not get any fresher. A great
deal of codfish in these days is sent to the market without either skin
or bone. Supposing we have the regulation dried codfish, we skin and
bone it, then soak it over night in cold water, and next morning put it
over the fire in more cold water, plenty of it, and put the kettle or
pan containing the fish and the cold water on the back part of the
stove, where it will heat very gradually. Do not let it boil at all, but
keep it at a scalding heat. Do not more than let it simmer. The effect
of the boiling on any salted fibre, whether it is fish or meat, is
simply to harden it. Keep it at a scalding heat until the fish is
tender. Of course that will depend upon the dryness of the fish. It may
take a half hour, it may take an hour. That is one way to freshen fish.
Another way--the way I am doing now--is accomplished more quickly by
putting the fish over the fire in plenty of cold water, enough to cover
it; set it on the stove where it will heat gradually. When the water is
nearly hot on the fish pour it off and put more cold water on. Let that
get scalding hot; do not let it boil at all; simply let it get scalding
hot--that is, let the steam begin to rise from it. Change the water as
often as it gets scalding hot, until the fish is tender. If you are
careful to change the water often enough, that is, if you do not let it
begin to boil, probably the fish will be tender in half an hour--from
half to three-quarters of an hour. The time will depend upon the dryness
of the fibre of the fish. Generally in about half an hour it will be
tender. As soon as the fish is tender drain it, and then it is ready to
dress in any way you wish to use it. To-day I shall make a little cream
sauce, and heat the fish in it. That will be codfish stewed in cream
sauce. Boiled codfish you would serve with boiled potatoes, and the
white sauce is made either with water or milk and hard-boiled eggs. That
is the old New England salt fish dinner. Usually, with a salt codfish
dinner there were boiled parsnips and sometimes boiled beets; and it is
very nice if you like codfish. For codfish hash, the old-fashioned
codfish hash, use simply boiled codfish torn apart, forked in little
fine flakes or chopped in fine flakes; of course all the skin and bone
is taken off, mixed with an equal quantity of boiled potatoes, either
mashed or chopped fine, palatably seasoned with pepper; of course the
fish would be salt enough, usually; for a pint bowl full of fish and
potatoes, use a tablespoonful of butter. The fish and potatoes are
thoroughly mixed, then put into a frying pan, with just enough butter or
drippings to keep it from burning. You may put, for the quantity I have
given you, a heaping tablespoonful of butter in the frying pan, and let
it melt; then put in the fish, and continue stirring it. Remember there
is some butter in the hash already, and that will melt with the heat and
probably be enough; but if you need any more to prevent its burning, add
a tablespoonful. Stir the hash until it is scalding hot; then push it to
one side of the frying pan with the knife you are stirring it with, and
form it into a little oval cake at one side of the frying pan. When the
hash is thoroughly hot, the butter in it will begin to fry out of it,
and there probably will be butter enough to prevent its burning. Let it
stand in the little cake at the side of the pan until it is browned on
the bottom. You want to watch it a little, and now and then run a knife
under it and loosen it from the pan, to make sure that it is not
burning. Then, when the bottom is browned, hold a plate in one hand and
the frying pan in the other, and turn the fish out in a little cake on
the plate or dish.


CODFISH CAKES.

To make codfish cakes, first make the fish fine; after freshening it and
taking off the skin and bone, chop it or tear it in fine flakes; mix it
with an equal quantity of potato either mashed or chopped--mashed potato
is rather better for codfish cakes because you can pack it a little more
closely in the form of cakes. To a pint bowlful of codfish hash add a
tablespoonful of butter, a palatable seasoning of pepper and the yolk of
one raw egg. That is, half codfish, half potato, a tablespoonful of
butter and the yolk of one raw egg, and a palatable seasoning of pepper.
Then dust your hands, with dry flour; take a tablespoonful of this
mixture up in your hand and either form it in the shape of a round ball
or flat cake, as you like. Have ready a frying kettle or deep frying pan
with enough fat or drippings, or lard, in it to cover three or four of
the codfish cakes or balls, when you drop them into it. So that if you
use a frying pan you must have a deep frying pan. You may make in that
case codfish cakes, not balls. If you have a frying kettle you can make
little round balls. When the fat is smoking hot drop the codfish cakes
or balls into it and fry them just a golden brown, light brown. Take
them out of the fat with a skimmer and lay them on brown paper for a
moment to free them from grease, then serve them hot.

You will notice that I always tell you in frying everything to take it
out of the fat and lay it for a moment on brown paper, because then you
are sure to free it from grease. Not necessarily very coarse paper; just
ordinary brown wrapping paper. I do not mean manila paper, but the
common brown wrapping paper that comes around groceries and meat, that
tradesmen generally use. The paper must be porous so that the grease
will be easily absorbed. That is the only point you have to remember.
The usual way of frying codfish cakes is simply to put fat enough in the
pan to keep them from sticking, and in that way they are not browned all
over, that is, they are not browned on the sides. They are simply
browned on the top and on the bottom, and the fat has, of course,
generally soaked into them so that you get them thoroughly greasy unless
you have fat enough to cover them and have the fat smoking hot when you
put them in. In frying it is very easy to use the fat repeatedly, if you
only remember one thing. The fat you fry fish in you want to keep always
for fish; then you can fry anything else, meat, chicken, fritters or
doughnuts, in the other fat. Generally keep two jars or crocks of fat,
and take care only to let the fat get smoking hot in frying, and as soon
as you have done frying set the kettle off the stove so that the fat
does not burn; let it cool a very little, then strain it through a cloth
into an earthen bowl and let it get cold. Wash the frying kettle out and
clean it thoroughly, and then you can put the fat back in it, and it
will be ready for the next time, if you use a porcelain-lined kettle; if
you use a metal kettle for frying, tin or anything of that sort, do not
put the fat in it till you are ready to use it again, because it might
rust it a little. If you strain it through an ordinarily thick towel
there will be no sediment. If you strain it through a sieve there will
be a little sediment that will settle to the bottom of the fat, and you
can turn the cake of fat out of the bowl when it is cold and scrape that
off. The best way is to strain through a cloth in the first place. If
you are careful with the fat you can use it repeatedly,--use it a dozen
times or more, until it really is nearly used up. But if you are
careless and let it burn, of course you very soon get it so dark in
color that it colors anything directly you put it in, before it is
cooked, and it has a burnt taste. But if you use it at the heat I tell
you, just smoking hot, and do not let it burn, you can use it
repeatedly. Sometimes you can lift it out in one solid cake when it is
cold; sometimes you will have to break it and take it off in more than
one piece. On the bottom of the cake you will find a little brownish
sediment which you must scrape off. Then you have the fat clarified and
ready for use. For ordinary frying purposes the straining through the
towel will answer. An earthen bowl is the best for keeping the fat in
the kitchen, very much better than metal of any kind.


STEWED CARROTS.

Next take the recipe for stewed carrots. Carrots, peeled, as many as you
wish to make a dishful; cut them in rather small slices, a quarter of an
inch thick, put them over the fire in salted boiling water enough to
cover them; boil them steadily until they are tender. That will be in
perhaps half or three-quarters of an hour; if the carrots are young and
fresh they will boil in half an hour; longer as the season advances and
the carrots grow denser in their fibre. Late in the winter it may take
an hour or even an hour and a half if they are very large and woody.
Boil them until they are tender. Then drain them and throw them into
plenty of cold water, and let them get thoroughly cold. While they are
cooling make a sauce of water or of milk, as you like. If you have an
ordinary vegetable dish full of carrots you want about a pint of sauce.
In that case you will make the sauce as I have told you several times: a
tablespoonful of butter, and a tablespoonful of flour for a pint of
sauce; melt the butter and flour together over the fire, stirring them
constantly until they bubble and are smoothly mixed; then begin to add
half a cupful at a time the milk or water that you are going to use in
making the sauce; stir each half cupful in smooth before you add any
more water. If the milk or water is hot, of course the sauce will be
cooked all the more quickly. Let the sauce boil for a minute, stirring
all the time, then season with a level teaspoonful of salt for a pint of
sauce, a quarter of a saltspoonful of pepper, remembering what I have
said about using white pepper. Drain the carrots from the cold water and
put them into the sauce to heat. While they are heating--and that will
only take three or four minutes--chop a tablespoonful of parsley fine,
and stir it among the carrots; then serve them as soon as they are hot.
You may make the addition of parsley or not, as you like, but it is very
nice. In some seasons of the year you can not have the parsley. If you
have not parsley, and have made the sauce of water, you will improve the
dish very much if you stir the yolk of a raw egg into the sauce and
carrots when you take them off the fire, just before you dish them. I
will do that to-day. I will make a sauce of water and add the yolk of an
egg. You had better put two or three tablespoons of sauce into a cup
with the egg and mix it, and then pour that into the sauce and stir it
well. In chopping parsley use just the leaves, not the stalks; put them
in the chopping bowl and chop them fine. If you chop on a board steady
the point of a knife with one hand and use an up-and-down motion with
the other hand. Of course you can understand that using a long knife in
chopping you can chop very much more quickly than you could in a
chopping bowl, where you only get a circular cut. One of the ladies asks
me the object of putting the carrots in cold water. They are put first
in boiling salted water-to set their color. The action of the salt in
the boiling water slightly hardens the surface so that the color does
not boil out. Then if you take them at the point when they are tender
you check the boiling at once by the cold water and secure the color
entirely. Of course you will understand that by draining them and
throwing them into cold water you check the heat at once. If you simply
let them stand in the water and gradually soften and soak, letting the
water keep warm, you would soak the color out. That follows with all
boiled vegetables. Where we want to preserve the color this is the
simplest and easiest way to do it.

_Question._ Can the color of beets be preserved in the way you speak of?

MISS CORSON. No, beets have to be boiled differently from any other
vegetable. If you break the skin of beets, or cut them in any way, the
color escapes in the water. So that to prepare the beets for boiling,
wash them very carefully without breaking the skin. Do not cut off the
roots or the tops of the beets close; leave some of the roots and three
or four inches of the stalk. Do not trim them off close, because if you
cut the roots or stalks close to the beet you make a cut whence the
color can escape; wash them very carefully without breaking the skin.
Put them over the fire in boiling water. You do not need to salt it, in
fact, it is better not to salt it. Boil them until they grow tender to
the touch. If you puncture the beet with a fork or knife, to try it, you
let the color out, but you can take one of the beets up on a skimmer and
use a thick towel and hold it in your hand and squeeze it to see if it
is growing soft. Do not break the skin, always remember that. When the
beet is tender you will find that it will yield a little, between your
fingers, and the length of time required for cooking them will be from
half an hour to two hours and a half, perhaps even longer than that.
Young, tender, juicy beets may be cooked in half an hour. The older they
are, the later it is in the season, the harder the woody fibre will be,
and the longer it will take to cook them. After they are cooked really
tender, then throw them into a bowl of cold water and rub off the skin
with a wet towel. Do not leave them soaking in cold water.


VENISON WITH CURRANT JELLY.

Take the recipe for venison now, ladies. Enough butter to cover the
bottom of the pan about a quarter of an inch. Let it get smoking hot,
then put in the venison. You must have the pan large enough to hold the
venison. As soon as the venison is brown on one side turn it and brown
it on the other. Brown it very fast. As soon as the venison is browned
put with it the currant jelly. For every pound of venison use two
tablespoonfuls of currant jelly--not heaping spoonfuls; or you might put
one heaping tablespoonful for every pound of venison. As soon as the
venison is brown put the currant jelly in with it. Put the pan back
where it will not be too hot, and finish cooking the venison until it is
done to suit your taste. It will cook, if it is an inch thick, pretty
well done in about twenty minutes. Season it with salt and pepper, and
when it is done put it on the platter and pour the currant jelly and
butter over it. The cooking of the jelly with the venison makes it a
nice sauce or gravy.

_Question._ Wouldn't this be a nice way to cook buffalo or any other
kind of game?

MISS CORSON. Yes, it is a very good way.




LECTURE EIGHTH.


MEATS AND VEGETABLES.

We will begin to-day with so-called roast beef, it is really baked. This
is what is called a shoulder cut of beef, and is just as the butcher has
sent it home, that is, without any of the bones being taken out. This
thin part of the beef can be either roasted with the rest or cut off and
used as a stew. It is not very available at the table. It almost always
is tough, and there is a great deal of fat proportionately. The lean
that is there is very apt to dry and harden in the baking. So that the
best way to use the part is to cut it off and cook it separately. Have
the beef cut large enough to give a roast from the thickest part. The
white line of cartilage will be sure to bother in carving, and the best
way is to cut it out before you cook the meat. You can cut it out
without any difficulty. You can also cut off the bone entirely. You will
not find that doing this will make the meat waste if you bake it or
roast it properly, and you can carve it more easily and more
economically. Carving when the bone is in the meat you are sure to leave
more meat on than you really want to, and it is quite a difficult matter
to carve even slices when the bone is in the meat. It is a very easy
matter to take the bone out, and then either use the bone for soup meat
or put it in the pan with the meat and let it bake as the basis for
gravy. You will notice both in cutting the cartilage and the bone, I do
not take off any meat. I simply cut close, and take away the parts I
wish to remove without wasting any of the meat. That leaves a solid
piece of meat which offers no difficulty in carving; you can either
fasten it in shape by tying a string around it or by running a few
skewers through it. The better way is to tie it with a string, because
the skewers will make holes and permit the juice to escape. You can
either take off the thin, outside skin of the beef or wipe it as I have
already said, with a wet towel. With good beef the skin is so
exceedingly thin that it is not objectionable in carving or to the
taste. With poor beef, the skin is decidedly leathery, and then it is
advisable to take it off.

_Question._ How many pounds were there in your piece altogether, before
you began to cut it?

MISS CORSON. Oh, I fancy it weighed five or six pounds. Of course you
use the number of pounds that your family requires. I am speaking of
dividing the meat so as to cook it in the most economical manner. You
would buy a sufficiently large piece in weight to give you the thick
part--large enough for your family for the roast, and the other part you
use for the stew subsequently. We made a beef stew one day, here, I
think. Roasting is cooking meat before the direct blaze of the open
fire. Baking is cooking it in the oven. Nearly all the so-called roast
beef that we get is baked beef. It is not quite so delicate as real
roast beef. You can accomplish the roasting of beef with any range or
kitchen stove that has a large grate, that is, a grate where you can
have a clear surface of coals against the grate, by using what is called
a Dutch oven. This is a tin box, with one side open and a little hook in
the top of the box, from which you can hang the meat. Then in the bottom
part of the tin case there is a pan that catches the drippings. After
you have got the meat all ready, you put the Dutch oven in front of the
grate, standing it so that the open side of the Dutch oven is directly
in front of the grate of your stove or range. You will find that the
bright tin of the oven will reflect heat enough to cook the meat nicely.
There you get a genuine roast. You do not get an old-fashioned roast on
a spit before the open fire, but you get a nice roast. Generally those
little hooks are so arranged that the meat swings a little--swings and
turns, and if the hooks are not so arranged, once in a while, say once
in half an hour, you want to turn it.

Now, suppose you have not that oven, but still have an open fire, you
can roast. I have roasted a chicken before a grate fire in the sitting
room. You can roast small birds of any kind in that way, by putting
something on the mantel piece heavy enough to support the weight of the
bird. Tie a string around the bird or around the piece of beef and let
it hang down in front of the fire. Put a platter under it or a dripping
pan, and put the blower up in front of it. You might be amused at the
idea of doing that as an experiment. I have made coffee in an old tomato
can as an experiment, to see whether it can be done, and it is just as
nice as any you could possibly make in the finest French coffee pot.
After all there are many expedients that you can resort to in cooking
with good results.

After the meat is browned on the outside, whether you are roasting or
baking, season it. Get it browned first on the outside very quickly,
then season it with salt and pepper, and after that moderate the heat
of the oven, or draw the Dutch oven a little away from the fire, and
finish cooking till the meat is done, allowing fifteen minutes to the
pound if you want it medium rare, about twenty minutes to the pound if
you want it very well done. If you are baking the meat put it in the
hottest oven, without any seasoning at all, without any water in the
pan. You will find that the meat will yield drippings enough for
basting. Our chicken that we basted yesterday,--do you remember how nice
and brown that was? Pretty well basted, wasn't it? That had nothing in
the pan for basting except the drippings which flowed from the chicken
itself. Put the meat in the hottest oven until it is browned, and then
moderate the heat and cook the meat fifteen minutes to the pound. We
might do what the French call braise the end of the roast, if you like
to see the effect of slow cooking. One difficulty that we labor under
here is that we have to use a very intense heat, otherwise the flame of
this vapor stove goes out. In order to braise successfully you want a
very gentle and continuous heat,--such as you would get on the back part
of a cooking stove,--just heat enough to keep the meat simmering. We
will do as well as we can by keeping the sauce pan at one side of the
fire, and then I will describe the braising process, so that you can do
it perfectly at home. If we have any cabbage we will braise the meat
with it. That makes a dish that is used very much in the north of
Europe, in Poland and Sweden. I think I will give you the recipe,
whether we have our cabbage or not.

Use a large pot or sauce pan, large enough to allow you to lay the piece
of meat on the bottom; or, you can use a thick, deep, iron pan. I
remember, several days ago, seeing in the hardware stores pans about ten
inches high, pans made of Russia iron, oval. You can use that for quite
a large piece of meat if you have not a sauce pan. You want a pan deep
enough to allow the water to come just over the beef. Put water in the
pan, enough to cover the beef, and let it get boiling hot. I will give
you two methods of braising. When the water is boiling hot, put the beef
in it; watch it carefully until it just begins to boil again. The moment
it boils, push back the pot or pan in which it is far enough away from
the hot part of the stove to keep the water only simmering, only
bubbling, not boiling. Put in whatever seasoning you like. If you use
spice, cloves for instance, or mace, use it whole. If you use simply
salt and pepper, of course use them in the powder. Keep the cover very
tightly over the pot or sauce pan, and cook the meat in that slow,
gentle way, for at least two hours. A piece weighing not more than four
or five pounds you want to cook at least two hours, or until it is
tender. Remember to cook very, very slowly. That is a very simple and
easy way of braising, which any one can accomplish.

Now I am going to give you the French method of braising. Cut part of
the fat off the meat, about half the fat off the meat. Put the part that
you cut off in the bottom of the pot. Lay the meat on the fat. That is
the way we will cook our meat to-day, because I have decided to cook the
cabbage in another way. After you have put the fat in the bottom of the
sauce pan, lay the meat on it, with the fat part up, so that, you see,
you have fat under and over the meat. On top or by the side of the meat
put an onion of medium size, peeled and stuck with about a dozen cloves.
Put parsley, if you have it, about a tablespoonful of leaves, or some
stalks, or parsley root; but remember that the flavor of parsley root is
very much stronger than the leaf, so that you will use proportionately
less root. One bay leaf, a tablespoonful of carrot, sliced, about a
tablespoonful of turnip, sliced, and a level teaspoonful of
peppercorns--unground pepper--or a small red pepper. Then boiling water
enough just to cover the meat. Then put on the cover of the sauce pan,
and put the meat where it will simmer very gently until it is quite
tender. The French always braise in what is called a braising pan; that
is, two oval pans made in such a way that one sets into the other, and
goes about a third of the way down. They put the article that is to be
braised in the bottom pan, and then in the top pan they put hot ashes,
or coals of wood or charcoal, mixed with ashes; so that there is heat
top and bottom; then they put their braising pan by the side of the fire
or at the back of the stove, where it will have a gentle heat, and cook
it for a very long time. They braise it four or five hours, and it makes
the toughest meat tender. After you once bring the meat to the boiling
point you must not boil it fast; if you boil it fast you will make it
very much tougher. After you get it to the boiling point keep it there,
and cook it slowly, and long enough so that it will be sure to be
tender. If you are sure the meat is tough in the beginning, put half a
cupful of vinegar into the water with it. You won't notice the vinegar
when you come to eat the meat, and it will help to make the meat tender.
The French, of course, use the ordinary wine of the country,--a sour
wine,--it has the same effect; it is about as sour as vinegar, and has
about the same effect. I think, indeed, that is the reason why the
French use so much wine in cooking meat. They use a very acid wine
always, and probably use it for the purpose of making the meat tender in
many instances. Put in salt, but not too much, for the effect of salt,
while the meat is boiling, would be to harden it. Just a little salt,
and then in seasoning your gravy you can add more salt. After the meat
is braised French fashion, it is taken out of the broth, and the broth
is strained and then used as a broth or soup, or made into a gravy.

To make the gravy, for each pint of gravy that you wish to make, use a
tablespoonful of butter or beef drippings and a tablespoonful of flour.
Stir the drippings and flour over the fire in a sauce pan until they are
brown. Then begin to add the seasoned broth in which the meat was
cooked, half a cupful at a time, stirring it until it is smooth each
time, until it boils; then season it with salt and pepper, remembering
that the broth is already seasoned, so that you have to taste it. That
makes a very nice gravy or sauce. Of course, you have plenty of broth,
so you can make as much of it as you like.

Take now a recipe for cooking cabbage to serve with braised meat. For a
cabbage of medium size,--that is, a cabbage about as large as a
breakfast plate,--first wash the cabbage thoroughly, cutting away any
part of the stalk that seems woody. Then cut the cabbage in rather thin
slices. That is very easy. Lay it on the board and cut it down through.
You would need a large sauce pan to cook a cabbage as large as a
breakfast plate, because remember when it is cut up it takes up more
space. Put in the bottom of the sauce pan a tablespoonful of butter or
drippings. If you are braising your meat you can open the pot and dip
some of the drippings out of it. A tablespoonful of butter or drippings,
half a cupful of vinegar, a tablespoonful of cloves, a teaspoonful of
peppercorns and a tablespoonful of brown sugar. Then put in the cabbage
on top of these things. Put the cover on the sauce pan, set it over the
fire where it will steam. Be very careful not to let it burn. Keep it on
the back part of the fire where it will simmer. Keep it covered. Every
fifteen minutes take off the cover, and with a large fork or spoon lift
the cabbage from the bottom so that the top uncooked part goes down to
the bottom. In about an hour the cabbage will be tender. You do not need
to begin to cook that until within, say an hour and a quarter of the
time the beef is likely to be done. To serve it, turn it on a dish,
leaving the spice, cloves and pepper in with it, and lay the beef on it.
Just moisten the cabbage with a little gravy or broth from the beef, and
serve the rest of the gravy in a bowl; remember that the broth from the
meat is salted, and that in moistening the cabbage it seasons it, or if
you like very much salt you can put a little with the cabbage in
cooking.

Now, to boil cabbage quickly, and without odor: After thoroughly washing
it take off the decayed leaves, cut it in rather small pieces, but do
not use the stalk of the cabbage--avoid that. Put over the fire a sauce
pan large enough to hold the cabbage twice over. Have plenty of space in
your sauce pan or kettle, fill it half full of water, put plenty of salt
in the water,--that is, a level tablespoonful of salt to about a quart
of water,--let the water boil; be sure that it is boiling fast. Then put
in the cabbage; get it boiling again just as fast as you can, and
continue to boil it just as fast as you can until it is tender. That
will be in from ten to twenty-five minutes, according to the age of the
cabbage. Young cabbage, early in the season, will boil tender in ten
minutes; or it may take 15, 20 or 25. It never takes over a half hour
unless the cabbage is very old or dry. The cabbage is done the moment
the stalk is tender. A great many people have the idea that they must
boil the cabbage until the leaf is almost dissolved. It needs only to be
boiled as tender as you boil the stalks of cauliflower, and you would
try, of course, the thickest part, which would be near the stalk.
Remember, in the first place you would cut out any tough, woody stalk,
but the tender stalk you would leave in, and that is the part you would
try. If you boil it fast it will not take over thirty or thirty-five
minutes at the outside, probably not more than twenty. Just as soon as
the cabbage is tender drain it and put with it whatever sauce or
dressing you are going to serve with it. That sometimes is vinegar,
butter, pepper, and salt. Sometimes a little milk, butter, pepper, and
salt. In that case it is called cabbage stewed with cream. Sometimes you
would simply serve it without any further seasoning, only remember that
the moment it is tender, drain it and serve. As I told you the other
day, the odor of the cabbage comes from letting it boil until after the
substance of the cabbage is so soft that the oil begins to escape from
it, the volatile oil. That makes a strong odor in the room. As soon as
the cabbage is tender it is ready to eat, and should be taken from the
fire.


TURNIPS.

To bake turnips, peel the turnips, either white or yellow ones, cut them
in rather small slices, a quarter of an inch thick; put them over the
fire in salted boiling water enough to cover them, and boil them fast
until they are tender. It may take ten or fifteen minutes, possibly
twenty minutes, according to the age of the turnips. Of course you will
understand that if the turnips are old and corky they will not be as
nice when they are done as if they are in good condition. But as soon as
the turnips are tender, drain them, put them in an earthen pudding dish,
make a little white sauce, either with milk or water,--for a pint, a
tablespoonful of butter, tablespoonful of flour; stir over the fire;
then milk added gradually and stirred smooth; seasoned with salt and
pepper,--make enough of the white sauce just to moisten the turnips;
pour it over the turnips; dust over the top some cracker dust or bread
crumbs, just enough to cover the top of the turnips; put a little salt
and pepper over the crumbs, and a scant tablespoonful of butter over the
top of the crumbs. Then put the dish into the hot oven, and just brown
the crumbs on the top of the dish. Serve it as soon as the bread crumbs
are brown. That is a very nice and easy dish. If you have cold boiled
turnips, slice them, cover them with white sauce and bread crumbs, and
cook them just in the same way.

(At this point Miss Corson announced that the cabbage was done, after
being in between nine and ten minutes, and no smell was perceptible in
the room.)

I am going to moisten the cabbage with cream sauce,--that is white sauce
made with milk,--and heat it for a moment and then it will be done.

I will now answer a question that has been asked about cooking corned
beef. The same principle applies to the cooking of corned beef that
applies to the cooking of salted fish. You remember this morning in
talking about codfish I said, if you boil the salted fibre hard and
fast, you make it hard and toughen it. That holds good in relation to
salted meat or corned meat. You want to boil it very gently. There is
comparatively little juice left in corned beef, so that the action of
cold water is not so disastrous to it as it would be to fresh meat.
Sometimes the beef is so very salt that it is desirable to change the
water upon it. Put it over the fire in cold water. Let it slowly reach
the boiling point, and then try and see if it is too salt. If the water
itself seems very salt, change it. Put fresh water in, let it gradually
heat, and boil very gently always. As soon as the meat reaches the
boiling point, push it to the back part of the stove and boil it very
gently until it is tender. It usually takes about twenty minutes to a
pound, but boil it very gently and slowly. Then it will be tender. If
you boil it fast it will be hard and tough. If you put a whole dried red
pepper in with the beef in boiling, you will find that it will improve
the flavor very much. If you intend to use the beef cold, leave it in
the water in which it is boiled; take the pot off the stove and let it
cool in the water in which it was boiled. Those same directions apply to
boiling smoked or salted tongue.

The turnips were just fifteen minutes in boiling.

Nice points about boiled dinners are asked for. I think I have given you
the nicest point in cooking beef, so that you will be sure to get it
tender, and to cook cabbage so that it is tender and does not smell.
Cabbage always goes with a New England boiled dinner, potatoes, onions,
parsnips and squash. I told you about cooking beets this morning. All
the other vegetables you may cook in boiling water, and salt to suit the
taste. The old-fashioned way was to boil all the vegetables in the pot
with the beef, adding the vegetables in succession, so that each one was
put in just long enough before the beef was done to have it done at the
time the beef was done; each one except the squash. The squash is best
peeled and cut in small pieces and steamed. If you boil it you want to
put it in boiling salted water until it is tender, and then put it into
a towel and squeeze it, so as to get out the water; then season it with
butter, salt and pepper, and serve it.

I made gravy yesterday; I think if I give you the recipe to-day it will
answer. Pour the drippings out of the pan, all except about a
tablespoonful; put a tablespoonful of flour in with the brown drippings;
set the pan over the fire; stir the drippings and flour together until
they are quite brown; then begin to put in boiling water, a little at a
time, not more than half a cupful, and stir until the gravy is smooth;
then season it palatably with salt and pepper. Onions are very nice
cooked precisely as I have cooked cabbage to-day; that is, cooked until
they are tender, and dressed with the white sauce that I used in
dressing the carrot.

For pressed corn beef the nicest cut is the brisket. Have the cut
rather long and narrow, and not a short chunk or piece. Take a long
piece of meat, a foot long, or more; have all the bones cut out and roll
it up tight. Tie it compactly, in the same way that I tied this meat.
Tie it so that you have it in a tight bundle. Then boil it according to
the directions I have already given you. After it is done let it partly
cool in the liquor; then take it out and lay it on the platter; lay
another platter on top of it, and put a heavy weight on the platter, and
press it with the string still on until it is cold; then cut off the
string and you have it in nice shape. If you want to use part of it hot
for dinner, and then have it cold, you would have to boil it, and when
it is done cut off enough for your dinner; then press the rest of it
between two platters. You could double it over, but you could not press
it so very well in shape. Cut it in slices; put it into a tin mould or
tin pan and boil down the broth in which you have cooked it until it
begins to look thick. Or, you could dissolve a little gelatine in the
broth to thicken it, and pour it over the slices of corned beef in the
mould. In that case you would depend upon the gelatine to thicken the
broth, without boiling it down.




LECTURE NINTH.


BEEF A LA MODE ROLLS.

Our lesson this morning will begin with beef _a la mode_ rolls. Use the
round of the beef or the end of sirloin steak. I have here a piece of
round of beef. Cut the beef in pieces about two inches wide and five
long; lay these strips of meat on the cutting board and season them with
salt and pepper. In the middle of each one put a little piece of salt
pork about a quarter of an inch thick. Roll the meat up in such a way
that the pork is inclosed in the middle of the little roll. Tie the roll
to keep it in shape. You can use instead of salt pork pieces of fat from
the meat. After all the little rolls are tied up put a very small
quantity of beef drippings or butter in the bottom of the saucepan or
kettle. Put the saucepan over the fire with the drippings or butter in
it and let the fat get hot. As soon as it is hot put the little rolls of
meat in it and let them brown. As soon as the little rolls of meat are
brown sprinkle flour over them, a tablespoonful of dry flour to half a
dozen little rolls of meat. Let the flour brown. As soon as the flour
is brown pour in boiling water enough to cover the rolls; add salt. Then
put the cover on the sauce pan and set the meat where it will cook very
gently. Remember what I have told you about cooking meat slowly if you
want it to be tender. When the meat is quite tender--and that will be in
from half an hour to an hour and a half--the time will depend, of
course, upon the fibre of the meat, then take off the strings and serve
the rolls in the gravy in which they have been cooking. You see the
brown flour and water and butter will have make a nice gravy for the
rolls. Now if the meat is very tough remember what I have told you about
the action of the vinegar on the meat fibre. For a pound of meat add
about two tablespoonfuls of vinegar, when you begin to stew the meat,
and let it cook with the meat; that will make it tender. You can vary
the dish by cooking with it vegetables of any kind that you like to use.
Add potatoes when it is within half an hour of being done, turnips
peeled, cut in small pieces; carrots peeled and sliced.


CARAMEL CUSTARD.

I will make a caramel custard next. For caramel custard use a plain tin
mould, oval or square in shape, that will hold about three pints. Put a
teaspoonful of sugar in the bottom of the mould and set the mould on the
top of the stove where the sugar will brown. You may want to shake the
mould a little to scatter the sugar evenly over the bottom. When the
sugar is brown set the mould off the fire on the table where the burnt
sugar will get cold; that forms what is called a caramel or coat of
burnt sugar on the bottom of the mould. Make a custard by beating
together six eggs, a quarter of a pound of sugar and a pint of milk.
After the custard is made pour it into the mould and set the mould in a
sauce pan with boiling water that will come half way up the sides of the
mould, and steam the custard until it is firm. When the custard is firm
you can turn it out of the mold and use it hot or leave it until it is
quite cold and use it cold. I have used granulated sugar this time. You
can make the same custard, preparing it just exactly as for steaming,
but bake it, if you like, only you would set the mould in the dripping
pan with water in it, baking it just until it is firm, in a moderate
oven. You could make it in teacups; in that case you would burn the
sugar in an iron-spoon or in the frying pan and while it still is liquid
put just a little in the bottom of each cup, because you remember it
hardens directly. Then bake the cups of custard in a pan of water. Use
the custard in the cups either hot or cold. If the custard is to be used
cold leave it in the mould; it will stand better than if it is turned
out hot. But it is stiff enough to retain its form even when it is hot.
And the sugar that is in the mould forms a little sauce around it on the
dish.


TOMATO SOUP.

Next take a recipe for tomato soup. A can of tomatoes; put them over the
fire. In the summer use about two quarts of fresh tomatoes. You will
find that about two quarts will be sufficient. After the fresh tomatoes
are peeled and sliced (you will remember canned tomatoes are already
peeled), put them over the fire and stew them gently for about half an
hour, or until they are tender. If the canned tomatoes are entirely
solid you may need to add a little liquid, but I find there is generally
more liquid in the can than you need. When the tomatoes are tender
enough to rub through a sieve, put them through the sieve with a potato
masher. That gives you pulp, or _puree_, of tomatoes. And you will add
to the tomatoes, after they have been passed through the sieve, half a
salt spoon of baking soda, and then milk enough to thin them to the
proper consistency of soup. Season with salt and pepper, and let them
boil, and serve the soup. If you want a thick soup, add to the tomatoes
a quart of milk, and thicken the soup with cracker dust, very finely
powdered and sifted. Thicken as much as you like, beginning with two
heaping tablespoonfuls; add more if you want it. Of course you can put
butter in either of these soups, but it is not necessary. The way I
shall make the soup to-day will be to thicken it with butter and flour
after the tomatoes have been passed through the sieve. Do not confuse
these two recipes. You have got one of thin soup; you have got another
with milk, salt and pepper, thickened with cracker dust. Now a third:
Put a tablespoonful of butter and a tablespoonful of flour in a
saucepan. Stir them over the fire until they are melted together, then
put in a pint of water gradually--a pint of hot water--stirring it
smooth; and the tomato pulp. If that does not make the soup as thin as
you desire--and it should be about the consistency of good cream--add a
little more boiling water. Season with salt and pepper, and stir it
until it boils, and then it is ready to use.

Next take directions for boiling vegetables, so that the color is
perfectly kept. I told you yesterday that we should have spinach if we
could get it, if not, that we would use lettuce. I think that next week,
in the course of the lessons, I shall succeed in having some spinach
from Cleveland. However, I shall use lettuce to-day. First, thoroughly
wash it in salted water. For a quart of water use a tablespoonful of
salt. As I told you the other day, the salt in the water is for the
purpose of killing any little insects that are in the leaves, especially
of the lettuce. You know that it is very troublesome to dislodge them,
but the salt kills them, and of course you can wash them out. As long as
they are alive they cling there. If you sprinkle salt on the leaves it
will wither them, but if you put it in the water it will not. Salted
water is intensely cold, you know, and it would restore the freshness of
the leaves of lettuce, even if they were wilted, unless they were really
on the verge of decay. If you will remind me, after I have finished
giving the recipe for cooking the vegetables, I will tell you how to
keep lettuce fresh. After your vegetables, whatever they may be, whether
lettuce, or spinach, or asparagus, or string beans, are washed perfectly
clean--I do not say wash peas, and I will tell you after a little the
reason why--after they are thoroughly washed put them over the fire in
enough boiling salted water to more than cover them--plenty of water, so
that they can float about--the water to be salted with a tablespoonful
of salt in a quart of water, and to be actually boiling when you put in
the vegetables. This same rule applies to the cooking of peas, only that
the peas are treated a little differently in the cleaning, but they are
cooked in the same way. Boil the vegetable (whatever it is) in salted
water, fast, just till they are tender. Remember what I said about
boiling carrots yesterday. As soon as the vegetables are tender, drain
them and throw them into plenty of cold water. Leave them in the cold
water until you want to use them. Then, if peas or beans, drain them,
heat them quickly, with a little salt and pepper and butter, very
quickly, or any sauce or gravy you wish to serve them in, and serve them
hot. If lettuce or spinach, to make a _puree_, after having boiled in
boiling salted water and then put in cold water, rub them through a
sieve with a potato masher. After they are rubbed through the sieve they
are ready to be used in different ways. In Europe the _puree_ of lettuce
is served as a vegetable, just as the _puree_ of spinach is. We do not
often cook it in that way, but it is very nice; it is such an
exceedingly tender vegetable that it takes proportionately more than of
spinach. After the lettuce or spinach is rubbed through the colander or
sieve with a potato masher it is ready to be seasoned with salt, pepper
and vinegar, or any sauce you like, and used as a vegetable, or used in
soup. You remember what I told you about spinach soup yesterday--_puree_
of spinach with cream soup, colored green with spinach. Put in just
enough spinach to cover it. If I succeed in getting spinach next week I
shall make, at one of the lessons, spinach soup, and also boil and serve
some as a vegetable.

Now about peas. I spoke about washing string beans but not washing peas.
If the shells of the peas are at all dirty, and sometimes they are so
that they blacken your fingers in shelling, wash the shells of the peas
before you begin to shell them, but do not wash the peas after they are
shelled. Of course the inside of the pod is perfectly clean, and if your
hands are clean and the shells are clean, you do not need to wash them.
In using green peas in summer time it is well to have a quantity of
them, perhaps twice as many as you are likely to use for one meal, and
shell them, because you know they are of different sizes always. Shell
them and separate them into two different sizes, the smallest and the
largest, and then cook one size for one day, putting the others in a
very cool place, or refrigerator, and cook them the next day, because if
you have the large and small ones mixed they do not cook evenly. You
will find them very much nicer; if you keep them in a cool place it will
not hurt to keep them.

The length of time that it takes to boil lettuce or spinach depends
somewhat on the time of the year. The tenderer the spinach is, of
course, the quicker it will boil; when it is very young and tender it
will boil in two or three minutes; when it is older it may take as long
as ten minutes. Ladies very often make the mistake in boiling spinach
that they do in boiling cabbage. They boil it sometimes until the leaves
are destroyed, in order to soften the stalk. The better way is to tear
away the stalk and use only the leaf. Of course, that gives you a
smaller quantity of spinach than if you use the stalk, but when you use
the tough, woody stalk you waste the leaf in boiling. Lettuce usually
boils in a couple of minutes. One of the ladies speaks about cooking
spinach without any water. You can do that if you wish. Just put in a
sauce pan, after having carefully picked it over and washed it; stir it
a little once in a while to be sure that the uncooked top goes down to
the bottom. There is no special advantage in it, because if you boil it
as I tell you, only until it is tender, the water has no effect upon it
except to cook it more quickly. It is the English way to cook it without
water. If you use boiling salted water, as I told you, it cannot
possibly affect the nutriment of the vegetable. It is when you boil
vegetables a long time, and boil them away before you take up the dish,
that you waste the nutriment. These rules apply to every vegetable that
has color in it except beets. Beets have to be cooked without cutting
the skin or trimming them in any way, in order to keep the color.

Now to keep lettuce fresh. I have kept it fresh, even in the summer
time, for two or three days in this way: When it first comes in from the
market wash it thoroughly in plenty of cold salted water. You do not
need to tear it apart. You know I told you the other day about
separating the leaves slightly from the head of the lettuce and shaking
it in cold salted water. Trim off the outside wilted leaves. Wash it
thoroughly in cold salted water, then wet a towel and lay the lettuce in
it, fold it loosely up over the roots and if you have ice lay the towel
on the cake of ice in the refrigerator or by the side of the cake of
ice. If you haven't any ice and have a cold cellar, after you have
washed the lettuce and wrapped it in the wet towel, put it in a box; a
tight wooden box is the best, or a thick pasteboard box if it is not
broken; and put it in the cellar in the coldest place you can find. If
you wrap it in a wet towel and put it on the ice you do not want to look
at it. It will keep fresh at least two days, and sometimes longer; but
if you put it in the cellar you will have to wet the towel thoroughly
twice a day, morning and night; and you will find that you will have to
take away some of the leaves that have wilted, but if you have it upon
the ice the chances are that you will not lose any leaves. And it is
very much nicer than it is to let it wilt and then try to restore it by
soaking it in water.


FRIED PICKEREL.

Next take a recipe for fried pickerel. Some of the ladies will remember
that a few days ago we were talking about frying fish in this way with
salt pork. If any of the ladies have the recipe, of course they do not
need to take it again. For fried fish of any kind, enough salt pork to
cover the bottom of the frying pan that you are going to use for the
fish. You find you have three or four pounds of fish; you will need at
least half a pound of salt pork. Cut the pork in very thin slices; fat
salt pork is the best. Put it in the frying pan and fry it until it is
light brown. While the pork is being fried get ready the fish, having it
thoroughly cleaned by washing it in cold water. If the fish is small you
do not need to cut it; if it is large, cut it in pieces about three or
four inches square. After the fish has been cleaned dry it in a towel;
season some Indian meal with salt and pepper, roll the fish in the
Indian meal. When the pork is brown take it out of the fat and put the
fish into the drippings and fry the fish brown, first on one side and
then on the other. When the fish is browned nicely serve it in a dish
with the pork--fried pork and fish in one dish. This fish will not get
very brown to-day, because it is still frozen. It did not come in long
enough ago for us to get it thawed out, so, of course, there will be a
little water in the fat, and it will not get quite so brown.




LECTURE TENTH.


CHEAP DISHES AND REWARMED FOODS.

We begin our lesson this afternoon with a dish of rice,--piloff of
rice,--any cold meat cut in small squares, an onion peeled and chopped
fine, and if you have tomatoes, either canned, fresh, or cold stewed
tomatoes, a cupful. Sometimes the dish is made with tomatoes, sometimes
without. Put the onion in the sauce pan with a tablespoonful of
drippings; set it over the fire and let it get light brown. When it is
light brown put with it a cupful of rice, picked over and washed and
dried by the fire. After the onion begins to brown put the rice with it
and stir until the rice is light brown; then put in a quart of hot
water, the meat and tomatoes and a palatable seasoning of salt and
pepper. Of course, the quantity of salt and pepper that you use will
depend on the seasoning of the meat, and this may be any kind of meat.
Then cover the sauce pan in which you have all these things and let the
rice, meat, tomatoes and water all cook together gently. Every ten
minutes you must look to see whether the rice has absorbed all the
water. If it has you must add a little more water, not more than half a
cupful at a time, keeping the rice just moist until it is tender. You
will find that probably in about half an hour the rice will be tender,
and when the dish is done it should not have the gravy about it; it
simply needs to be moist, so you will have to add water cautiously after
the first quart.

If the meat that you use is very fat,--and sometimes beef like this is
very fat,--you may cook the meat, fat and lean together in with the
onion in the first place instead of the tablespoonful of butter or
drippings. If you have no meat you can make the dish in the same way
using tomato, onion and rice; and if you have cold gravy of any kind put
that in it.


FRENCH HASH.

Next take the recipe for a dish called French hash. There is no potato
in it, it is simply meat and gravy, so that you must not let the name
mislead you. Little slices of cold meat, fat and lean together. For a
pint bowlful of meat use about a tablespoonful of chopped onion. First
slightly brown the onion with a tablespoonful of butter or drippings or
fat from the meat; then when the onion begins to brown put in the meat
and let that brown. Next a tablespoonful of dried flour; stir the flour
with the brown meat and onion until the flour is quite brown; then cover
the meat with pork gravy or boiling water. After you have covered the
meat with water or cold gravy just let the water or gravy boil, then
season it palatably with salt and pepper; of course, the seasoning will
depend upon whether you have used gravy or broth or water. If you have
used gravy or broth that already will have been seasoned, so that you
want to taste for the seasoning. After the gravy is both boiled and
seasoned take the sauce pan off the fire and stir in the yolk of one raw
egg with it and dish at once. You must not put the hash back on the fire
after putting the egg in. If you do you will curdle it. Do not stir the
egg in till you are ready to serve it, on toast or plain.


BAKED TENDERLOINS.

The next recipe will be for baked tenderloins. Split the pork
tenderloins in such a way as to make rather thick slices. Tenderloins
are so thick that by cutting you spread them out. Inside the slice of
tenderloin put any stuffing that you like. I have given two or three
recipes for different kinds of stuffing. For this to-day I shall use a
little stale bread, crumbed, seasoned with salt and pepper, and
moistened with butter; a tablespoonful of butter to a scant cupful of
bread, or in place of butter you could use an egg. After you put a
little stuffing in the tenderloins fold them together and either tie or
sew them so as to keep the stuffing inside. Put the tenderloins in the
dripping pan in the oven and bake them until they are thoroughly
browned. Then take off the strings and serve them. They are very nice if
you bake potatoes in the pan with them. If the oven is hot the potatoes
and tenderloins will bake in about the same time. The potatoes should be
peeled. Remember what I told you about always taking large stitches in
sewing up meat, so that you can see to pull them out when the meat is
done. Of course, pork tenderloins will be pretty sure to yield drippings
enough to baste with. I have spoken about that in the baking of meats
two or three times. No water is needed in preparing them. The
tenderloins, when sewed up, will resume their original shape.


FRIED LIVER.

First, wash the liver in cold water, then pour scalding water on it and
let it stand for about ten minutes to draw out the blood; slice it about
half an inch thick. After the liver is scalded and sliced, roll it in
flour, season it with salt and pepper and put it into the frying pan
containing about a quarter of an inch of hot fat, which may be drippings
or fat from bacon or salt pork. In that case you first would fry the
salt pork or bacon to get the fat or drippings, and put the slices of
pork or bacon to keep warm when they are done. After the pork or bacon
is fried put it on a dish to keep warm, and then fry the liver in the
drippings. As soon as the liver is browned on both sides serve it on a
dish with the fried pork or bacon. Fried liver needs to be cooked as
quickly as possible, making sure that it is done. The more quickly you
can cook it the tenderer it will always be. You can take that as a rule
in regard to liver, heart and tongue, that the faster they can be cooked
the tenderer they will be. To-day I simply have fried this with
drippings. I have not fried the bacon with it, but I have told you how
to fry it.


BAKED HASH.

Next take a recipe for baked hash. Equal quantities of chopped meat and
stale bread, meat of any kind. Suppose you have a pint bowl of each. Mix
with the meat and the bread a heaping tablespoonful of butter, a
palatable seasoning of salt and pepper, and that, of course, will depend
upon the seasoning of the meat. You may use corned beef or highly
seasoned meat, and then you will not need so much seasoning as you would
if you used fresh meat. A heaping teaspoonful of chopped parsley, enough
cold gravy, if you have it, or broth to moisten the hash,--just to
moisten it, not make it sloppy,--or if you have not gravy or broth you
must use water and butter. Mix the hash very thoroughly. Have ready an
earthen dish, buttered. See that the oven is hot, then very quickly
dissolve a teaspoonful of baking powder in a teaspoonful of water or
broth and stir it into the hash just as fast as you can and put it into
the oven to bake. As soon as the hash is brown on top it will be done.


CORNED BEEF HASH.

Now I will give you a recipe for corned beef hash. Yesterday we spoke
about boiling corned beef. You will take cold corned beef and boiled
potatoes, either hot or cold, about equal quantities. Sometimes people
like a little more potato than meat. Mix the meat and potato together;
add just enough water or broth to moisten the meat and potato. Season
palatably with salt and pepper and butter; have the hash nicely mixed
together; put into the frying pan; suppose you have a quart of hash,
about two tablespoonfuls of butter and let it get hot, then put in the
hash. Stir the hash in the butter until it is nearly hot. Then, using a
knife, form it into a cake on one side of the frying pan and let the
bottom brown. Loosen the hash once in a while from the bottom of the pan
to make sure it is not burning and when it is brown on the bottom turn
it out on a dish with the brown side up. Another form of hash is the
moist hash. That is simply prepared and warmed without browning it,
using broth or butter and hot water for moistening it.




LECTURE ELEVENTH.


OYSTERS.

We begin our lecture this morning with roast oysters, Mobile style. All
oysters, when cooked in any way, should be first put in a colander and
the juice allowed to drain off, then strain the juice. Always take each
oyster in the hand and carefully remove all fragments of shell from the
gills. The shells of oysters are dangerous to swallow, and serious
illness is often the result. Hold the oyster by the hard part, removing
pieces of shell with the finger. Then wipe the oyster with a wet towel.
Keep the most perfect specimens for broiling, as the more imperfect ones
will do sufficiently well for soups or stews. For roasting oysters in
the Mobile style, have as many deep oyster shells as you intend to have
oysters, scrubbed very clean; put the shells in a dripping pan and place
them in the oven, until they become so hot as to melt butter when put
into them. When quite hot take the shells out of the oven and put a
small piece of butter and a very little pepper in each shell. If the
oysters are large lay one in each shell, if they are small put two or
three in each shell and put them back in the oven directly. By the time
the edges of the oysters curl they will be done. Oysters when heated
through are done. Do not put any salt on them. Serve them on the shells.
As they are served in Mobile, a large shell is used, laid on a small
charcoal furnace, putting the shell on top of the furnace to get very
hot; the furnace is brought to the table and the oysters opened and
dropped into the hot shell and turned once. The regulation way of
roasting oysters is to thoroughly wash the outside of the shell and lay
them on the fire with the large end down. As soon as the oysters open
serve them.

To use the liquor, take a pint of the oyster liquor after it has been
strained; sift a heaping cupful of flour; mix with it a level
teaspoonful of salt and a heaping teaspoonful of baking powder. Have the
griddle as hot as you would for pancakes. Very quickly stir into the
flour enough of the oyster liquor to make a batter, and fry just as any
pancake; serve hot with butter.

Next take a recipe for oyster fritters. Have the frying kettle half full
of fat, as you would for doughnuts. Strain the oysters and remove all
bits of shell. In the meantime the lard should be heating on the back
of the stove. Cut the oysters slightly. For a pint of oysters use a pint
of flour, sifted, and mixed with a level teaspoonful of salt. Put the
flour in a mixing bowl with the yolk of one egg, a tablespoonful of
salad oil, and a pinch of pepper. Use enough of the oyster liquor to
make a batter thick enough to drop from the spoon. Beat the white of an
egg to a stiff froth. Mix the oysters and the white of egg lightly with
the batter, and as soon as it is mixed drop by the large spoonful into
the hot lard. As soon as brown take the fritters out and lay them for a
moment on brown paper to drain the grease off. In order to keep them hot
while you are frying the rest lay the paper on a dripping pan and set it
in the oven.

Take next a recipe for oyster soup, thickened with cracker dust. For a
quart of oysters, remove all bits of shell, as usual, and mix the oyster
liquor with enough to make a quart. Take one tablespoonful of butter, a
very little white pepper, if you have it, two tablespoonfuls of cracker
dust finely powdered. As I told you the other day, the cracker dust
which you buy at the cracker factories is the nicest. Stir all together
over the fire, and when it comes to a boil put in the oysters, with a
level teaspoonful of salt. Stir till the edges of the oysters curl; then
serve. To thicken with flour, stir one tablespoonful of flour and one of
butter together over the fire. Season with pepper, and put in one quart
of liquor and milk.

For plain broiled oysters, prepare the oysters as above directed and lay
them on a towel. Take a double-wire broiler and butter it thickly,
taking care to have the fire hot. Season the oysters lightly with pepper
and but very little, if any, salt. Put the oysters between the broiler,
and broil them; serve them on toast.

For breaded oysters, prepare as before, and dip the oysters in melted
butter seasoned with pepper and salt, and roll them in cracker crumbs.
Put them on the gridiron and broil them until they are light brown.

For oysters broiled with bacon, cut very thin slices of breakfast bacon,
as many slices as oysters, and stick them on little skewers, half a
dozen oysters on each skewer, first a slice of bacon and then an oyster,
until you have half a dozen on each skewer. Flatten them so that they
will lie a little apart. Put the skewer between the buttered bars of the
gridiron, dust them a little with pepper and brown them. The bacon
should be cut very thin and about the size of the oyster. Serve them on
the skewers.

For oysters in the Philadelphia style, prepare the oysters by draining
the juice from them and removing the small pieces of shells. Use for one
dozen large oysters one tablespoonful of lard, two tablespoonfuls of
salad oil. As soon as the fat is hot put the oysters in and fry them
till the edges curl. Season them with pepper and salt. Fry them plain or
rolled in flour.


WELSH RAREBIT.

For a rarebit large enough for three or four persons, put in a sauce pan
a quarter of a pound of grated cheese, two tablespoonfuls of butter, a
saltspoonful of salt, two tablespoonfuls of ale, one teaspoonful of
mustard, a little dust of cayenne pepper, stir all these together over
the fire and serve on toast.




LECTURE TWELFTH.

_Cookery for the Sick._


BROILED CHICKEN.

For broiled chicken choose always a tender chicken. Remove all the
feathers, singe it over the fire, and wipe the chicken with a wet towel.
Split the chicken down the back. In doing that one can remove the
entrails without breaking. Take out the entrails and crop; lay the
chicken open on the gridiron. It is better to use a double gridiron,
well buttered. If the chicken is not tender, break the joints so the
chicken will lie flat on the gridiron. Put the inside of the chicken to
the fire first and brown it. Do not put it too close to the fire. Broil
it fifteen or twenty minutes, for it will require about that time to get
well done. When the inside is brown, turn it and broil the outside,
allowing about ten minutes. Take time enough to brown it nicely without
burning. If you have a very young spring chicken less time will be
required. Do not broil a chicken that weighs over three pounds. If the
chicken is very large it is better to put it in a very hot oven in a
pan, with no butter unless the chicken is very lean. Season with salt,
pepper and butter, if desired, when it is removed from the oven.


BARBECUED CHICKEN.

Split down the back, and after breaking the joints dress and lay it
open. Use two tablespoonfuls of butter and one cup of water. Season with
salt and pepper. Brown the chicken well, dredge it with flour and baste
it every fifteen minutes with drippings from the pan until tender. Pour
over it the gravy that you find in the pan, and serve. The Southerners,
with whom this dish is a great favorite, usually put in this gravy some
nice table sauce.


JELLIED OATMEAL.

Take one-half cup of very finely ground oatmeal and put it over the fire
with a pint of boiling water and a level teaspoonful of salt. Boil it
very slowly until it becomes transparent. This will require two hours or
longer. Do not add any more water unless it is positively necessary.
When it is done it should be stiff and hold its form when it is turned
out. It makes a dish which is very nice and nutritious for sick people,
when it is quite gelatinous. Add sugar, if it is desired, and put it in
a mould. Serve when cold and solid with cream and powdered sugar.


BOILED TROUT.

Boiled trout makes an excellent dish for convalescents and it is very
nutritious. Have the fish cleaned and the scales removed. The entrails
should be drawn from the gills. After the fish has been thoroughly
washed boil it in salted boiling water till you can easily pull a fin
out, then serve it with a white sauce either made plain or with milk.
French canned green peas are nice with trout. If the peas are served
with the trout put the peas on the dish and lay the trout on them.

Clam soup may be given to invalids with beef tea, alternating. Clam soup
may be given when beef tea can not be digested. It is very nutritious.
Drain off the juice and remove all bits of shell as with oysters. If the
clams are whole put the shells over the fire until they are heated;
remove the clams and simply season the juice very lightly with salt and
pepper and use the broth in that shape. If you are using canned clams
heat the clams in the juice, then remove the juice and season slightly,
using the juice. Strain the juice. Take the clams and cut away the hard
part from the soft part. Boil the juice, with the hard part, long enough
to extract the flavor. Use the juice to make the soup, adding water or
milk. When the soup is made season it, putting the soft part of the clam
in it. Boil it a couple of minutes and serve it. Use butter and flour in
the same manner as for thickening oyster soup.

Make orange salad to serve with broiled chicken in the following manner:
For a small chicken use two small sour oranges, sliced very thin.
Arrange them nicely on a dish. Place over the slices of orange a very
little salt, a little cayenne pepper, and three tablespoonfuls of salad
oil. If the oranges are sweet a few drops of vinegar or lemon juice must
be added. Serve the chicken on top of the orange salad.


RENNET CUSTARD.

Heat a half pint of milk until it is lukewarm. While the milk is heating
beat one egg with a teaspoonful of powdered sugar and stir the egg and
sugar in with it. When the milk is lukewarm add one teaspoonful of
liquid rennet and one teaspoonful of wine or one tablespoonful of rennet
wine. Mix all together and let it become cold. Rennet custard may be
given safely when the invalid is not able to take more than broth.


BEEF TEA.

For a pint of beef tea take one pound of beef chopped very fine. All the
fat is to be cut away. Put it in a bowl with a pint of cold water. Let
it stand in an earthen bowl at least an hour, and longer if possible.
Put the water and beef in the sauce pan over the fire, and heat them
very slowly indeed. When the beef tea arrives at the boiling point pour
it into a wire sieve to allow the juice and the little particles of
meat--not the fibres--to pass through. Season it very lightly, and if
any particles of fat are visible lay little pieces of white porous paper
on top of the tea to absorb the fat; serve it hot or cold.




NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF PERSONS IN ATTENDANCE UPON THIS COURSE.


  Alexander, Jane A.                  30 Prince Street, Minneapolis, E. D.
  Asire, Mrs. Dr. L.                  258 First Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Aasland, G. P.                         1315 Seventh Street, S. E., City.
  Abbott, Mrs. A. L.                              1115 Fifth Street, E. D.
  Adams, Mrs. S. E.                          Care of Carrier 3, West Side.
  Ainsworth, Mrs. C. F.                  404 Nicollet Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Amy, Jennie M.                        1809 Portland Avenue,      "
  Anderson, Hannah                          2215 Park Avenue,      "
  Adair, Mrs. Mary                    206 Tenth Street South,      "
  Arnold, Mrs. E. L.                 513 Eighth Avenue South,      "
  Adams, Miss Alice.                 University of Minnesota,      "
  Allen, Mrs. M. L.              312 Fourth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Angbe, Mary                                       Box 1829,      "
  Adams, Mrs. August                       Care of Carrier 3,      "
  Abraham, Miss M. P.                   1025 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Anderson, Henrietta        525 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Alden, Jennie M.                                   Box 143,      "
  Athens, Mrs.                    801 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Anderson, Mrs. R.             1025 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Anderson, Anna E.              618 Fourth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Adams, Mrs. Charles                      107 Island Avenue,      "
  Allen, Miss Kitty                                       St. Cloud, Minn.
  Anderson, Miss Mary                       701 Union Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Ames, Mrs. C. W.                           233 Western Avenue, St. Paul.
  Avery, Mrs. G. W.          725 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Alden, Bertha                  1227 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Alexander, Mrs. Jane                52 Prince Street E. D.,      "
  Allen, Mrs. E. S.                                 Jacksonville, Vermont.
  Alger, Mrs. Q. D.                   1227 University Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Asire, Mollie                       258 First Avenue South,      "
  Andrews, Mrs. F. P.             527 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Austin, Mrs. M. P.                1212 Eighth Street South,      "
  Anderson, Martha                                     Eden Prairie, Minn.
  Billings, Miss Ida P.              70 North Twelfth Street, Minneapolis.
  Bicknell, Mrs. Chas. A.    416 Nineteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Bicknell, Miss F. E.          1805 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Beach, Mrs. W. H.                         1509 Park Avenue,      "
  Berry, Flora                   300 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Barrows, Miss Nellie           227 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Beach, Miss M. P.                         1509 Park Avenue,      "
  Brown, Mrs. E. J.                       61 Highland Avenue,      "
  Barrett, Nellie                    611 Second Avenue North,      "
  Buhtolph, Mrs. F. G.           1829 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Butler, H. E.                  1829 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Berry, Miss Olive             1906 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Bradley, Miss Anna            1901 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Brown, Mrs. Elwood                   425 University Avenue,      "
  Bartlett, C. J.                             Care _Tribune_,      "
  Beveridge, Miss Nellie                 43 Royalston Avenue,      "
  Bolton, Lettie E.         1529 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Benton, Mary L.                419 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Bausman, Miss Bertha                320 South Tenth Street,      "
  Budington, Miss Anna                 1209 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Barry, Mrs. J. L.                 218 Twelfth Street South,      "
  Bolton, Mrs. N. H.                  1529 University Avenue,      "
  Bell, Mrs. J. F.                                     Long Prairie, Minn.
  Bradford, Belle                1313 Fifth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Bardwell, Mrs. Wm.                                      Excelsior, Minn.
  Bradley, Mrs. R.              1910 Fourth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Bettman, Mrs. P. H.              35 Sixteenth Street North,      "
  Bernard, Mrs. M. M.             517 Ninth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Billings, Mrs. A. L.               70 North Twelfth Street,      "
  Butler, Mrs. L.                     808 Third Avenue South,      "
  Brown, Miss Nellie          625 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Butler, Mrs. H. E.                     1829 Western Avenue,      "
  Blake, Miss S. C.                      324 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Bardwell, Mrs. C. T.                      1800 Park Avenue,      "
  Bolton, Miss L. F.            1801 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Bacon, Mrs. W. H.               401 Sixth Avenue Northeast,      "
  Bentliff, Mrs.
  Bevan, Mrs.                     801 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Bosworth, Inez                  502 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Berry, Mrs. R. W.               502 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Bemis, E. W.                    502 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Butler, Mrs. G. S.        Room 3 Lindley Block, corner Seventh
                              Street and Nicollet Avenue.          "
  Burtliff, Mrs. G.                  1806 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Bredyman, Mrs. C.                                       St. Cloud, Minn.
  Bridgeman, Anna J.              837 Fifteenth Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Burce, I. M.                              College Hospital,      "
  Brown, Paul                 625 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Bell, Annie D.                 616 Fourth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Brooks, Mrs. D. T.                                      Minneiska, Minn.
  Brown, Clara                          1129 Hennepin Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Beveridge, Miss Kate                   43 Royalston Avenue,      "
  Bonfoy, Anna H.         823 Twenty-second Avenue Southwest, Minneapolis.
  Burch, Mrs. Lottie J.                                   Excelsior, Minn.
  Blaisdell, Ada                                     Box 178, Minneapolis.
  Bragg, Mrs. W. F.                                                "
  Brooks, Mrs. Jabez                      1708 Laurel Avenue,      "
  Boeland, Mrs. Geo                                       Iowa City, Iowa.
  Baldwin, Mrs. R. J.               423 Seventh Street South, Minneapolis.
  Blaisdell, Miss Sadie                              Box 178,      "
  Ball, Mrs. Sarah                                        Excelsior, Minn.
  Beebe, Mrs. R. P.                      614 Franklin Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Bolton, Mrs. A. C.      1801 Fourth Street and Eighteenth Ave.
                            S. E.,                                 "
  Brown, Estelle              625 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Baker, Sibyl B.                1611 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Blanchard, Carrie W.               University of Minnesota,      "
  Cheney, Mrs. Isaac             238 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Carriel, Mrs. D. S.                     1808 Fourth Avenue,      "
  Connor, Miss A. A.                  1415 University Avenue,      "
  Cheney, Miss Nellie A.    Corner Franklin Avenue and
                              Minnehaha,                           "
  Cheney, Mrs. E.           Corner Franklin Avenue and
                              Minnehaha,                           "
  Cantwell, Miss M. J.     1215 Chestnut Avenue, Minneapolis,      "
  Cummings, Mrs. R.               325 Sixth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Cooley, Mrs. E.                 121 Cess. Avenue Southeast,      "
  Coe, C. E.                    Room 59, 315 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Coe, Helen                 619 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Cooper, Mrs. Preston     Fourth Street and Third Avenue
                             South,                                "
  Castner, Mrs. F. H.        725 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Covey, Hattie D.                   508 Eighth Avenue South,      "
  Cuzner, Mrs. A. B.       Twelfth Ave. Southeast, bet. Com.
                             and Palm,                             "
  Cooke, Mrs. J.                 1521 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Cole, Miss Carrie A.         113 Pleasant Street Southeast,      "
  Cole, Mrs. Alida             113 Pleasant Street Southeast,      "
  Camp, Mrs. A. R.               1405 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Curtis, Mrs. E. F.             527 Second Avenue Southeast,      "
  Clark, Prudy                                         Eden Prairie, Minn.
  Crane, Tremont                1113 Fourth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Conklin, Miss Margaret                    2215 Park Avenue,      "
  Chapman, Mrs. Dr. O. S.           1123 Fourth Avenue South,      "
  Carpenter, Mrs. G. W.                117 University Avenue,      "
  Carver, Miss Linda.                                              "
  Carver, Mr. R. I.              1226 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Cunningham, Miss          Portland Avenue, between Eighteenth
                              and Nineteenth streets.              "
  Cantwell, Mrs. P. P.                  1215 Chestnut Avenue,      "
  Chunt, Miss B. A.                  1133 Ninth Street North,      "
  Chapman, Miss                   204 Fifth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Caswell, Mrs. Vesta                                    Litchfield, Minn.
  Caswell, Mrs. Martha                                   Coon Creek, Minn.
  Clark, Mrs. Frank                   616 Sixth Avenue North, Minneapolis.
  Cone, Mrs. J. W.                701 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Crafts, Lettie                  610 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Croswell, Mrs. H. J. G.        1301 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Cary, Mrs. N. H.                       2216 Portland Place,      "
  Cook, Mrs. Nordy                                                 "
  Cole, Mrs. E.                 Seventeenth and Vine Streets,      "
  Cone, Mrs. M. D.            Stearns Avenue and Twenty-eighth
                                Street,                            "
  Chamberlain, Mrs. W. E.                                     Anoka, Minn.
  Crafts, Mrs. A.                 610 Fifth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Crocker, Mrs. E. B.                    2222 Portland Place,      "
  Coe, Mrs. C. A.            619 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Conner, Mrs. J. L.                 252 Second Avenue South,      "
  Chute, Mrs. S. H.                     15 University Avenue,      "
  Cady, Louise                       University of Minnesota,      "
  Cummings, Miss L.               325 Sixth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Crippen, Miss                            34 Seventh Street,      "
  Cuzner, Mrs. E. A.                                               "
  Cummings, Miss M.               325 Sixth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Coplin, Mrs. Chas              318 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Creelman, Mrs. M. J.                      5 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Coverdale, Mrs. J. W.          336 South Eighteenth Street,      "
  Caskin, Miss E. C.         428 Eighth Street and Fifth Avenue
                               South,                              "
  Christian, Mrs. Geo. H.    Corner Eighth Street and Fourth
                               Avenue South.                       "
  Coverdale, Daniel              336 Eighteenth Street South,      "
  Cumming, Mrs. Gussie                                Taylors Falls, Minn.
  Calderwood, Mrs. J. T.                    415 Grant Street, Minneapolis.
  Cummings, Mrs. Henry                726 First Avenue North,      "
  Connell, Miss Kate B.              70 North Twelfth Street,      "
  Coe, Mrs.                             1906 Hawthorn Avenue,      "
  Christian, Mrs. L.         Eighth Street and Fifth Avenue
                               South,                              "
  Clark, Mrs. G. A.                 809 Seventh Street South,      "
  Calhoun, Mrs. J. F.                  60 South Tenth Street,      "
  Coffin, Mrs. W. F.         1013 Sixteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Coykendall, Mrs. J. K.          715 Sixteenth Street South,      "
  Chapin, Mrs. N. C.         319 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Cordell, D. W.                       904 University Avenue,      "
  Crosby, Mrs. Judge                                       Hastings, Minn.
  Cook, Mrs. Alma                                             Anoka, Minn.
  Campbell, Mrs. L. W.           1100 Fifth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Carey, Mrs. Maggie                 926 Second Avenue South,      "
  Connor, Mrs. E. H.             1105 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Carswell, Mrs. J. F.                     43 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Canfield, Miss Maggie      Corner Cedar Avenue and Twenty-sixth
                               Street,                             "
  Cheney, Jennie L.              325 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Christie, Mrs. J. O.       714 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Cone, Mrs. E. C.           714 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Dean, O. A.                                           Bloomington, Minn.
  Dexter, Mrs. Chas                         63 Island Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Davidson, Mrs. E. B.                  1021 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Donnell, Mrs.              Nineteenth Street between Sixth
                               and Seventh Avenues South      Minneapolis.
  Dorsett, Mrs. C. W.                                              "
  Dix, Mrs. S. A.                    27 South Twelfth Street,      "
  Dyer, Mrs. C. E.           624 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Durkee, Mrs. H. O.                                      Rochester, Minn.
  Dodson, Mrs. E. F.                    1509 Portland Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Donovan, Mrs. M.                     Street Railway Office,      "
  Derickson, Mrs. G. P.                   24 Highland Avenue,      "
  Davenport, Mrs. E. J.                         63 Oak Grove,      "
  Dudley, Mrs. D. W.                              2030 Place,      "
  Dennison, Mrs. J. E.         1413 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Dodge, Mrs. J. A.              417 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Dowers, Mrs. E.                110 Washington Avenue South,      "
  Dennett, Miss S. E.                  716 University Avenue,      "
  Doolittle, Mrs. L. A.           727 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Deveau, Miss Gertrude               804 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Dickinson, Mrs. G. L.              1301 First Avenue South,      "
  Donthwaite, Mrs. M. A.                                Bloomington, Minn.
  Donald, Mrs. M.                  903 Main Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Downey, Mrs. Stella           801 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Davenport, Mrs. Jason                57 South Tenth Street,      "
  Doerr, Mrs. Henry                     25 Washington Avenue,      "
  Davenport, Mrs. G. C.                  619 Mississippi Street, St. Paul.
  Daniel, Mrs.                         319 University Avenue, Minneapolis.
  De Mott, Mrs. H. V.        Seventeenth St., bet. Nicollet
                               and Hennepin,                       "
  Davison, Mrs. R. A.                                Box 440,      "
  De Laittre, Mrs. Jno.                   24 Grove Place, Nicollet Island.
  Dailey, Mrs. C. W.                               Box 717 Brainerd, Minn.
  Dailey, Miss A. E.         714 University Avenue Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Dailey, Mrs. M. A.         714 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Elliot, Mrs. J. R.         Cor. Tenth Street and Tenth Ave.
                               South,                              "
  Elliott, Mrs. A. F.                    429 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Emery, Mrs. Fanny                      2030 Portland Place,      "
  Emery, Mrs. H. F.                  724 Fourth Street South,      "
  Elliot, Mrs. D.                    1415 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Eustis, Miss Emma                        University Avenue,      "
  Eustis, Miss Nellie                      University Avenue,      "
  Eustis, Mrs. E. S.                       University Avenue,      "
  Eastman, Mrs. Geo. H.      18 Grove Place, Nicollet Island,      "
  Einstein, Mrs. Kate                    620 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Eastman, Mrs. John W.                716 University Avenue,      "
  Eastman, Mrs. H. D.        20 Grove Place, Nicollet Island,      "
  Elliot, Mrs. M. E.                  814 Third Avenue South,      "
  Edgerly, Mrs. Frank        609 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Erickson, Mrs. O. P.       609 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Elwell, Mrs. Jas. P.                                             "
  Ermentrouh, Mrs. C. H.                1820 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Edwards, Mrs. John                      617 Seventh Avenue,      "
  Edwards, Miss Flora                             Box 888, Brainerd, Minn.
  Eaton, Mrs. Chas. A.                    First Avenue North, Minneapolis.
  Emery, Mrs. J. C.                      2030 Portland Place,      "
  Emery, Dr. Mary                             433 Dayton Avenue, St. Paul.
  Elwell, Mary W.                     1002 Elwell's Addition, Minneapolis.
  Elwell, Mrs. George                 1002 Elwell's Addition,      "
  Edwards, Miss Fanny               617 Seventh Avenue South,      "
  Eastman, Mrs. C. C.           Grove Place, Nicollet Island,      "
  Eastman, Mrs. C. H.                        Dedham, Audubon County, Iowa.
  Emery, Mrs. H. F.          1721 Fourth Street South, E. D., Minneapolis.
  Eastman, Mrs. A. M.                  716 University Avenue,      "
  Fowle, Anna R.                   33 Sixteenth Street North,      "
  Foster, Mrs. C. E.                  1401 University Avenue,      "
  Fuller, Jennie, M. D.                       433 Dayton Avenue, St. Paul.
  Foset, Mrs. C. E.               521 Ninth Avenue Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Farrier, Mrs. G. W.                Room 59, Hennepin Block,      "
  Fish, Mrs. A. M.                     49 Third Street South,      "
  Fosberg, Lottie                 228 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Fosberg, Kate                  520 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Fules, Ida                      2118 Portland Avenue South,      "
  Folwell, Mrs. M. H.            1020 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Fobwle, Mrs. E. B.              409 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Foster, Mrs. F. P.            1323 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Firkins, Ina                       University of Minnesota,      "
  Fairly, Mrs. William                      613 Cedar Avenue,      "
  Foster, Miss L.                        2216 Portland Place,      "
  Foster, Mrs. Robert            1327 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Francis, Miss Emma                       Care A. B. Barton,      "
  Foster, Mrs. S. E.             518 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Foster, Flora              Between Fourth and Fifth Avenues
                               Southeast,                          "
  Fullerton, Mrs. C. F.            203 Eleventh Street South,      "
  Furber, Mrs. Geo.          Corner Sixteenth Avenue, Elwell's
                               Add.,                               "
  Flemming, Annie R.         312 Nineteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Felt, Mrs. E. S.                   34 Seventh Street South,      "
  Field, Mrs. Ellen M.       Twenty-first Avenue and Twelfth
                               Street N.,                          "
  Folds, Mrs. William B.             607 Second Avenue South,      "
  Foster, Mrs. A. F.                916 Seventh Street South,      "
  Fairchild, Mrs. E. K.           409 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Forbes, Carrie E.                        21 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Fratzke, Ida                        602 South Tenth Street,      "
  Francisca, Mrs. G. E.          409 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Gould, Mrs. Lucy                    527 Ninth Street South,      "
  Guild, S. A.                             1214 Harmon Place,      "
  Graham, Mrs. D. M.                 1527 Sixth Street North,      "
  Garfield, Mrs. J. M.       Corner Nicollet and Hennepin
                               Avenues,                            "
  Gould, Helen M.                                         Excelsior, Minn.
  Grimes, Mrs. J. T.         609 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Goodale, Mrs. P. H.            1019 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Goss, Mrs. S. M.                          Olympia, Washington Territory.
  Gage, Mrs. H. C.                   21 South Twelfth Street, Minneapolis.
  Gallow, Mrs. J. E.                 University of Minnesota,      "
  Grindale, Mrs. C. J.           515 Fourth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Gardner, Mrs. E.                631 Fifteenth Street South,      "
  Greenleaf, Mrs. L. L.                                      Beloit,  Wis.
  Gray, Mrs. W. R.                   57 North Twelfth Street, Minneapolis.
  Gray, Miss Mamie                         Care J. R. Hoflin,      "
  Gillette, Mrs. L. S.          1301 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Gallinger, Mrs. H. E.            1103 South Seventh Street,      "
  Grimes, Emma                                         Fergus Falls, Minn.
  Gukell, Mrs. Joseph                38 North Twelfth Street, Minneapolis.
  Gudley, Mrs. J. C.                                         Victor, Iowa.
  Graham, Miss R.                       1224 Nicollet Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Gilpatrick, Mrs. Thos.             1018 Fifth Street South,      "
  Gilpatrick, Mrs. Eva           411 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Gordon, Mrs. E. P.         409 Madison Street, East
                               Division,                           "
  Gorham, Mrs. J. E.         Corner Fourteenth Street and Vine
                               Place,                              "
  Griffith, Mrs. O. J.              1307 Fourth Avenue South,      "
  Graves, Mrs. A. R.                513 Seventh Avenue South,      "
  Godfrey, Mrs. A. C.                                     Minnehaha, Minn.
  Gray, Mrs. T. J.                                        St. Cloud, Minn.
  Gilmore, Mrs. D. M.                     1600 Laurel Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Gale, Mrs. S. C.                           Care Gale & Co.,      "
  Graham, Mrs. J.               1112 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Griffith, Mrs. O. J.              1307 Fourth Avenue South,      "
  Grimes, Mrs E. E.                                                "
  Goodrich, Mrs. F. B.               713 Eighth Street South,      "
  Gilfillan, Mrs. J. B.      Corner Fourth St. & Tenth Ave.
                               Southeast,                          "
  Galpin, Mrs.               1328 Cor. Sixth St. and Fourteenth
                               Ave. Southeast,                     "
  Gould, Mrs. M. S.                                       Excelsior, Minn.
  Gould, Lucy M.                           1214 Harmon Place, Minneapolis.
  Goodfellow, Mrs. R. S.               33 South Ninth Street,      "
  Grimes, Mary               509 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Holbrook, Mattie                        210 Central Avenue,      "
  Hawes, Mrs. W. W.               419 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Hawes, Mrs. J.             Eighth Street and Tenth Avenue
                               Southeast,                          "
  Hughes, Helen G.              1104 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Holbrook, Mrs. E. R.                     29 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Hughes, Mrs. T. E.                     38 Oak Grove Street,      "
  Hayes, Mrs. M. P.                    525 University Avenue,      "
  Holmes, Mrs. J. V.                                          Beloit, Wis.
  Hinshaw, Mrs. A.                414 Sixth Avenue Northeast, Minneapolis.
  Hatch, Mrs. A. P.                   907 First Avenue North,      "
  Huntington, Florence               121 Fourth Street North,      "
  Hall, C. W.                          904 University Avenue,      "
  Hudson, Mrs. James                  Corner Ninth and Broadway, St. Paul.
  Huntley, Mrs J. S.            1025 Eighth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Hoyt, Mrs. C. J.                      628 Sixteenth Street,      "
  How, Lizzie                    425 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Hicks, Mrs. H. G.                   120 Third Avenue South,      "
  Harmon, Miss Irene                  421 First Avenue South,      "
  Harmon, Mrs. E. A.                  421 First Avenue South,      "
  Hoit, Mrs. J. R.                        Pillsbury "A" Mill,      "
  Henderson, Laura E.             217 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Hutchins, Mrs. Dr.              30 Thirteenth Street South,      "
  Hendrickson, Mrs. E. H.                Room 20, F. & M. Block, St. Paul.
  Hayes, Miss Carrie         525 University Avenue Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Ham, Minnie                         640 Sixth Avenue North,      "
  Hayes, Amy N.                  1226 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Heath, Mrs. S. F.             1323 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Hurkinson, Zenobia          Fourth Street and Tenth Avenue,      "
  Hagan, Mrs. A. R.              1013 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Hall, Mrs. C. W.           904 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Hush, Mrs. V. J.           Corner Tenth Street and Second
                               Ave. South,                         "
  Holman, Miss M. B.             1423 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Hoflin, Mrs. J. R.                    1521 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Hermes, Miss Sarah            1219 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Henshaw, I. M.                  414 Sixth Avenue Northeast,      "
  Halnosson, Mrs. Emma                 30 South Tenth Street,      "
  Hammond, Mrs. Mary                                      Lake City, Minn.
  Harrison, Mrs. John                    700 Hennepin Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Haight, Miss Mamie                           Bismarck, Dakota Territory.
  Hurlburt, Mrs. Wm. H.                                      Winona, Minn.
  Hoag, Mrs. W. R.           1113 Fourth Street South, E. D., Minneapolis.
  Henderson, Mrs. A. C.           217 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Hance, Mrs. S. F.                   720 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Howey, Mrs. J. F.                  316 Eighth Street South,      "
  Howell, Miss.                       307 Tenth Street South,      "
  Heath, Mrs. L. M.            1324 Fourth Street, Southeast,      "
  Haskell, Mrs. Frank                                Box 586,      "
  Hughs, Mrs. T. E.                      38 Oak Grove Street,      "
  Hall, Mrs. E. I.                     714 University Avenue,      "
  Hastings, Mrs. W. H.               1816 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Hubbard, Mrs. R. M.                 804 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Hendrickson, Minnie M.                 Room 20, F. & M. Block, St. Paul.
  Havens, Mrs. H. R.                        413 Grant Street, Minneapolis.
  Hall, Mrs. John            Bet. Eighteenth and Nineteenth
                               Aves. South,                        "
  Houghton, Mrs. A. C.                      1604 Park Avenue,      "
  Harper, Mrs. J. L.            34 South Seventh Street West,      "
  Hurd, Mrs. B. C.                    714 First Avenue North,      "
  Holmes, Mrs. H. A.              113 Pleasant Street, E. D.,      "
  Hall, Mrs. P. D.                     1305 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Holden, Mrs. W. H.                                       Hastings, Minn.
  Harrington, Mrs. L. G.                                    Mankato, Minn.
  Hyde, Mrs. E. R.                            Chelsea, Orange County,  Vt.
  Hudson, Mrs. H. H.                              Bridgewater Corner,  Vt.
  Haglin, Mrs. C. F.                 321 South Eighth Street, Minneapolis.
  Hemiup, Mrs. D. D.              604 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Hayes, Mrs. Geo.                      1018 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Hagan, Fannie                  1013 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Hawes, Mrs. W. W.               419 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Holmes, Mrs. H. W.         820 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Hastings, Mrs. A. W.           427 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Hager, Mrs. P. F.         1010 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Irving, Mary E.                    University of Minnesota,      "
  Irwin, Mrs. E. F.                                       Richfield, Minn.
  Jones, Mrs. C. C.             1529 Fourth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Jefferson, Annie H.           1021 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Jones, A. W.                       University of Minnesota,      "
  Jones, Mrs. Dr.                                          Red Wing, Minn.
  Jamison, Mrs. Robt.            1409 Fifth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Johnson, Miss Bessie           227 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Jones, Mrs. Bertha              88 South Fourteenth Street,      "
  Jones, Mrs. Howard              88 South Fourteenth Street,      "
  Jones, Jennie L.              1529 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Johnson, Mrs. R. H.                30 Seventh Street South,      "
  Joy, Miss Inez E.          Corner Tenth Street and Tenth
                               Ave. South,                         "
  Joslin, Mrs. E. O.                     404 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Jones, Mrs. Jos.                                        Oskaloosa, Iowa.
  Jefferson, Mrs. C. A.         1021 Fourth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Jones, Mrs. J. J.                  1221 First Avenue North,      "
  James, Mrs. W. A.                    1910 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Johnson, Hannah                        2500 Stevens Avenue,      "
  Jones, Mira C.                  502 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Johnson, Miss F. M.                 927 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Jones, Miss Annie                   122 First Avenue North,      "
  Johnson, Lena                       720 Third Avenue South,      "
  Joslin, Mrs. J. C.                    1203 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Jackson, Mrs. Geo.                   1914 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Jackson, Mrs. A. B.                 Care of Jackson & Pond,      "
  Jerome, Mrs. Chas. P.              620 Second Avenue South,      "
  Johnson, Mrs. L. G.                  329 University Avenue,      "
  Jackson, Mrs. A. B.             715 Sixteenth Avenue South,      "
  Jenkins, Mrs. J. H.                                        Oshkosh, Wis.
  Jones, Mrs. Chas.                           Bradford, Orange County, Vt.
  Johnson, Anna               Sixth Street and Eighth Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Johnson, A. L.             622 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Jackson, Mrs. H. N.                     89 Franklin Avenue,      "
  Jones, Mrs. M. H.                                       Excelsior, Minn.
  Jackson, Mrs. J. G.                                         Minneapolis.
  Johnson, Miss Margaret     714 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Kingsley, Miss Mary             212 Grant Street Southeast,      "
  Kennedy, Julia                           21 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Kennedy, Miss Mary                   428 University Avenue,      "
  Kiehle, Louisa                     1719 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Kiehle, Ada M.                     1719 Fifth Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Kirkwood, Mrs. H.                      614 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Knotson, Miss Martha                 30 Tenth Street South,      "
  Kittridge, Mrs. C. L.                710 University Avenue,      "
  Kennedy, Mrs. P. A.                  428 University Avenue,      "
  Kennedy, Miss Kate                   428 University Avenue,      "
  Kitteridge, Mary R.           1021 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Kitteridge, Mrs. T.           1021 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Knieff, Emma               1513 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Knox, Miss Florence          1005 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Kennedy, Ernest                      428 University Avenue,      "
  Kelly, Miss Kate              1529 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Kuderer, Miss Frances           419 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Kelley, Mrs. L. E.                 1203 First Avenue North,      "
  Koon, Mrs. M. B.            Ninth Street and Fourth Avenue,      "
  Kitchel, Mrs. Spanley R.               128 Highland Avenue,      "
  Kent, Mrs. Chas.                       2030 Portland Place,      "
  Kiehle, Mrs. D. L.                 1719 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Knight, Mrs. S. H.                2018 Eighth Avenue South,      "
  Klopp, Mrs. M. J.                         63 Island Avenue,      "
  Kelley, Mrs. H. H.         803 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Kelson, Mrs. W. H.         714 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Little, Jennie E.               24 Fourteenth Street South,      "
  Lewis, Ruth C.                     1310 First Avenue South,      "
  Lyte, Mrs. F. A.               1222 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Loye, Mrs. Wm.                      613 Cedar Avenue South,      "
  Larson, Miss Martha                                              "
  Long, Miss Alva                     420 First Avenue South,      "
  Le Duc, Miss M. C.            1600 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Lackor, Miss Ida F.                       224 Grant Street,      "
  Lackor, Mrs. H. L.                        224 Grant Street,      "
  Lloyd, Mrs. Helen M.                                       Toledo, Ohio.
  Lawley, Mrs. Frank                  229 First Street North, Minneapolis.
  Lunt, Mrs. J. H.              1800 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Lewis, Mrs. D. J.              1600 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Lingrin, Pina                           Care of S. C. Gale,      "
  Lee, Miss                             1227 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Larson, Miss Emma              1025 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Lyle, Mrs. Robert         1123 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Lawrence, Lucy C.             1219 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Lovejoy, Mrs. Loren K.         715 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Lewis, Mrs. L. M.                  30 Seventh Street South,      "
  Laythe, Miss Bessie            803 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Laraway, Mrs. L. D.           2215 Thirteenth Avenue South,      "
  Lyall, Maude J.                    University of Minnesota,      "
  Lovell, C. P.                          131 Highland Avenue,      "
  Leathers, Mrs. Oliver                                   Princeton, Minn.
  Laurence Mrs. A. W.             622 Fifth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Lyman, Mrs. J. P.                                        Grinnell, Iowa.
  Lyall, Miss M. E.               326 Fifth Street Northeast, Minneapolis.
  Lisk, Miss                        504 Fourth Street, E. D.,      "
  Lee, Mrs. J. W.                                     Box 51,      "
  Latz, Mrs. F. W.              1401 Washington Avenue South,      "
  Lyons, Wm.                                         Box 685,      "
  Lumley, Mrs. Chas.         Corner Seventh Ave. and Sixth
                               Street South,                       "
  Linton, Mrs. Abner                        Grand Forks, Dakota Territory.
  Latz, Mrs. Dr.            1816 Two-and-a-Half Street South, Minneapolis.
  Longee, Mrs. C. D.             1103 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Leonard, Mrs. L. D.                 812 Third Avenue South,      "
  Long, Mrs. M. C.                           443 Carroll Street, St. Paul.
  Linton, Mrs. A. H.                                 Box 240, Minneapolis.
  Lumbert, Mrs. E. R.                     469 Bluff Street, Dubuque, Iowa.
  Leavitt, Mrs. Elizabeth                31 Royalston Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Leighton, Mrs. H.                        803 Fourth Street,      "
  Lochren, Mrs. Wm.               422 Tenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Lundeen, Mrs. John A.                               Fort Snelling, Minn.
  Lund, Mrs.                 315 University Avenue Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Lobdell, Mrs. Leila        2706 Twenty-eighth Street South,      "
  Lobdell, Mrs. C.            2910 Thirty-first Avenue South,      "
  Longbrake, Mrs. L. L.                    University Avenue,      "
  Lovejoy, Mrs. J. A.       1013 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Long, Mrs. E. H.           111 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Linton, Mrs. A. H.                   79 Sixth Street South,      "
  Lamborn, Mrs. E. F.                 724 First Avenue North,      "
  Lee, Mrs. J. B.               1228 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Libby, Minnie                         2617 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Lyon, Mrs. R. C.          1010 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Lockwood, Mrs. Phillip         202 Thirteenth Street South,      "
  McDougall, Mrs. J. E.        1515 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Montgomery, Mrs. M. W.           720 Eleventh Avenue South,      "
  Markus, Emma                         1910 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Morrisson, Miss J. E.          328 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Mann, Ida V.                       1512 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  McMahon, Miss Kate                       Care A. B. Barton,      "
  Myers, Evelyn H.               1214 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  McNair, Will                    814 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  McIntyre, M. Eva                      1833 Portland Avenue,      "
  Murray, Margaret A.                2720 Third Avenue South,      "
  McLaughlin, Miss M.                 229 First Street North,      "
  Marsh, Mrs. C. A. J.                   324 Franklin Avenue,      "
  Marshall, Mrs. J.                  500 Eighth Avenue South,      "
  McSorley, Miss Florence    421 Thirteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Mann, Mrs. G. T.                   1512 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Morris, M. L.                          700 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Marrs, Josephine                          2211 Park Avenue,      "
  Milliken, Mrs. W. P.                                    Lake City, Minn.
  Martin, Mrs. John                    425 University Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Miner, V. F.                            Flat 5, Hale Block,      "
  Mitchell, Luella               1414 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Marston, Mrs. M.                          2211 Park Avenue,      "
  McKenney, Mrs. A. E.       311 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Merrick, L. L.             Nicollet Ave. bet. Eighteenth &
                               Nineteenth Streets,                 "
  Moore, Mrs. J. P.                  30 South Seventh Street,      "
  Moore, Mrs. Kate                   30 South Seventh Street,      "
  Matthews, B. E.                 727 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  McNair, Mrs. Isaac                                               "
  McCleary, Mrs. T.              820 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  McNair, Miss A. W.                       North Sparta, Lee County, N. Y.
  McNair, Miss Louise                      North Sparta, Lee County, N. Y.
  Marsh, Helen B.                    417 Second Avenue North, Minneapolis.
  Mayor, Mrs. Belle                      928 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Morse, Mrs. Susie K.                       Care Gale & Co.,      "
  McMillan, Mrs. P. D.       Fifth Street and Tenth Avenue
                               Southeast,                          "
  Morse, Mrs. W. A.                     1231 Chestnut Avenue,      "
  Major, Mrs. Mollie S.                  917 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Morrison, Mrs. H. G. O.    Cor. Nicollet Ave. and Fourteenth
                               St.,                                "
  McNair, Marie L.                  1200 Second Avenue South,      "
  Morse, Mrs. F. L.          Cor. Nineteenth St. and Hawthorne
                               Ave.,                               "
  Merrick, Mrs. A. N.                 Room 4, Hurlburt Block,      "
  McNiece, Mrs. Ettie         622 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  McCord, Mrs. J.                                          La Crosse, Wis.
  Moffett, Mrs. Chas. W.             3105 Sixth Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  McIntyre, Miss                         324 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Moore, Mrs. Geo. C.           1608 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  McCann, Mrs. M. A.             2745 Fifteenth Avenue South,      "
  Moore, Mrs. H. L.              301 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Moore, Mrs. A. G.              301 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Moulton, Miss Maddie          902 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  McClellan, Eva                 2512 Sixteenth Avenue South,      "
  McCulloch, Mrs. A. S.                  1400 Stevens Avenue,      "
  McDonald, Mrs. F. S.              1212 Eighth Street South,      "
  May, Mrs. C.                                                     "
  May, Miss Mary O.             1202 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Mills, Mrs. A. W.                                                "
  McCulloch, Mrs. F. B.                  1400 Stevens Avenue,      "
  Monthei, Mrs. H.              1206 Washington Avenue South,      "
  Moore, Miss Mabel.                     140 Highland Avenue,      "
  Manchester, Mrs. M. S.         1412 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Mason, Mrs. M. T.                1103 Seventh Street South,      "
  Morrison, Mrs. L. L.                  1512 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Milligan, Mrs. J. G.          1202 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Mitchell, Mrs. Nancy                                    Excelsior, Minn.
  Martin, Miss Ellen                   93 Sixth Street South, Minneapolis.
  Morse, Mrs. Frank                    1819 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  McClary, Maggie A.              316 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Molynew, Mrs. B. S.                     702 Seventh Street,      "
  Martin, Mrs. C. J.                  602 Tenth Street South,      "
  Marshall, Mrs. Jas.                500 Eighth Avenue South,      "
  Miller, Nellie M.                        21 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Miller, Miss Mattie                      17 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Miller, Mrs. G. W.                       21 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Miller, Mrs. P. A.                        Cascade, Dubuque County, Iowa.
  Mills, Mrs. S.                                              Minneapolis.
  Morse, Mrs. Chas.                 317 Eighth Street, South,      "
  McNair, Minnie                              Care I. McNair,      "
  McLeod, Mrs. Jennie        725 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Mansfield, Miss A.             709 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Moody, Mrs. F. F.               39 North Nineteenth Street,      "
  Merriam, Mrs. G. N.                828 Second Avenue South,      "
  Miller, Mrs. W. A.                          916 Mary Place,      "
  Moore, Mrs. G. A.              1119 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Meader, Mrs. S. B.                 601 Second Avenue South,      "
  Nelson, Emma C.                     113 First Street South,      "
  Nettleton, Miss Carrie M.           927 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Nind, J. Newton                                                  "
  Nelson, Miss Annie             1020 First Street Southeast,      "
  Noblit, Mrs. J. H.             30 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Naylor, Mrs. Geo. M.                     1418 Spruce Place,      "
  Norton, Mrs. L. B.         Northwestern Hospital,
                               Three-and-a-Half Avenue South       "
  Newcomb, Mrs. S.                                                 "
  Nicol, Miss Ida               914 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Newman, Mrs.               Sixth Street and Ninth Avenue
                               Southeast,                          "
  Nettleton, Mrs. A. B.               927 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Nab, Miss Mary                      421 First Avenue South,      "
  Notervan, Mrs. R. E.              617 Seventh Avenue South,      "
  Nelson, Ellen M.               1401 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Nickell, Mrs. J. H.                 619 First Avenue South,      "
  Norton, Miss Carrie            715 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Norton, Mrs. H. A.             715 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Newten, Miss H.            Corner Fourteenth Avenue and
                               Eighth Street Southeast             "
  Nichols, Miss Lillie              1206 Eighth Street South,      "
  Outcalt, Miss F. B.            1827 Third Street Southeast,      "
  Outcalt, Miss Cora             1827 Third Street Southeast,      "
  Overmire, Kate                   2022 Seventh Avenue South,      "
  Overmire, Mrs. S.                   2022 Park Avenue South,      "
  Olson, Miss Olive               88 South Fourteenth Street,      "
  Oxnard, Mrs. M. A.                 829 Second Avenue South,      "
  O'Brien, Mrs. W.               411 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Owen, Miss Jennie                                       St. Cloud, Minn.
  Orborough, W. A.                                      Bloomington, Minn.
  Otto, Tilly                          63 Tenth Street South, Minneapolis.
  Osgood, Mrs. C. N.                  720 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Peterson, Carrie                                                 "
  Preston, Jennie                           38 Prince Street,      "
  Pike, Mrs. W. A.                   University of Minnesota,      "
  Payne, Mrs. D. W.                   1415 University Avenue,      "
  Powell, Mrs. C. F.             1025 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Pratt, Mrs. E. A.                  27 Twelfth Street South,      "
  Perkins, Mrs. G. D.                  701 University Avenue,      "
  Plant, Mrs.                            408 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Peck, Mrs. D. G.                     13 North Ninth Street,      "
  Pearson, Miss S. P.                      1101 Harmon Place,      "
  Pickard, Mrs. F. W.            1300 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Penney, Mrs. Robert L.             16 South Twelfth Street,      "
  Peterson, Miss Minnie      1211 Second Street and Twelfth
                               Ave. South,                         "
  Pardee, Mrs. W. S.         Eleventh Street and Twenty-Second
                               Ave. North,                         "
  Porter, M. Estella                                  Box 30,      "
  Porter, Katie P.                                    Box 30,      "
  Porter, Lillie C.                                   Box 30,      "
  Parker, Mrs. H. M.                 57 North Twelfth Street,      "
  Plant, Mrs. James C.                210 Ninth Street South,      "
  Plummer, Mrs. G. A.                   1915 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Patten, Mrs.                  168 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Payne, Mrs. D. C.                 17 North Eleventh Street,      "
  Parker, Mrs. Dr. J. A.            17 North Eleventh Street,      "
  Parker, Mrs. Ed               908 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Potter, Miss Elma           623 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Pillsbury, Addie           Fifth Street and Tenth Ave.
                               Southeast,                          "
  Pratt, Mrs. C. H.               727 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Parker, Mrs. Geo. A.           516 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Paine, Mrs. J. M.                     2200 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Pabody, Mrs. E. F.                  808 Third Avenue South,      "
  Paine, Miss Alice               73 Fourteenth Street South,      "
  Potter, Mrs. A. R.              24 Thirteenth Street South,      "
  Pearson, Clara E.                        1101 Harman Place,      "
  Page, Mrs. R. C.                   1236 First Avenue North,      "
  Parsons, Annie                           107 Island Avenue,      "
  Patton, Dr. E. A.                 1228 Second Avenue South,      "
  Plummer, Mrs. L. P.               1117 Second Avenue South,      "
  Page, Mrs. Dr.                                           Sandusky, Ohio.
  Pratt, Mrs. C. H.               727 Sixth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Phelps, Mrs. Chas.                      60 Highland Avenue,      "
  Pond, Mrs. C. M.                        56 Highland Avenue,      "
  Phillips, Mrs. C. M.                    60 Highland Avenue,      "
  Palsepp, Anna D.                   2803 Third Avenue South,      "
  Palmer, Mrs. Chas. R.     2205 Three-and-a-Half Ave. South,      "
  Packer, Mrs. Mary                      413 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Pillsbury, Mrs. J. S.   Fifth St. and Tenth Ave. Southeast,      "
  Pound, Jessie M.                  1402 Second Avenue South,      "
  Pratt, Mrs. Frank                  2747 First Avenue South,      "
  Phillips, Mrs. B., Jr.          Care C. A. Pillsbury & Co.,      "
  Quigley, Mrs. James             316 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Rieley, Mrs. A.              1513 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Rutz, Augusta                  529 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Rahmon, Laura                  822 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Rockwood, Mrs. C. J.            33 Nineteenth Street North,      "
  Ryan, Mary A.                                            La Crosse, Wis.
  Ryan, Julia                        418 Second Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Russell, Mrs. O. M.                    608 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Rich, Mrs. W. W.               529 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Russell, Mrs. Geo. V.                  614 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Reynolds, Clara E.              21 Thirteenth Street South,      "
  Richardson, Mrs. L. H.          73 Fourteenth Street South,      "
  Rourke, Miss Nellie            702 Second Avenue Southeast,      "
  Ripley, Dr. Martha G.               48 Eighth Street South,      "
  Remington, Mrs.                                     Box 51,      "
  Rose, Virginia                                         Monticello, Minn.
  Rose, Mrs. A. H.               321 Fourth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Rinker, Mrs. Andrew                      1015 Harmon Place,      "
  Raymond, Miss M. A.             727 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Richardson, Mrs. A. F.              111 Sixth Street South,      "
  Rickard, Mrs. C. F.           701 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Rolfe, Mrs. J. H.                    1910 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Rand, Miss Kate            Cor. Seventh Street and Sixth
                               Avenue,                             "
  Reynolds, Mrs. A. S.              422 South Seventh Street,      "
  Rickey, Mrs. Jas.          Tenth St. bet. Nicollet and
                               Hennepin Aves.,                     "
  Robinson, Mrs. S. C.                      1812 Park Avenue,      "
  Read, Mrs. J. H.               615 Fourth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Reeves, Mrs. T. H.         727 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Rich, Mrs. W. W.               529 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Rich, Mrs. J. O.               529 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Robedeau, Mrs. C. T.                508 Fifth Avenue South,      "
  Rust, Mrs Geo. H.                     1114 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Rolph, Mrs. W. T.               416 Third Avenue Southeast,      "
  Rockwood, Mrs. C. J.       Nineteenth Street between Laurel
                               and Hawthorne Avenues,              "
  Ricker, Mrs. H. M.                   716 University Avenue,      "
  Shepard, Miss F.                       1409 Stevens Avenue,      "
  Springate, Mrs. J. L.                  917 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Soutar, Mrs.               Sixteenth Avenue and Seventh
                               Street Southeast,                   "
  Shaw, Mrs. J. M.                    527 Ninth Street South,      "
  Simmons, Laura             328 Thirteenth Avenue and Fourth
                               Street Southeast                    "
  Starr, C. M.                                       Box 499,      "
  Shockey, Mrs. C. C.               1320 Fourth Avenue South,      "
  Simpson, Mrs. M. E.        3, corner Central Avenue and Fifth
                               Street,                             "
  Stacy, Miss Frances           1113 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Smith, Mabel L.            622 Fourteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Starr, Mrs. C. M.                                  Box 499,      "
  Stagg, Nettie                          255 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Shenebon, Frances S.          1113 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Siebert, Mrs. A. C.            Eighteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Stillman, Miss Nellie              2120 Third Avenue South,      "
  Sillowey, Mrs. R. A.          1914 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Sure, Mrs. E. M.               1320 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Sheffer, Miss Ada                 1811 Fourth Street North,      "
  Sprague, L. E. P.                        6 Highland Avenue,      "
  Secombe, Mrs. D. A.            927 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Smith, Mrs. Thomas         Corner Fifteenth Street and Spruce
                               Place,                              "
  Spear, Mrs. S. C.           713 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Stillman, Mrs. W. F.                                       Oshkosh, Wis.
  Sewall, E. Q.                              481 Carroll Street, St. Paul.
  Shillock, Anna                    1811 Fourth Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Smith, Mrs. C. F.              457 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Swanson, Miss Hannah             201 Eleventh Street South,      "
  Spear, Minnie E.              1614 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Say, G. I.                  727 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Strothinham, Mrs. J. H.         629 Fifteenth Street South,      "
  Salisbury, Mrs. M. F.            719 Eleventh Avenue South,      "
  Shuman, Mrs. Geo. W.                    1001 Eighth Avenue,      "
  Shaw, Mrs. F. H.                   1509 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Sheldon, Miss Emma F.            717 Eleventh Avenue South,      "
  Shaw, Mrs. Geo. K.                    1205 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Shoemaker, Mrs. H. J.                  1903 Western Avenue,      "
  Selene, Miss Maggie            417 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Shillock, Miss                     University of Minnesota,      "
  Stillman, Mrs. R. L.               2720 Third Avenue South,      "
  Selden, Emma R.                      14 Tenth Street South,      "
  Stark, Mrs. Theo. F.                   134 Highland Avenue,      "
  Sweet, Mrs. O. T.              702 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Smith, Mrs. Dr. C.         1102 South Seventh Street
                               Southeast,                          "
  Seaton, Miss Rose             902 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Slosson, Mrs. Theo.             419 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Scudder, Mrs. M. C.            521 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Smith, Mrs. D. L.              516 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Stacy, Alice M.                1401 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Strever, Mrs.              101 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Sisson, Mary                              College Hospital,      "
  Siddall, Mrs. W. A.             73 Fourteenth Street South,      "
  Smith, Carrie E.                    1800 Park Avenue South,      "
  Seaton, Mrs. J. K.                902 7th Street Southeast,      "
  Sheldon, Mrs. S.                    Care Dr. A. F. Elliott,      "
  Shepley, Mrs. L. C.        Cedar Avenue and Twenty-sixth
                               Street,                             "
  Shepley, Mrs. O. H.                                              "
  Swift, Grace H.                       1204 Chestnut Avenue,      "
  Swift, Mrs. L.                        1204 Chestnut Avenue,      "
  Spaulding, Mrs. W. A.                      1424 Vine Place,      "
  Smith, Mrs. D. C.          Cor. Fifth and Hennepin Avenues,      "
  Stark, Miss J. Mary                    134 Highland Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Sewall, A. R.                              481 Carroll Street, St. Paul.
  Sewall, Miss Ida                           481 Carroll Street, St. Paul.
  Shuey, Mrs. A. M.                       65 Highland Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Scribner, Mrs. D. M.                  1512 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Sawyer, Mrs. T. J.                    1512 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Sauter, Miss Laura         Eighteenth Avenue, bet. Fourth
                               and Fifth Streets, E. D.            "
  Scharpf, Mrs. Geo.              84 South Thirteenth Street,      "
  Scribner, Mrs. D. M.                  1512 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Soutar, Mrs. Geo.                                         Luverne, Minn.
  Sheldon, Mrs. H. G.                                     Richfield, Minn.
  Smith, Mrs. E. T.                       66 Highland Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Smith, Mrs. Frank                                    Ft. Snelling, Minn.
  Spaulding, Mrs. G. S.          319 University Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Sprague, Mrs. J. J.                                        Oshkosh, Wis.
  Shepherd, Mrs. Geo. B.     Cor. First Ave. and Sixteenth St.
                               South,                         Minneapolis.
  Sheldon, Miss Mary                                      Excelsior, Minn.
  Steele, Mrs. J. A.                  103 Ninth Street South, Minneapolis.
  Secombe, Kittie E.             927 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Spear, Mrs Edward                  502 Eighth Avenue South,      "
  Scudder, M. C.                 521 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Scudder, Mrs. J. L.            425 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Stone, Mrs. J. W.                  1015 First Avenue North,      "
  Smith, Mrs. W. K.                     100 Royalston Avenue,      "
  Swett, Ella A.                           702 Fourth Street,      "
  Shatto, Mrs. C. W.                                               "
  Tweedie, Mrs. Wm.                1815 Seventh Street South,      "
  Tucker, Mrs. Henry                  826 First Avenue South,      "
  Taylor, Mrs. Benjamin                  2200 Chicago Avenue,      "
  Taylor, Mrs. B. L.                  620 Fifth Street South,      "
  Talbert, Mrs. M. J.            1423 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Trogner, Miss                     1315 Second Street North,      "
  Tupper, Mrs. D. W.            1113 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Thompson, Clara A.          701 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Thompson, Mrs. P. M.        701 Fifteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Twichell, Mary                  400 Ninth Street Southeast,      "
  Teall, Mrs. B. F.                  1510 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Taylor, Miss Virgi         Seventeenth Street, near Nicollet
                               Avenue,                             "
  Truesdell, Mrs. J. A.                   246 Farrington Avenue, St. Paul.
  Trail, Jane                Sixteenth Avenue and Seventh Street
                             Southeast,                       Minneapolis.
  Turner, L. H.               2910 Thirty-first Avenue South,      "
  Townsend, Mrs. L. R.            19 Thirteenth Street South,      "
  Twichell, Miss M. H.                      1604 Park Avenue,      "
  Todd, Mary W.                  504 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Taylor, Miss E.                     720 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Thompson, Mrs. Anna              Northern Pacific Junction,      "
  Tuller, Mrs. C. S.                          Seventh Street, Lyons, Iowa.
  Truman, Mrs. B. H.               39 Fifteenth Street South, Minneapolis.
  Todd, Mrs. S. D.                  504 Fourth Street, E. D.,      "
  Trevellyan, Mrs. Am.            508 First Avenue Northeast,      "
  Tenney, Mrs. Wm.           Cor. Third Ave. South and Twelfth
                               Street,                             "
  Thomberg, Mrs. John                86 Twelfth Street South,      "
  Turner, Mrs. Rev. W.                                      Poynette, Wis.
  Thomberg, Miss Kate                86 Twelfth Street South, Minneapolis.
  Tice, Mrs. W. H.                         26 Eastman Avenue,      "
  Thompson, Miss Mettie                  613 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Turner, Mrs. Murtz                                         Fifield, Wis.
  Tully, Miss Maggie         2527 Three-and-a-Half Avenue
                               South,                         Minneapolis.
  Thompson, Mrs. H. E.                      161 Pleasant Avenue, St. Paul.
  Taylor, Mrs. K. M.                                          Anoka, Minn.
  Townsend, Mrs. L. R.            19 South Thirteenth Street, Minneapolis.
  Twickham, Mrs. Willis                                   Richfield, Minn.
  Turner, Miss Minnie E.      2706 Thirty-first Avenue South, Minneapolis.
  Turner, Mrs. Alvira         2910 Thirty-first Avenue South,      "
  Thomas, Mrs. W.                409 Eighth Street Southeast,      "
  Ullmer, Mrs. M.            207 University Avenue Northeast,      "
  Vind, Mrs. C. L.           710 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Vrooman, Mrs. W.                           8 Holden Street,      "
  Varney, Mrs. J. M.      1700 Three-and-a-Half Avenue South,      "
  Vosburg, Mrs. A.                 1103 Seventh Street South,      "
  Van Norman, J. D.                                  Box 123,      "
  Van Cleve, Mrs. E. M.          520 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Van Cleve, Mrs. H. S.           604 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Wilcox, Mrs. A. G.                     105 Highland Avenue,      "
  White, Mrs. C. A.                          1512 Vine Place,      "
  White, Miss Elburta               1804 Fourth Avenue South,      "
  Welles, Mrs. M. H.           1315 Seventh Street Southeast,      "
  Wornenninde, Miss                      353 Franklin Street,      "
  Webster, W. W.                                         Clearwater, Minn.
  Wahlstrom, Albert                         210 Third Street, Minneapolis.
  Wilder, Mrs. J. A.            1021 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Warnock, A. May                       1408 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Wheaton, Mrs. Geo.             119 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  White, Mrs. M. C.              1319 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Waltemath, Miss                120 Fourteenth Avenue North,      "
  Williams, Mrs. A. P.                   255 Hennepin Avenue,      "
  Whitcomb, Mrs. M. B.               70 North Twelfth Street,      "
  Willenaw, Mrs. F.                  2014 Third Avenue North,      "
  Winterer, Edward              1113 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Worley, Mrs. Charlotte          88 South Fourteenth Street,      "
  Whipple, Mrs. Wm.                                          Winona, Minn.
  Winterer, Miss Ellen          1113 Fourth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Weller, Miss Marian                16 South Twelfth Street,      "
  Woodward, Frances G.                     189 Island Avenue,      "
  Wyman, Mrs. William            415 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Winston, Mrs. Fred R.         1013 University Avenue South,      "
  Wetherald, A. E.                        235 Fourteenth Street, St. Paul.
  Woodburn, Miss Ida                 30 South Seventh Street, Minneapolis.
  Woodburn, Mrs. J. A.               30 South Seventh Street,      "
  Walcott, Mrs. Reynolds                 61 Oak Grove Street,      "
  Williams, Mrs. E. S.            1729 Eleventh Avenue South,      "
  Winchell, Mrs. C. S.                                             "
  Wilson, Helen E.               505 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Webber, Mrs. Minnie                       General Delivery,      "
  Wilson, Mrs. J. P.             505 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Wells, Mrs. Genevive                903 First Avenue North,      "
  Whitney, Mrs. F. W.                                         Beloit, Wis.
  Wells, Mrs. S. R.                          Buffalo, Wright County, Minn.
  Woods, Mrs. Chas.                    33 South Tenth Street, Minneapolis.
  Weller, Mrs. J. H.                    1824 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Williams, Mrs. A. C.         Ninth Street, near Mary Place,      "
  White, Miss Ida E.                    1015 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  White, Miss M. E.                     1015 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Wadleigh, H. L.                1417 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Wells, Mrs. C. W.                      2500 Stevens Avenue,      "
  Wadleigh, E. H.                1417 Sixth Street Southeast,      "
  Wade, Mrs. C. H.                        262 Central Avenue,      "
  Wilcox, Mrs. J. P.                                      Richfield, Minn.
  Wullweber, Mrs. M. R.                                   Iowa City, Iowa.
  Woodmansee, Mrs. D. W.         1214 Fifth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Warner, A. A.                                           St. Cloud, Minn.
  Whiting, Mrs. A. V.                                     St. Cloud, Minn.
  Weber, Mary L.                 1401 Sixth Street Southeast, Minneapolis.
  Williams, Mrs. H. R.            837 Fifteenth Avenue South,      "
  Ware, Mrs. J. L.           312 Nineteenth Avenue Southeast,      "
  Wolfrum, Miss O.                312 Fifth Street Northeast,      "
  White, Mrs. S. B.                                      Watervliet, Mich.
  Walke, Mrs. Chas.                     1129 Hennepin Avenue, Minneapolis.
  Watson, Mrs. B. K.             39 Seventeenth Street South,      "
  Westcott, Mrs. Dr.                   1909 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Williams, Mrs. S. B.                12 Eighth Street North,      "
  Walker, Miss May                    726 First Avenue North,      "
  White, Ida E.                         1015 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  Wheeler, Mrs. Wm.                       Sixth Street North,      "
  Williams, Mrs. B. H.               34 South Seventh Street,      "
  Wilson, Mrs. E. M.                   1300 Hawthorne Avenue,      "
  Watts, Miss Martha         425 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Wakefield, Annie L.                   1812 Nicollet Avenue,      "
  White, Miss Flora              529 Eighth Avenue Southeast,      "
  White, Mrs. E.                         616 Franklin Avenue,      "
  Whitney, Mrs. A.                          413 Grant Street,      "
  Wilson, Mrs. N. G.              424 Third Avenue Northeast,      "
  Willmas, Mrs. J. R.             510 First Avenue Northeast,      "
  West, Mrs. H. G.               200 Fourth Street Northeast,      "
  Wells, Mrs. T. B.                                                "
  Wilson, Mrs. M. G.             1115 Fifth Street Southeast,      "
  Wood, Mrs. Emma                                         Excelsior, Minn.
  Walker, Mrs. P. B.                  726 First Avenue North, Minneapolis.
  Walker, Mrs. James                   716 University Avenue,      "
  White, Mrs. S. B.             1228 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Wilcox, Mrs. M. L.         716 University Avenue Southeast,      "
  Watson, Mrs. Geo. C.               2618 First Avenue South,      "
  Wolverton, Mrs. I. A.               802 Sixth Avenue South,      "
  Wolford, Mrs. W. L.                  59 Tenth Street South,      "
  Whitney, Mrs. C. L.                                Box 178,      "
  Young, Mrs. S. J.             1721 Fourth Street Southeast,      "
  Yenney, P. F. P.                                        St. Cloud, Minn.
  Ziegler, Mrs. C. C.              2123 Lyndale Avenue North, Minneapolis.




  INDEX
  TO
  MISS CORSON'S LECTURES.


  Apple dumplings, baked, 33

  Apple dumplings, steamed, 34

  Apple meringue, 48

  Apple pie, 40


  Beans, How to cook, 25

  Beef a la mode rolls, 84

  Beef, Baked tenderloin of, 91

  Beef, Corned, 82

  Beef, Fried steak, 35

  Beef, To season and test when done, 37

  Beef, To make tender, 38

  Beef, Pounding, 37

  Beef, Gravy for, 80

  Beef, Pressed, 83

  Beef, Roast, 76

  Braising, French method, 79

  Beets, To boil, 74

  Bread, Graham, 44

  Bread, Making, 41, 45, 46

  Bread, Rolls, 47

  Breading meats, 50


  Caramel for coloring soups, 39

  Caramel custard, 85

  Cabbage, To boil quickly, without odor, 81

  Cabbage, To cook to serve with braised meat, 80

  Carrots, Stewed, 73

  Cheese crusts, 57

  Cheese, Welsh rarebit, 96

  Chicken, Fricasseed, 61

  Chicken, Fried, 63

  Chicken, Roast, 58

  Cookery for the sick, 96
    Beef tea, 98
    Chicken, Broiled, 96
    Chicken, Barbecued, 97
    Jelly, Oatmeal, 97
    Rennet, 98
    Salad, Orange, 98
    Trout, Broiled, 97


  Dumplings, Apple, 33, 34


  Fat, To absorb after frying, 72

  Fish, Cod, stewed in cream, 70

  Fish, Cod cakes, 71

  Fish, Fried, 65

  Fish, Pickerel, fried, 89

  Fish, White, to prepare, 28, 31

  Fish, To remove odor of, 30


  Gravy, for meat, 58


  Hash, French, 91

  Hash, Baked, 92

  Hash, Corned beef, 93

  Hominy, 64


  Lamb, Baked, 49

  Lentils, How used, 26

  Lettuce, To keep fresh, 89

  Liver, Fried, 92


  Meats, Breading, 50


  Omelettes, Plain breakfast, 14

  Omelettes, Light, 14

  Onions, To remove odor of, 30

  Oysters, breaded, 95

  Oysters, Broiled with bacon, 95

  Oysters, Broiled, plain, 95

  Oyster fritters, 94

  Oyster liquor, How to use, 94

  Oysters, Philadelphia, 96

  Oysters, Roast, 94

  Oyster soup, 95


  Pastry, Light, 35

  Pastry, Plain, 31

  Peas, To wash, 88

  Pie, Sliced apple, 40

  Pie, Rhubarb, 46

  Pie, To prevent juice from running out of, 47

  Potatoes, Baked, 56

  Potatoes, Boiled, 54

  Potatoes, Stewed in butter, 12

  Potatoes, To soak, 57

  Poultry, To sew for roasting, 51

  Pudding, Bread and apple, 44

  Pudding, Cabinet, 66


  Quail, Boned, 15


  Rice, Piloff of, 90


  Saucepans, To clean, 12

  Salmon, Boiled, with cream sauce, 9, 13

  Soup, Beef and vegetable, 18, 21

  Soup, Cream, 53

  Soup, Caramel for coloring, 39

  Soup, Clarify, 39

  Soup, Pea, with crusts, 17, 26, 68

  Soup, Tomato, 86

  Soup as a stimulant, 20

  Soup, Value of, 19

  Soup, Stock for, 7

  Spinach, To boil, 88

  Stews, Brown, 27

  Stews, Meat, 22

  Stews, White, 23


  Turnips, To bake, 82


  Venison, with currant jelly, 75

  Vegetables, To preserve color of in cooking, 87


  Welsh rarebit, 96


  Yeast, Use of, 43




Transcriber's Note


The following typographical errors were corrected:

  Page  Error
    4  sent to Miss Carson changed to sent to Miss Corson
    7  slowly head changed to slowly heat
    8  thoroughly wish changed to thoroughly wash
   10  tablespoonful of floor changed to tablespoonful of flour
   11  pans are pefectly changed to pans are perfectly
   12  _Question_: Do you use a wooden changed to _Question._ Do
       you use a wooden
   13  in the appearence changed to in the appearance
   13  Ichotyophagus changed to Ichthyophagous
   17  friends in this changed to friends in the
   17  fresh. Al changed to fresh. All
   17  Then it beomes changed to Then it becomes
   18  tend to harded changed to tend to harden
   22  To day I am changed to To-day I am
   23  use cold meat changed to use cold meat,
   36  from this pieee changed to from this piece
   36  CARSON. No, decidedly changed to CORSON. No,
   37  CARSON. Of course changed to CORSON. Of course
   41  Obscured text in flour use reconstructed as flour in general use
   44  with it,if changed to with it, if
   51  deal of erase changed to deal of ease
   58  those little chese changed to those little cheese
   60  way of choping changed to way of chopping
   60  burning, becausea changed to burning, because a
   64  double boileryou changed to double boiler you
   69  softens at once, changed to softens at once.
   71  bowlfull changed to bowlful
   72  from greese, changed to from grease
   72  it from greese changed to it from grease
   72  manilla changed to manila
   72  that the greese changed to that the grease
   74  No, beats changed to No, beets
   74  skin of beats, changed to skin of beets
   80  part of the stock changed to part of the stalk
   82  that the cabbags changed to that the cabbage
   83  tablespoonful of flower changed to tablespoonful of flour
   88  two or thre changed to two or three
   92  in the tenderlonis changed to in the tenderloins
   92  that the fatter changed to that the faster
   94  wet towl changed to wet towel
   95  pinch of peper changed to pinch of pepper
   95  finely powdered, changed to finely powdered.
   98  BEAF TEA. changed to BEEF TEA.
   98  in an earthern changed to in an earthen
  101  Eighteenth Ave. S E. changed to Eighteenth Ave. S. E.
  111  316 Sixth Street Southesst, Minneaplis. changed to 316 Sixth
       Street Southeast, Minneapolis
  111  Three-and-a-half changed to Three-and-a-Half
  111  St. Cloud, Minn changed to St. Cloud, Minn.
  115  Lyons, Iowa changed to Lyons, Iowa.
  119  merringue, changed to meringue,
  119  Section break added before Beans, How to cook, 25
  120  Saucepans, To clean, 11 changed to Saucepans, To clean, 12

The following word was inconsistently spelled.

  Force meat / Forcemeat





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of A Course of Lectures on the Principles
of Domestic Economy and Cookery, by Juliet Corson

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK A COURSE OF LECTURES ***

***** This file should be named 35567.txt or 35567.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/3/5/5/6/35567/

Produced by Julia Miller and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
produced from images generously made available by The
Internet Archive/American Libraries.)


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

Project Gutenberg's Self-Instructor in the Art of Hair Work, by Mark Campbell

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: Self-Instructor in the Art of Hair Work
       Dressing Hair, Making Curls, Switches, Braids, and Hair
       Jewelry of Every Description.

Author: Mark Campbell

Release Date: January 24, 2012 [EBook #38658]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK SELF-INSTRUCTOR IN ART OF HAIR WORK ***




Produced by Chris Curnow, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
produced from images generously made available by The
Internet Archive)











SELF-INSTRUCTOR

IN THE

ART OF HAIR WORK,

DRESSING HAIR,

MAKING CURLS, SWITCHES, BRAIDS,

AND

HAIR JEWELRY OF EVERY DESCRIPTION.


Compiled from Original Designs and the Latest Parisian Patterns

BY

MARK CAMPBELL.


    NEW YORK:
    M. CAMPBELL, 737 BROADWAY.

    CHICAGO:
    81 SOUTH CLARK STREET.

    MDCCCLXVII.




    Entered according to Act of Congress, in the year 1867, by

    MARK CAMPBELL,

    In the Clerk's Office of the District Court of the United States,
            for the Northern
    District of Illinois.




PREFACE.


The necessity for a comprehensive work, giving a full and detailed
explanation of the Art of manufacturing Hair Work in all its various
branches, has been so frequently urged upon the attention of the author,
that, in compliance with an almost universal demand, he has concluded to
publish a book which will clearly illustrate the Art of Hair Dressing,
and making Hair Jewelry and Hair Work of every description. His perfect
familiarity with the business--the result of many years' successful
experience--renders him eminently competent to impart the fullest
information upon the subject of which he treats, while the great
consumption and rapidly increasing demand for every description of Hair
Goods, will make this work he now presents to the public, one of
particular interest to all classes. Heretofore the Art of making these
goods has been zealously guarded by a few dealers, who have accumulated
fortunes, and would still retain it a profound secret but for the
publication of this book. This is the only descriptive volume ever
published on Hair Work. It is an elaborate, carefully prepared book,
containing over one thousand drawings, devices and diagrams, engraved at
great expense to the publisher, and accompanied with the most
comprehensive instructions. It not only reveals to the most ordinary
comprehension the hitherto concealed mysteries of the Art, but will
prove an indispensable adjunct to every lady's toilet table, as by its
aid she will not only be able to dress her own hair in every variety of
style, but make her own Hair Jewelry and articles of Hair work,
including Switches, Braids, Curls, Waterfalls, &c., assisted by a
reference to plates of the most modern European and American styles. For
children, no art or accomplishment is more useful than the ability to
make articles of tasteful ornament in Hair Work. This work will open to
all such persons a path to agreeable and profitable occupation. Jewelry
Dealers, from the clear instructions herein given, can manufacture any
required pattern of Hair Jewelry, and add, without extra expense, a new
and lucrative branch to their business.

Persons wishing to preserve and weave into lasting mementos, the hair of
a deceased father, mother, sister, brother, or child, can also enjoy the
inexpressible advantage and satisfaction of _knowing_ that the material
of their own handiwork is the actual hair of the "loved and gone."

No other work ever met with such an earnest demand as this treatise upon
the art of Hair Braiding. It must certainly commend itself to the ladies
of our country as invaluable. Even a hasty perusal will convince every
one of its utility and worth. Translations in French and German are in
progress.

[Illustration]




INTRODUCTORY REMARKS.


IN this book of instruction, I have introduced for practice the easiest
braids first--which are chain braids. The first pattern, found on page
9, is a very easy and handsome one, and should be practiced to
perfection before trying any other, as it will enable the beginner to
execute all others after the first is perfected. A new beginner should
be particular to place the strands correctly upon the table, and mark
the cover with precision, after the manner shown in the diagram. I have,
by the introduction of plates, diagrams and explanatory remarks, made
comprehensive and simple the execution of all the braids herein
contained. The novice should first give special attention to preparing
the hair for braiding, the adjustment of it to the bobbins, weights,
molds, &c., of which plates, and full explanations are to be found
elsewhere in this book. I wish to impress upon the mind of the worker,
that every change made with the strands changes the numbers of them to
correspond with the numbers on the table. For example: lift No. 1 over
No. 2, which would make No. 1 No. 2, and No. 2 No. 1, &c.

[Illustration: BRAIDING TABLE AND POSITION IN BRAIDING.]




SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1,--one in each hand--lift them over
the table, one on each side of the mold, and lay them between Nos. 1 at
B, and bring back the Nos. 2 from B, one on each side of the mold, and
lay them between Nos. 2 at A; then go to C, lift Nos. 1 over between
Nos. 1 at D, passing one strand each side of the mold, and bring back
Nos. 2 from D, and lay between Nos. 2 at C. Then you are through the
braid, ready to commence at A, as at first, and repeat until finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a mold, made of small wire, with a hole in one end like
the eye of a needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the
wire. When you have it braided, take off the weights, tie the ends fast
on the wire, and push the braid tight together; then boil in water about
ten minutes, and take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until quite dry; then slip it off the wire on to the
cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and put a little
shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use elastic
cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the number of hairs in a
strand.




REVERSE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands and place on table like pattern. Commence at A with
sixty hairs in a strand. Take Nos. 2, lift over table to B, lay them in
between Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B, and lay in between
Nos. 1 at A. Then walk around table to C; take Nos. 1 and lift over
table and lay them in between Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D
to C; then take Nos. 2 at C, lift over table and lay them inside of Nos.
2 at D, and bring back Nos. 2 from D to C. After braiding several times
round to suit your taste, say five, reverse the braid by commencing at
C, and braiding as you did at A, by taking Nos. 2 at C, lift over table
to D, and lay them in between Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 2 from D,
and lay in between Nos. 1 at C. Then go to A and take Nos. 1, lift over
table and lay in between Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A,
then take Nos. 2 at A, lift over table and lay in between Nos. 2 at B,
and fetch back Nos. 2 from B to A, then commence at C again and braid
five times. Then commence at A as you did at first, reversing it every
time you braid it five times through. Braid it over a small wire, tie
the ends on the wire, boil and dry the same as chain on page nine, only
you need not press the braid together on the wire.

[Illustration]




SIXTEEN TWIST CHAIN.


TAKE sixteen strands, with eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A and B; take No. 1 at A in right hand, and
No. 1 at B in left hand, and swing them around the table to the right,
changing places with them. Then take Nos. 1 at C and D and change as at
A and B. Then go to B and take Nos. 2 at B and A, and change them by
taking No. 2 at B in right hand and No. 2 at A in left hand, and swing
them around table to the right as before, changing places with them.
Then go around the table to D, and take Nos. 2 at D and C, and change
places as before, then take Nos. 3 at A and B and change as before. Then
take Nos. 3 at C and D and change places with them. Then take Nos. 4 at
B and A and change as before. Then take Nos. 4 at D and C and change as
before. Then commence at A, as at first, repeating until the braid is
finished.

[Illustration]




STRIPED SNAKE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands with twelve hairs in a strand, or any number
that can be divided by four, and sixty strands for usual size, and place
them on table like pattern. Have every alternate two strands of black
hair, and the others of light hair. Commence at A, taking two strands of
light hair in left hand, Nos. 1 and 2, and take two strands of black
hair in right hand, Nos. 3 and 4, and cross No. 2 (light) over No. 3
(dark), then No. 1 (light) under No. 3 (dark), then No. 4 (dark) over
Nos. 1 and 2 (light); so on around the table to the right until you get
to A; then commence and work back to the left by taking light hair in
left hand and dark hair in right hand, as before, and put No. 3 (dark)
over No. 2 (light), and No. 4 (dark) under No. 2 (light), and No. 1
(light) over Nos. 3 and 4 (dark), so on around the table till you get to
A; then commence as at first, so on, braiding first one way around the
table then the other till you have the chain completed.

[Illustration]

Braid it over wood, or brass wire, the size and length you wish your
chain. When braided take off your weights, tie the ends fast and boil
and dry, then take out the mold and put a cord through with some cotton
wrapped around it so it will be soft and pliable. This is called the
STRIPED SNAKE BRAID, and can be braided all of one color if desired.




CABLE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by two, eighty hairs in a
strand, twenty strands for usual size, place on table like pattern.
Commencing, take No. 1 at A in right hand and No. 1 at B in left hand,
and swing around the table to the right, and lay the one in right hand
at No. 1 at B, and the one in left hand at No. 1 at A; then bring back
No. 2 at B with right hand, and No. 2 at A in left hand, to the left,
then take No. 3 and swing to the right, then No. 4 and swing to the
left, so on, round first to the right then to the left, with every
number of strands till you get to No. 1; then commence as at first, and
so on till the chain is as long as required.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together on the wire; boil in water about ten
minutes, then take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip off
the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




SNAKE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands, or any number that can be divided by four,
twelve hairs in a strand, and sixty strands for usual size; place them
on table like pattern. Commence at A, lift No. 2 in your right hand, and
put your left under your right hand and take up No. 3 and bring it back
of No. 1, and lay them both down; then take No. 4 up and lay it between
Nos. 1 and 2, then take the next four to the right, and so on till you
get around the table; then commence and braid back around the table to
the left, but reverse the braid by braiding it this way: lift No. 3 with
your left hand, pass your right under and take No. 2 and bring it back
over No. 4, and lay them both down; then take No. 1 and lift it over in
between Nos. 3 and 4, and so on, till you get around the table. Then
commence as at first, braid one way, then the other, till you have it as
long as required. Braid it over wood or brass wire the size and length
you wish your chain; when braided take off your weights, tie the ends
fast, and boil and dry them; take out the mold and put a cord through
with some cotton wrapped around it so that it will be soft and pliable.
This is called the SNAKE CHAIN BRAID.

[Illustration]




EIGHT SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the
table like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 strands, lift across the
table and lay down inside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B
to A, then lift Nos. 2 at A over inside Nos. 2 at B and bring Nos. 2
from B to A, then lift Nos. 3 from A to B, and bring back Nos. 3 from B
to A, then lift Nos. 4 from A to B and bring back Nos. 4 from B to A,
then commence at Nos. 1 again and repeat until the chain is completed.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of an
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




HALF-TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands or any number that can be divided by two, usually
eighty hairs in a strand. Commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right
hand, and No. 1 at B in left hand, and swing them around table to right,
and lay the one in right hand down at B across over No. 2, and the one
in right hand lay down across over No. 2 at A; then go to C and D, and
change No. 1 as before at A and B; then go to the next two strands and
change as before, so on around the table, taking the next two each time
until the chain is completed. Directions same as on page 9.

[Illustration]




SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 across table and lay in between Nos.
1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then go to C, take Nos. 1 and
lift across table and lay in between Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1
from D to C; then go to A, take Nos. 2 and lift across inside of Nos. 2
at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then go to C, lift Nos. 2
across inside of Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 2 from D to C; then go
to A and commence as at first, and repeat until it is the required
length.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid close together; then boil in water about ten minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire on to the cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and
put a little shellac on the ends to keep it fast. If you want it
elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the
number of hairs in a strand.




CABLE TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on table
like pattern. Commence at A and B with Nos. 1, passing them around table
to the right, and leave No. 1 from A at B, and No. 1 from B at A. Then
take Nos. 7 at A and B, and pass around table to right, and leave the
one from A at B, and the one from B at A. Then take Nos. 2 at A and B,
changing places with them; then take Nos. 8 and change as before; then
take Nos. 3 at A and B and change them as before; then take Nos. 1 at A
and B and change as at first; then take Nos. 4 and change as before;
then take Nos. 2 and change as before; then take Nos. 5 and change as
before, so on until the braid is finished, all the time taking the third
strand to the right, or forward, and the second one to the left, or
backward.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE eighteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A and B, take Nos. 1 and swing around table to the
right, and place the No. 1 from A over the Nos. 2 and 3 at B, and the
No. 1 from B over the Nos. 2 and 3 at A; then go to C and D, take the
Nos. 1 and change the same; then go to E and F and change the same; then
go to B and A, and change as at first,--all the time taking the Nos. 1,
and swinging to the right, for when you lay them over the Nos. 2 and 3
it makes them Nos. 3, and makes Nos. 2 Nos. 1--and so on, until the
chain is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid close together; then boil in water about ten minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire on to the cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and
put a little shellac on the ends to keep it fast. If you want it
elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the
number of hairs in a strand.




TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on table
like pattern. Commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand and No.
1 at B in left hand and swing them around the table to the right and lay
the one in the right hand down at B, over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4, and
the one in the left hand at A over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4, then go to C
and take No. 1 at C and D and change as before at A and B; then go to B
and take No. 1 at B and A and change them by taking No. 1 at B in right
hand, and No. 1 at A in left hand and swing them round the table to the
right as before, laying them across over Nos. 2, 3 and 4; so on braiding
around the table to the right until you have it the required length.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




RIB CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 2 and lift over across table
outside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A outside of
Nos. 1 at A, then take Nos. 1 at C and cross over inside of Nos. 1 at D,
and bring back Nos. 2 from D inside of Nos. 2 at C, then go back to A
and braid as before, so on repeating until it is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE ten strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the table
like pattern. Commence at A and B, take Nos. 1 and swing them around the
table to the right, and leave No. 1 from A at B and the No. 1 from B at
A, then take the Nos. 2 and swing them around the table to the right and
change places with each other, then take Nos. 3 and change places as
before; then take Nos. 4 and change places as before; then take Nos. 5
and change places as before; then commence at Nos. 1 and repeat until
the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




HALF TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, seventy-five hairs in a strand, and place on the
table like pattern. Commence at A take Nos. 1 and 2, lift across the
table to B, and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and lay No. 2 between Nos. 1
and 2, and bring back Nos. 1 and 2 from B to A, and lay No. 1 outside of
No. 4, and No. 2 outside of No. 1 at A; then go to C and take Nos. 1 and
2, lift over table to D and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and lay No. 2
between Nos. 1 and 2, and bring back Nos. 1 and 2 from C, and lay No. 1
outside of No. 4, and No. 2 outside of No. 1 at C; then go to B and
change the same, and so on around the table to the right until the braid
is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




CABLE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty strands, seventy-five hairs in a strand, place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 over across the table inside of Nos.
1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A, cross
over and lay them between Nos. 2 at B, and carry back Nos. 2 from B to
A; then take Nos. 3 at A, cross over inside of Nos. 3 at B, and bring
back Nos. 3 from B to A; then take Nos. 4 at A and cross over inside of
Nos. 4 at B, and bring back Nos. 4 from B to A; then take Nos. 5 at A,
cross over inside of Nos. 5 at B, and bring back Nos. 5 from B to A;
then take Nos. 1 at B, cross over inside of Nos. 1 at A, and bring back
Nos. 1 from A to B; then take Nos. 2 at B and cross over inside of Nos.
2 at A, and bring back Nos. 2 from A to B; then take Nos. 3, so on
around the table to the right until the braid is finished, all the time
taking the next two.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




SIXTEEN SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands, fifty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 across inside of Nos. 1 at B,
and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then change at C and D, E and F, and
G and H the same, then go to A, lift Nos. 2 across in place of Nos. 2 at
B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then change at C and D, E and F,
and G and H the same. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence
at A, as at first, repeating the changes until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid close together; then boil in water about ten minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire on to the cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and
put a little shellac on the ends to keep it fast. If you want it
elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the
number of hairs in a strand.




GERMAN TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the
table like pattern. Commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand
and No. 1 at B in left hand, and swing them around to the right and
change places with them; then take No. 1 at C in right hand and No. 1 at
D in left hand, and swing around table to the right and change places as
before; then take No. 2 at B in right hand and No. 2 at A in left hand
and swing to the right and change as before; then take No. 2 at D in
right hand and No. 2 at C in left hand and swing to the right and change
as before; then take No. 3 at A in right hand and No. 3 at B in left
hand and change as before; then take No. 3 at C in right hand and No. 3
at D in left hand and change as before; then take No. 4 at B in right
hand and No. 4 at A in left hand and change as before then take No. 4 at
D in right hand and No. 4 at C in left hand and change as before. Then
commence at A as at first and repeat till the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

For further directions see page 9.




FANCY SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A--change Nos. 1 at A across inside of Nos. 1
at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A, then go to C, change Nos. 1
across inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C, then
take Nos. 1 at E in right hand and No. 1 at F in left hand, lift across
table in place of Nos. 1 at G and H, and bring back Nos. 1 from G and H
to F and E; then take Nos. 2 at E and F and change across to G and H,
and lay in place of Nos. 2, and bring back Nos. 2 from G and H to F and
E; then take Nos 3 and change across to G and H as before; then take
Nos. 4 at F and E and change across to G and H as before; then go to C
and change the Nos. 1 across to D, and bring the Nos. 1 from D to C;
then go to A and change the Nos. 1 across to B, and bring back Nos. 1
from B to A; then go to E and H, take No. 4 at H in right hand, and No.
4 at E in left hand, and lift across in place of Nos. 4 at F and G, and
bring back Nos. 4 from F and G to E and H; then take Nos. 3 at E and H
and change across in place of Nos. 3 at F and G, and bring back Nos. 3
from F and G to E and H; then take Nos. 2 at E and H and change across
in place of Nos. 2 at F and G and bring back Nos. 2 from F and G to E
and H; then take Nos. 1 at E and H, and change across in place of Nos. 1
at F and G, and bring back Nos. 1 from F and G to E and H; then go to A
and commence as at first, and repeat till the chain is finished.

[Illustration]

For further directions see page 9.




FANCY SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 across inside of No. 1 at B,
and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then change Nos. 1 at C and D the
same; then change Nos. 1 at E and F the same; then go to A, lift Nos. 2
across to B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then change Nos. 2 at C
and D the same; then change Nos. 2 at E and F the same, and you are
through the braid ready to commence at A as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If
you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the
table like pattern. Commence at A, change the Nos. 1 across inside of
Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take No. 2 at A
change over in place of Nos. 2 at B and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A;
then go to C, and change the Nos. 1 from C to D, and bring back Nos. 1
from D to C; then take Nos. 2 at C and change over in place of Nos. 2 at
D, and bring back Nos 2 from D to C; then go to A and begin as at first,
repeating until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry, then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




FANCY TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands, fifty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Change Nos. 1 at A across inside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring
back Nos. 1 from B to A; then change in the same way, successively, the
Nos. 3, 5, 2, 4, 6, 3, 5, 7, 4, 6, 8, 5, 7, 1, 6, 8, 2, 7, 1, 3, 8, 2,
4--then you are through, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire, then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




FANCY TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and lay on table like
pattern. Commence at A and B--take No. 1 at A in left hand and No. 1 at
B in right hand, swing around table to the left, and change places with
them; then take No. 7 at B in right hand and No. 7 at A in left hand,
and swing around the table to the right and change places with them;
then take No. 5 at A in right hand and No. 5 at B in left hand, and
swing around the table to the left, and change places as before; then
take No. 8 at A in right hand and No. 8 at B in left hand and swing
around table to the left and change as before; then take No. 6 at A in
left hand, and No. 6 at B in right hand and swing around table to the
right and change as before; then take No. 4 at A in right hand and No. 4
at B in left hand, and swing around table to the left and change as
before; then take No. 7 at A in right hand and No. 7 at B in left hand,
swing around table to the left and change as before, then take No. 5 at
A in left hand and No. 5 at B in right hand, swing around table to the
right and change as before; then take No. 3 at A in right hand and No. 3
at B in left hand and swing around table to the left and change as
before; then take No. 6 at A in right hand and No. 6 at B in left hand
and swing around table to the left and change as before; then take No. 4
at A in left hand and No. 4 at B in right hand and swing around table
to the right and change as before; then take No. 2 at A in right hand
and No. 2 at B in left hand and swing around table to the left and
change as before; then take No. 5 at A in right hand and No. 5 at B in
left hand and swing around table to the left and change as before, then
take No. 3 at A in left hand and No. 3 at B in right hand, and swing
around table to the right and change as before. Then commence at A as at
first.

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




DOUBLE TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE eighteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A and B--take No. 1 at A in right hand and No. 1 at
B in left hand and swing them around the table to the right and change
places with them; then change the Nos. 8, 6 and 4 the same way; then
count back five to the left (not counting the one last braided),
bringing you to No. 9--swing as before to the right and change places;
then change the Nos. 7, 5 and 3 the same way; then count back five,
bringing you to No. 8--change the same; and so on, first counting two
forward and change three times, and then count five back and change the
same, so on until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




FANCY CABLE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the
table like pattern. Commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand
and No. 1 at B in left hand, and swing them around to the left and
change places with them; then take successively Nos. 3, 5, 2, 4, 6, 3,
5, 7, 4, 6, 8, and change the same; then commence as at first with No.
1, so on repeating until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




HALF SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty four strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and arrange like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and lay them in the place of Nos. 1
at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at C and lay
in the place of Nos. 2 at D and bring back Nos. 2 from D to C. Then take
the Nos. 3 from H and lay between the Nos. 3 at G, and bring back the
Nos. 3 from G to H; then take the Nos. 4 at H and place between the Nos.
4 at G, and bring back the Nos. 4 from G to H; then take Nos. 5 at E and
place between Nos. 5 at F, and bring back the Nos. 5 from F to E; then
take the Nos. 6 at E and place them inside of Nos. 6 at F, and bring
back the Nos. 6 from F to E. Commence at A as at first, and repeat until
the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




TWELVE SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, and place on table like pattern. Commence at
A, take Nos. 1 and place between Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from
B and lay in place of Nos. 1 at A; then change the Nos. 2 at A, and B
the same way; then change the succeeding numbers, 3, 4, 5 and 6, all the
same way. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence at Nos. 1
again, as at first, and repeat until the braid is the desired length.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid close together; then boil in water about ten minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire on to the cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and
put a little shellac on the ends to keep it fast. If you want it
elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the
number of hairs in a strand.




FLAT TWIST CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE eight strands, ninety hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence, take No. 1 at A in right hand, and No. 1 at B in left
hand, and swing around table to the right--the No. 1 in the right hand
over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4 at B, and the No. 1 in the left hand over
across Nos. 2, 3 and 4 at A; repeat until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




RIB CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the
table like pattern. Commence at A, take both No. 1 strands and cross
over in between Nos. 1 on the opposite side to B, then bring back both
Nos. 2 from B to A, and place them in between Nos. 2; then walk around
table to C and braid it across table to D as before. Then commence at A
and repeat until braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




FANCY CABLE CHAIN BRAID


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by two, eight hairs in a
strand, and place on table like pattern. Commence by taking No. 1 at A
and B and change places by swinging them to the right; then take No. 2
at A and B and change places with them by swinging to the left; then
take No. 3 at A and B and change places by swinging them to the right;
then Nos. 4, and change places by swinging them to the left, and so on,
swinging to the right and left alternately, until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




SQUARE CABLE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by two, eighty hairs in a
strand, and place on table like pattern. Commence at A and B, take Nos.
1 and swing them around table to the right--No. 1 from A around to B
across No. 2 at B, and No. 1 from B across No. 2 at A; then take Nos. 1
at C and D and change as before; then change the same at E and F and at
B and A, so on around the table to the right until the chain is
completed. Any number of strands can be used by increasing the number in
each place, or by having three, four, five or six in a place, care being
taken to cross all the strands. For instance, there are four strands,
No. 1 must be crossed over all as you braid around the table. By adding
strands a different braid is formed.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




FOB CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, cross No. 1 in the right hand over the No. 1 in
the left hand, and then go to B and cross No. 1 in the left hand over
No. 1 in the right hand; then go back to A and take Nos. 1 and cross
inside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos.
2 and change the same; then change Nos. 3 the same; then go to C and
take Nos. 1 and cross inside of Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from
D and lay inside of Nos. 2 at C; then commence at A as at first, and
repeat until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




SQUARE RIBBED CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence take No. 1 at A in right hand and No. 1 at B in left
hand, swing to the right and change places with them; then take Nos. 3
at A and lay inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring Nos. 3 from B and lay
inside of Nos. 2 at A; then go to C and take No. 1 in right hand and No.
1 at D in left hand, swing to the right and change places with them;
then take Nos. 3 at C and lay inside of Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos.
3 from D and lay inside of Nos. 2 at C. Then commence at A as at first,
and repeat until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry, then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




DOUBLE LOOP CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, sixty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A and B: take Nos. 1 at A, and lift them
across the table, and lay the one in left hand between Nos. 1 at B, and
the one in right hand on the outside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back the
Nos. 1 from B to A. Then pass round the table to the right, and change
(in the same manner) successively, the Nos. 3, 5, 6, 2, 4, 6, 2, 4, 5,
1, 3 and 5; then commence at A with Nos. 1, as at first, and repeat
until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid close together; then boil in water about ten minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire on to the cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and
put a little shellac on the ends to keep it fast. If you want it
elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the
number of hairs in a strand.




KNOT CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands with fifty hairs in a strand, and place them on
table like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 4 and lift over across
table, and lay outside of Nos. 1 at B, then bring back Nos. 4 from B and
lay outside of Nos. 1 at A; then take Nos. 3 at A and lift over across
table and lay outside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 3 from B and
lay outside of Nos. 1 at A; then change Nos. 2 at A and B the same; then
take Nos. 1 and change the same; then go to D and change the same as at
A; then go to B and change the same; then go to C and change the same,
and you are ready to commence again at A, as at first: repeat until
braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




DOUBLE RIB CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands, sixty hairs in a strand and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 4 and lift over table and lay outside
of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 4 from B and lay outside of Nos. 1
at A; then go to D and change the Nos. 4 the same as at A and B; then go
to B and change the same as at A; then go to C and change the same way,
and then to A and change as at first, and so on, repeating the changes
until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid close together; then boil in water about ten minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire on to the cord, sew the ends of the braid so it will not slip, and
put a little shellac on the ends to keep it fast. If you want it
elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the
number of hairs in a strand.




FANCY CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, change Nos. 1 across inside of Nos. 1 at B, and
bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A and change across
inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then go to C
and change the Nos. 1 and the Nos. 2 across with the numbers at D the
same as at A; then return to A and commence as at first and repeat ten
times. Then change the figures on the table to correspond with the
following diagram:

[Illustration]

Then commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand and No. 1 at B
in left hand, and swing around the table to the right, changing places
with them; then take Nos. 1 at C and D and change the same; then change
Nos. 2 at B and A the same; then change the Nos. 2 at D and C the same;
then take Nos. 3 at A and B and change the same; then change the Nos. 3
at C and D; then the Nos. 4 at B and A; then the Nos. 4 at P and C; then
commence at A as at first, and repeat ten times, so on braiding
alternately ten rounds by the directions of each pattern until the braid
is finished.




FANCY CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, change Nos. 1 across inside of Nos. 1 at B, and
bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A and change across
inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then go to C
and change the Nos. 1 and the Nos. 2 across with the numbers at D the
same as at A; then return to A and commence as at first and repeat ten
times. Then change the figures on the table to correspond with the
following diagram:

[Illustration]

Then commence at A, take Nos. 1 and 2, lift across table to B and lay
No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2 between Nos. 1 and 2, and bring back
Nos. 1 and 2 from B to A, and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2
outside of No. 1 at A; then go to C and take Nos. 1 and 2 and lift over
table to D, and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2 between Nos. 1 and
2, and bring back Nos. 1 and 2 from C and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4 and
No. 2 outside of No. 1 at C; then go to B and change the same, and so on
around the table to the right, braiding alternately ten rounds by each
diagram until the braid is finished.




FANCY CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on table
like pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 over across the table and lay
them in between Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then go
to C and change the Nos. 1 across with the Nos. 1 at D the same; then
take Nos. 2 at A and change across inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back
Nos. 2 from B to A; then change the Nos. 2 at C across inside of Nos. 2
at D the same; then commence at A as at first, and repeat ten times.
Then change the numbers on table to correspond with the following
pattern or diagram:

[Illustration]

Then commence at A, take Nos. 1 and 2, lift across table to B and lay
No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2 between Nos. 1 and 2, and bring back
Nos. 1 and 2 from B to A, and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2
outside of No. 1 at A; then go to C and take Nos. 1 and 2 and lift over
table to D, and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2 between Nos. 1 and
2, and bring back Nos. 1 and 2 from C and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4 and
No. 2 outside of No. 1 at C; then go to B and change the same, and so on
around the table to the right, braiding alternately ten rounds by each
diagram until the braid is finished.




FANCY CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on the
table like pattern. Commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand
and No. 1 at B in left hand, swing around the table to the right and
change places with them; then take Nos. 1 at C and D and change as at A
and B; then change Nos. 2 at B and A the same; then change the Nos. 2 at
D and C the same; then take Nos. 3 at A and B and change the same; then
change the Nos. 3 at C and D; then the Nos. 4 at B and A, and also the
Nos. 4 at D and C, all the time swinging to the right. Braid around ten
times.

[Illustration]

Then commence at A, take Nos. 1 and 2, lift across table to B and lay
No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2 between Nos. 1 and 2, and bring back
Nos. 1 and 2 from B to A, and lay No. 1 outside of No. 4, and No. 2
outside of No. 1 at A; then change the same at C, B and D; then commence
again at A and braid ten rounds, so on braiding alternately ten rounds
by the directions of each pattern until the braid is finished.




FANCY CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, change Nos. 1 across inside of Nos. 1 at B, and
bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A and change across
inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then go to C
and change the Nos. 1 and the Nos. 2 across with the numbers at D the
same as at A; then return to A and commence as at first and repeat ten
times. Then change the figures on the table to correspond with the
following diagram:

[Illustration]

Then commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand and No. 1 at B
in left hand, and swing them around the table to the right, and lay the
one in right hand down at B over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4, and the one in
left hand at A over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4; then go to C and change the
Nos. 1 at B and D the same; then go to B and change the Nos. 1 at B and
A the same; so on, braiding around the table to the right, alternately
braiding ten rounds by the directions of each pattern until the braid is
finished.




FANCY CHAIN BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place them on table
like pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 over across the table and lay
them in between Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then go
to C and change the Nos. 1 across with the Nos. 1 at D the same; then
take Nos. 2 at A and change across inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back
Nos. 2 from B to A; then change the Nos. 2 at C across inside of Nos. 2
at D the same; then commence at A as at first, and repeat ten times.
Then change the numbers on table to correspond with the following
pattern or diagram:

[Illustration]

Then commence at A and B, take No. 1 at A in right hand and No. 1 at B
in left hand, and swing them around the table to the right, and lay the
one in right hand down at B over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4, and the one in
left hand at A over across Nos. 2, 3 and 4; then go to C and change the
Nos. 1 at B and D the same; then go to B and change the Nos. 1 at B and
A the same; so on, braiding around the table to the right, alternately
braiding ten rounds by the directions of each pattern until the braid is
finished.




DOUBLE RIB CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-six strands, sixty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A and B, take Nos. 1 and change places by
swinging them around the table to the left; then take the third strands
to the right of A and B, and change places by swinging them around the
table to the right; then take the fourth strands to the right of the
ones last taken, and change places by swinging them around the table to
the left, and so on working around the table to the right; first
swinging the strands to the left, and then to the right, taking
alternately the third and fourth strands to the right of the ones last
used, until the braid is finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




ROPE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, sixty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take No. 2 in right hand, swing around the
table to the right and lay in place of No. 2 at B, and bring back No. 2
from B and lay in place of No. 2 at A; then take No. 1 at A in left
hand, and change places with No. 1 at B by swinging around to the left;
then go to C, take Nos. 3 and lift over table and lay inside of Nos. 3
at D, and bring back Nos. 3 from D and lay in place of Nos. 3 at C; then
go to E and change the Nos. at E and F the same as at A and B; then go
to G and change the same as at C and D, and so on, alternately changing,
first as at A and B, and then as at C and D, until the braid is
finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




DIAMOND SHAPED CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on the
table like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 2 lift across table and lay
in between Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then take
Nos. 1 at A and lift across table and lay between Nos. 1 at B, and bring
back Nos. 1 from B to A; then go to F, take No. 1 in right hand, swing
around to the right and lay in place of No. 4 at E; then take No. 1 at E
in left hand and swing around to the left and lay in place of No. 4 at
F; then go to C, take Nos. 2 lift across table, and lay them in between
Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 2 from D to C; then take Nos. 1 at C,
lift across the table and lay between Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1
from D to C; then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




FANCY SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take No. 1 in right hand, swing around to
the right and lay in place of No. 4 at B; then take No. 1 at B in left
hand, swing around table to the left and lay in place of No. 4 at A;
then go to C, take No. 2 in right hand, swing around the table to the
right and lay outside of No. 2 at D, and bring back No. 2 from D to C;
then take No. 1 at C in left hand, swing around the table to the left
and lay outside of No. 1 at D, and bring back No. 1 from D to C; then go
to E and change the Nos. at E and F the same as you did at A and B; then
change the Nos. at G and H the same as you did at C and D. Then you are
through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




FANCY SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take No. 1 in right hand, swing around to
the right and lay in place of No. 4 at B; then take No. 1 at B in left
hand, swing around table to the left and lay in place of No. 4 at A;
then go to C, take Nos. 1 and lift them across the table and lay in
between Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C; then go to E,
and change the Nos. at E and F the same as you did at A and B; then go
to G, and change the Nos. at G and H the same as you did at C and D.
Then you are through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




FANCY SQUARE CHAIN BRAID


TAKE twenty-four strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take No. 1 at the left side of A in the
right hand, and No. 1 at the left of B in the left hand, swing them
around the table to the right and lay the one from B at the right of A,
and the one from A at the right of B; then go to C, take No. 1 at the
left side of C in the right hand, and No. 1 at the left side of D in the
left hand, swing them around the table to the right, and lay the one
from C at the right of D, and the one from D at the right of C; then go
to B, take Nos. 3 and lift them across table and lay between Nos. 3 at
A, and bring back Nos. 3 from A to B; then change Nos. 2 and 1 the same
way; then go to C, take Nos. 3 and lift across the table and lay between
Nos. 3 at D, and bring back Nos. 3 from D to C; then change Nos. 2 and 1
the same way. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first, at A.

[Illustration]

For explanation see page 9.




FANCY SQUARE CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 2 and lift across the table and
lay between Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then change
Nos. 1 the same way; then go to C, take Nos. 2 and lift them across the
table and lay between Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 2 from D to A;
then change Nos. 1 the same way; then go to E, take Nos. 1 and 2 and
lift them across the table to F, and lay No. 1 from E at the right of
No. 1 at F, and No. 2 from E at the right of No. 2 at F, and bring back
the Nos. 1 and 2 from F to E; then go to G and change the same from G to
H as you did at E and F. Then you are through the braid, ready to
commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid, vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




FANCY TWIST BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 cross over and lay between Nos.
1 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B and lay between Nos. 2 at A; then
go to E, take Nos. 1 and 2 and cross over to F, and lay No. 1 down at
the right of No. 1 at F, and No. 2 at the right of No. 2 at F, and and
bring back Nos. 1 and 2 from F to E; then go to C, and change the Nos.
at C and D the same as you did at A and B; then go to G, and change the
Nos. at G and H the same as you did at E and F. Then you are through the
braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire,
and push the braid together; then boil in water about ten minutes, and
then take out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off the
wire and on the cord, and sew the ends so it will not slip, and put a
little shellac on the end to keep it fast. If you want it elastic, use
elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid vary the number of hairs in
a strand.




FLAT CHAIN BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, seventy hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and change places by crossing
one over the other; then go to B and cross the Nos. 1 the same way; then
go back to A, take Nos. 1 and cross over and lay between Nos. 1 at B,
and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A, and cross over
and lay between Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then
change Nos. 3 and 4 the same way; then go to C, take Nos. 1 and 2 and
cross over to D, and lay the No. 1 from C down at the left of No. 1 at
D, and the No. 2 from C down at the left of No. 2 at D, and bring back
the Nos. 1 and 2 from D to C; then take the Nos. 3 and 4, cross over to
D and lay the No. 3 from C down at the right of No. 3 at D, and the No.
4 from C down at the right of No. 4 at D, and bring back Nos. 3 and 4
from D to C. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence at A, as
at first.

[Illustration]

For explanation see page 9.




NECKLACE PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and 4 left across to B, lay in place
of Nos. 1 and 4 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 and 4 from B to A; then take
No. 2 at A in right hand and No. 3 in left hand, pass right hand round
table to the right to B, and lay the No. 2 from A in place of No. 3 at
B, and bring back No. 2 from B to A in right hand, and pass left hand
round table to the left, and lay No. 3 from A in place of No. 2 at B,
and bring back No. 3 from B to A, and lay No. 3 from B down at No. 2 at
A, and lay No. 2 from B down at No. 3 at A, then go to C and take Nos. 1
across over inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C;
then go to A and repeat this all three times; then the fourth time at C
you take Nos. 1 at C across over to D and lay outside of Nos. 2 at D,
bring back the Nos. 1 from D to C and lay them outside of Nos. 2 at C;
then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at first at A.
Braid it over a small cord so as to put it up together.




NECKLACE PATTERN.


TAKE sixteen strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 at A lift across inside of Nos. 1 at
B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then go to C, take Nos. 1 at C
lift across inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C;
then commence at A again and repeat it three times; then commence at A,
take Nos. 1 across to B and lay them outside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring
back Nos. 1 from B to A and lay outside of Nos. 2 at A; then go to C and
change from C to D the same as from A to B; then you are through the
braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a small wire, with a hole in one end like the eye of a
needle, so as to draw a small cord in the place of the wire. When you
have it braided, take off your weights, tie the ends fast on the wire
and push the braid together on the wire; then boil in water about ten
minutes; then take it out and put in an oven as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry; then take it out and slip it off
of the wire on to the cord, and sew the ends of the braid so it will not
slip on the cord, and put a little shellac on the end to keep it fast.
If you want it elastic, use elastic cord. To vary the size of the braid,
vary the number of hairs in a strand.




NECKLACE PATTERN.


TAKE sixteen strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 at A across over inside of Nos. 1 at
B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A across over
inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then take No.
1 at C in right hand and No. 1 at D in left hand and change them, lay
the No. 1 from C in place of No. 1 at D, and lay the No. 1 from D in
place of No. 1 at C; then change the Nos. 1 and 2 at A and B as at
first; then change the Nos. 2 at C and D, as you did the Nos. 1 at C and
D; then change the Nos. 1 and 2, as before, at A and B; then take Nos. 3
at C and D and change as you did the Nos. 2 at C and D; then change
again Nos. 1 and 2 at A and B as at first; then take the Nos. 4 at C and
D and change as you did the Nos. 3 at C and D; then you are through the
braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this without cord or wire.




NECKLACE PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 lift over to B in place of Nos. 1 at
B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A and change
over in place of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then
take No. 3 at A in right hand and No. 3 at B in left hand, and lay them
inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D and lay in place of
Nos. 3 at A and B; then take No. 4 at A in left hand and No. 4 at B in
right hand, and lay inside of Nos. 1 at C, and bring back Nos. 1 from C
to A and B, and lay in place of Nos. 4; then commence as at first and
repeat this three times, then take Nos. 1 at A, lift over to B in place
of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 at A
and change over in place of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to
A; then take Nos. 3 at A and B, lay inside of Nos. 1 at D; then take
Nos. 4 at A and B, lay inside of Nos. 1 at C; then take Nos. 2 at A and
lay outside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B and lay outside
of Nos. 1 at A; then take Nos. 1 at C, lift over inside of Nos. 1 at D
and bring back Nos. 1 from D and lay inside of Nos. 1 at C; then take
No. 1 at C, on the side next to B, in right hand, and lay it inside of
No. 1 at B; then take the No. 1 at D, next to B, in left hand, and lay
it inside of No. 1 at B; then take the No. 1 at C, next to A, in right
hand, and lay it inside of No. 1 at A; then take No. 1 at D, next to A,
and lay it inside of No. 1 at A; then take the Nos. 3 and 4 at A, lift
over to B, and lay outside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 3 and 4
from B and lay outside of Nos. 1 at A; then lift Nos. 2 at A over and
lay in place of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A, and lay
in place of Nos. 2 at A; then take No. 4 at A, in left hand, and No. 4
at B in right hand, and lay them inside of Nos. 1 at C, and bring the
Nos. 1 from C back in place of the Nos. 4 at A and B; then take No. 3 at
B in left hand, and No. 3 at A in right hand, and lay them inside of
Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D and lay in place of Nos. 3 at
A and B; then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at first.




NECKLACE PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty-two strands, fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Have the strands at A and B black hair, and those at C and
D light hair. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and cross over inside of Nos. 1
at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B and lay in place of Nos. 1 at A, then
take Nos. 2 at A, cross over inside of Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos.
2 from B and lay inside of Nos. 2 at A; then take No. 1 at C in right
hand, and No. 1 at D in left hand, cross over and lay the No. 1 from C
at D, and the No. 1 from D at C; then change the Nos. 1 and 2 at A and B
as at first; then take the Nos. 2 at C and D and change them as you did
the Nos. 1; then change again at A and B as at first; then take the Nos.
3 at C and D, and change as you did the Nos. 2; then change again at A
and B, and so on till you get to Nos. 7, and after changing that, change
again at A and B; then change Nos. 7 again, then those at A and B, then
Nos. 6, then at A and B, then Nos. 5, and so on back to No. 1, and
change No. 1 there as you did Nos. 7. Always braid those at A and B
between each of those at C and D.




NECKLACE PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE 24 strands, twenty-five hairs in a strand, and place on table like
this pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 lift across inside of Nos. 1 at
B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A, then go to C and take Nos. 1 at C
and cross inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C, then
go to A and change Nos. 1 from A to B, as at first, then take Nos. 1 at
E and F and swing round table with the same, and lay down in between
Nos. 1 at A and B, and lay the No. 1 at A and B in the place of No. 4 at
E and F, then change the Nos. 1 at C across inside of Nos. 1 at D, and
bring back Nos. 1 from D to C, then change Nos. 1 at A and B the same,
then the Nos. 1 at C and D again, then take Nos. 1 at H and G, swing
round table with the same, and lay in between Nos. 1 at C and D, and lay
the right hand ones at C and D up in place of No. 4 at H and G, then you
are through the braid ready to commence as at first. Braid it over a
cord so to push it together.




NECKLACE OR EDGING BRAID.


TAKE sixteen strands, fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 2 across inside of Nos. 2 at B, and
bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then take Nos. 1 at A, lift across inside
of Nos. 1 at B, and cross them, the one in right hand over the left, and
bring back Nos. 1 from B to A, and cross the right over the left; then
go to D, lift Nos. 1 across inside of Nos. 1 at C, cross the right over
the left, and bring back Nos. 1 from C to D, and cross the right over
the left; then repeat all from the beginning three times round the
table. Then go to D, lift Nos. 3, cross the right over the left, and lay
them outside of Nos. 1 at C; then go to A, lift Nos. 2 across inside of
Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then take Nos. 1 at A,
lift across inside of Nos. 1 at B, cross the right over the left, and
bring back Nos. 1 from B to A, and cross them; then go to D, lift Nos. 1
across inside of Nos. 1 at C, cross the right over the left, and bring
back Nos. 1 from C to D; then take Nos. 3 at C, and lay inside of Nos. 2
at D, and leave them there. Then you are through the braid, ready to
commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

See explanation on page 9.




HEAD DRESS OR NECKLACE BRAID.


TAKE twenty-four strands, eighty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, lift Nos. 1 and 2 across inside of Nos. 1
and 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 and 2 from B to A; then go to C, lift
Nos. 1 and 2 across inside of Nos. 1 and 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 1
and 2 from D to C; then go to A and change the Nos. 1 and 2 from A to B
the same as at first; then take Nos. 1 at E and F, swing round table to
the left, and lay them down between Nos. 1 and 2 at A and B; then lay
the Nos. 2 at A and B in place of Nos. 4 at E and F; then change the
Nos. 1 and 2 at C across inside of Nos. 1 and 2 at D, and bring back
Nos. 1 and 2 from D to C; then change the same at A and B; then change
again at C and D the same; then take Nos. 1 at H and G, swing round
table to the left, and lay them between Nos. 1 and 2 at C and D, and lay
the Nos. 2 at C and D in place of Nos. 4 at H and G. Then you are
through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid it over a strong cord, and when braided push it close together,
tie the ends, and boil in water five minutes; then heat it in an oven
until it is quite dry, and it is ready for use.




RING PATTERN.


TAKE thirteen strands, fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern. Commence at A, lift No. 5 over between Nos. 2 and 3 at A;
then take No. 1 at A, and lift over between Nos. 2 and 3 at B; then take
No. 1 at B, and lift over between Nos. 2 and 3 at C; then lift No. 1 at
C over between Nos. 2 and 3 at C; then lift No. 4 at C over between Nos.
2 and 3 at B; then lift No. 4 at B over between Nos. 2 and 3 at A. Then
you are through the braid, ready to commence as at first, and repeating
until it is the required length. Then tie it out straight on a flat
stick, boil it in water five minutes, then heat it in an oven as hot as
it will bear without burning, until it is quite dry, and then it is
ready for use.

[Illustration]

The above directions, after braiding, will suffice for finishing all
Ring Braids, unless other directions are given.




RING BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty-four strands, twenty hairs in the strands at C and D, and
ten hairs in the strands at A and B, and place on table like pattern.
Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and lift across table and lay inside of Nos.
1 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B and lay outside of Nos. 2 at A;
then go to C, take Nos. 1, cross over and lay in between Nos. 1 at D,
and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C; then take Nos. 3 at C, cross inside
of Nos. 3 at D, and bring back Nos. 3 from D to C; then take Nos. 4 at
C, cross over inside of Nos. 4 at D, and bring back Nos. 4 from D to C;
then commence at A, and change them at A and B as at first; then go to C
and commence with the Nos. 2. You must leave the Nos. 1 every other time
and the Nos. 2 every other time, and braid it as at first.




RIB RING BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE nineteen strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take No. 1 and lift over Nos. 2 and 3, under 4
and 5, over 6, 7, 8, 9 and 10, and lay over to B; then take No. 1 at B,
lift over Nos. 2 and 3, under 4 and 5, over 6, 7, 8, 9 and 10, and lay
over to A; then you are through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at
first,--first round to the left, and then to the right, and so on,
repeating the changes as above, until the braid is finished. Then tie it
out straight on a flat stick, boil in water five minutes, then heat it
in an oven as hot as it will bear without burning until it is quite dry,
and then it is ready for use.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take the Nos. 1 and lift across the table and
lay in place of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then
take the Nos. 2, 3 and 4, and change the same; then go to C, take the
Nos. 1 and lift across the table and lay in place of Nos. 1 at D, and
bring back Nos. 1 from D to C; then commence again at A, take Nos. 1 and
lift over the table and lay in the place of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back
the Nos. 1 from B to A; then change the Nos. 2 and 3 the same as the
Nos. 1; then go to C and change the Nos. 1 over in the place of Nos. 1
at D, and bring back the Nos. 1 from D to C; then go to A, and take the
Nos. 1, 2 and 3, and change the same as before; then go to C and change
the same as before. Then you are through the braid ready to commence at
A, as at first, and repeat until the braid is finished.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and lift over across the table, and
lay in place of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B and lay in
place of Nos. 1 at A; then take Nos. 2, 3 and 4, and change their places
the same as Nos. 1; then go to C, take Nos. 1 and lift over across the
table and lay in place of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to
C; then go to A, take Nos. 1 and lift them over the table and lay in
place of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos.
3 and 4 and change the same; then go to C, take Nos. 1 and lift them
over the table and lay in place of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1
from D to C. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence at A, as
at first, and repeat the changes until the braid is finished.




RING PATTERN.


TAKE twenty strands, fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1, lift across to B, and lay inside of
Nos. 1, and bring back Nos. 2 from B and lay in between Nos. 2 at A;
then go to C, take Nos. 1 and lift over inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring
back Nos. 1 from D to C; then take Nos. 2 at C, and cross over inside of
Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 2 from D to C; then take Nos. 3 at C,
cross over inside of Nos. 3 at D, and bring back Nos. 3 from D to C;
then commence again at A, as at first, and repeat until it is braided
the desired length.

[Illustration]

When the braid is finished, tie it out straight on a flat stick, boil in
water five minutes, and heat in an oven until perfectly dry, and then it
is ready for use.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and lay on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and lift over table and lay in place
of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2 and
change the same; then the Nos. 3, and change the same; then go to C,
take the Nos. 2 and lay outside of the Nos. 1; then go to D, and take
the Nos. 2 and lay outside of the Nos. 1; then go to C, and take Nos. 2
and lift over table and lay in place of Nos. 2 at D, and bring back the
Nos. 2 from D to C; then go to A, take Nos. 1 and lift across the table
and lay in place of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then
take Nos. 3 at A, and lift across table in place of Nos. 3 at B, and
bring back Nos. 3 from B to A; then go to C, take Nos. 2 and lay outside
of Nos. 1; then go to D, take Nos. 2 and lay outside of Nos. 1; then go
to C, take Nos. 2 and lift over table in place of Nos. 2 at D, and bring
back Nos. 2 from D to C. Then you are ready to commence at A, as at
first, and repeat until finished.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE fifteen strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, by taking No. 1 and lifting it over Nos. 2, 3
and 4, under Nos. 5, 6, 7 and 8, and pass it over to B; then take No. 1
at B, lift over Nos. 2, 3 and 4, under 5, 6, 7 and 8, and pass it over
to A; then you are through, ready to commence at A, as at first, and
repeat until the braid is finished,--first round to the left, and then
round to the right.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE nineteen strands, ten hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take No. 1 and lift over Nos. 2, 3 and 4, under
5 and 6, over 7 and 8, under 9 and 10, and pass it over to B; then take
No. 1 at B, and lift over Nos. 2, 3 and 4, under 5 and 6, over 7 and 8,
under 9 and 10, and lay it over to A; then go to A and commence at No.
1, as at first, and repeat over and over, first to the left and then to
the right, and so on, until the braid is finished. Then tie it out
straight on a flat stick, boil in water five minutes, and heat it in an
oven as hot as it will bear without burning, until it is quite dry, and
then it is ready for use.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty-four strands, and place on table like pattern. Commence at
A, take Nos. 1 and lift across inside of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back
Nos. 2 inside of Nos. 2 at A; then go to C, and take Nos. 1 and cross
over inside of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C; then take
Nos. 2 at C, and cross over inside of Nos. 2 at D, and bring back Nos. 2
from D to C; then take Nos. 3 at C, and cross over inside of Nos. 3 at
D, and bring back Nos. 3 from D to C; then take Nos. 4 at C, and cross
over inside of Nos. 4 at D, and bring back Nos. 4 from D to C; if you
wish to reverse every other time, you may leave the Nos. 1 and not braid
them; then you are ready to commence at A as at first.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty-four strands, sixteen hairs in a strand, and place on the
table like pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and cross over to B, lay
in between Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B and lay in place of
Nos. 1 at A; then take Nos. 2 at A, and change them the same way; then
Nos. 3 the same; then Nos. 4 the same. Then take Nos. 1 at C and D, and
lift over Nos. 2; then lift Nos. 1 at C over in place of Nos. 1 at D,
and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C; then go to A, and take Nos. 2, cross
over between Nos. 2 at B, and bring back Nos. 2 from B to A; then take
Nos. 3 and change the same way; then take Nos. 4 and change the same.
Then go to C and D, and lift Nos. 1 over Nos. 2, and then lift Nos. 1 at
C over and lay in place of Nos. 1 at D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D and
lay in place of Nos. 1 at C; then you are ready to commence as at first,
at A, and repeat until the braid is finished. You will place double
weight on the strands at C and D.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty-eight strands, of twelve hairs, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take Nos. 1 and cross over the table and lay in
place of Nos. 1 at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then change the
Nos. 2 the same. Then take Nos. 4 at A, and lift over the table in place
of Nos. 4 at B, and bring back Nos. 4 from B to A; then take Nos. 5 and
change the same way. Then go to C and D, and lift the Nos. 1 over the
Nos. 2; then take Nos. 1 at C, and lift them over the table inside of
Nos. 1 at D, and bring back the Nos. 1 from D and lay in place of Nos. 1
at C; then go to A, and take Nos. 1 and cross over in place of Nos. 1 at
B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then take Nos. 2, 3, 4 and 5, and
change all the same. Then go to C and D, and lift Nos. 1 over Nos. 2;
then lift Nos. 1 at C over the table, and lay them inside of Nos. 1 at
D, and bring back Nos. 1 from D to C. Then you are through the braid,
ready to commence at A, as at first, and repeat until the braid is
finished. Place extra weight on the strands at C and D.




RING OR BRACELET PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty-four strands, twenty hairs in a strand, and place on table
like pattern, thirteen on the right side and eleven on the left. Take
No. 1 at right hand, lift over Nos. 2 3 and 4, and under Nos. 5 and 6,
and over No. 7; then take No. 1 again, in right hand, and lift over Nos.
2 3 and 4, and under Nos. 5 and 6; then take the same two that you have
braided along, and lift over two strands, and under two, till you get to
the center; then pass the same two strands across to the left side, and
lay them down next to No. 11; then commence on the left side with No. 1,
and braid the left side as you did the right; then the braid is through,
ready to commence as at first, with No. 1 at right hand, and so on.
Repeat till finished.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE thirteen strands, twelve hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence by lifting No. 7 over Nos. 6 and 5, and under Nos. 4
and 3, and over Nos. 2 and 1, and lay it next to No. 1 on the left side,
making seven on the left side; then commence on the left side, take the
outside one and braid it into the middle, over two and under two, till
you get to the center, and lay it across on the opposite side; then you
are through with the braid, and ready to commence as at first, with the
No. 7 at right hand. You can have any odd number of strands you please.




RING PATTERN.


[Illustration]

TAKE twenty strands, ten hairs in a strand, and lay on table like
pattern. Commence at A, take No. 2 in right hand and swing it round the
table to the right, and lay it across No. 2 at B, and bring back No. 2
from B to A; then take No. 1 at A in left hand, and swing it round the
table to the left, and lay it across No. 1 at B, and bring back No. 1
from B to A. Then commence at C and D; take No. 1 at C in left hand, and
No. 1 at D in right hand, and change places with them by passing the
left hand over the right; then take Nos. 2 at C and D, and change the
same way; then take Nos. 3 and change the same way; then take Nos. 4 and
change the same way. Then go to B, and change the Nos. 1 at E and F as
you did at C and D, by commencing at Nos. 1 first, then the Nos. 2, 3
and 4, in succession. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence
as at first, at A. Braid it over a small wire.




BRACELET TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, and Nos. 1 and 3 over Nos. 2 and 4, and so on round table to the
left, till you get to A; then go to C, braid to the left, lift Nos. 1
and 2 over Nos. 3 and 4, and so on round to A; then commence at A and
braid round to the right; lift No. 2 over No. 3, and Nos. 3 and 4 over
Nos. 2 and 1, and so on round table to A; then go to C, braid round to
the right, and lift Nos. 2 and 4 over Nos. 3 and 1, and so on round to
A. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




BRACELET BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE sixteen strands, thirty hairs in a strand, and place on the table
like pattern. Commence at A, take the Nos. 1 and 2 and lay them over
Nos. 3 right and left; then lay the Nos. 1 at A over Nos. 1 at C and D,
and bring back the Nos. 1 from C and D and lay outside of Nos. 3 at A;
then lay the Nos. 2 at A over Nos. 1; then go to B and repeat the same
as at A, only change the Nos. 1 at B with the Nos. 2 at C, instead of
the Nos. 1 at C; then lift the Nos. 1 at A over and lay between Nos. 1
at B, and bring back Nos. 1 from B to A; then go to C and lift Nos. 1
and 2 over between Nos. 1 and 2 at D, and bring back the Nos. 1 and 2
from D to C. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence at A, as
at first. Braid this over a small wire, and place double weight on the
strands at C and D, and Nos. 1 at A and B.




BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--forty being the
usual number for this braid--twelve hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and
lift No. 3 over No. 2; then No. 1 over No. 2; then No. 4 over Nos. 3 and
2; then go to B and change the same way, and so on round the table to A.
Then go to C, commence with the outside row of figures, and braid round
to the left; lift No. 2 over No. 3; then No. 3 over No. 4; then No. 2
over No. 1; then No. 2 over No. 3, and so on round the table to A; then
you will be through the braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




ELASTIC BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--forty being the
usual number for this braid--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift
No. 2 in right hand, and put your left hand under the right hand, and
take Nos. 3 and 4 and bring them back, and cross them over No. 1, and
lay them all down; then go to B, and change the same way, and so on
round the table to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of
figures, and braid round to the left; lift No. 3 in left hand, and put
your right hand under the left hand and take Nos. 1 and 2, bring them
back, cross them over No. 4, and lay them all down, and so on round the
table to A; then you will be through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




ELASTIC BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four--sixty being the
usual number for this braid--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and
braid round table to the right; lift No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 4 over
Nos. 3 and 2; then repeat with the same strands, the No. 1 over No. 2,
and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2. Then go to B and braid the same, and so on
round table to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of
figures, and braid round table to the left; lift No. 1 over No. 2, and
No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2; then repeat with the same strands, the same as
you did at A and B, and so on round table to A. Then you are through the
braid, ready to commence as at first. After it is braided turn the braid
inside out.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, and push
it tight together, tying it so it will fit the mold exactly, and then
boil in water five minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven as hot
as it will bear without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready
for use.




DOUBLE ELASTIC BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four--sixty being the
usual number for this braid--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures; and
braid round table to the right; cross No. 4 over No. 3, and No. 1 over
Nos. 2 and 3; then repeat with the same strands. Then go to B, and braid
the same, and so on round table to the right, until you get to A. Then
go to C, and braid back round table to the left, by crossing No. 2 over
No. 1, and No. 3 over No. 4, and No. 2 over No. 3; then repeat with the
same strands, and so on round table till you get to A. Then you are
through the braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, and push
it tight together, tying it so it will fit the mold exactly, and then
boil in water five minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven as hot
as it will bear without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready
for use.




FANCY TIGHT BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, and Nos. 1 and 3 over Nos. 2 and 4; then go to B, and braid the
same to the left until you get to A; then commence at C, with the
outside row of figures, and braid round table to the left again; lift
Nos. 1 and 2 over Nos. 3 and 4, and so on round table till you get to A.
Then commence with the inside row of figures at A, and lift No. 2 over
No. 3, and Nos. 2 and 4 over Nos. 3 and 1; then go to B, and braid the
same to the right, and so on round table to A; then commence at C with
the outside row of figures, and braid round to the right, lift Nos. 3
and 4 over Nos. 2 and 1, and so on round table to A; then you are
through the braid, ready to commence as at first. Be sure and braid the
first two times round table to the left, and the last two to the right.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use. To have it
elastic use elastic cord.




REVERSE TIGHT BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, and No. 1 over No. 2, then No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2; then go to B
and change the same to the left, and so on round table to A; then go to
C, braid to the left with the outside row of figures, lift Nos. 3 and 4
over Nos. 1 and 2, and so on round to A. Then commence again at A and
braid round to the right; lift No. 2 over No. 3, then No. 2 over No. 1,
and Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4, and so on round table to A; then commence
at C and braid to the right, lift Nos. 1 and 2 over Nos. 3 and 4, and so
on round to A. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




BANDED BRACELET BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, and No. 1 over No. 2, then No. 3 over No. 4, and No. 3 over No.
2; braid round table to the left till you get to A, then repeat the same
at C with the outside row of figures. After braiding the second time
round, commence again at A, with the inside row of figures, and braid
round to the right; lift Nos. 3 and 4 over Nos. 1 and 2, and so on round
to A; then repeat, at C, with the outside row of figures. Then you are
through the braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




PLAIN OPEN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 1 over
No. 2, No. 4 over No. 3, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 4 over No. 3; then
No. 3 over No. 2, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 4 over Nos. 2 and 3. Braid
round table to the left till you get to A, then repeat the same at C,
only braid the outside row of figures. Then you are through the braid,
ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN FINE BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
The usual number for this braid--four hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift
No. 2 over No. 3; then No. 2 over No. 1; then No. 2 over No. 3; then
Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4; then No. 2 over No. 1. Then go to B and change
the same way, and so on round the table to A. Then go to C, and commence
with the outside row of figures, and change the same as you did at A,
and so on round the table, when you will be through the braid, ready to
commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN FINE BRAID.


TAKE any number of Strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number for this braid--four hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift
No. 1 over Nos. 2, 3 and 4; then No. 3 over Nos. 2 and 1; then No. 2
over Nos. 3 and 4; then No. 2 over No. 1. Then go to B and change the
same, and so on round the table to A. Then go to C, and commence with
the outside row of figures, and change the same as you did at A, and so
on round the table, when you will be through the braid, ready to
commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN LACE BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 2, and so on
round the table to the left to A; then commence at C, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 2, No. 1 over
No. 2 and No. 3 over No. 4. Then you are through the braid, ready to
commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number for this braid--four hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift
No. 3 over No. 2; then No. 3 over No 4; then No. 1 over No. 2; then No.
3 over No. 2; then No. 1 over No. 2; then No. 3 over No. 4. Then go to B
and change the same way, and so on round the table to A. Then go to C,
and commence with the outside row of figures, and change the same as you
did at A, and so on round the table, when you will be through the braid,
ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




BASKET TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE thirty-two strands, or any number that can be divided by four,
fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like pattern. Commence at
A, with the inside row of figures, and braid round the table to the
left; lift No. 3 over No. 2, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 4;
then commence at C, with the outside row of figures, and braid round the
table to the left; lift Nos. 1 and 2 over Nos. 3 and 4; then commence at
A, as before, and braid round the table to the right; put No. 3 under
No. 2, and lift No. 2 over No. 1, and No. 3 over No. 4; then commence at
C, as before, and braid round the table to the right, and put Nos. 1 and
2 under Nos. 3 and 4. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence
at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--forty being the
usual number--twelve hairs in a strand, and place on table like pattern.
Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and lift Nos. 1 and 2
over Nos. 3 and 4; then go to B and change the same way, and so on round
table to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of figures, and
braid round to the left; lift Nos. 3 and 4 over Nos. 1 and 2, and so on
round the table to A. Then you will be through the braid, ready to
commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




ACORN TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 2 over
No. 3, No. 4 over No. 3, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 2, and so
on round table to the right till you get to A; then commence at C, braid
round to the right, lift Nos. 3 and 4 over Nos. 1 and 2, and so on round
table to A. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence at A, as
at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




HALF TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, and Nos. 1 and 3 over Nos. 2 and 4, and so on round table to A;
then commence at C with the outside row of figures, lift No. 2 over No.
3, No. 2 over No. 1, No. 2 over No. 3, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4, and No.
2 over No. 1, and so on round table to A. Then you are through the
braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




FANCY TIGHT BRAID.


IN this pattern you braid with eight strands, or with two groups of
fours. Commence at B, lift No. 4 in left hand and lay down between Nos.
3 and 4 at C, and take No. 4 at C in right hand; then lift No. 3 at B
over between Nos. 2 and 3 at C, and take No. 3 at C in right hand; then
lift No. 2 at B over between Nos. 1 and 2 at C, and take No. 2 at C in
right hand; then lift No. 1 at B over next to No. 1 at C, and take No. 1
at C in right hand, and then lift those in right hand over to B, and lay
them all down. Braid round to the right till you get to A, then take the
next eight strands, and braid round table to the left; lift No. 1 at C
over between Nos. 1 and 2 at B, and take No. 1 at B in left hand; then
lift No. 2 at C over between Nos. 2 and 3 at B, and take No. 2 at B in
left hand; then lift No. 3 at C over between Nos. 3 and 4 at B, and take
No. 3 at B in left hand; then lift No. 4 at C over next to No. 4 at B,
and take No. 4 at B in left hand, and then lift those in left hand over
to C and lay them all down, and so on round table, taking the next eight
strands, till you get to A. Then you are through the braid, ready to
commence as at first.

[Illustration]

See explanation on page 100.




PLAIN TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number for this braid--four hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift
No. 3 over No. 2; then No. 3 over No. 4; then No. 1 over No. 2; then No.
3 over No. 2. Then go to B and change the same way, and so round the
table to A. Then go to C, and commence with the outside row of figures,
and change the same as you did at A, and so on round the table, when you
will be through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




ACORN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 2, and so
on round table to A; then go to C, take the outside row of figures, and
make the same changes round to A, and repeat alternately at A and C,
until the braid is long enough to cover the bottom of the acorn, and
then commence at A with the inside row of figures; lift No. 3 over No.
2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 2, No. 1 over No.
2, and No. 3 over No. 4, and so on round to A; then go to C, take the
outside row of figures, and make the same changes round to A; then
repeat until the braid is long enough to make the top or bur of the
acorn. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




HALF OPEN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 1 over
between Nos. 2 and 3 at B; then lift No. 1 at B over between Nos. 2 and
3 of the next four strands, and so on round table to the left to A; then
go to C, take the outside row of figures, lift No. 2 over No. 3, No. 2
over No. 1, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4; then No. 3 over No. 4, and No. 2
over No. 1, and so on round the table to the right, till the braid is
finished.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OVERSHOT BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, braid to the
right, lift No. 2 over Nos. 3 and 4, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 3 over
No. 2, and so on round to A; then go to C and repeat the same changes,
with the outside row of figures, round to A; then commence at A with the
inside row of figures, and braid to the left; lift No. 3 over Nos. 1 and
2, No. 4 over No. 3, and No. 2 over No. 3, and so on round to A; then go
to C, and repeat the same changes, with the outside row of figures,
round to A. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




DIAMOND TIGHT BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have Nos. 1
and 2 of white hair, and Nos. 3 and 4 of black hair; lift Nos. 1 and 2
over Nos. 3 and 4, and so on round table to the left, to A; then go to
C, and braid round table to the right; lift Nos. 3 and 4 over Nos. 1 and
2, and so on round table to A. Then you are through the braid, ready to
commence as at first.

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




SPIRAL STRIPED BRAID.


[Illustration]

TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
alternately four strands of white hair and four of black; braid round
table to the left, lift Nos. 1 and 2 over Nos. 3 and 4, and so on round
table to A; then go to C, braid round table to the right, lift Nos. 3
and 4 over Nos. 1 and 2, and so on round to A. Then you are through the
braid, ready to commence as at first.

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




EMPRESS TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, No. 1 over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, and No. 3 over No. 2; braid
round table to the left till you get to A, then go to C, take the
outside row of figures, and braid round to the right; lift Nos. 3 and 4
over Nos. 1 and 2, and so on round to A, and repeat with the inside row
of figures, and then repeat again with the outside row; then you are
through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first. Commence at C
every other time, for you only braid the first change of figures once,
and the last change three times.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN CHECK BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Have one-half the strands white and one-half black, and place
on table alternately, four white and four black. Commence at A, with the
inside row of figures, lift No. 2 over No. 3, No. 2 over No. 1, No. 2
over No. 3, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4, and No. 2 over No. 1. Then go to B
and change the same way, and so on round table to A. Then go to C,
commence with the outside row of figures, and change the same as you did
at A, and so on round the table; then you will be through the braid,
ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




SCOTCH PLAID BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Have one-third the strands white hair, one-third black, and
one-third red, and place on table alternately, four white, four black,
and four red. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 2
over No. 3, No. 2 over No. 1, No. 2 over No. 3, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4,
and No. 2 over No. 1. Then go to B and change the same way, and so on
round table to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of
figures, and change the same as you did at A, and so on round the table;
then you will be through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




HALF OPEN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift No. 3 over
No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 2; braid
half way round the table, and then braid the last half by lifting No. 3
over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 2, No. 1
over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 4, and so on round to A; then go to C and
repeat the same. Then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN STRIPED BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-half the strands white hair, and one-half black, and place
alternately one strand of white, and one strand of black; lift No. 2
over No. 3, No. 2 over No. 1, No. 2 over No. 3, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4,
and No. 2 over No. 1. Then go to B and change the same way, and so on
round table to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of
figures, and change the same as at A, and so on round table; then you
will be through the braid, ready to commence as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




CHINCHILLA OPEN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-half of the strands white hair, and one-half black, and place
alternately two strands of white and two of black; lift No. 2 over No.
3, No. 2 over No. 1, No. 2 over No. 3, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4, and No.
2 over No. 1; then go to B and change the same way, and so on round
table to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of figures, and
change the same as you did at A, and so on round table. Then you will be
through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




FANCY LACE BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-half the strands white hair, and one-half black, and place
alternately two strands of white, and two strands of black; lift No. 3
over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, No. 3 over No. 2, No. 1
over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 4. Then go to B and change the same way,
and so on round to A. Then go to C, commence with the outside row of
figures, and change the same as you did at A, and so on round table;
then you will be through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




STRIPED ELASTIC BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-half the strands white hair, and one-half black, and place
alternately Nos. 1 and 2 of white, and Nos. 3 and 4 of black; lift No. 1
over No. 2, and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2; then repeat with the same
strands, the No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2. Then go to B
and braid the same, and so on round table to A. Then go to C, commence
with the outside row of figures, and braid round to the left; lift No. 1
over No. 2, and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2; then repeat with the same
strands, the same as at A and B, and so on round to A. Then you are
through the braid, ready to commence as at first. After it is braided,
turn the braid inside out.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN STRIPED BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--sixty being the
usual number--fifteen hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-half of the strands white hair, and one-half black, and place
alternately one strand of white and one of black; lift No. 1 over No. 2,
and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2; then repeat with the same strands, the No.
1 over No. 2, and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2. Then go to B and braid the
same, and so on round table to A. Then go to C, commence with the
outside row of figures, and braid round to the left; lift No. 1 over No.
2, and No. 4 over Nos. 3 and 2; then repeat with the same strands, the
same as at A and B, and so on round to A. Then you are through the
braid, ready to commence as at first. After it is braided, turn the
braid inside out.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




WIDE STRIPED BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number,--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-fourth of the strands white hair, and three-fourths black, and place
all the white strands on one side of the table, and all of the black on
the other side; lift No. 2 over No. 3, No. 2 over No. 1, No. 2 over No.
3, Nos. 2 and 3 over No. 4, and No. 2 over No. 1. Then go to B and
change the same way, and so on round table to A. Then go to C, commence
with the outside row of figures, and change the same as at A, and so on
round table; then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




NEAPOLITAN TIGHT BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number--four hairs in a strand, and place on table like
pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, and have
one-fourth of the strands white hair, and three-fourths black,--the Nos.
1 white, and the Nos. 2, 3 and 4 black; lift No. 3 over No. 2, No. 3
over No. 4, No. 1 over No. 2, and No. 3 over No. 2. Then go to B and
change the same way, and so on round table to A. Then go to C, commence
with the outside row of figures, and change the same as at A, and so on
round table; then you are through the braid, ready to commence as at
first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying it
so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five minutes,
and take it out and put it in an oven as hot as it will bear without
burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




OPEN BRAID.


TAKE any number of strands that can be divided by four,--eighty being
the usual number for this braid--four hairs in a strand, and place on
table like pattern. Commence at A, with the inside row of figures, lift
No. 3 over No. 2; then No. 3 over No. 4; then No. 1 over No. 2; then No.
3 over No. 2. Then go to B and change the same way, and so round the
table to A. Then go to C, and commence with the outside row of figures,
and change the same as you did at A, and so on round the table, when you
will be through the braid, ready to commence at A, as at first.

[Illustration]

Braid this over a round stick, the size you want the braid for use,
varying the number of strands according to the size of the stick; then
slip the braid from the stick on to the mold you wish to use, tying the
braid so it will fit the mold exactly, and then boil in water five
minutes, and take it out and put it in an oven, as hot as it will bear
without burning, until it is quite dry. Then it is ready for use.




DIRECTIONS FOR NEW BEGINNERS.


The hair to be used in braiding should be combed perfectly straight, and
tied with a string at the roots, to prevent wasting. Then count the
number of hairs for a strand, and pull it out from the tips, dip it in
water and draw it between the thumb and finger to make it lie smoothly;
then tie a solid, single knot at one end, the same as you would with a
sewing thread.


THE BOBBIN.

To prepare the bobbin for the hair, wind it with white thread, as shown
in the plate, and fasten it with a slip-knot over the knob, leaving an
end of some three inches, with a solid knot tied at the end of it. To
adjust the hair to the bobbins, take the prepared strands of hair and
tie the knotted ends in a square knot to the ends of the strings on the
bobbins. When each strand is thus prepared and tied to the bobbin
strings, place them even, and tie the ends with a string to prevent
their slipping.

See cut of Bobbins on another page.


HOW TO PLACE THEM ON THE TABLE-COVER FOR BRAIDING.

Place the strands across the table-cover, over the numbers, as shown in
the diagram, and fasten a weight to the end of them, under the table,
through the center of cover; then tie the mold or form to be braided,
around in the center, and you are ready for braiding.

For further reference, see plate of table, with explanations.




[Illustration: BRAIDING TABLE.

No. 1.]


The Table Cover, as shown in diagram No. 1, represents the under side of
the cover, showing the rim that fits over the cap, allowing the cover to
revolve, for the convenience of the braider. The cavity through the
cover and cap allows the braid, with the weight attached, to pass
through as fast as braided.

For reference see Braiding Table complete, with bobbins and weights
attached, on page 124.




[Illustration: BRAIDING TABLE

No. 2.]


The above cut represents Braiding Table No. 2, complete, showing the
strands over the cover, with Bobbins attached; also, the weight attached
to the braid, showing the manner of its passing through the table.

[Illustration: BRAIDING TABLE AND POSITION IN BRAIDING.]




[Illustration: WOOD BRAIDING BOBBINS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The above cut shows the Wood Bobbins, for fine open work or tight
braids. No. 1 is used for braiding any pattern of from one to four hairs
in a strand. No. 2 is used for braiding any pattern of from five to
twenty hairs in a strand. To prepare the Bobbins for use, see
explanations on page 121.




[Illustration: LEAD BOBBINS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The above cut shows the size and shape of the Lead Bobbins. The No. 1
size is used for braiding Rings and Chains, that have but few hairs in a
strand--from twenty to forty. No. 2 is used for braiding Chains that
have from forty to one hundred hairs in a strand. Either size will
answer for any pattern of Chain or Ring, but to vary the size of the
Bobbin according to the number of hairs in a strand, gives it a nicer
finish. To prepare the Bobbin, wind it with thread, as shown in the cut,
leaving the thread some three inches long, with a solid knot tied at the
end.




[Illustration: LEAD WEIGHT.]


The above cut shows the weight used for drawing the work through the
center of the table as fast as braided, and to balance the bobbins.
Attention should be given to have the weight balance the bobbins
properly, as too great a weight will make the braid loose, or too light
a weight will leave it rough. Use any number of weights required to
balance the bobbins.




[Illustration: FORMS FOR BRAIDING OVER.

No. 1. No. 2. No. 3. No. 4.]


The above cuts are made of wire and wood, for braiding over. The Nos. 1
and 2 are for braiding chains over--the No. 1 for small chains, and the
No. 2 for large sizes. No. 3 is used for braiding tight or open work
braids, of from thirty to forty strands. No. 4 is used for the same
braids, with from forty to sixty strands in a braid. The mold may be
made any length, to accommodate the work.




[Illustration: FORMS FOR BRAIDING OVER.

No. 5. No. 6. No. 7.]


The above cuts show the size of forms used for tight or open work
braids. The No. 5 is used for braids of from sixty to eighty strands,
No. 6 of from eighty to one hundred, and No. 7 from one hundred to one
hundred and twenty, according to the fineness of the braid.




[Illustration: EXPLANATIONS ON BRACELETS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The above cuts represent the completed Bracelet Braid. The No. 1 is
formed from fourteen small braids, braided according to diagram and
explanation on page 104,--using, however, but thirty-two strands,
instead of eighty.

After you have the small braids all completed and prepared, as required
in the explanation, sew them together at one end, so they all lie smooth
and flat, then divide them off in twos, using each two as one strand,
and plait them together; commence at the right side, take one strand at
a time, and lift over one and under two till you get to the center, then
commence on the left side and braid the same way, and so on till
finished. Then sew the ends well, trim them, and put on a little shellac
to fasten them in the clasps.

No. 2 is from the same pattern, and is prepared and finished up in the
same manner. For this Bracelet you use fifteen small braids, divide them
into threes for each strand, and lift over one and under one, from each
side to the center.




[Illustration: EXPLANATIONS ON BRACELETS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The No. 1 cut of the above Bracelet Braids, is formed from patterns on
pages 87 and 97, and instead of using forty and sixty strands, use but
thirty-two for each. Braid six small braids from pattern on page 87, and
three from pattern on page 97. Sew them tight together at one end,
divide them off in threes, with the open work braid between the two
tight ones, use each three as one strand, and plait them together in a
common three strand braid.

No. 2 is braided according to pattern on page 89. Have three of the
braids, sew them fast at one end, and then twist them carefully and
evenly together; then sew and fasten with shellac, and it is ready for
being gold mounted.




[Illustration: EXPLANATIONS ON BRACELETS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The No. 1 cut of the above Bracelet Braids, is formed from patterns on
pages 26 and 86. Have two small braids from each of the patterns, lay
them side by side, as in cut, and sew them firmly together, either with
some of the hair, or with very fine silk of the same color. Then sew and
trim the ends, and fasten with shellac.

No. 2 is braided from patterns on pages 18 and 86. Have four small
braids like pattern on page 18, and two like pattern on page 86. Place
them side by side, as in cut, and prepare and finish up the same as in
the above.




[Illustration: EXPLANATIONS ON BRACELETS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The patterns used for the No. 1, represented above, are found on pages
63 and 95. Have one braid from pattern on page 63, and two from that on
page 95. Place them side by side, as in cut, sew the ends firmly
together, either with some of the hair, or with very fine silk of the
same color. Then sew and trim the ends, and fasten with shellac.

For the No. 2, use two small braids from pattern on page 18, one from
pattern on page 63, and two from pattern on page 95. Place them as in
cut, sew them together, and prepare the same as No. 1.




[Illustration: EXPLANATIONS ON BRACELETS.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The No. 1 of the above Bracelet Braids, is made up of two small braids
from pattern on page 97, and three from pattern on page 101, using,
however, but thirty-two strands, instead of sixty. Place them side by
side, as in cut, and sew them together with some of the hair, or with
fine silk of the same color. Sew, trim and shellac the ends, and they
are ready for the gold mounting.

No. 2 is formed of four small braids, from pattern on page 97, and is
prepared, sewed and finished up the same as No. 1.




LITHOGRAPHED DESIGNS.


The following Lithographic designs of Hair Jewelry, Flowers and
Pictures, are given for the purpose of showing a few of the many
beautiful forms into which the human hair may be transposed. Each and
every one of the devices on the following pages, with the exception of
the flowers and pictures, can be braided from the diagrams and
explanations given in the first one hundred and twenty pages of this
book. Select any article you may wish to make, and by referring to the
patterns, you can easily find the style and directions whereby to braid
it. We might have given twice the number of patterns, or even more, but
any person can, after a little experience, readily invent new and
different styles of braids, and by so doing, each can satisfy their own
peculiar taste.

The making of Hair Flowers is very simple, and yet, of course, every one
has first to learn it. Supply yourself with as many different colors of
hair as you can, and by applying Gum Tragacanth, it renders it capable
of being cut in any shape you may wish--such as leaves, twigs, buds,
&c., and by judiciously arranging the colors, the effect will be very
pleasing. Pictures are made in the same manner, and any one possessing
the least artistic skill, can make any flower or picture they may
desire, and many pleasing adornments and lasting mementos may thereby be
had.

All articles intended to be worn as jewelry, should, of course, be
mounted with gold, and as this kind of work is not done in all jewelry
establishments, I wish to say that my facilities for this branch of
business is complete, and the work done is in the best possible manner.
I can guarantee satisfaction in all cases, let the style desired be what
it may. In sending braids to be mounted, draw on paper, as near as can
be, the style or design you want.




[Illustration: M. CAMPBELL'S,

DESIGNS

OF

HAIR

JEWELRY.]

[Transcriber's Note: For this text edition, fifty instances of
the [Illustration] tag were removed at this point. This was done in an
effort to make reading the text less tedious. The actual illustrations
can, of course, be seen in the HTML edition of this text.]






WEAVING HAIR FOR SWITCHES.


[Illustration]

The above cut represents the apparatus used for weaving hair into
Switches, Curls, Wigs, &c. It is a very simple arrangement, and can be
easily constructed. Provide two straight sticks, about twelve inches
long, and in one of them bore three small holes, two inches apart, in
which to place as many thumb-screws, to be used for tightening or
loosening the cords; in the other, have a single wooden pin or nail, to
fasten the cords to. Place the sticks in a firm, upright position, about
three feet apart, either by boring holes through a table, or by using
mortised blocks, such as is plainly shown in cut, at the right end.
After placing them in position, put on three cords, as shown in diagram,
numbered 1, 2 and 3. For this weft use linen thread, at Nos. 1, 2 and 3.

In commencing to weave, place the hair between two cards, as shown in
diagram, and draw out with the right hand, between the thumb and
fore-finger, the quantity of hair required for the size of the weft;
then change it into the left hand, and place it up to the threads, Nos.
1, 2 and 3, as shown in diagram; lay the strand over No. 1, under No. 2,
over No. 3, around under No. 3, over Nos. 2 and 1, around under Nos. 1
and 2, over No. 3, around under Nos. 3 and 2, and over No. 1. Then push
the strands together, as in cut.




[Illustration: SEWING SWITCHES.

No. 1. No. 2.]


The No. 1 of the above cuts represents the winding and sewing of the
switch after it is woven. For sewing a switch on points, after weaving,
take Berlin cord, about one-sixteenth of an inch thick, and tie a solid
knot at the end, and sew the end of the weft to the knotted end of the
cord; then wind the weft around the cord, as shown in cut, the length of
point desired, turning the end of the cord over to form a loop. Cut the
weft according to the number of points desired in the switch. Cut No. 2
shows the switch all complete.




WEAVING HAIR FOR CURLS.


[Illustration]

In commencing to weave, place the hair between two cards, or stiff
brushes, as shown in diagram, pressing them tight together, so that in
drawing out, it is perfectly free from tangles; draw out with the right
hand, between the thumb and fore-finger, the quantity of hair required
for the size of the weft; then change it into the left hand, and lift it
up to the No. 1 cord, as shown in diagram; lay the strand over No. 1,
under No. 2, over No. 3, around under No. 3, over Nos. 2 and 1, around
under Nos. 1 and 2, over No. 3, around under No. 3, over No. 2, and
under No. 1. Then push the strands together, as shown in diagram. For
this weft use fine, strong linen thread.




MAKING AND PREPARING CURLS.


[Illustration: No. 1.]

[Illustration: No. 2.]

After weaving, according to directions on page 241, take a piece of
ribbon an inch wide, the same color of hair, and as long as you wish the
curls to be in width, and sew the weft to it back and forth. After that
is done, pipe them, which is done in this manner: Dampen the hair, comb
each curl out straight, and wind it tightly on a rattan stick about four
inches long, having each curl on a separate stick, and commencing to
wind at the tip end, tying them firmly to keep in place. Then boil in
water for thirty minutes, and place in an oven as hot as they will bear
without burning, until quite dry. When dry and perfectly cool, take them
off the sticks, and smooth over a curling iron, the size you wish the
curls. Side curls and frizzes should be prepared the same way.

Cut No. 2 represents a set of Curls and Puffs. For explanation of Puffs,
see page 245.




WEAVING HAIR FOR WIGS.


[Illustration]

In commencing to weave, place the hair between two cards, or stiff
brushes, as shown in diagram, pressing them tight together, so that in
drawing out, it is perfectly free from tangles; draw out with the right
hand, between the thumb and fore-finger, the quantity of hair required
for the size of the weft; then change it into the left hand, and lift it
up to the No. 1 cord, as shown in diagram; lay the strand over No. 1,
under No. 2, over No. 3, around under No. 3, over Nos. 2 and 1, around
under Nos. 1 and 2, over No. 3, around under No. 3, over Nos. 2 and 1,
around under Nos. 1 and 2, over No. 3 around under Nos. 3 and 2, and
over No. 1. Then push the strands together, as shown in diagram. For
this weft use sewing silk.


WEAVING HAIR FOR WATERFALLS AND BOWS

Prepare the same as above, and place the strand under No. 1, over Nos. 2
and 3, around under Nos. 3 and 2, over No. 1, around under Nos. 1 and 2,
over No. 3, around under No. 3, and over Nos. 2 and 1. Aside from these
changes, follow directions given above.




MAKING WATERFALLS AND BOWS.


[Illustration: No. 1.]

[Illustration: No. 2.]

[Illustration: No. 3.]

In making a Chignon, you have first to make the cushion. Take the
combings or waste hair, which is of no other use, and place it between
the cards or stiff brushes, the same as for weaving. Use the weaving
apparatus, with two piping cords, instead of three small ones, and wind
the hair all up, by passing over, between and under the cords. Boil and
dry it, and then pull out the cord, which leaves it all crimped, ready
to weave, according to directions on page 239. Then sew it on a cord,
the same as a switch, and form it in any shape you desire, for a
Waterfall, Bow or Puffs. This completes the cushion. Then weave the long
hair for the covering, according to directions on page 243, and sew it
to the top end of the cushion; comb it out smooth, cover the cushion,
and tie a cord around it immediately at the bottom; then bring up the
end of the hair, and pin it to the inside. Cut No. 1 is intended to
represent the cushion, and No. 2 the complete Waterfall.

Cut No. 3 represents the Bow, which is made in the same manner, by using
two small cushions, like cut No. 1, and placing between them a strand of
smooth or braided hair.




MAKING PUFFS AND COILS.


[Illustration: No. 1.]

[Illustration: No. 2.]

[Illustration: No. 3.]

To make Puffs for front of head, from false hair, similar to cut No. 1,
weave hair from eight to twelve inches long, according to directions on
page 241; then take a ribbon, about one and a half inches wide, any
length required, and tack it on a wig block, or straight piece of board,
and sew the weft crossways a quarter of an inch apart, till the ribbon
is entirely covered; then divide it off in as many puffs as desired,
comb each out straight, and wind it over the two fore-fingers, close up
to ribbon, and put in a hair-pin to retain it.

To make Puffs for back of head, cut No. 2, prepare the same way; make
the foundation the shape and size you wish the puffs, and sew it on the
same way you want the puffs to run. The puffs may be made over a
cushion, formed of crimped hair the shape wanted, and wound over that
instead of the fingers. Ladies not wearing false hair, can have her own
hair dressed by following the above directions.

Cut No. 3 represents a coil, which is made from a switch, and wound over
a long roll of crimped hair. They are much nicer, but more expensive, by
being made altogether from a switch, as that can be twisted into a rope
or braided, before coiling.




EXPLANATIONS ON HAIR DRESSING.


I herewith present, on the following pages, a number of engravings
illustrative of a few of the many styles of Hair Dressing, accompanied
with explanatory remarks as to their execution. They are the latest and
most fashionable European and American styles, and will prove
indispensable to every lady's toilet, as, from the explanations, they
will be able, with very little practice, to dress their own hair in any
desired style; and when any new style is inaugurated, after studying and
practicing the directions given with each illustration, she will find it
an easy matter to arrange it accordingly.

Any one learning Hair Dressing, should acquire perfectly the execution
of the first pattern--the Promenade Head-Dress--as that is very easily
arranged, and when you have once executed it in a perfect manner, the
others will prove comparatively easy.

The manner of dressing the hair at the present day calls for much
attention, and many inquiries are addressed us on the subject. It is
plain, however, that what would correspond with the complexion and
physiognomy of one, would certainly have a distasteful appearance on
another; consequently, in answering inquiries, I can do nothing more
than give the different styles worn. Before giving my illustrations on
Hair Dressing, I have given instructions how to weave hair for chignons,
curls, switches, &c., and how to put them in shape, and with the
directions given with each illustration on Hair Dressing, it will
certainly be an easy task to arrange the hair in any style that is now
or may be in fashion.

[Illustration: PROMENADE HEAD-DRESS.]

Our first cut represents the Promenade Head-Dress, but is worn as
frequently in the drawing-room, and even at public and private
assemblies--in fact, a common and very pretty style.

EXPLANATION: Comb the front hair between the temples straight back, over
a cushion of crimped hair, forming a Chignon; then make two braids of
two small switches, and place one of them over the top of the Chignon,
and the other across the forehead, forming a diadem, turning the ends
under; then comb the hair from temples over the braids, and put back
under the Chignon, and fasten. Place a net of pearl or gilt beads over
the Chignon, as in cut. You can use false hair for covering cushion, if
desired.

[Illustration: RECEPTION HEAD-DRESS.]

This Head-Dress is a most charming composition, and entirely new. It is
adapted either for a brown or fair complexion, to be worn at grand
dinners or receptions. Ornamented with pearl or gilt, it is in good
taste for evening parties.

EXPLANATION: Curl the hair across forehead, or use false curls, combing
the hair straight back, and form a chignon of curls at the back. Place a
diadem plait across forehead, and raise the hair from the temples over
the plait. Trim with roses and ribbans, or to suit dress.

[Illustration: SOIREE OR EVENING HEAD-DRESS.]

This cut illustrates the Soiree or Evening Head-Dress. It is a very
unique and modern style, suited for almost any complexion, and very
easily executed.

EXPLANATION: Comb the hair straight back between the temples, tie it,
and curl the ends, or use a set of long false curls. Place a diadem
plait, made from a switch, across the forehead; then comb the hair back
from the temples, over the ends of the plait, twist it, pass it back
under the curls, and fasten firmly. Use a fancy back-comb on top of
curls, and pin an ornament to diadem plait, with feather and chain
attached, as in cut, or trim to suit dress.


[Illustration: GRAND EVENING PARTY HEAD-DRESS.]

A very graceful Head-Dress, of a bold style, suited for a young lady of
brown or fair complexion, and is in good taste to be worn at the theatre
or Grand Evening Parties.

EXPLANATION: Make a parting over the head, from ear to ear, two inches
from front; on the forehead, between the temples, curl the hair in small
friz curls, and from the temple to the ear, make loose puffs. Divide the
hair in three partings over the head, and roll each in a large puff;
then form a large puff of the back hair, round the nape of the neck, as
in cut. Fasten a large set of loose curls over the puff, with a comb or
other ornament. For reference, see page 245.

[Illustration: EMPRESS HEAD-DRESS.]

A charming Head-Dress, and entirely new, perfectly suiting a fair
complexion. It may serve for the theatre or evening parties. When
powdered it preferably suits a brown or brunette.

EXPLANATION: Make a front parting, and a cross one from ear to ear.
Divide each side into five parts; of the front parting make three puffs
on each side. The remaining four make into long puffs, as in cut,
according to explanations on page 245. The back hair may be arranged in
the same style of puffs, or with a double Chignon, placing a single,
long false curl or braid, back of each ear. Trim with orange leaves, or
to suit dress.


[Illustration: PARISIAN HEAD-DRESS.]

This Head-Dress, both bold and graceful, is suitable for any complexion
or age, when the physiognomy allows it.

EXPLANATION: Comb back the hair from the forehead between the temples,
make a large puff on the temples, and three puffs above each ear. Place
a cushion at the back of head, and comb the hair over it, forming a
chignon; then place a diadem plait, or twist, made from a large switch,
round on the top of head, trimmed with leaves or ribbon, as shown in
cut.


[Illustration: THE APOLLO HEAD-DRESS.]

This Head-Dress is one of the most graceful styles. It was worn in the
time of Louis XIVth, and well agrees with the fashion of the present
day. With some modifications, it is suited to every complexion.

EXPLANATION: Crimp the front hair, and raise it over the temples with a
puff comb. Comb the hair just above the ear back, and friz the ends, and
curl the back hair in large flowing curls, as shown in the cut.


[Illustration: THE MODERN HEAD-DRESS.]

A Head-Dress of elegant composition, coming down from antiquity,
suitable for a young and pretty woman, and perfectly agreeing with a
fair complexion.

EXPLANATION: Part the hair from temple to temple, one inch from front,
comb it up on the forehead, and curl the ends in small snap curls; then
comb the hair back from the temples, and form a loose puff. Make three
partings across the head, and form a puff of each. Of the back hair,
make a braided or plaited chignon, with a few friz curls underneath;
then make two puffs back of the ear, as shown in cut. Wear a fancy comb
or band over the top of chignon.


[Illustration: EVENING PROMENADE HEAD-DRESS.]

A Head-Dress of extraordinary simplicity, and of a most genteel kind,
becoming a dark complexion. It may be adapted for the opera by changing
the trimming.

EXPLANATION: First crimp all the hair, then place a cushion high up
under the hair at the back, forming a chignon, and friz the ends of the
hair from ear to ear under the chignon. Tuck the hair high up on the
forehead, place bands of ribbon over the head with a net at the back,
and bring the hair above the ear up, and fasten to the ribbon. Pin a
ribbon streamer to the net, as in cut.


[Illustration: THE SHEPHERDESS HEAD-DRESS.]

An elegant Head-Dress, and was worn in the time of Louis XVI, for balls
and evening parties, or as a disguise when powdered.

EXPLANATION: Separate the hair across the head from ear to ear, three
inches from front, and roll it in puffs according to directions on page
245. Do up the back hair in a double chignon, either with your own or
false hair; add a set of false curls underneath the chignon, extending
from ear to ear. Trim to suit dress with leaves, flowers and ribbon, as
shown in illustration.


[Illustration: COURT HEAD-DRESS.]

A rich Head-Dress, having a great stamp of distinction, and for that
reason will be adapted for a Court Head-Dress, or Grand Evening Parties.

EXPLANATION: Make a parting over the head from ear to ear, two inches
from front, and form a row of nine small puffs over the forehead. Comb
the remaining hair back, and divide into four partings around the head,
and form each parting in a large puff, as in cut. Add a few small friz
curls and orange blossoms between the puffs. For reference see page
245.


[Illustration: YOUNG BRIDE'S HEAD-DRESS.]

An exquisite Head-Dress, of a very graceful style, and well agreeing
with a fair or brown complexion, to be worn by a young bride, or at
grand assemblies.

EXPLANATION: Comb the hair back and place a set of small loose curls
across the forehead; place a diadem plait over the top of the curls, and
comb the hair off the temples over the ends of the plait, and form a
chignon or bow of the back hair, and place a three-strand braid around
the chignon, made either from the ends of hair from the temple or a
switch. Add a crown of white blossoms and a veil, as shown in the
engraving. If not for a bride, trim to match dress.


[Illustration: NEAPOLITAN HEAD-DRESS.]

An exquisite Head-Dress, of exceedingly graceful and modern style,
agreeing with nearly every complexion; may be worn as a promenade or at
small parties.

EXPLANATION: Part the hair from front to crown, and from ear to ear;
crimp the front, and braid the ends in a three-strand braid, and trim
the ends with ribbon. Either braid or twist the back hair, and form into
a coil. Place a small plait across the forehead, as shown in the
engraving. Deck the hair with flowers or beads, to suit the occasion.




SYNOPTIC OF HUMAN HAIR.


In placing before the public the only book ever published in the "Art of
Hair Work," it is but due to the purchasers of it to say something in
relation to the trade in Human Hair. It is not my intention, however, to
enter into an extended detail and complete history, but simply give a
few items that will serve to show what enormous strides have been taken
within the last few years in this branch of business. It is a business
that but few know anything about--at least in this country, for it is
comparatively new here--but it is one that is very rapidly increasing,
and is now almost doubling itself each year.

The larger quantity, in fact nearly the whole amount of hair retailed in
this country is imported from Europe, where the dealing in human hair
has been made an established and legitimate business for years, and a
great deal of attention is paid in purchasing and preparing it for the
market. Paris is the greatest market for the sale of human hair in the
world; but the amount of superfluous hair used and worn throughout all
Europe, could we give the figures, would seem incredible. The amount
imported to the United States in the years of 1859 and 1860 was not far
from 150,000 and 200,000 pounds, which was valued at that time at from
$800,000 to $1,000,000. Since that time it has been steadily increasing,
and the amount imported last year may be set down at three times as much
as during the years above mentioned. Paris also finds as great a sale
for the article in Russia as in America--the shipments to each being
about equal. Thus, it will be seen, that if all the hair reserved in
Europe for the home demand were added to that which is imported, the
amount would be almost beyond conception; and yet, but about one-tenth
part of the whole production ever leaves its native country.

It is mostly procured from the markets of France, Italy, Russia and
Germany, and large quantities are obtained from Norway and Sweden.

The Norwegians were among the first to make ornaments of hair to be worn
as jewelry, but, in a great measure, we are indebted to the French for
the perfection to which the art has attained. Of the different varieties
of hair, that which is obtained in France and Italy is by far the best,
being of a much finer texture, even color, and of a more glossy
appearance than that from other countries.

The principal requirement in hair to make it valuable is length, and
after it is thrown upon the market it is all assorted--the long from the
short--which is a task of extreme difficulty.

The prices of hair range all the way from $15 to $200 per pound, (a wide
range, but certainly not too large,) and is rated according to hue,
length and texture. The smallest price paid is for the short, coarse
hair of the poorest quality, and which can be used only for certain
purposes. Hair of the ordinary colors range in price from $15 to $100
per pound, but that of gray and white from $100 to $200 per pound, and
even then is not considered exorbitant. In fact, hair is worth any and
all prices. We know of one dealer who had in his possession a very small
quantity, weighing but a half pound and measuring seventy inches, for
which he was offered _four hundred dollars!_ and, strange as it may
appear, he refused to accept it. White hair is mostly obtained by being
picked from the gray, and it not unfrequently happens that many hundred
pounds have to be assorted before being able to secure one single pound
of pure white. It is mainly used in the manufacture of wigs, and it
frequently puzzles the dealer to prepare one for a customer that will
exactly match, and this, with the scarcity of the article, cause the
extraordinary price.

Hair is shipped in both a prepared and unprepared state. That which is
prepared undergoes a process of washing, scouring and cleansing, which
leaves it in the nicest possible state; all the oil, dirt and other
unhealthy substances are completely separated from it, leaving it
perfectly free from all unhealthy influences. That which is shipped in
an unprepared, or raw state, is subjected to the same process of
cleansing after its arrival, and it is so thorough that it is altogether
impossible for anything except the hair to remain. It has frequently
been examined with a microscope, which has proved in every case how
successful the cleansing process had been, for it revealed nothing
whatever of a foreign nature, and, in fact, after its extraordinary
cleaning it would be simply impossible.

After being fully prepared it is then made into switches, curls, plaits,
fronts, wigs, chignons, and not a small amount is used in the
manufacture of hair jewelry, and such other articles as are worn for
ornaments. The jewelry manufactured at this time is as durable as the
all gold jewelry, and is done in a style of surpassing neatness, thus
rendering it beautiful, either as an ornament or memento. There are but
very few places in the United States where hair jewelry is made, and as
it is comparatively a new business, but few have learned it. It is
surprising, however, to notice the many beautiful patterns and elegant
designs into which it is transformed. There is nothing in the way of
jewelry or ornament of any description but what is or may be made from
human hair; and, after being gold-mounted, the contrast between them
makes the hair jewelry preferable to the all gold.

There are many strange incidents related of the human hair suddenly
changing its color--many of which it is hard to believe--and the causes
assigned are various. We are told of persons who, from excessive grief,
found their hair had gradually changed from a dark brown to an almost
perfect white; others, from the same cause, in the short space of one
week discovered their hair plentifully streaked with grey, giving them
the appearance, although young, of being quite old. Many have had their
hair change on account of extreme fright, but we have now to give the
first instance we have ever heard of its turning from white to that of
any other color, except by the aid of dyes.

A Parisian, M. Stanislaus Martin, has published in the _Bulletin de
Therapeutique_ the curious case of a worker in metals who had wrought in
copper only five months, and whose hair, which was lately white, is now
of so decided a _green_ that the man cannot appear in the street without
immediately becoming the object of general curiosity. He is perfectly
well, his hair alone being affected by the copper, notwithstanding the
precautions taken by him to protect it from the action of the metal.
Chemical analysis shows that his hair contains a notable quantity of
acetate of copper, and that it is to this circumstance that it owes its
beautiful green color, which is most singular and remarkable.

The practice of wearing false hair, although it was not generally dealt
in as traffic, has been in vogue many hundred years. The Greek and Roman
ladies were, in olden times, as active in their toilet for the head as
the fashionable ladies of the present day, and false hair was always
brought into requisition, which was then obtained from the Germans, and
they in turn from their slaves.

Powdering the hair, which is now the rage in all fashionable circles, is
also an ancient practice, and was as much indulged in by the men as the
women. History tells us that the consumption of hair powder by the
soldiers of George II was enormous. It was calculated, that inasmuch as
the military force of England and the colonies was, including cavalry,
infantry, militia and fensibles, 250,000, each man used a pound of flour
a week, simply for powdering their hair. The quantity consumed in this
way was 6,500 tons per annum; an amount sufficient to sustain 30,000
persons on bread. Gold and silver hair powder was also plentifully used,
and at a time much earlier in the world's history, than is generally
supposed. Josephus relates that Solomon's horse-guards daily strewed
their heads with gold-dust, which glittered in the sun; and there are
similar instances of different personages recorded in the bible.

The human hair seems to have been given us both for an ornament and
covering--being susceptible of transformation in almost any desired
shape, and apparently indispensable for covering and protecting the
head. The ancient Greeks were very partial to long hair, considering it
by far the more becoming; but the Egyptians regarded it as an
incumbrance, shaved their heads, and substituted wigs. The ancients,
generally speaking, strangely considered a fine head of hair so
desirable, that it became sacred. They frequently dedicated it to the
gods, on important occasions of marriage, victory, escape from death and
danger, and the burial of friends. Different styles of wearing the hair,
was resorted to for denoting the various grades, or positions in life,
of the people, some wearing it quite long, others short, and some
dressing it in a peculiar manner,--each style, or length, being
according to the condition, wealth, or social standing of the wearer.
Plucking it out, or neglecting it, was a token of affliction.

Hair contains a very small quantity of water, manganese, iron, and
various salts of lime, which have been found by the various methods of
analyzation, and it is owing to these properties that it is peculiarly
indestructible. It has been found on mummies, more than twenty centuries
old, in a perfect and unaltered state, and many instances are related,
which are now admitted to be facts, of the hair continuing to grow, for
a time, after death.

There has never before been a book written and published, that was
particularly dedicated to the subject of Hair, and as the field is a
vast one, both as regards the importance of the subject, and the
information to be gained thereby, it is simply strange that no one has
ever entered it. It has been too long neglected, and the increasing
necessity for a treatise of this kind, has been pressed upon the
attention of the author, and induced the publication of this work, which
will certainly meet the necessities of the age.

There is much else that might be said on this subject that would prove
both interesting and instructive, but we prefer for the present to let
it rest. We have endeavored in preparing this book both to instruct and
amuse; for, by following its instructions, it may be made to be
profitable and highly remunerative, and in making articles, either for
gifts, mementoes, or otherwise, it will certainly be amusing and
entertaining. We have given the instructions in a way that all may
readily understand, and as the patterns are numerous, and the designs
elegant, we think there can be nothing lacking to make the book all it
claims to be.

The principal offices for the sale of these books, will be at my
establishments, No. 737 Broadway, New York, and No. 81 South Clark
Street, Chicago.

[Illustration]




RETAIL DEPARTMENT.


[Illustration]

In placing before the trade my list of Hair Jewelry and Hair Goods, I
beg sincerely to thank my customers for the increasing support I have
received from them, and let them be assured I shall do all on my part to
merit a continuance of the same. The following is a list of some of the
leading articles I import, manufacture and sell, at wholesale and
retail, and at prices less than can be found in any other House on this
continent. I import

    HUMAN HAIR OF THE FINEST QUALITY!

of every length and shade, prepared and unprepared, _which I furnish the
trade at low prices_:

  _Hair Jewelry, Gold Mountings for Hair Jewelry, Gent's Wigs and Toupees,
  Ladies' Wigs, Switches, Braids, Curls, Waterfalls, Frizettes, Coils, Bows,
  Fronts, Scratches, Bands, Hair-Nets, Ornamental Hair, Partings,
  Whiskers, Beards, Mustaches, Puffs, Curling-Irons,
  Curling-Sticks, Crimping-Irons, Perfumery, Pomades
  and Creams, Soaps, Hair Brushes, Combs,
  Hair Oils, Cosmetiques, Crimping-Pins._


"CHREVOLION," FOR THE HAIR!

For restoring the growth and natural color of the hair, and beautifying
the complexion.

    FACE POWDERS,
      ROUGES AND
        FRENCH ENAMEL.
          HAIR POWDERS--
            DIAMOND POWDER,
               GOLD POWDER,
                 SILVER POWDER.


Wig Material, and Tools of Every Description!

In conclusion, I again renew my thanks to my customers, and trust, by
the best attention to all orders, to give them increased satisfaction,
as well as to merit the support of any portion of the trade who have not
heretofore favored me with their commands. All orders sent by mail,
accompanied by a Post Office Certificate, will be promptly filled and a
safe return guaranteed.




WIG MANUFACTORY.

[Illustration]

WIGS! TOUPEES! SWITCHES! CURLS!


The great success I have met with, and the rapidly increasing demand for
Goods of my manufacture, is owing mainly to the superior quality of hair
which I import exclusively for my trade, and the superior workmanship in
their manufacture.


_WIGS! WIGS! WIGS! WIGS!_

I have the largest assortment of Wigs in the United States, and
manufacture to order any and every style.


GENT'S WIGS AND TOUPEES,

ventilated on Human Hair gauze or silk seams. Weft Wigs and Toupees,
with or without seams, of straight or natural curly hair.


LADIES' WIGS,

short or long glossy hair, straight, natural curly or frizzed. Also
Fronts and Bandoes.

[Illustration: Directions for Measuring the Head for a Wig.

No. 1--The circumference of the Head.

No. 2--From Forehead to Nape.

No. 3--From Ear to Ear, across the Forehead.

No. 4--From Ear to Ear, over the top of the Head.

No. 5--From Temple to Temple, round back of the Head.]

To measure for Toupee or Scratch, cut a piece of paper the exact size
and shape of bald spot. Send your orders according to the above
directions, and we will warrant a fit.


I OFFER TO THE PUBLIC THE LARGEST ASSORTMENT

of SWITCHES, CURLS, BRAIDS and FRIZZETTES, to be found in any
establishment in America, and

    DEFY COMPETITION IN QUALITY AND PRICE.




MANUFACTURING DEPARTMENT.

[Illustration: GOLD JEWELRY MANUFACTORY.]

[Illustration: HAIR BRAIDING ROOMS.]


I manufacture and sell, at WHOLESALE and RETAIL,

    HAIR JEWELRY
    AND
    _GOLD MOUNTINGS FOR HAIR JEWELRY_,
    OF EVERY PATTERN AND DEVICE,

to suit the fancy of my patrons. I have given years of study and
practical experience to this branch of my business, and have so
perfected and enlarged my MANUFACTURING FACILITIES, as to feel confident
of being able to give entire satisfaction, in workmanship and price. I
furnish or make the

    Gold Mountings for Hair Jewelry,

of any style or pattern desired. I also furnish the braids separate from
the mountings, or the two complete.

Persons buying books, and wishing to procure

    _BRAIDING TABLES,_
    _WEIGHTS,_
    _BOBBINS,_
    _MOULDS_
    _OR FORMS,_

will be supplied at very low rates. For the accommodation of my trade, I
have made arrangements to have braiding tools and material


MANUFACTURED IN VERY LARGE QUANTITIES,

which I will furnish at prices sufficient only to cover the cost of
manufacture and transportation.




CAMPBELL'S CHREVOLION.

[Illustration]


CAMPBELL'S CHREVOLION

FOR

_Restoring the COLOR and Growth of the Hair, Purifying, Whitening and
Beautifying the Complexion._


IT IS A PREVENTIVE AND SURE CURE FOR BALDNESS,

_Cleansing the Scalp of Dandruff and all Impurities, Invigorating the
Roots of the Hair, giving it Life, Health, and its_

    NATURAL COLOR.


IT IS A SURE CURE FOR ROUGH SKIN, FRECKLES, SUNBURN, AND ALL IMPURITIES
OF THE COMPLEXION.




CAMPBELL'S CHREVOLION.

[Illustration: M. Campbell's Chrevolion Manufactory.]

[Illustration: BEFORE USING]

[Illustration: AFTER USING]

M. CAMPBELL'S CHREVOLION NO. 1, FOR _Restoring the Hair to its Natural
Color_.


This wonderful Preparation needs only to be used to be appreciated. It
is free from those objections that accompany preparations compounded
from minerals, which have been offered to the public in

    Imitation of Chrevolion.

      It will restore the natural color of the Hair with but
      two or three applications. It is a common practice
      with compounders, when presenting an article to the
      public, to advertise an array of testimonials
      purporting to be from distinguished persons, but I
      prefer to rest the success of the Chrevolion strictly
      upon its efficacious merit,

    KNOWING IT WILL DO ALL THAT IS CLAIMED.

[Illustration: Pointing hand] Sold by all the principal Druggists in this
country, and prepared by M. CAMPBELL, Broadway, N. Y., and South Clark
street, Chicago, Ill.




CAMPBELL'S CHREVOLION.

[Illustration: Ladies' Hair Dressing.]

[Illustration: BEFORE USING.]

[Illustration: AFTER USING.]

CHREVOLION No. 2, FOR PURIFYING AND WHITENING THE COMPLEXION AND

_Restoring the Growth of the Hair_.


This Complexion Purifyer is a Magical Curative for the Face and Scalp.
It will allay all Feverish Humor of the Skin, and remove Freckles,
Pimples Sunburn and other eruptions, leaving the Face soft, white and
beautiful, with

    _BUT TWO OR THREE APPLICATIONS_.

      Hundreds of cases, where the Hair was dropping, and
      Baldness seemed inevitable, have been effectually
      cured by the use of the Chrevolion.


PREPARED ONLY BY M. CAMPBELL.

Sold by all the principal Druggists in this country. Price $1.00 per
Bottle.




HAIR JEWELRY.

PRICE LIST.


    No.     Mount's.    Compl't.
    1       $ 5 50      $ 8 00
    2         3 75        6 00
    3         3 00        5 00
    4         5 25        8 00
    5         4 00        7 00
    6         4 50        7 00
    7         6 00       10 00
    8         5 50        8 00
    9        11 00       15 00
    10       10 00       12 50
    11        5 75        8 00
    12        5 00        7 00
    13        8 00       10 00
    14        6 00        8 00
    15        4 50        6 00
    16        9 00       10 00
    17        7 50       10 00
    18        6 50        8 00
    19       10 00       12 50
    20        9 00       12 50
    21        7 50       10 00
    22       10 00       12 50
    23        8 00       10 00
    24        7 50       10 00
    25       10 00       15 00
    26       12 50       15 00
    27        4 00        7 00
    28        4 00        8 00
    29       10 00       12 50
    30       10 00       12 50
    31       15 00       17 50
    32       15 00       17 50
    33       12 50       15 00
    34       12 50       15 00
    35       12 50       15 00
    36       12 50       15 00
    37       13 00       15 00
    38       11 00       12 50
    39       13 00       15 00
    40       13 00       15 00
    41       12 50       15 00
    42       11 00       12 50
    43       10 00       12 50
    44        8 00       10 00
    45        6 50        8 00
    46        6 50        8 00
    47        8 50       10 00
    48       10 00       12 00
    49        4 00        5 00
    50        4 00        5 00
    51        3 50        5 00
    52        7 00        8 00
    53        5 00        6 00
    54        6 50        8 00
    55       10 00       12 00
    56        5 00        6 00
    57        5 50        6 00
    58        7 00        8 00
    59        6 50        8 00
    60        8 50       10 00
    61        8 00       10 00
    62        6 00        7 00
    63       12 50       15 00
    64       15 00       17 50
    65       12 50       15 00
    66       15 00       17 50
    67       12 50       15 00
    68       12 50       15 00
    69       13 00       15 00
    70       11 00       12 50
    71       13 00       15 00
    72       13 00       15 00
    73       12 50       15 00
    74       11 00       12 50
    75       10 00       12 50
    76        8 00       10 00
    77        6 50        8 00
    78        6 50        8 00
    79        8 50       10 00
    80       10 00       13 00
    81       10 00       12 50
    82        8 00       10 00
    83       13 00       15 00
    84        6 00        8 00
    85        8 00       10 00
    86       10 00       12 50
    87        8 00       10 00
    88        6 50        8 00
    89       10 00       12 00
    90        8 00       10 00
    91        6 00        8 00
    92        4 50        6 00
    93       12 50       15 00
    94        6 00        8 00
    95       13 00       15 00
    96       12 00       15 00
    97       10 00       12 50
    98       10 00       12 50
    99       10 00       12 00
    100       5 00        7 00
    101       8 00       10 00
    102      12 50       15 00
    103       8 00        10 00
    104      10 00        12 00
    105       7 00         9 00
    106       6 00         8 00
    107       7 00         8 00
    108       6 00         7 00
    109       9 00        10 00
    110       6 00         7 00
    111      12 00        15 00
    112      13 00        15 00
    113      13 00        15 00
    114      12 00        15 00
    115       4 50         6 00
    116       4 00         5 00
    117       5 00         7 00
    118       5 00         7 00
    119       7 00         8 00
    120       5 00         6 00
    121       5 00         6 00
    122       7 00         8 00
    123       9 00        10 00
    124       6 00         7 00
    125       5 00         6 00
    126       6 00         7 00
    127       4 50         5 00
    128       7 00         8 00
    129       4 50         5 00
    130       5 00         6 00
    131       7 00         8 00
    132       5 50         6 00
    133       5 00         6 00
    134       5 50         6 00
    135       6 00         7 00
    136       5 50         6 00
    137       4 00         5 00
    138       4 25         5 00
    139       4 25         5 00
    140       6 00         8 00
    141       6 00         7 00
    142       5 00         6 00
    143       4 00         5 00
    144       3 00         5 00
    145       2 50         3 50
    146       4 00         5 00
    147       6 50         8 00
    148       4 00         5 00
    149       8 00        10 00
    150      10 00        12 00
    151       4 25         5 00
    152      10 00        12 00
    153       3 50         4 00
    154       3 50         4 00
    155       4 00         5 00
    156       5 25         6 00
    157       3 50         4 00
    158       3 50         4 50
    159       5 00         6 00
    160       3 00         3 50
    161       4 00         5 00
    162       3 50         4 00
    163       5 00         6 00
    164       4 50         5 00
    165       5 00         6 00
    166       4 00         4 50
    167       6 00         7 00
    168       4 00         4 50
    169       7 00         8 00
    170       6 00         7 00
    171       1 00         1 50
    172       4 50         5 00
    173      11 00        12 00
    174       3 50         4 00
    175       1 00         1 50
    176       9 50        10 00
    177       5 50         6 00
    178       3 00         4 00
    179       6 00         7 00
    180       1 50         2 00
    181       6 00         7 00
    182       2 50         3 00
    183       6 00         7 00
    184       4 50         5 00
    185       6 00         7 00
    186       4 50         5 00
    187       7 50         8 00
    188       5 50         6 00
    189       9 00        10 00
    190      11 00        12 00
    191       9 00        10 00
    192       3 50         5 00
    193       8 50        10 00
    194       3 50         5 00
    195      10 00        15 00
    196       5 00         8 00
    197       4 50         7 00
    198       4 00         6 00
    199       4 00         6 00
    200       6 00        10 00
    201      10 00        10 00
    202      12 00        15 00
    203      10 00        12 00
    204       6 50         8 00
    205       4 00         5 00
    206      10 00        12 00
    207       8 00        10 00
    208      10 00        12 00
    209       6 50         8 00
    210      12 00        13 00
    211       8 50        10 00
    212       9 00        10 00
    213       8 50        10 00
    214      10 00        12 00
    215       8 50        10 00
    216       6 00         7 00
    217      13 00        15 00
    218      13 00        15 00
    219       8 50        10 00
    220       8 50        10 00
    221       7 00         8 00
    222      10 00        12 00
    223       7 00         8 00
    224       8 50        10 00
    225       10 50        12 00
    226        8 50        10 00
    227       10 50        12 00
    228       14 00        15 00
    229       10 00        10 00
    230       14 00        15 00
    231        8 50        10 00
    232        8 50        10 00
    233       10 00        12 00
    234        7 50         9 00
    235        7 50         9 00
    236        6 75         8 00
    237        2 25         6 00
    238       11 00        15 00
    239        5 00        10 00
    240        3 50         7 00
    241        3 50         6 00
    242        4 50         7 00
    243        6 00         8 00
    244       12 00        20 00
    245       20 00        28 00
    246        8 00        12 00
    247        8 00        12 00
    248        8 00        10 00
    249       10 00        12 00
    250       25 00        30 00
    251       25 00        30 00
    252       13 00        15 00
    253        8 00        12 00
    254       18 00        20 00
    255       10 00        12 00
    256       12 00        15 00
    257        8 00        10 00
    258       10 00        12 00
    259        9 50        12 00
    260       10 00        12 00
    261       10 00        12 00
    262        8 00        10 00
    263       16 00        20 00
    264       10 00        12 00
    265       21 00        25 00
    266       25 00        30 00
    267        6 00         8 00
    268       20 00        25 00
    269       10 00        12 00
    270        3 50         6 00
    271        4 00         7 00
    272        4 50         8 00
    273        4 00         6 00
    274        9 00        12 00
    275        9 00        12 00
    276        7 50        10 00
    277        3 50         6 00
    278       18 00        20 00
    279       18 00        20 00
    280       17 00        20 00
    281        9 00        12 00
    282       12 00        15 00
    283        9 00        12 00
    284       16 00        20 00
    285       30 00        40 00
    286        9 00        12 00
    287        9 00        14 00
    288        4 50         6 00
    289        4 00         7 00
    290       18 00        20 00
    291       22 00        25 00
    292                     6 50
    293                     6 00
    294                     4 00
    295                     5 00
    296                     4 50
    297                     5 50
    298                     8 00
    299                     6 00
    300                     2 25
    301                     4 50
    302                     2 50
    303                     7 50
    304                     6 00
    305       18 00        20 00
    306       18 00        20 00
    307       23 00        25 00
    308       15 00        17 50
    309       22 00        25 00
    310       12 00        15 00
    311       23 00        25 00
    312       18 00        20 00
    313       23 00        25 00
    314       12 00        15 00
    315       15 00        18 00
    316       22 00        25 00
    317       18 00        20 00




INDEX.


    TITLE.                                      PAGE.

    Preface, 5

    Introductory Remarks, 7

    Position in Braiding, 8

    Square Chain Braid, 9

    Reverse Braid, 10

    Sixteen Twist Chain Braid, 11

    Striped Snake Chain Braid, 12

    Cable Chain Braid, 13

    Snake Chain Braid, 14

    Eight Square Chain Braid, 15

    Half Twist Chain Braid, 16

    Square Chain Braid, 17

    Cable Twist Chain Braid, 18

    Twist Chain Braid, 19 to 20

    Rib Chain Braid, 21

    Twist Chain Braid, 22

    Half Twist Chain Braid, 23

    Cable Chain Braid, 24

    Sixteen Square Chain Braid, 25

    German Twist Chain Braid, 26

    Fancy Square Chain Braid, 27 to 28

    Square Chain Braid, 29

    Fancy Twist Chain Braid, 30 to 32

    Double Chain Braid, 33

    Fancy Cable Chain Braid, 34

    Half Square Chain Braid, 35

    Twelve Square Chain Braid, 36

    Flat Twist Chain Braid, 37

    Rib Chain Braid, 38

    Fancy Cable Chain Braid, 39

    Square Chain Braid, 40

    Fob Chain Braid, 41

    Square Rib Chain Braid, 42

    Double Loop Chain Braid, 43

    Knot Chain Braid, 44

    Double Rib Chain Braid, 45

    Fancy Chain Braid, 46 to 51

    Double Rib Chain Braid, 52

    Rope Chain Braid, 53

    Diamond Shaped Chain Braid, 54

    Fancy Square Chain Braid, 55 to 58

    Fancy Twist Chain Braid, 59

    Flat Chain Braid, 60

    Necklace Pattern Braid, 61 to 67

    Necklace or Edging Braid, 68

    Necklace or Head Dress Braid, 69

    Ring Pattern Braids, 70 to 81

    Ring or Bracelet Braids, 82 to 84

    Bracelet Tight Braids, 85 to 87

    Elastic Bracelet Braids, 88 to 89

    Double Elastic Bracelet Braid, 90

    Fancy Tight Bracelet Braid, 91

    Reverse Tight Bracelet Braid, 92

    Banded Tight Bracelet Braid, 93

    Plain Open Braid, 94

    Open Fine Braid, 95

    Open Fine Braid, 96

    Open Fine Lace Braid, 97 to 98

    Basket Tight Braid, 99

    Tight Braid, 100

    Acorn Tight Braid, 101

    Half Tight Braid, 102

    Fancy Tight Braid, 103

    Plain Tight Braid, 104

    Acorn Braid, 105

    Half Open Braid, 106

    Overshot Braid, 107

    Diamond Tight Braid, 108

    Spiral Striped Braid, 109

    Empress Tight Braid, 110

    Open Check Braid, 111

    Scotch Plaid Braid, 112

    Half Open Braid, 113

    Open Striped Braid, 114

    Chinchilla Open Braid, 115

    Fancy Lace Braid, 116

    Striped Elastic Braid, 117

    Open Striped Braid, 118

    Wide Striped Braid, 119

    Neapolitan Tight Braid, 120

    Open Braid, 121

    Directions for New Beginners, 122

    Braiding Table No. 1, 123

    Braiding Table No. 2, 124

    Braiding Table and position in Braiding, 125

    Wood Braiding Bobbins, 127

    Lead Braiding Bobbins, 128

    Lead Weight Bobbins, 129

    Forms for Braiding Over, 130 to 131

    Explanations on Bracelets, 132 to 136

    Lithograph Designs, 137 to 238

    Weaving Hair for Switches, 239

    Sewing Switches, 240

    Weaving Hair for Curls, 241

    Making and Preparing Curls, 242

    Weaving Hair for Wigs, 243

    Making Waterfalls or Bows, 244

    Making Puffs and Coils, 245

    Explanations on Hair Dressing, 246

    Hair Dressing, 247 to 259

    Synoptic of Human Hair, 260 to 265

    Retail Department, 266

    Wig Manufactory, 267

    Manufacturing Department, 268

    Campbell's Chrevolion, 269

    Campbell's Chrevolion, No. 1, 270

    Campbell's Chrevolion, No. 2, 271

    Price List, 272 to 274

    Index, 275 to 276

       *       *       *       *       *

Transcriber's Notes:

Obvious punctuation errors repaired.

Some patterns began with small caps and some did not. For the sake of
consistancy, all patterns now begin with small caps. This will show up
as ALL CAPS in the text version.

Index, the page numbers were missing and the transcriber supplied them
for the following entries: Preface; Introductory Remarks; Position in
Braiding; and Square Chain Braid.

Page 10, repeated word "and" removed from text. Original read (and and
lift over table)

Page 13, "very" changed to "vary" (vary the size of the braid)

Page 36, 43, "t" changed to "it" (Keep it fast)

Page 50, "ocross" changed to "across" (B over across Nos. 2)

Page 127, "srtand" changed to "strand" (four hairs in a strand)

Page 246, "llustrative" changed to "illustrative" (engravings
illustrative of a)

Page 251, "prefably" changed to "preferably" (it preferably suits a
brown)

Page 271, "effectualy" changed to "effectually" (been effectually cured
by)

Page 272, missing "3" added to table, fourth line

    (3         3 00        5 00)






End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Self-Instructor in the Art of Hair Work, by
Mark Campbell

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK SELF-INSTRUCTOR IN ART OF HAIR WORK ***

***** This file should be named 38658.txt or 38658.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/3/8/6/5/38658/

Produced by Chris Curnow, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
produced from images generously made available by The
Internet Archive)


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

